The Chief ot the Catalan police, #MajorTrapero, who coordinated the response to the Barcelona terrorist attacks, has been relegated to administrative tasks in a small police station. Meanwhile, police officers who attacked voters during the referendum will receive medals. pic.twitter.com/0o6lU2L6Z1 
Cunning Brexit plan #342. Give leavers a blue passport and just tell them we’ve left. 
I've noticed a sudden increase in @LeaveEUOfficial troll/bot activity.  It had died down a lot and we just had a few Kool Aid drinkers to deal with.  It seems to me that the farms are unleashing again - maybe in preparation for an upcoming referendum rerun or collapse of UK gov't 
Now that even the fishermen of Grimsby want an exit from Brexit, it's best if we just forget we ever had that referendum. 
Only half-way through the week. Here are are some of the "niceties" I've gotten in connection to Brexit so far -- here or, always my favourite, via email to work: Russiaphobe; cunt; EU apologiser; idiot; EU whore (again); virtue-signalling bitch ... #happydays ... 
#Newsnight It is the Tories holding up Brexit with their insistance of the "Henry VIII clause"It will enable them to act like dictators & change or Toryify Laws ie Employment Protect without asking the Commons - The PeopleTHIS ISN'T DEMOCRACY OR TAKING BACK CONTROL - AGREE RT  
Tremendous work this - reads like a real clear the air piece from a highly competent former SIS officer  
What did the EU do for us? Brexit heartlands want someone else to pay. Sad but true.  
What is the true extent of Russia's interference in Brexit through social media and did it have any impact? Pioneering investigations by @J_amesp  
The mutineers will be unable to delay and frustrate #Brexit if the exit date is set in the Bill. That is why they are so vehemently opposed.  
Rolls Royce has a warning about post-Brexit border checks #brexitwontwork#stopbrexit 
The Iraqi parliament bans public displays of ‘Zionist’ symbols weeks after Kurdish independence referendum saw Israeli flag appear during rallies; sudden move likely attributed to Israel’s open solidarity with Kurds and support for their independence.   
Only ‘betrayal’ would be to rubber stamp sweeping powers for a tiny handful of ministers post Brexit. Get a grip & some perspective @DailyMailUK 
It's like that everywhere. Remember in the UK people didn't know what they were voting for when they voted for Brexit. 
In 2016, Russian bots were busy supporting Brexit, too:  
Labour Brexiteer John Mann takes a SWIPE at his own party over Brexit deadline  
'We don’t want a crisis!' Macron ally concedes 'hard' Brexit would DAMAGE French economy   
Thanks so much to @IanDunt for an inspired talk @BathforEurope today. Our government is of such low quality and the expected brexit damage so severe, we must carry on making the arguments to #StopBrexit and minimise its damage. 
Congrats you really are doing something very right lots of support from those of us who share the view that Brexit is a an economic suicide note that must be reversed  
The only realistic option that could one day deliver Brexit is to ask for an extension of time under Article 50, ie stay a full member for a while longer whilst HMG sorts itself out and gets its papers in order. The alternative to that, is we revoke Article 50 and remain.  
The SNP have no mandate or power to call a referendum.You know it. I know it. Sturgeon knows it & Prime Minister Theresa May knows it. 
JUST BCOS WE SAID WE R NOT VOTING IN NIGERIA ELECTION AGAIN TILL THEY GIVE US A DATE FOR REFERENDUM THEY’VE SENT BOKOHARAM ARMY TO KILL US  
So @UKLabour once again all your amendments are turning to ash... Where the Fuck do you go next? A #brexit for jobs huh?Delusion pure fucking delusion.Wake up! #Brexit will sink the #UK. 
Just take this in, staggering #Brexit  
Feckless Brits have to learn to knuckle down after Brexit, writes Alice Thomson  
@JeremyCorbyn you say we should RemainReform, but you won't force a 2nd ref cos 1st Brexit ref has been framed as The Will Of The People & you value that above all else.If we all sign up for #FinalSay then it's a clear sign we want to #StopBrexit, yes? 
That is truly pathetic. She doesn't seem even to know what the Bill is about, let alone engaging with its detail.  The Bill is about life AFTER Brexit not about us leaving.  We did not vote to give up Parliamentary democracy.  Unbelievably idle and irresponsible of her. 
Fascinating to talk to @JustinWelby this eve: he had strong words for Tgraph Brexit Mutineers front page calling it ‘vilification’ 
Yeah, that's the sad part, he undermines democracies and promotes chaos like Brexit and sick people like Le Pen - not a peep about Ukraine or Putin wonder why... 
Latest attempts to change key Brexit bill rejected in Commons  
Russia had 150,000 Twitter accounts for Brexit? Way more than that original 201. That's one Russian Twitter account for every 5 swing victory votes.    
Another day, another vote, this time on protecting EU citizens' rights. Again Labour abstain. Unbelievable. #Brexit #WithdrawalBill 
This is cloud cuckoo land, the universe in which #Brexit must and should happen, but it’s somebody else, anybody else, who must live with the inconvenient consequences of leaving the biggest free trade area in the world, writes @jennirsl 
Theresa May 'close to offering financial deal to progress Brexit negotiations'  
Someone in your position shouldn't tweet like that . Totally unprofessional.I cannot wait until we are clear of your EU bullying and paid anti Brexit propaganda. Worrying times ahead ..... for the EU not us  
Very striking how #Corbyn does everything he possibly can to avoid talking about Brexit - it's the elephant in the Cobynite room. 
The Leave EU site is controlled by absolute scum. No one called anti EU campaigners 'traitors' for the 43 years they took to overturn a referendum or critised their patriotism. Your twitter feed is nothing but vicious, evil, bile. 
They are not betraying their voters. They are standing up for them. Because Brexit will destroy this country.  
Calling out the “Green Brexit” bullshit: “There is no logic to suggest that Brexit creates new opportunities to strengthen environmental governance.” #hugahusky 
Please retweet and share this. For just over the price of a coffee you get to have a say in democracy. Have a part in history. #brexit   
This is absolutely astonishing - James Dyson the manufacturer who Brexiters keep mentioning as backing Brexit (bc there are so few) actually moved production of his vacuum cleaners out of the UK to Malaysia bc we didn't join the Euro. #Brexshit #Dyshit  
MPs vote 313 to 297 to reject Labour's new clause to ensure environmental principles under EU Treaty continue to apply in the UK after Brexit 
The Gov has voted down New Clause 30 to the #EUWithdrawalBillThis clause ensured that the EU's high standard of protections for animals would be carried on after Brexit:  
You might well ask....lost the animal sentience amendment by just 18 votes - so disappointing #EUWithdrawalBill #Brexit  
150,000 Russian-language Twitter accounts discovered a passion for "Brexit" on the eve of the vote  
'We ARE leaving!' Brexit Minister slams Labour MP for refusing to accept EU exit date  
Heaver puts Soubry in her place for her persistent peddling of a fake Brexit. Well done, Michael.  
If you listened to James Dyson last Sunday you will know exactly what rights workers are going to get after Brexit VERY FEW!! 
As the case for Brexit collapses (pretending there ever was one), expect to see a lot of UK newspapers desperately trying to ‘remainwash’ themselves. 
#Russia's role in #Brexit. #RussiaGate #EUref #repealbill #EUWithdrawalBill #StopBrexit #ExitFromBrexit #FBPE #Putin #Putinbot 
Brilliant from @weehighlandlass on the news that The Speaker has said he expects the Govt to produce the 58 Brexit reports within 10 days.  
If you want a taste of Post brexit borders, then travel between Serbia, Croatia, Montenegro. Borders take 2-6 hours to clear #StopBrexit 
So I am sat here all on my own to watch Blade Runner 2049, a follow up film about a dystopian future. Sounds a bit like Brexit Britain. My first Senior Citizen ticket. Will I stay awake? 
No-one can any longer claim, with any hope of being taken seriously outside the UK, that the referendum outcome was the will of the people. Frankly, I think that was the case long before we knew of Russian meddling, but now it is unarguably so. 
Well look who’s back from her Brexit. #Blindspot 
Noel Gallagher talks Brexit: "Fucking get over it"  pic.twitter.com/By0mmAJjsG 
Brexit ‘impact assessments’, from all that's been said and written remain an essential part of the final decision to leave or remain in the EU. 
If you don't already, I'd highly recommend following @chrisgreybrexit. one of the very best Brexit bloggers around. I agree with every word of this excellent analysis.  
Researcher finds just 400 tweets from Russia aimed at #Brexit vote  
Interesting point for anyone who questions whether Twitter impacts real life: it does.My article on identifying trolls not only prompted a real life reaction, but went round the right-wing like wildfire. Remember that next time they say social media had no impact in Brexit  
Intelligence watchdog urged to look at Russian influence on Brexit vote  
So @Anna_Soubry says Tory #Brexit rebel MPs are being bullied. Meanwhile 17,410,742 Leavers have been called old, stupid, gullible, misinformed, uneducated, xenophobic racists. So, Anna, spare us your pitiful victimhood. 
Let’s be clear here: The votes of Scottish Tory MPs could’ve made the difference but instead they acted as lobby fodder to make it easier to tear up employment rights, environmental protections, health & safety standards, consumer standards and standards of equalities #Brexit  
Dear working class Brexit voters: you just got punched in the face. Still, who wants employment rights, consumer rights, and environmental protections, eh?  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and your Country and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
A Tory MP has revealed threats against her have been reported to police after she was branded among "Brexit mutineers" on a newspaper's front page  
The Tory whips turn on their own to ensure that the handful of Brexit Tories can get their hard Brexit. Bugger the fact that most MPs would rather stay in the EU or have a Norway type deal. There is no mandate for a hard Brexit in parliament or in the country. #StopBrexit 
All Scotland's Labour MPs refused to vote to give Scottish Parliament a say in Brexit. They have sold out their own country. 
Re-reading Gove's pamphlet opposing the Good Friday Agreement I'm always struck by the opening passages, where he sets out total opposition to many aspects of British public life. For him Brexit might be just the start 
#bbcfakenewsflash pictures emerge of #VladimirPutin phoning 17.4 million people offering them a bottle of Vodka if they vote #Brexit  
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "A clean exit from the European Union is hugely economically advantageous and cutting tariffs will benefit the poor in society. "So there are real opportunities. It’s exciting to get #Brexit."  
I wonder if James @Dyson is still so cocky about his post-Brexit future?! Thanks to Rosemary Schonfeld for this pic of the #Dyson vacuum graveyard at at tip in Devon!#StopBrexit #BrexitMutineers #BrexitCrisis pic.twitter.com/ZARZAez9T7 
Mainstream media:Trump is bad, EU is good, Russia is bad, Islam is good, nationalism is bad, open borders is good, populism is bad, socialism is good, Brexit is bad, Euro is good, East Europe is bad, migration is good, war is bad, NATO war is good, WikiLeaks is bad, CNN is good  
.As MP labelled Brexit ‘mutineer’ reports death threats to police - Remember THISIn Aug 2017 The Telegraph launched its NEW BRAND campaign"Words Chosen Well". 
Traitors, a cancer, the violent intolerant language given license by #Brexit. Is this who we want to be?  
Me! Me! I'm a "Brexit Mutineer" and European Patriot. How dare this "Government" wrench my identity from me. I'm one of the 48 million, NOT one of the 17 million. This is UNdemocratic & Fascist. #BrexitMutineers 
Repeat After Me (By orders of the NeoCon Thought Police) : @RT_com is a joke- its pundits are cranks and no one watches it!@RT_com poses a grave threat to western democracy and must be taken off air because it’s influencing elections and referendum results!’ 
When you start to wonder if the Brexit negotiations could get any worse, just imagine if these numpties were negotiating...#NoDeal #brexit  
so focused on 2016 US Election, but my hypothesis is Russia social media had a bigger impact in #Brexit than US  
Twitter accounts based in Russia posted 45,000 tweets in 48 hours to "disrupt" last year's Brexit vote.  
The Gov just defeated New Clause 58 of the #EUWithdrawalBill - meaning that EU derived rights relating to consumer standards, employment & more can be now amended by Ministers after Brexit.  
More than 400 Kremlin linked Twitter accounts active in the U.S. also waded into "Brexit"  
Greatest Brexit speech ever? LABOUR MP Peter Shore ’s address will make your neck hairs stand up  
Perhaps also the worst, most incompetent Opposition.  But, since Brexit is a fact-free belief system, no amount of reasoning will persuade Labour's leaders to change direction.  
Bloody funny the telegraph " naming and shaming" tory anti brexit rebels. Instead has created first wave of heroes!! 
If this isn't a contempt of Parliament, it should be. This account fawns over the brexit elite: billionaire disaster capitalists, tax-dodgers and Putin. But it hates our judges, our parliament and our laws and constitution. It hates our country.  
Brexit impact studies? Yup, they're available. Well, the European Parliament ones are, because #transparency and #workethic.via @RCorbettMEP 
This mornings videoWatch ‘Treason May’ vomit back up the sick of Brexit..  
When butt hurt #Remainers swarm over your timeline insisting Brexit won’t happen, direct them to the nearest ... pic.twitter.com/MwhyDIzWk6 
Grimsby voted 70% to leave the EU. Now wants exemption from Brexit as £ falls and costs rise, prospect of customs delays. Reality starts to hit. #c4news 
#C4News Grimsby voted 70% to leave the EU but is now asking for special ‘free port’ treatment to avoid huge tariff increases and protect it from the fall in the pound arising from Brexit. Oh dear. 
I see scope for a deepening of Irish-US relations post-#Brexit when Ireland will be the sole English-speaking country in the EU. A bridge between #US & #EU. 
Places that voted for Brexit and now want special treatment to protect them from the consequences can get to fuck. 
At last progress.The 15 Tory MPs challenging May on Brexit:Ken ClarkeHeidi AllenJonathan DjanoglyVicky FordDominic GrieveStephen HammondOliver HealdJeremy LefroyPaul MastertonNicky MorganBob NeilAntoinette SandbachAnna SoubryTom TughendhatSarah Wollaston 
And there you have what Brexit is all about the Tories' assault on hard won rights and protections. 
So EU standards on environmental, labour, equality and consumer law can be changed after Brexit by ministers without an Act of Parliament...  
Warnings from car makers, farmers, tech companies, banks, airlines, port authorities and many more that catastrophe looms. This is not speculation. This is not scaremongering. This is not Project Fear. This is Brexit. 
Just voted to protect employment rights, environmental protections, equalities, health and safety and consumer rights post-Brexit. The Government voted our amendment down. #EUWithdrawalBill #BrexitShambles 
Did Theresa May seriously criticise Labour's position on Brexit at today's PMQ's?!  
Alongside the Electoral Commission's investigations into Leave campaigners, all these Russian Twitter revelations are making #Brexit look less and less like the "will of the people". 
Some very ugly pro-Leave tweets cropping up on "traitors" etc. Reminds me of the New European tweets hoping for a cold winter to kill off Brexit voters. Plague on both houses. 
David Davis has been ignoring requests for Brexit talks with Trade Unions. He is talking with business groups but has no interest in how Brexit will affect workers... #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Daniel Hannan MEP - "Our total trade with the EU amounts to 12.6% of our GDP. We have a large domestic economy, we’re a big home market and most of our trade is outside the EU." #Brexit  
We deserve a brand new (post-Brexit) UK immigration system that admits only the best and the brightest essential skilled foreign experts to work here on a limited work-permit system (1–3 years). Seasonal workers (farm, etc.) admitted for just one season. Home-bound after that. 
Will you invite any of them in to explain how their Brexit plan is going to work? 
Please go along to support our great friend @albawhitewolf (Madeleina Kay) on BBC Any Questions this Friday in Elland. See below for ticket details. #Brexit  
The telegraph @christopherhope finally reflecting what the readers think. The Tory party needs to get on with Brexit & show some grit  
"....and act in the country's best interest. ..Best reiteration of "MPs are not delegates." and #Article50 was advisory- not mandatory.  Said so on the tin.Good old #BritishCommonSense#Brexit  
In 24 hours:Scottish Labour MPs abstain on veto for Holyrood on Brexit.Scottish Labour's opposition to minimum pricing in tatters.Scottish Labour's interim leader Alex Rowley steps down amid misconduct claims.For the Party, not the people. 
"#Brexit has become like someone who booked a trip to #Dignitas who were told they were dying but now have been told the diagnoses was wrong. But they are going to go ahead with #euthanasia anyway cause they already decided... My take on @robertshrimsley's reader comment in @FT 
This has been a revealing and useful moment. Press targeting of Brexit critics no longer has the effect it did before.  
And just 12 vote majority for Govt on that Brexit vote. Getting closer. Well get them on one of these votes. 
."It is their egos that are driving the country into the Brexit abyss, into economic disaster & world isolation.". 
The year is 2052. Brexit still hasn't happened. The brain of David Davis has been transplanted into a chimp. He still hasn't decided on  a font for the negotiations. PAPYRUS! he screams to himself in his cell. 
A list of everyone who wants an exemption from Brexit thus far: bankers, farmers, Next, fishermen, universities, businesses, Cornwall..  
The government is pushing its Brexit bill through the Commons. But as @BBCNormanS has been finding out, not all Conservative MPs are on board... 
Tory majority down to 16 on that Brexit vote. Plenty more to come. We're going nowhere. 
Tragically, this is a correct assessment of where Brexit Britain is at right now. 
"The man (John Redwood) who will not let one day pass without emphasising how well Britain is going to do out of #Brexit is at the same time talking down markets & encouraging capital flight. That's what disaster capitalists do." (Jon Luydendijk, Guardian) 
Must Read. Even by @J_amesp standards this is an astonishing piece describing disinformation & provocation. "Leave.EU is markedly pro-Russia and also deeply tied to the Trump/Russia affair, not least through Cambridge Analytica" 
Pleased to see my MP in the Telegraph’s roll of honour as one of a small band of Tory MPs who are working in the interests of the country. You understand the dangers a hard Brexit poses to us all - keep up the pressure. 
Hint: She blocked me when I reminded her of 2007; we met briefly at the peak of “Okoa Kenya” referendum push but her eyes were full of betrayal and none of righteous anger.  
#a50challengeOur democracy has been hijacked by @theresa_may. After the advisory referendum, MPs should have debated whether to leave, or #RemainInTheEU. They should have voted on it. They have not. Instead, May just announced she had decided for us, hence this case. Support it! 
Sarah...good news in part but 37% of the electorate expressing an opinion in a non-binding test of opinion neither justifies the political decision to act as if #Brexit's mandatory nor the denial of a democratic #FinalSay in 2018 2 Confirm or #StopBrexit. Democracy not Autocracy. 
."Britain has suddenly woken up to the prospect that Russia may have interfered in last year’s EU referendum". 
The divided legal opinion on #EEA after Brexit makes clear that leaving or staying in the EEA is a political decision. If we are to take back control, then it must be Parliament, not the government, that decides on #EEA membership 
Russia used hundreds of fake accounts to tweet about Brexit, data shows  
The biased BBC refused to be impartial on Brexit, when 17.4m Brits voted to quit the corrupt EU, but they're very open minded about murderous tyrant Robert Mugabe...  
Surely Theresa May is not ignorant of the role of Putin in successfully  sowing discord in the UK already via its active measures promoting  Brexit, anti-Muslim and anti-immigrant bias, etc.?  
Brexit populism targets the democratic process - @FT View on Tory “mutineers” who are simply doing their jobs and protecting parliamentary democracy against the voice of the mob   
The Solicitor General accepts the result of the EU referendum, unlike bitter Remoaner extremists eg Soubry  
Beyond the "I'm the rebel" quote, the clip of Ken Clarke went on to say in his splendid speech is the best summary of the con that was pulled -and continues to be pulled- on the British public by the #Brexit extremists. A vital two minutes, absolutely worth your time and your RT.  
February 2015: the Constitutional Court rules that several articles of Catalonia’s law of consultations are unconstitutional and strikes down the presidential order calling a mock referendum for November 9. 
Will Continuity Remain ever give up on trying to stop Brexit? (My latest for Reaction @reactionlife) 
So where are the brexit impact studies? Shouldn't the parties have them before voting on the brexit implementation legislation in Parliament? 
Painting over the promises hasn't helped. The wheels on the Brexit bus are really starting to come off (). 
Interesting. I'm hearing that in private EU officials are assuring key allies (non-EU members) that Brexit will not mean tariffs on future goods trade between UK and EU. No reason why it should but that's hardly what they're saying in public. 
Rt. Hon. Winston Peters MP, Deputy Prime Minister of New Zealand and Foreign Minister of New Zealand: "Brexit is...an excellent opportunity to heal a rift dating back to 1973...It’s not just a wake up for the UK, or the EU, but to democracies everywhere." pic.twitter.com/FYcXkjec2l 
This is what hard Brexit means in real life to real people. Except bankers obviously, they get to stay.  
No deal Brexit could add £1500 to the price of an average car, say manufacturers. Govt must secure a Brexit deal that works for British people and businesses.  
This bears repeating for as long as Brexiters keep insisting that hard Brexit or even no deal Brexit is the 'will of the people'. For that matter, when was leaving e.g Euratom or the EMA even mentioned during the Referendum?  
Frankly Mr Bowie the entire country is sick and tired of the hash politicians are making of Brexit. We voted to leave, get on with it !  
Russia used a network of 150,000 Twitter accounts to meddle in Brexit   
#EUWithdrawalBill Claims that the #Leave campaign said that #Brexit must mean leaving the #SingleMarket are certainly not true of all their campaigners: 
Some domestic violence charities get 40% of their income from EU funding. Government must report on how they will replicate this after Brexit. Tweet your MP asking if they will support amends 385 and NC77 by @jessphillips now! 
BREXIT:So, the 17,410,742 people that voted to Leave the EU are not just racists, xenophobes, bigots and/or old white people... now they were conned & duped by Russia. pic.twitter.com/xFLAPvoxlS 
Brexit bros @LeaveEUOfficial now deleted tweet about "traitor" MPs being a "cancer". But they've left up video of me being violently assaulted & threatened with gun. As has Twitter. Acceptable?  
This is horrific. Describing people who disagree with you as a "cancer" and a "traitor" is  something else. Want to know why Brexit has divided the country? Because rhetoric like this is becoming normalised by people like that.  
What ending Freedom of Movement really means. One rule for bankers. Another for the rest of us #Brexit  
Study: Russian Twitter bots sent 45k Brexit tweets close to vote  by @riptari 
UK government funds Matthew Herbert's Brexit Big Band  
I am both saddened and amazed at the pro EU propaganda and scaremongering that is still prevalent in the mainstream, when the #EU has shown a real hatred towards the UK throughout the #Brexit negotiations. I cannot wait to bear witness to the independence of our great nation. 
Because the vast majority of UK voters are either one nation Tories or Social Democrats. Brexit is exposing the Left & Right wing extremists.  
What is with the right wing press that anyone expressing a dissenting view is  seen as some kind of traitor? Disagreeing with the @GOVUK is called #democracy. It happens. Get over it. #brexit #bremain #BrexitMutineers 
#Paddington2 review: Brexit, pursued by a bear  
Dear UK citizens,The #Dutch government is debating right now whether to slash divident tax with 1,400,000,000 euros for big companies. Their main argument: Big companies will move from Amsterdam to London AFTER #BrexitSo, 'REMAIN' lied? Media lied? #dividendbelasting 
My speech during the Committee Stage of the EU (Withdrawal) Bill:  Made the point that Brexit is an opportunity to raise standards, not reduce them! Taking back control means keeping good standards & regulations and improving where necessary.  
We're in this mess due to 1) A gerrymandered referendum 2) Delivering a referendum act devoid of a threshold 3) Totally ignoring the advisory nature of the legislation. Various opportunists then took advantage of what was essentially handed to them on a plate. #esnewsviews 
The New Statesman is right: "Rather than reaching out to Remain voters, Brexiteers have treated their narrow 52-48 referendum victory as a landslide." However, the option remains for a new referendum, or for stopping Brexit, as more falsehoods are exposed.  
Why the delay? Surely these papers are framing the governments #Brexit plans and so should be immediately available. Unless @DavidDavisMP lied !!! 
The Brexit Secretary has made sure Brexit will be fine… if you’re a banker 
MUST-WATCH: @patmcfaddenmp powerfully argues that the Gov't has a choice on Brexit between prosperity & nationalism - RT if you agree.  
So Kent joins Cornwall, Wales, Farmers & Grimsby...all of whom voted overwhelming for brexit & all now want money, special investment, consideration post brexit! 
Brexit/Russia.Facts. And. Figures.Via me and @Byline_Media 
Today's @ScotNational column on the important loss of influence Scotland (and the UK) face if brexit happens and what is at stake for our campaigning charities. 
No evidence of Russian interference in #Brexit, Theresa May admits in parliament.  
#Brexit is causing many people to forget the lessons of history. History has taught us that we ignore the rise of right wing populism at our peril.  As such, these wise words from @SarahButter4 really resonate right now.  
195,000 tweets deep, complete with memes as you've never seen it beforeBrexit: The Russian JobVia @Byline_Media 
No one has done more to uphold the democratically expressed wishes against #BREXIT of the electorate in North of Ireland than @M_AndersonSF - a formidable political leader. #56% #designatedspecialstatus 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
As Brexit begins to bite, Britain's economic future is not the only thing in question. In 2018, Britain could lose its "street cred" pic.twitter.com/O6Pioz2Ghj 
Meeting with PM @theresa_may in 10 Downing Street today.My impression is that progress in the #Brexit talks is possible. There is a willingness for compromise.  
The result of the Australian “gay marriage” referendum was no great surprise. They ran the campaign, textbook, from Ireland, as expected. And “Yes” won as could have been expected. It took cast iron stupidity to run the “No” campaign from the same textbook.  
So, it now turns out that all the chat about EU workers leaving the UK in droves was Remain propaganda too? Time to face the facts & back Brexit! 
Car manufacturers need to know by March if UK vehicle certification will still be accepted in the EU after Brexit, a senior vice president of Honda has warned. 9- 12 months needed to set up type-approval in another country.#StopBrexit #standupfordemocracy #bremain 
I just typed “Brexit” into Amazon and it came up “People who bought Brexit also bought the Trump Presidency”#russia #putin 
The accounts with 'Brexit saboteur' in their bios, what do they actually plan to do?Mass posting of #StopBrexit hastags?Make little 'Stop Brexit' placards & stand outside Westminster?Write opinion pieces for the Guardian?Yeah, that's really going to work.  
Russian bots dropped 45,000 garbage tweets on us during the Brexit referendum  
Brexit is creating uncertainty on interest rates for Bank of England, deputy governor says  
Certain Brexiteers will say this is the last desperate attempt to undermine Brexit with a Russia conspiracy theory. Others might ask if their lives have been hijacked by a combo of “useful idiots” and hi-tech interference 
David Davis' migration plan: 1. Privileges bankers and the better off.2. Treats people as commodities not individuals.3. Will create more red-tape.4. Depends on EU countries' agreement.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
When you think you've caught a Russian Brexit bot but he's actually a security guard from Glasgow...  
Instead of bickering with Donald Trump and spending time trying to overturn Brexit perhaps Mr. Khan needs to spend more time running London? I think that's his job?  
.@heidi_mp: “In last year’s referendum there was only one question on the ballot paper... The words #EEA or #SingleMarket did not feature.Some people say ‘everyone knew it meant we would be leaving SM’, but that is simply an interpretation of the result”#EUWithdrawalBill pic.twitter.com/CFsCsyoyaM 
This is a Despite Brexit so intense you have to look at it through one of those slabs of UV-blocking glass you use to watch a solar eclipse (if you're not President Homer Simpson).  
#FakeNewsAs a keen tweeter on #Brexit there was only about 15-20 main influential Pro-Brexit accounts, all of them still running today and all of them interacting with their followers. Complete Bollocks from the The Times #FakeNews 
There seems to be lots of hard evidence that the #Brexit Referendum was heavily influenced by Putin. Why isn't #BrexitRussia & #PutinsPuppet bigger news?We demand a recount. #standupfordemocracy#BrexitMutineers #StopBrexit 
It seems that the post referendum exodus of EU nationals the pundits kept referring to was a fiction.  
"The Lords will not be silenced on this matter" says a crossbench peer on Brexit.  
We're sorry You got conned by some Russians and a bunch of toffs with hidden agendas, its not to late to wake up, don't be angry with the remainers who know brexit will be bad for us, #Brexit is not going to be utopia you've been promised, time to wake up & #StopBrexit 
Britain's carmakers warn they may face "semi-catastrophic" production interruptions after Brexit  
I've got it. The perfect Brexit compromise.We'll save the economy & guarantee rights for EU & UK citizens.In return, we stay in the EU. 
The government are wrong to be narrowing down our options for Brexit by ruling out #EEA #EFTA membership. That is why we need to amend the #EUWithdrawalBill by supporting @heidi_mp & @ChrisLeslieMP amendments /1 
Record numbers of EU workers in UK since Brexit  
Whether or not the Trump/Brexit campaigns took help from Moscow is an important question. But it has little to do with why millions of people voted for them. 
Great speech from @heidi_mp on putting the economic interests of the country before the nationalist ideology driving the Government’s approach to Brexit. 
EU Brexit chiefs meet Sinn Féin MEP "@M_AndersonSF about Border, citizens’ rights and Good Friday Agreement @EUparliament @POLITICOEurope 
Excellent speech by @heidi_mp on #EUWithdrawalBill: staying in EEA could be compromise we need to deliver Brexit without damaging economy 
Co-operation within the EU is vital to tackling FGM, trafficking, and the safety of women fleeing DV. Government must report on how they will replicate this after Brexit. Tweet your MP asking if they will support amends 385 and NC77 by @jessphillips now! 
Wise words from @Andrew_Adonis "My own view is that the wisest leadership is to stop the whole Brexit fiasco...to tell the British people straight, that on June 23rd 2016 they were sold a pup by political fraudsters....a democracy which cannot change its mind is not a democracy." 
Disagree with the Wetherspoon's Brexit beer mat manifestos? Print this out to stick over them if you happen to be in one soon:  
On Aston Martin’s recent comments: “Germany alone exports 820,000 cars to the UK. It is absurd to predict trade will not continue between the UK and the EU post-Brexit”. @UKIP #UKIP 
Brexit is a SCAM. It's not for or of the people. It will irreparably damage our economy & global standing. Time to rescind A50 , fully investigate , with register of MPs & financiers interests. #stopbrexit #putinwantsbrexit #houseofcards 
It was only then that I realised my tweets were used by Russian agents to ferment Brexit, which was nice.  
Formula E will leave Britain if no Brexit deal, says CEO  
Racist Brits votes #Brexit. Even though as many pointed out, it’s economic suicide. Now that it’s failing, Brits blame Russia. You can’t make this stuff up.  
We need to #StandUpForDemocracy. People cannot be bullied as part of the #Brexit debate. People only want what is best for their community! #LeaveWatch 
Russia had 150,000 Twitter accounts for Brexit? Wow, way more than that original 201!  
Tory rebels press ahead with their plans to rewrite vital Brexit laws. Traitors One & All!  
A total disgrace! @Telegraph is taking part in a witch-hunt to bully people trying to do right by their community #Brexit #LeaveWatch 
David Davis promises City of London special post-Brexit travel regime FFS! Free movement - but only for bankers!  
In Brexit negotiations British ignorance of Ireland is no longer bliss:  @GuitarMoog @BrexitBin 
Remoaner pundits are desperate to say that the referendum was won by a handful of alleged "Russian bots" that nobody read.They must have missed the massive grassroots campaign we were running at the time!   
The very fact that any MP who speaks against Brexit is accused of being a traitor, is alone sufficient reason to call off Brexit. It is a fascist agenda. 
My intervention on @PeterGrantMP: . We leave voters knew exactly what we were voting for in the EU Referendum. I found leave voters were very intelligently engaged with the issues at stake. The SNP are wrong to suggest otherwise.  
Britain risks losing its reputation as a scientific research powerhouse as a result of Brexit says chair of the public accounts select committee. 
WATCH | #JacobReesMogg:  "There will be an enormous #Brexit bonus for the government - £135bn  extra - if we follow the right policies in respect of Brexit."  @theresa_may @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #Conservative #UK #EU #NEWS #BBC #SKY #LABOUR #UKIP 
Independent: Brussels will have to deal with the #Catalan problem as well as Brexit  
Also health secretary - sarah wollaston, education - Antoinette sandbach, Brexit sec - Vicky ford, defence - oliver heald and and Scottish sec paul masterston tho he looks like a transport sec 
Up to 21 Tory rebels now against Mrs May's "Brexit Day law".  And two ministers have indicated they could resign next autumn if exit deal is bad for UK  
The great #JacobReesMogg has revealed how the #UK could benefit by £135BN if we have a clean #Brexit.  This man truly backs #Britain and is looking ahead to huge opportunities. #Remoaners in the #cabinet should take notes!   #ConservativeParty #BBC 
Two Russian assets sitting in a tree H-U-GG-I-N-G#Brexit  
Ken Clarke isn't going to live long enough to see Brexit.#PissedAgain 
BBC News - Despite Brexit UK unemployment dips to 42 year low!  
Tomorrow's New Statesman leads on the plot to block Brexit - while this nonsense is still being seriously tried there is no possibility of any form of reconciliation. Remain ultras are pushing politics to breaking point. 
Russian Twitter accounts posted almost 45,000 messages about Brexit in the 48 hours around last year's referendum in an attempt to sow discord during the vote on whether to leave the European Union.Trump’s affinity for Putin is more dangerous every day.  
This was #Scot24 day, the day after #Brexit vote and AMERICAN Russia Today was pushing nonentity-over-here Corbyn  
#EEA Parliamentarians meet in Strasbourg to discuss Brexit. Important for all 30 states including #Norway that will remain in the #singlemarket after Brexit.  
Do you believe Russia did or did not seek to deliberately interfere with the EU referendum? #BrexitRussia RETWEET & VOTE  #YourVoiceMatters 
The threats made by Brexiters are enough reason on their own to #StopBrexit. By the government's own definition they are terrorism, and we must never let British politics be ruled by terrorism. #Brexit  
The former Chancellor Norman Lamont says we'll have forgotten we were ever members of the #EuropeanUnion in a decade. He says #Brexit will be good for places like his home town #Grimsby. #bbcsp 
Russian Twitter accounts promoted Brexit ahead of EU referendum: Times newspaper  
A no-deal Brexit would be fatal for the German economy | @pietercleppe 
The MPs that support limiting the damage of Brexit or better still reversing it should be proud of what they are doing. It is no longer the will of the people. Enough people think we made the wrong choice in June 2016. It is time to exit Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Friends! With immediate effect, the former "Our Opinion Polls, which consistently show impressive 2-3pt leads for Labour, despite Far-Right Tory Austerity and extreme Cliff-Edge Brexit", are now:"The hate-filled Tory-funded opinion polls, which are LIES and cannot be trusted."  
Excellent article on the #LegatumInstitute style 'disaster capitalism' behind John Redwood's advice to take money out of the UK Good article on the Tory-linked, hard-#Brexit pushing Legatum think-tank #StopBrexit 
Weren't you producing cartoons smacking Brexit supporters. Poor old @Anna_Soubry can hit the gin.  
Sexual harassment scandal, rogue foreign policy attempts, 2 cabinet resignations, Brexit-rebellions and all. Labour just 1.5% ahead.  
It's a very weird dilemma living in a Scotland which is still part of the UK. Each day I'm a little more proud to live Scotland (min. pricing), then its dampened by the reality of UK (bankers get special Brexit deal). 
I think we should talk a bit more about this & a bit less about Russian botsSupport for #Brexit by attitudes toward immigration 
If you enjoyed Ken Clarke defying the Tories over Brexit you'll enjoy this passionate speech from him earlier this year too.  
BREAKING John Bercow tells MPs he expects the Government to publish Brexit papers focusing on 58 areas of the economy within 10 days 
Brexiteers - the very definition of elites - looking after elites. Anyone who voted for Brexit needs the word 'mug' branded in hot iron on their forehead  
These are the 15 #Tory #MP's who are #VOTING against YOUR #BREXIT #DEMOCRATIC #VOTE! They are NOT @Conservatives but #TRAITORS & #ENEMIES of the #BRITISH People! UTTER SCUM all of them! #DESELECT.! @theresa_may #ConservativeParty #Conservatives #Conservative #BBC #SKY #UK #EU 
I did not enjoy having to break that @PutinRF bots interfered with #Brexit last year but I faithfully reported the truth. I’m still for Brexit.Patriotism over Party means nothing if it stops when your favorites are involved. #Brexit wasn’t Putin’s only UK cause. 
The Treasury's forecasts have been consistently wrong, EFT's Budget for Brexit sets out how the UK can gain £135bn from 2020-2025 and £40bn a year thereafter - @Jacob_Rees_Mogg pic.twitter.com/QgUl0TpfVx 
I don't want a hard/no deal Brexit precisely bcos it will hit poorest hardest. And just FYI..my school wasn't grammar when I was there, my dad left school at 16, my mum was a primary school teacher, and I'm v proud I got to Cambridge.  
If you talk to a Leave voter who's turning against Brexit - don't bash them ffs.  
.@thetimes confirms gross violation of uk sovereignty  by #RussianTroll backing #Brexit.  @theresa_may must challenge @PutinRF_Eng 
We need better scrutiny of Brexit, say MPs who gave the government a majority of 384 to trigger Article 50 without scrutinising it. 
I got Brexit wrong all this time: it's in fact the EU that is leaving the UK.  
Interesting responses to my Brexit poll of 12k people. I interpret it as 45% are happy with the leave vote + 8% would vote leave again if 2nd ref. Giving us total 53% leave and 47% remain. Almost same as original referendum (52% v 48%) #Brexit  
BrexitCentral's @isaby reminds those seeking to scupper Brexit that aside from the small matter of the referendum, more than 80% of people voted at the general election for parties committed to delivering the result  
Jacob Rees-Mogg, in his daily @BBC  broadcast, presents his alternative Brexit budget, written by the bonkers ‘economist’ Patrick #Minford.Tomorrow, he will present his alternative Brexit environment policy, written by Nigel Lawson. #bbcdp #PMQs 
Neither party is going to save us from the disaster of Brexit, so why does it matter which of them is in power.  
In  #PrimeMinister questions ask why #Brexit pledge of #freemovement for #FinancialServices but no other industries 
Cheers John. He should be ok but even getting the letter shows that no matter what someone contributes, if they werent born here they’ll always be seen as an outsider. I fucking despair at the scottish working class tory/brexit voters. 
 “#TRAITOR #DominicGrieve the sanctimonious Anti #Brexit #Conservative #MP!” #Beaconsfield stand up against your MP who is voting against YOUR DEMOCRATIC WISHES and WILL!  @theresa_may @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #Conservatives #Conservative 
MPs & Media wildly stating the blxxding obvious over our transitional #Brexit arrangements are hardly helping to calm the mood. Very reminiscent of the Millenium Bug that was going to end the world. Outcome? SFA . #KeepCalmAndCarryOn. 
Speaking to Die Zeit she says: "only fair if after talks Brits get chance to say in 2nd referendum whether this is really what they wanted" 
WATCH | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg: "There will be an enormous Brexit bonus for the government - £135bn extra - if we follow the right policies in respect of Brexit."  
How will Labour supporters feel if Tory Brexit rebels open the way to bringing the govt down, only to find that Labour's pro Brexit MPs keep them in power?The numbers suggest it could happen. 
Katarina Barley, Germany's families & labour minister, has called on UK government to hold a 2nd referendum with an option to cancel Brexit. 
"Welsh" Labour MPs didn't support Wales having a say in Brexit. "Welsh" Labour Gov wants a say in Brexit.No matter if you support #Brexit or not, our country deserves a say in negotiations. The union we need to leave is the UK!  
.@vincecable asks why bankers are set to get freedom of movement after Brexit, but other industries aren’t being offered the same.One rule for the rich, another for the rest of us. #PMQs 
#Fact: Australia’s #MarriageEquality vote turnout was 79.5%. That’s bigger than the Brexit vote and the US presidential election 
.@MaryCreaghMP on the Russians, May & Johnson: “Today The Times reports that fake Russian Twitter accounts churned out thousands of messages in an attempt to influence EU referendum result.”#PMQs 
We must not let animals be the collateral damage of brexit. I'm urging Ministers to adopt my animal protection amendment today.Could it be the first amendment accepted?  
Businesses at the Dover frontline are preparing for Brexit. At today's #PMQs I called for at least £1 Billion to be earmarked in the Budget for investment to ensure we are ready on day one for Brexit - deal or no deal. 
This train journey might be Brexit tribute. Advertised as fast. Set off briskly. Broke down. Went backwards. Waited in station, destination uncertain. 
Patriotism is about seriously inquiring into the consequences of #Brexit.Yelling "We won!" and "Get over it" is a betrayal of this country and its people. It is the behaviour of yobs and vandals, not of patriots!#StopBrexit 
"Can the Prime Minister assure us that Brexit will not adversely impact..." no, she can't, love. However you finish that: she can't #PMQs 
Remoaners wrong AGAIN !Economic growth in UK hit 6-month high last month acording to Latest Lloyds Bank Regional Purchasing Managers’ Index seen as important “health check” indicator of business confidence & activity & includes employment & prices#Brexit 
Mary Creagh q on alleged Russian interference on UK social media pre -referendum. PM says her Guildhall speech was not about UK examples 
A actually a 3.8% margin, less than the margin of error in an opinion poll, which is all this advisory referendum was#StopBrexit @acgrayling @No10Vigil @albawhitewolf @RemainerAction @BrexitBin @pEussyhat @EUflagmafia @Mcr4EU @nickreeves9876 
Food price hike is attributed to Brexit. Brexit cost to be borne by the poorest.  
The @guardian is also talking about Russian interference with Brexit #Brexski 
Anyone who is under the illusion that Brexit is going to be good for them needs to face the reality that #Tories don't care about anyone except themselves. #StopBrexit #BrexitReality #EUWithdrawalBill @Keir_Starmer @DavidLammy @campbellclaret @StopBrexitMarch @unisontweets @FT 
Yet more talk of how the Russian backed Brexit with the full force of their cyber army #Brexski 
What is truly shocking is UK press acting like this is new. I broke the Russian twitter for Brexit last year. Russia did the same in France for Le Pen, I reported. They did the same the world over.Were UK papers asleep?Where have you been? 
They've been doing it for months, but it doesn't make it any more acceptable.Look at the language: it's the language of war. Over opponents of something that's supposed to be about free speech, democracy, sovereignty#brexit #journalism /1 
FoM for bankers in the City while everyone else is excluded ... this is still getting more idiotic every day.  David Davis promises City of London special post-Brexit travel regime  
Will Corbyn raise #Brexit, the biggest issue of the decade at #PMQs? Of course not, he is in favour of #Brexit and has to keep his head down. 
Excellent piece. Brexit damaging every Govt priority. All our pre-2016 problems still exist, but now no time/resources to tackle any of them  
Here's a first look at this week's magazine cover: The plot to stop Brexit. Subscribe here:  
I'm despairing at the state of our body politic & how easily it has let this #Brexit debacle slip through, fuelled by a debased part of our media. FGS can we get some real political leadership stating clearly 37% of the elect is not the undeniable Will & can't justify this! 
The worst, most incompetent government in my lifetime but @labour barely manages to draw level in the polls. Their pro #Brexit policy isn’t working...  
And I am quite used to mainstream press gnashing their teeth at my true reporting then parroting it nine months later. Russia ALSO interfered in the General Election for its asset @JeremyCorbyn. If he knew, he should be jailed. #Brexit 
Not only did I (and I alone) break Russian bots for #Brexit last September, I also broke the story of @Comey’s #TrumpRussia investigation on Nov 7th, thus scooping both UK and US media on both their biggest stories of the last year 
UK tweeps should know: Jeremy Corbyn also benefited from Russian propaganda in the General Election and if he knowingly cooperated, he should be arrested, like anybody in #Brexit who knowingly colluded. @ me all you want; I broke Russian bots for Brexit last year. 
You have got to ask, did the £450,000 given to the DUP by Scottish Tory members come from RUSSIA?What are the Tories & DUP hiding We have a right to know where the money came from.   Who funded the #Brexit Tory/DUP leave campain?  
The 15 Tory MPs aren’t in the same party as me, and I disagree with them on many important issues. But I respect their thoughtfulness and integrity. Your inflated use of aggressive language helps no one at this difficult time in the life of our nation. #brexit  
"If you listen very carefully, you can hear the tide starting to turn on Brexit" says @MollyMEP in her latest #Brexit newsletter  #StopBrexit 
Who's 'we' Anna? You assume you speak for everyone when you certainly don't. I want a hard, clear, decisive, unambiguous, full and final Brexit. Which is what 'we' voted for.  
What might Labour do, as the country gurgles down the Brexit u-bend, to get ahead of the Tories?   
Calling people #mutineers may be unhelpful but on same day, millions if us are being told tge only reason we voted #brexit cos we were haplessly manipulated by tweets from Russian bots. Hmm. Cry fowl at insults if you must but refrain from doling them out if you do. 
The combination of Brexit and the Conservative-DUP deal has deeply unsettled the little political stability we had here. Cheers Brits. 
Watch Ken Clarke's excellent new anti-Brexit speech here: 
BBC/Comres poll on Single Market, Brexit and free movement  
You have to get more than 3/4 through the Guardian article on Russia-Brexit Twitter influence to learn that "78% of the tweets came after the Brexit vote" 
It's reported up to 15 Tories could defy the government - enough to wipe out that Brexit majority, says @EmmaVardyTV #WithdrawalBill #bbcdp 
Let the destruction of beautiful #Wales  commence. Majority #Brexit voters in Wales  ignored by Assembly traitors  
Grandson of  #WinstonChurchill#BrexitReality#BrexitBill#Brexit  
Redwood - and others like him - are the REAL traitors. "Brexit" is revamped asset-stripping in these Post-Truth times. STOP BREXIT.  
'Voting against Government on key Brexit questions is like trying to reverse the referendum result', @billcashMP tells @JuliaHB1  
7/12 BRUSSELS HISTORIC MANIFESTATION to claim x 1. Police violences > Catalan referendum ( +1.000 injured people) + corruption 2. Internet censure and press manipulation 3. Political jailed ( no crime detected )4. Possible human right violations 5. Auto determination right  
#Lunch #LifeStories @andyflannagan talks #PMQs #patriotspaytax #UniversalCredit Check out the simple #Tax solution to our #austerity problems from @ChrLeft ....#WednesdayWisdom #Brexit #trustconf17 #PanamaPapers #ParadisePapers #London #May #Corbyn #LoveTheatreDay 
Watching Brexit unfold from abroad, I feel like Spock watching Vulcan implode from space. 
President Kiska of Slovakia  addresses @Europarl_EN and repeats what should be main lesson from Brexit: defend Europe, don’t play into populist hand by painting all successes as national and all defeats  as European. 
Brexit - Don’t abandon separating families. That’s the message from us, @FamilyLawBar and @IAFL_FamLaw.  
@BenPBradshaw @AnthonyGlees @J_amesp  It is self-evidently so that May can continue to cover up the fact, now widely known - see Today's Times -  that Putin and his UK and foreign associates subverted the EU Referendum so as to procure the leave vote 
Here is the Trump-Putin link staring us in the face. Putin uses fake news to create confusion, distrust and conflict in order to undermine democracy. Trump is executing Putin's strategy to the letter.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Blindly voting through any old shit because a slim majority of the people voted for it in an advisory referendum is mind numbingly stupid. 
Dear friends: if we blame Russian bots for Brexit and Trump, we’re desperately missing the point and it will all happen again  
Labour MPs turned on their veteran colleague Frank Field in the House of Commons yesterday for daring to suggest that voters in the party’s electoral heartlands supported Brexit  
My Dad, who emigrated here in 1974, married a Scottish woman, worked and paid tax every single day he’s lived here received a letter from the home office telling him his status here could now change due to Brexit. He’s been here longer than i’ve been alive. Theres yer Union! 
Which leading political party would you say is the most united on the EU? #brexit @UKLabour @ConservativesGERETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
If the government falls in the next year the election will be fought mostly on the issue of #Brexit. A warning to @UKLabour & @jeremycorbyn, you will lose millions of votes and lose the election if you continue with your pro Brexit policy. Time to change! 
Leavers should stop living on fantasy island and read this: The Brexit reality check is coming. What will happen to Britain's economy when the insular turn of Brexit meets the reality of global trade?#StopBrexit #Brexit 
A WINTER'S TALEWinter came.It lasted for years.The land frozedespite the hot air.An iceberg afloat,no direction of note,just Brexit, pursued by despair. 
"Ministers' insistence that Brexit must be carried out at any cost, even if it turns us into a third tier country, is a complete betrayal of both Leave and Remain voters". @MPphilwilson 
So where will YOU go once Brexit is stopped? Russia perhaps?  
Do Conservative Brexit rebel MPs realise they are damaging their Party and their country? 
Leave.EU just deleted this tweet describing Tories voting against Brexit legislation as “cancer” and “traitors to their country”  
Referendum Result should be annulled and re-run.Not only an Act of Economic self harm but engineered and abetted by Putin's Russia.  
I reckon that one overriding characteristic of Brexit supporters is an inability to cooperate with others. That's why they want to leave the EU, but it's also why they can't work together to make it happen.#StopBrexit 
People of Wales are ignored over & over againThey don't want more immigrationWales voted for #Brexit but Welsh Assembly campaigns to keep Wales in the EU.Politicians in Wales seem to do the opposite of what their voters want.Time for a change.@ForBritainParty@AMDWaters 
Jacob Rees-Mogg's ROUSING pledge Britain’s economy will THRIVE if we have a CLEAN Brexit  
Don't let the myth that Brexit is irreversible be peddled by hard Brexiters -Pls RT Lord Kerr's speech tht we can change our minds on Brexit  
Russia used hundreds of fake accounts to tweet about Brexit, data shows this, deeply buried in report, 'About 78% of the tweets came after the Brexit vote on 23 June 2016' 
The 15 Tory MPs planning to vote against enshrining the Brexit date into UK law are the cancer within their party and traitors to their country. Total disregard for the people's democratic choice. 
Paddington would find Brexit Britain less welcoming than in the rose tinted vision of the 1950s the Brexiteers want to resurrect. My full immigration law review here: @BigIssue 
On #mutineer news, yes, I will be voting to take back control for Parliament rather than a tiny group of ministers when it comes to effective scrutiny of secondary legislation post Brexit on behalf of my constituents 
Tory supporting Daily Telegraph accused of 'blatant bullying' of Tory Brexit rebels..... 
Labour is plotting to stop Brexit, EU Parliament leader Richard Corbett let slip there's a secret plot to derail leaving during the transition period, which is why they're currently opposing a fixed date of March 2019. 
So true! #Brexit, built on lies.  
So when will we see the EU referendum result annulled ?#StopBrexit@spaceangel1964 @BrexitBin @JP196700 @ExitBrexit @DExEUgov @Anna_Soubry @Meg_HillierMP @SebDance @RobertsDan @CarolineLucas @vincecable @nick_clegg @AlisonKMurray @SandraDunn1955 @JolyonMaugham @acgrayling 
[Ticker] Kremlin trolls tried to sway Brexit vote  
"hello 2018,  the year that brexit failed, farage was tarred and feathered and Boris jailed. Brexit sorted, now let's #StoptheDaleks " #FBPE 
Brexit for the plebs only.Theresa May plans to EXEMPT her own husband - who works in the City - from Brexit:  
Russian Twitter accounts tweeted 3,468 times about Brexit  
There's a whiff of fascism in the Daily Telegraph front page.Bloody Mutineers, standing up for what they believe in and trying to save their country from an economic disaster.#Brexit #Mutineers #WeAreTheMutineers 
The City will remain a global financial hub post-Brexit.  
Dear Mrs May @theresa_may, in the event common sense does not prevail, I wish to submit my application for exemption from Brexit. This will entail retention of my current EU citizen rights, keeping my current passport, EHIC, mobile phone roaming, etc etc etc. Many thanks.  
Ken Clarke yesterday predicted today's "The Telegraph" front page. The @Telegraph is becoming the #Terriblegraph.#Mutineers #Brexit  
Really !!!!! No other news today ! Scottish Tories Red and Blue made sure Scotland had no say in Brexit last night you know all them that stand up for Scotland! Alex Rowley stands down ! FM invited to speak today #climatechange !!!!!!!! 
FURY at Tory collaborators who are trying to derail Brexit. 
I see no more reason today to support Brexit than I did yesterday. The evidence from businesses who actually give a shit about this country and actually make their stuff here agree Brexit will be catastrophic. Today is the first day of the rest of my life fighting Brexit. 
Russian Twitter accounts promoted Brexit ahead of EU referendum: Times newspaper  
The European Parliament will block any Brexit deal that resulted in British-based EU citizens being deported after Brexit. David Davis & the Tories have been dangling that possibility as a negotiating point #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Ken Clarke is a beacon of hope, MPs of conscience of all denominations must now stand up and be counted. Brexit will affect 100% of the electorate. It is time to acknowledge that the will of the people reflects 37% of the electorate. The other 63% must also be heard.  
He’s fighting for 2nd #Brexit ref as voters should be allowed to change minds. He’s fighting against 2nd #indyref as, presumably, voters shouldn’t be allowed to change minds.... 
Brexit Secretary David Davis in 2012: "If a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy." 
So, Democracy (Brexit vote) = good. Yet Democracy (parliament decides on Brexit Bill) = bad? Also @telegraph, we need to talk about bullying. 
Dominic Grieve MP:  Brexit is an “extraordinarily painful process of national self-mutilation”. 
This aggressive intimidation of anyone who wants to debate/discuss Brexit is so, so anti-democratic. First the judges were “enemies of the people”, opposition MPs were “sabouteurs”, and now this. Profoundly worrying.  
How much did Russia interfere in Trump's election & the Brexit referendum?  How much would be an acceptable level of foreign interference? 
No-deal: Courting Ukip has locked the Tories into a high-risk, zero-flexibility Brexit strategy  
STOP this illegitimate Brexit process in its tracks! Support @a50challenge today: 
Latest data in Britain:- Unemployment rate is 4.3%- Holds at lowest since 1975- Number in work falls by 14,000- First decline in 13 months- Wage growth just above 2%- Far below rate of inflation- Pound rises slightly 
Instead of Brexit they could have just done a poll that asked “Do brown people make you nervous? Y/N?” and that would’ve scratched the itch. 
Get the new #CitizensOfNowhere album ft. the new bonus track "The #Brexit #Mutineers" 
How did we not notice Russia's interference in the Brexit vote? Zoom in on the driver's seat  #Russia #Brexit  
We want long-term good relations with the UK as neighbours & friends. For this, we need progress on the #Brexit negotiations. I will push for this today at my meeting with Theresa May.  
Our leader today gives a calm overview of Russian Brexit disinformation, why it matters, and what should happen next. Read it.  
WATCH: @ChukaUmunna last night is clear - Brexit is already starting to damage our economy & we must prevent a job destroying hard Brexit:  
Tough, Brexit does not require the blessing of the SNP.  
Those blaming Corbyn for Brexit:-Brexit referendum was set up to appease Tory party splits-LAB has a large percentage of Brexit voters-The Tories are driving a hard Brexit NOT LAB-The Tories are "negotiating" Brexit NOT LAB-Corbyn did campaign for remain & voted remain 
. @BrexitBin says it!Dear Leavers,We're not leaving the EU. You bitched about it for 40 years, but when push came to shove, you didn't have a plan. Simply put, you had your chance and blew it. So you have no one to blame for Brexit's failure but yourselves.#Brexit 
On today's show I would like people still persuaded that their lives will be improved by Brexit to tell me what they think motivates so-called 'Remainers' to keep going, especially given the vitriolic abuse and bullying the position attracts. 
Mutineers? V odd that some Brexit ultras struggle with the concept of parliament deciding. Was the central point of Brexit. 
"The bullying begins"? Anna, have you really never read the Telegraph, Mail, Express or Sun before? They bully people EVERY DAY.#Brexit  
Russia used hundreds of fake accounts to tweet about Brexit, data shows And @theresa_may warns about Russia's interference, while recklessly driving forward the policy that Russia's interference was intended to promote.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
I don’t actually CARE what politicians think about #Brexit. We, the people, instructed them to LEAVE the EU. End of. 
My apologies to @Robert___Harris for my initial reaction to this but unfortunately a variation on Poe’s Law is now in effect re. Brexit; ie. the GENUINE pro-Brexit arguments are now so stupid it’s impossible to tell what’s satire and what’s the real thing...  
Hear, hear! This and your energetic response to the antibiotics crisis were too things you got spectacularly right. One the subject of the referendum we tip-toe agonisedly away... 
10,000 years ago Doggerland connected UK with continental Europe. Brexit campaign should’ve been countered by a re-Doggerland campaign. Source:  pic.twitter.com/mMN8X24ywj 
Farage, Banks and Wigmore's attack on Soros, one presumes, has nothing to do with the fact that Putin regards Soros as an enemy, or the rumours that Putin has funded Banks/UKIP. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
A foreign power is accused of 'disrupting' our democracy.Anyone who loves this country should now be asking for #Brexit to be halted until an enquiry is completed.#russiagateUK 
That #Brexit risks crucifying Ireland should, as @rafaelbehr says, be a much greater cause of concern to the UK than it seems to be 
Mutineers, enemies, saboteurs - Brexit has become the UK’s identity politics. For so many, nothing else matters except where you stand on this one issue. 
Brexit branded an 'act of national self-mutilation' as MPs begin debating EU Withdrawal Bill  
By failing to support our #GiveWalesASay amendment last night, the Conservatives and Labour have silenced Wales on Brexit.  
Again. Does RUSSIA bear the majority of responsibility for causing brexit? Or is it being highlighted because it excuses liberals/neoliberals from thinking about the collapse of their hegemony?  
Just so you know, the bot/bigot-based response to the British press & PM describing secret, dishonest Russian meddling in Brexit will be an attempt to conflate it with Barrack Obama speaking honestly on the subject in public. And it will work up to a point. 
3,468 Brexit related tweets, of which 22% sent before the referendum (763)Direct fx of this (verified) activity on the vote=negligibleLet's not reinvent the magic bullet theory of media effects for Russian twitter bots  
Another great Brexit piece by @rafaelbehr  
What an incredible situation we find ourselves in when the country is undermined by Russian interference in the EU Referendum & leading media including @Telegraph attack @Anna_Soubry & other elected MPs for voting on basis of evidence. Who are the true patriots now? 
Russia used hundreds of fake accounts to tweet about Brexit, data shows  
A breakthrough is achieved as virtually all UK media finally report Russian cyber activity around UK elections including Brexit vote.Determined journalism from @carolecadwalla pays off! 
If the 13 Tory MPs from Scotland had voted in their constituents’ interests and not their own selfish party ones last night they would have delivered important and much needed changes to the EU Withdrawal Bill  #Brexit #WhatareScotsToryMPsfor 
Some influential Tories can see the dangers of Brexit. George Freeman, chair of the party’s policy forum sees young people leaving the country and looking for a better future in the EU, and who can blame them? We are set to be a isolated, small and insular country. #StopBrexit 
Not sure if Times mentions @Arron_Banks' 6-hr meeting at Russian Embassy prior to the referendum, at the invitation of Russian intelligence. Banks has tried to make out that this was all a big joke. Doesn't look quite so funny now.  
Farage lied about someone.They took him to court.He lost. ... Why can't Brexit be that simple? 
I've always said we should respect the Brexit result and negotiate softest possible break. No mandate for hard Brexit... 1/~ But Russia! 
Brussels will have to deal with the Catalan problem as well as Brexit  
If Britain edges further toward a “no deal” Brexit, sterling could start to slide again, pushing up prices  
A binding referendum would probably have required a supermajority of 66%. Which is sensible if you want a consensus for constitutional change. Leave fell 5 million votes short of that threshold. In 1975, however, Remain achieved it with 67%. 
who needs Putin or Russian bots we got Treason May Banquet gravy dribbler Paul Dacre+Barclay Bros holders of the corpse of Thatcher #brexit  
Brexit trade talks look set to be pushed back by 4 months. The prospect for catastrophic 'no deal' is greatly heightened. #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
#France Debates Dropping Minimum Legal Age for Sexual Consent to 13 France trying to normalising paedophilia, look at the ages of consent around Europe. This is where the EU is heading!#Brexit#PaP  
Nigel Farage: "The country has voted for Brexit. People should come together, whichever party they're from, and fight to make sure we get the best from it."  
As the Brexiteers look for scapegoats, it's not so much the 'whiff of desperation' more the stench of the rotting corpse of Brexit. 
Leave killed Brexit the moment they sold out British Democracy and worked with foreign agents. #LeaveGate 
I hope what’s happening in Zimbabwe doesn’t affect our ability to trade with them post Brexit. 
MPs have differing but sincere opinions about Brexit. Expressing those opinions is not mutiny; it's representative democracy. 
Be careful here, folks.#Brexit was NOT caused by the Russians. We will never be able to ascertain that.However it is becoming clearer that Russian money influenced the Brexit vote and puts the democratic quality of that vote in question. 
A relief that this story has finally broken through into the mainstream. Evidence has been mounting for some time that the Kremlin supported Brexit to cause division in the UK and undermine our democracy  
ICYMI  My article on the dangers of where the Tories are taking us on #Brexit 
NEW: Labour to force Brexit Bill amendment to protect workers’ rights“Labour has been clear from the outset that the withdrawal bill is fundamentally flawed and is a serious threat to workers’ rights,” @mtpennycook 
Why is Westminster worrying about setting an Exit Date for Brexit, when the invocation of Article 50 has already done so? 
Leave won the referendum with a less than 4% margin, (under  circumstances we'll be debating for years).To win a game in tennis, Advantage-40 isn't enough because that's only a 25% margin of error.Clearly we take Wimbledon a lot more seriously. 
Are these the 15 conservatives against #Brexit  
READ | The great @Jacob_Rees_Mogg has revealed how the UK could benefit by £135BN if we have a clean Brexit.This man truly backs Britain and is looking ahead to huge opportunities. Remoaners in the cabinet should take notes!  
VISION: @Jacob_Rees_Mogg’s Brexit plan would boost UK by £135 billion in 5 years.   
Russian Twitter accounts posted almost 45,000 messages about #Brexit in 48 hours ahead of #EUref, in what appears to be a co-ordinated attempt to sow discord  /via @thetimes 
But the bullies will not succeed, of course. That tone says more about them than us. We will continue to work constructively for the best Brexit possible - that's our duty - and what parliamentary democracy is all about.  
Patrick Minford is the Brexit economist. He is an incompetent Thatcherite & a big fan of the Poll Tax. His Brexit calculations have been widely chastised by prominent economists - though Jacob Rees-Mogg loves the numbers that he's made up #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles #r4today 
If they have a handful of genuine followers it is irrelevant. Narrative was Brexit won because everyone is racist, now it is Russian bots. Maybe just majority of people wanted out of EU? 
The @Telegraph left the Russia story off the front page and chose to attack Tory MPs who are concerned about government Brexit proposals.  
The Sun's leader today. Strangely, doesn't mention Russian interference in the EU referendum and its beloved Brexit  
Is your MP on the list? We name the 70 who voted against Brexit last night  
Kremlin influence over #Brexit story finally breaks....even the Times is covering it. Only happened thanks to the relentless work of @J_amesp, @carolecadwalla, @PeterKGeoghegan and @adamramsay at @openDemocracy. Watch @Nigel_Farage & @LeaveEUOfficial as they squirm and lash out. 
The #Brexit referendum, flawed in so many ways as well as being marginal and advisory is now treated as an unquestionable mandate to do anything in its name.  
Must say if I were a brexiteer I would be chuffed to bits at how #brexit is taking back Parliamentary sovereignty.  
MPs demanding a 'meaningful' vote on Brexit seem to have forgotten that they had their meaningful vote when they decided by six to one to delegate the decision to the British people. 
Come on, Brexiters: Wave those flags harder! Sing Rule Britannia louder! March faster to the cliff edge! Everything will be amazing if you just believe it will be! Hurrah for Brexit!  
"Remoaners...Enemies of the People...Saboteurs...Mutineers..."If the price of Brexit is the injection of such poison into our national discourse, then that is too high a cost. 
Delighted by Australia's #MarriageEquality vote - still feel human rights aren't something we should be putting to a referendum though. 
The Russians influenced Brexit, but people simply don't care, says @mrjamesob.  
."Britain risks losing its reputation as a scientific research powerhouse as a result of Brexit,". 
'We’ve voted for Brexit!’ Hartley-Brewer slams Cable for RELENTLESS second referendum bid  
Post-Brexit "free movement for bankers" promised. Good to see the rich will be OK. I was worried there.  
You remember a few weeks ago I did that article which showed the Russian bots switch from Ukraine etc to Brexit?This is in @thetimes today: 
"It's easier to fool people than to convince them that they have been fooled" - Mark Twain #Brexit  
With Teresa May talking tough on #Russia's meddling in #UK, I'm just reupping my piece in @guardian on the possible impact on #Brexit - has she really thought it through? 
MP warns that he won’t be ordered to vote against his conscience on Brexit despite “bloodcurdling threats”. More should put country before party and join him. MPs know we need scrutiny and option to #ExitFromBrexit. 
Brussels will have to deal with the #Catalan problem as well as Brexit  
Putin knows Brexit divides and enfeebles the UK while weakening Europe. Fanatical Brextremists are Russia’s useful idiots  
The truth is, Brexit is already over. It's a dead man walking. We just need to go through the fformalities. Labour missed the boat on this. Remain did it without their support. And we'll never forget. 
Cancel Brexit, and Brexiteers threaten to lose faith in democracy. Push ahead, based on a fraudulent claim that a marginal vote of a deliberately deceived electorate, further manipulated by a hostile foreign power, is the people's will, and whole world less 17m, will lose theirs. 
I wonder why the Channel Isles residing Barclay brothers who own the Telegraph are so strongly in favour of Brexit....  
Just think, if Labour had bothered to turn up to the fight, the Government could have been defeated at the first fence on Brexit.  
Brexit will be terrible for UK businesses. I run a business already active in 20 countries. Not sure why we need to leave EU in order to develop global business - we do that already 
Tax evader Jacob Rees-Mogg thinks the UK economy could enjoy a post-Brexit boost of £135bn over 5yrs. Big problem is that his economist is the discredited Patrick Minford - who is widely regarded as 'laughable' & 'flawed' #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles #r4today 
Ooops…looks like we’ve taken back control from Europe and ceded it to tiny group of self-interested, wealthy (many with their money safely invested offshore) Eurosceptic ideologues, instead!#Brexit#TakeBackControl#r4Today 
It is extraordinary that the Brexit lunacy has got this far: it should have been stopped in its tracks ages ago. It shows how hollowed-out our politics & government are: no maturity or good sense. We can stop it now : 
“Labour continue to plot how they can keep us tied to the rules of the EU for the foreseeable future.  Labour are reluctant to deliver the will of the people and are frustrating the Brexit process every step of the way” Rishi Sunak  
Russia interfered in #Brexit referendum. We don't know how much and how it affected outcome. Time to rerun it  
Now is your choice. You can be a tool of the Brexit machine, and complicit in the demise of the UK and its democracy. Or you can join us as we fight to save our nation. There is no middle way.  / Ends 
UK plans $80M in tech initiatives, doubles tech visas to 2,000 to shore up support amid Brexit  # via @techcrunch #TechNation 
Russian Twitter accounts posted almost 45,000 messages about Brexit in 48 hours in what appears to be a co-ordinated attempt to sow discord  
Honda described devastating impact of a hard Brexit on car industry: every 15 minutes of customs delays would cost some manufacturers up to £850k a year; New tariffs add £1500 to car; exports more expensive too #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles 
Wednesday briefing: Brexit – blame the Russians?  
Expect more of this as Brexit unfolds.  Judges, MPs, anyone who doesn’t submit to the ideological zeal of the nationalists driving this.  
MPs are now called 'mutineers' for voting - not against Brexit, no! - but merely against the crazy self-defeating move to tie their own hands before the crisis. 
1. Banks cause global crisis2. Real incomes screwed3. People blame immigrants4. Brexit5. Brits lose freedom of movement6. Real incomes even more screwed7. Bankers get special free movement rights.#ageofirony via @FT 
they never Stoped working together after the Scottish referendum they are stil trying to bring down the SNP  
Let´s send our #Bresistance support to the "BREXIT MUTINEERS"And I thought this was a #democracy#EUWithdrawalBill #StopBrexit #bremain 
Doing @GMB with.@piersmorgan @susannareid100 @Kevin_Maguire on the treachery of the 15 Tory Brexit rebels. 
Eight things that will happen in 2018, according to the man who predicted Brexit and Donald Trump  
Congrats to Australia on the defeat of Homophobia Brexit (??) 
Standing on the sidelines as an expat Canadian (w/ significant ties to Britain), the entire notion of "Brexit" always seemed toxic & stupid. To imagine a former great power voting on its future in a referendum? Gobsmacking.  
Watch ‘Treason May’ vomit back up the sick of Brexit..  
Turnout (79.5%) in Australia's (voluntary) same sex marriage referendum higher than turnout in any UK general election since 1951 
Exclusive: ‘Treason May’ are the Tories about to ditch Brexit on a technicality?? Woke Britain.. it was the Russians that did it!!!  
So the Russian social media bots worked on Brexit as well as Trump. Thank you Brexiteerskys! #hello #Russia 
Early start to Frankfurt to speak to British Chamber of Commerce in Germany @BCCGeV on dangers of damaging hard #Brexit  
Australians support same-sex marriage.At least in Oz the people got a vote on it.In the UK gay marriage was introduced by the politicians even though not one party had included it in their manifesto.There was no same-sex marriage referendum in the UK. 
Australia gay marriage referendum: Public votes 'Yes'  
419 accounts tweet 3478 times 78% AFTER Brexit that’s 2713 tweets. So 765 tweets swung #Brexit away from the Remain bombardment of a £9 mil state controlled leaflet, TV, most politicians & journos, corporate Britain, Luvvies United, EU funded academics etc that’s believable not!  
The Oz Government is trying to push to a referendum towards minimal constitutional recognition as Constitutional Recognition and branding it as a good thing. Its not. If Constitutional Recognition goes to referendum its terrible for Aboriginal people because it will mean nothing 
Russia used hundreds of fake accounts to tweet about Brexit, data shows  
So, if Russia backed Brexit and so did RobertMercer... what does that say about billionaires the world over? There is no Russia and there is no America or Britain - only the uber-weathly and the rest of us. Stop looking at this thru cold war prism and suddenly it all makes sense 
No such thing as a 'good Brexit' over 60% of electorate didn't vote for it, 5m denied a vote, Russian influence, Dark money, Undeclared spending of Leave campaign, list is endless. Do your job #StopBrexitNow 
At the heart of the astonishing Brexit & U.S. election results last year was Cambridge Analytica(CA). The Guardian & the author of this May/17 piece are being sued by CA in an attempt to shut them down.  
The Brexit Mutineers are those MPs brave enough to put the country before their tawdry party. Dodgy Russian #Brexit.  
It's really not getting enough airtime in US that exact same nexus of Russia/Mercer/SCL/CA behind Brexit and Trump info ops, both resulting in surprise electoral results.  
2018 will be the referendum on democracy as we know it. If you value American way of life, vote out GOP congress. 
Like PRESIDENTIAL FOOL / FOU PRÉSIDENTIEL @PR_Paul_Biya #paulbiya, like #ILLITERATE “GOVERNOR” he appoints who spells “BIKES” as “BYKES” & says “7am IN THE EVENING” #SHAME #FreeSouthernCameroons #Ambazonia #ReferendumInCameroUn #Referendum in #SouthernCameroons #StopGenocide @CNN 
Abbott tried to turn the postal vote into a referendum on ‘free speech, political correctness and freedom of religion.’ Overwhelmingly, the Australian people told him to get stuffed. What an abject irrelevance he is. 
Australia voted to legalize same-sex marriage 62% to 38% in a national survey where 80% of the people voluntarily cast a vote, besting turnout for US elections and Brexit. Here's our coverage on @BloombergTV. #history 
Australia votes for gay marriage. 61% in favour, 80% turnout. That's a resounding referendum victory  
That referendum result has to be the first time in ages anything unambiguously good has come about thanks to a large crowd of Australians. 
The popular reduction of politics to an "establishment" v. "anti-establishment" binary -- Brexit, Trump, et al. -- has been a tremendous gift to fascism. 
Brexit could rob Britain of 'edge' in scientific research, MP warns  
So Russian Twitter and Facebook propagandists were on the same side as the right-wing London press over Brexit ... Interesting ... 
Russia has nothing to do with what is happening in the UK. It's all down to the Corrupt Lying Racist Xenophobic Perverted Murdering Tories. They held the Brexit referendum. They thought they could rig it like they rigged the Scottish Referendum in Scotland in 2014.  
Tory Brexit MUTINY: Treacherous Remoaner MPs plot Labour union against Theresa May in open rebellion  
Theresa May escapes Brexit revolt as just one Tory backbencher votes with Labour - the nasty party always stick together!  
A greater percentage of people participated than in Brexit, UK general election, Irish #MarriageEquality referendum & the US Presidential election! #YES 
Did Russians force parliament to vote for Article 50? Did they block the single market amendment? Did they make Nick Clegg a giant pussy? Did they make Cameron a lying bastard? Did they make the EU an antidemocratic kleptocracy? No.#Brexit 
Daily Telegraph accused of 'blatant bullying' of Tory Brexit rebels  
UK plans $80M in tech initiatives, doubles tech visas to 2,000 to shore up support amid Brexit anxiety (@ingridlunden / TechCrunch) 
Brexit: an unrecognised bombshell - without equivocation, when the UK leaves the Single Market, UK will no longer be able to export cars to the EU ...  #Brexit.  
50 years since the 1967 referendum. 50 years later Australia votes ('votes') again on the rights of its citizens. Here's to advocating for brave, representative political leadership, so that humanity isn't once again up for debate. 
If Cameron had put country before party we wouldn’t have got into this #Brexit mess in the first place. MPs who put the people’s interest national interest first deserve approbation. #exitfrombrexit 
Good heavens. This is what it has come to. We’re hoping, but not sure, that after Brexit we can still travel@to Europe for a weekend. As long as you’re a lawyer in City, with a special permit. Don’t remember that hope being mentioned before the referendum.  
David Davis promises City of London special post-Brexit travel regime. WTF?! This is where we are now? Hoping for a deal on travel visas so “a British lawyer may still visit a client in Paris”! We’re HOPING we can still visit continent for a day?  via @FT 
Every day it becomes clearer that when Brexit happens, it will be disastrous.It now becomes clear that we had outside agencies interfering.Considering just how close the result was, i'm afraid all arguments against a second referendum are rapidly fading.  
If anyone still thinks Corbyn is playing a long game on Brexit I have some unicorn droppings to sell you. 
Russian Twitter accounts posted almost 45,000 messages about Brexit in 48 hours in what appears to be a co-ordinated attempt to sow discord  
@LyleShelton said the vote was a referendum on Safe Schools. He will keep faith with his own words, surely. 
The majority of leavers made their mind up to vote leave long before Twitter even existed. #Brexit 
Really outstanding article!"Brexit looks like economic aggression across the Irish sea.""Yes, Gove, Johnson, Davis and May – they can see you. The rest of Europe is watching your absurd, panic-stricken squabbles and listening to your bluster."  
Who’s your favourite? I like Paul Masterton. He looks as though he’s just hidden a frog in Boris Johnson’s pants drawer. #brexit #remainers 
@carolecadwalla @J_amesp  It is emerging very rapidly now that the EU Referendum was subverted by Putin so as to procure a leave vote. May must now be required to state exactly when and  how our Intelligence Agencies have briefed her on this treachery. 
"The Brexit mutineers""Crush the saboteurs""Enemies of the people"This sort of language should be of concern to EVERYONE regardless of party. 
Every Scottish Labour MPs abstained tonight on a vote to give the Scottish Parliament a say in Brexit. Every one of these yoons has sold out his country  
Well here’s one Brexit supporter that won’t be buying the Telegraph tomorrow. Puerile and pathetic front page.  
So I'll repeat what I said a few months ago: Toney, having declared this a referendum on political correctness at large, should be made to accept that the public have voted massively in favour of political correctness. 
Britain's May sees off challenges to Brexit plan, so far  
There you go: bankers are to be exempt from tight immigration rules after Brexit.  Money talks, governments listen.  
Brief nerd fact -- Result bizarrely almost identical to the Ireland referendum on #MarriageEquality YES 61.6/62.07 NO 38.4/37.9 
Don't worry about the World Cup, lads, sure we have an exciting referendum to look forward to 
78% of the 3468 tweets were posted AFTER the referendum. That leaves 763 tweets that were posted beforehand.... I tweet more than this from my single account each month. Are we really stoking a new Cold War for 763 tweets? 
I run my own business 50 employees,brexit is good for uk , the world is way bigger than EU which is growing slower than rest !! 
Most Brits now think Brexit was a mistake, European Parliament president says  
Now watch them roll out their pet sceptics saying "yes, but it didn't affect the referendum" They're all over twitter today. Don't let them get away with their deflective propaganda.  
What is happening to Britain is heartbreaking. Yes, the EU has its flaws, but, the positives far outweigh the negatives.Tragically, far too many people have been influenced to look inward, rather than look outward. That breaks my heart. Surely, we are better than that.#Brexit 
Has this been a referendum, the double majority would have been overwhelming, and that's a rare feat in this country 
When you're called 'Brexit mutineers' and precisely zero fucks are given  pic.twitter.com/al6qgwsowx 
Labour might have some explaining to do on why MPs abstained on #withdrawalbill amendment to give devolved parliaments vote on #Brexit deal  
MPs have voted 316 to 295 against an amendment to the Government's European Union Withdrawal Bill which proposed the UK should stay in the single market and the customs union during the Brexit transition period 
Hi @LyleSheltonI'm sorry you lost the referendum on Safe Schools.Kenny x  
TOMORROW: Finally; reasons for the Brexit vote explained…  
 Tory MPs have rejected amendments that would ensure after Brexit, that domestic rights kept pace with international standards. Get the facts here. #EUWithdrawalBill 
EU Withdrawal Bill will transfer all EU legislation into UK law. UK gov’t is looking for a trade deal very close to current arrangements. We will safeguard rights of EU citizens in the UK. We’ll pay a big bill to leave EU. So can anyone explain what we are achieving with #Brexit? 
OH LOOK#Skypapers #Newsnight @bbc5live @LBC #Pmqs #Bbcdp #Brexit  
Yup it’s a fact apparently, 17.4 million Brexit voters influenced by the Russians - vodkas all round - utter bullshit and #FakeNews 
From a Brexit minister, disowning @Telegraph front page. 
This is how glibly and readily Rees Mogg lies. It's Trumpian. He's lying to express his contempt for us, for ordinary people. He's lying to flaunt his power. This is the brexit elite in action.  
Playing catch-up on Brexit-Trump-Russia? My piece from May. Read it before Cambridge Analytica (of FBI & Wikileaks fame!) sues @guardian into oblivion. They're trying to shut this - me, us - down. 
You do rather get he feeling out friends at MI5/MI6 are about to reveal something untoward. No way May would voluntarily go against Russia...overturning Brexit on a technicality would be some legacy mind 
Brexit Minister and prominent Leave campaigner Steve Baker attacks Telegraph’s ‘mutineers’ p1 - knows how much damage it does his cause.  
May went part way there yesterday - now she must be required to tell Parliament and the British people exactly how MI5 , MI6 and GCHQ have briefed her about Putin's subversion of the EU Referendum to procure the leave vote 
Russia used 419 fake accounts to tweet about Brexit, data shows  
At least Australia's undignified and horrifying non-binding #MarriageEquality referendum nonsense ended in an overwhelming "yes" vote. You did well, Australians. Now it's time to follow up and do the right thing for Australia. 
Breaking: 61.6% of Australians vote in favor of non-binding referendum to legalize same-sex marriage as country looks to become the 24th nation to do so. Likely binding vote to come in Australian Parliament. 
A referendum should not be the way to decide whether a minority group deserves basic human rights, but I’m glad such an overwhelming majority made their point here. 
Never forget. This man created #Brexit chaos because of an internal Tory party feud. He then knighted all his mates (and f***ed off)  
Russia disrupted Brexit campaign by posting 45,000+ tweets in the last 48 hours of the campaign & hacked Britain's energy provider National Grid.What's the top story of the country's leading broadsheet? Naming & shaming of democratically-elected MPs for expressing their views.  
Australians approve same-sex marriage: county's Bureau of Statistics just announced 62% YES in referendum, with 80% turnout. 
Breaking: Australia has just voted by 61% to 38% in a referendum to legalise same-sex marriage. When enacted it becomes the 25th country on earth to allow same-sex couples to marry. #MarriageEquality #voteyes #auspol 
When the former Secretary General of NATO @AndersFoghR says a no-deal Brexit could imperil security cooperation & the fight against terrorism, I would listen up.  
The UK should simply have a new referendum. That will destroy Putin’s plan to weaken the EU and NATO. 
"RESPECT MY DECISION" you protest, having voted #Brexit or #Trump. But this isn't some journey you alone will take. You chose a wretched course for the ship in which we all must sail.And those of us who see icebergs ahead will not stop pointing them out, until you see them too. 
Welsh Labour MPs abstaining on a bill which would've given Wales more power on the matter of Brexit, which is exactly what the Welsh gov run by LABOUR were campaigning for...Utter hypocritical horseshit 
The reality is that both of these political parties don't want to give Scotland a voice on Brexit. Ultimately, this means that they will be culpable for what happens next.  
Is this why Theresa May, after 12 months of stonewalling & denial, yesterday half admitted Putin subverted the EU Referendum?  
419 accounts operating from the Russian Internet Research Agency (IRA) attempting to influence UK politics upholding Brexit, stirring anti-Islamic sentiment 
"More than 150,000 [Twitter] accounts based in Russia which had previously confined their posts to subjects such as the Ukranian conflict switched attention to Brexit in the days running up to the vote."  
Wednesday’s TIMES: “Russia used web posts ‘to disrupt’ Brexit vote” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
Front pages of Torygraph and Express talk of Brexit 'mutineers' - a direct echo of past Daily Fail's attack on supposed 'saboteurs'... Fact is, they are all the same:foreign non-dom media owners  in it together, for themselves!! #StopBrexit 
The growing role of the Russia-Brexit story was inevitable. If a public inquiry is not put in place to get a grip on it now the hysteria over it will exceed anything seen in the US  
Aston Martin announces 750 jobs at risk as it fears Brexit ‘no deal’ may harm its Welsh investment.On the same day Labour MPs from Wales failed to support giving Wales a say in the Brexit process. With friends like Labour who needs enemies? 
The bullying begins. We want a good Brexit not a Hard ideologically driven Brexit #standupfordemocracy 
Less than a week ago useless May dared Tory rebels to defy her on #Brexit. Today they did and 40 Tory MPs are planning to oust her. She got it wrong AGAIN and made herself even weaker, AGAIN. This is well beyond a joke #MayMustGo 
Hmmmm....City of London promised special deal post-Brexit allowing free movement of workers  via @FT 
UK plans $80M in tech initiatives, double tech visas to 2,000 to shore up support amid Brexit an...  by @ingridlunden 
Russian manipulation? We didn’t signup for that! 419 Putin fake twitter accounts fuelled Brexit & UKIP- millions of tweets to weaken UK/EU. When facts change, minds change. Void result; inquiry needed .@vincecable .@BenPBradshaw #ExitFromBrexit #StopBrexit  
AKA 'Just some of the very many MPs, who might actually be working on your behalf, to limit the damage that foolhardy gung-ho, lunatics like John Redwood want to wreak...' #Brexit  
The Telegraph vying for a place in the gutter alongside the Daily Mail with its 'Brexit mutineers' front page. Mutineers, saboteurs, enemies of the people, traitors - the state of this. I want my country back.  
.@BBCNews highlighted divisions in the Conservative Party over the #Brexit debate at 10pm tonight.They failed to mention that it is #Labour divisions which enabled the Government to achieve majorities today.I wonder why? 
It seems to me that many who voted Brexit for their own doubtless excellent reasons did so without having thought through in any grt detail , the immensely complex and often very poor consequences for our poor old country #cockup 
In this episode of Brexit Mutineers we have...the lovely aunt! The stern but ultimately lovable granddad! The tired but sassy mum! The naughty old uncle!  
Labour MP Frank Field is awarded top marks by Nigel Farage for his Brexit speech in Parliament today  
Let's talk about the time David Cameron begged Putin to intervene in the independence referendum, you massive hypocrite. 
I’m yet to meet a Brexit voter who said, “Oh yeah it was those tweets from those anonymous accounts that swung me!”  
Column: Whichever way you slice it, Brexit makes UK a nightmare neighbour to Ireland.  
Fake Twitter accounts targeting EU referendum 'co-ordinated by Russia'  
An appalling frontcover. Some sections of UK press have totally lost the plot over Brexit...  
ITN leads on Brexit.BBC relegates it to 3rd headline.Pressure on the BBC is working. 
Russia used 419 fake accounts to tweet about Brexit, data shows  
Unwise of the Telegraph to use the pictures of these Tory 'Brexit mutineers': they all look like genuinely nice, sensible people.  
Theresa May faces Brexit rebellion as at least 15 Tory MPs threaten to side with Labour against departure date #Premium  
The Guardian front page, Wednesday 15.11.17: Russia backed Brexit in fake Twitter posts  
There are four circumstances in which 29 March 2019 may not be the #Brexit date — the #Government ‘s attempts to fix the date in the #WithdrawalBill are a silly attempt to tie #Parliament ‘s hands: via @RCorbettMEP 
Wednesday’s Daily TELEGRAPH: “The Brexit mutineers” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
I'm genuinely curious why more British hacks are not investigating Russian interference in the Brexit referendum? Seems like a story. 
If you can't accept Brexit then leave. If your Nirvana lies in the jurisdiction of the EU then go. France, Italy, Spain awaits. Good luck. But please stop whining. You lost. Accept it and go! 
The UK's Brexit secretary is trying to assure the City of London that it will survive Brexit – and remain 'the world’s leading financial centre'  
If only Labour really were to plotting to derail Brexit  
Mrs May must have been aware that a very big story about Russia was about to break to have risked criticising the country so directly. The whole of Brexit depends on us keeping in with the US-Russia-Saudi axis of unscrupulousness. 
So if not 11pm GMT, midnight in Brussels, on March 29 2019 what is the deadline? 'We might need another day or week'. So a week later then? And why should that be the deadline? This is a nebulous argument. Stick to the deadline & focus EU minds. #Brexit 
The Tory rebels are fighting hard to remove the date of Britain's suicidal jump off the Brexit cliff that the Prime Minister agreed with the Brexit rabble. It would mean that Brexit could be delayed as long as we are talking to the EU. #StopBrexit 
All part of the story of Brexit inspired national decline. Madness British forces no longer fit for purpose, former UK service chiefs warn  
If Theresa May announced that the British people deserved to have the final say on any Brexit deal and therefore, she would legislate for a second EU referendum - that would show real leadership. Proper, selfless, for the common good, leadership.Will this happen? No chance. 
As the Tory Brexit fight club slugs it out, do they even care about Ireland? | Rafael Behr  
Tomorrow @ScotNational Brexit fears drive doctors to quit: One in five medics from the EU plans to leave Britain and the NHS  
Let's hope others are brave enough to do the same!Nicky Morgan: 'I will not vote for end date in Brexit bill'  via @mattfrei 
Tory rebels vow to resist 'bloodcurdling threats' over Brexit bill  
If Russians were trying to influence a Brexit outcome in the ref, maybe they'll help with EU negotiations. Would be more useful than some of our doom monger MPs, desperate to talk the UK down at every opportunity. 
Who persuaded Theresa May that enshrining the Brexit date in law was a good idea?  
A day in Brexit Britain:(1) Woke up to this - happy ageing and being sick everyone...   1/ 
More than 77% of Australians have had their say in the $122-million postal survey — a higher voter turnout than the Brexit vote in the UK and Ireland's same-sex marriage referendum. #VoteYES  #auspol #marriageequaility 
Tory Brexiteer  @Jacob_Rees_Mogg slates Treacherous Remainer @ChukaUmunna for opposing Brexit bill 'for his own sake'  
Surprised I haven't seen more UK psychologists sharing @DaveBrownToons excellent #Brexit cartoon for tomorrow's    @Independent 
Jacob Rees-Mogg slates Remainer Chuka Umunna for opposing Brexit bill 'for his own sake'  
Rebel Tories claim they have the votes to defeat Theresa May on the Brexit date  
Take it from the Swiss: the Brexit referendum wasn’t legitimate.Time to #StopBrexit 
Earlier this evening 70 MPs opposed the Clause 1 of the #EUWithdrawalBill, which repeals the European Communities Act 1972. I've posted the list identifying them - arguably the most anti-Brexit MPs - on @BrexitCentral 
Theresa May under growing pressure to scrap exact Brexit date despite only proposing one days ago  
Austerity: @chakrabortty is absolutely right. A policy that most economists opposed has brought ruin to this country. I doubt Brexit would have happened without it.  
An amendment which could save Britain from a Brexit disaster #StopBrexit 
Aston Martin says it might have to stop production if there is no Brexit deal in place when the UK leaves the EU  
How 400 Russia-run fake accounts posted bogus Brexit tweets  
Ken Clarke applauded by Labour MPs for anti-hard Brexit speech.  
Only 1 out of 28 Welsh Labur MPs voted to give WALES a final say on Brexit. Why does it take MPs from outside Wales to step into breach? #LabFail #EUWithdrawalBill 
TurbulenceThe latest Brexit u-turn provokes war inside the government. Again. [TWEETS] 
Was listening to @LBC this afternoon, some Brexiteers were freaking out on the phones and getting really angry at the suggestion that Brexit may have been 'influenced' by Russia. They can't handle apparent facts. 
Tory Brexiter MP George Freeman: #Brexit could produce an “entrepreneurship revolution” or could turn Britain into an “old people’s home that can’t pay for itself”We weren't told about any such risk during the referendum campaign.#StopBrexit #LeaveLies 
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg says a clean Brexit is 'hugely economically advantageous'. Watch as he debates with @ChukaUmunna about the future of Brexit Britain.  
While @SNP MP's stood up for Scotland, Labour backed the Government or sat on their hands #Brexit  
The PM receives Jimmy Krankie, Mayor of Scotland, for some more irrelevant moaning over #Brexit. 
Leavers, pay attention! They said the Eurozone was going to collapse. Here's the reality!Euro zone growth, eclipsing U.S. economy, set to be best in decade #LeaveLies #StopBrexit #Brexit 
The Government have defeated the first opposition amendment to their flagship Brexit legislation  
MPs are reminded by @nigelmp that the taxpayer paid for a booklet for every household which stated the government will enact the outcome of the referendum, regardless of the result #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
Parliament, EU Withdrawal Bill debate:A group of Conservative MPs have now said clearly that they will vote against the government if it insists on putting a date for Brexit in the bill.Have any Labour MPs yet acted as strongly against their own pro Brexit leadership? 
Any MP voting to ensure #Brexit proceeds regardless is shirking their responsibility to us all to act in the national interest, and instead being a cheerleader for chaos.This applies especially to @UKLabour MPs who should know better. 
Brexit with no deal  Saves taxpayers tens of billions, sidesteps the transition period, restores certainty and kicks some of the old soaks off the bureaucratic gravy train. 
The political mandate for brexit is shrivelling by the day. Please stop thinking about party, think about country and #StopBrexit. 
Nigel Farage Awards Labour MP Frank Field “10 Out Of 10” For Brexit Speech - LBC @LBC  
Given the chance tonight to vote for an amendment on a Holyrood veto over #brexit, Scottish Labour MP's did precisely what you'd expect. They sat on their hands and #labstained #WeakerForScotland 
Most probable explanation David  - MI5 MI6 and GCHQ have now told May that if she does not tell us exactly how Putin et al subverted the Referendum to procure the leave vote, then they will. They work for the British people, not the Tories or Labour 
Dominic Raab just announced government has commissioned work on amendment to require Ministers to make statement of compatibility of any Brexit-related primary or secondary legislation with the Equality Act. #BrexitEquality #EUWithdrawalBill @MariaMillerUK 
Ken Clarke’s closing remarks at #EUWithdrawalBill debate: The referendum settled that the majority wanted to leave the EU, it settled nothing else. What leaving actually means in practical, legal & economic terms is the duty of this House to debate.  
Ikea increases prices on some of its products in the UK as a result of higher import costs after slump in sterling following Brexit vote  
Here's how many MPs from each party that supported our amendment to #GiveWalesASay on #Brexit.  
Absolutely.Likewise Kate Hoey, Gisela Stuart, & one or two others.#Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill #CleanBreak 
It takes an MP from England to back an amendment to give Wales a final say on #Brexit when Welsh Labour MPs ABSTAINED. #EUWithdrawalBill 
CNN right now is reporting on Russian interference in the Brexit referendum. Since when have we had to rely on US media to report on important stories in the UK? 
.@Nigel_Farage awards Labour MP Frank Field “10 out of 10” for his “fantastic” Brexit speech in the Commons today  
"Fool me once, shame on you. Fool me twice, shame on me"Jacob Rees-Mogg taking us for fools#Brexit#BigRedBus 
Last night British PM  called out Putin for meddling in their #Brexit referendum, which resulted in her own subsequent rise to power.Two days ago, Trump on Putin’s meddling in U.S. 2016 election: He didn’t do it. I believe him. We have a good feeling for each other.  
At last, facts and excellent journalism from @RobertsDan is confirming what @OliverLehmann and I have been Tweeting about for many months. Thank you! It needs to sink into the thick skulls of Brexit ministers, who have no concept of JIT in the automotive industry! None whatsoever 
Apparently, the House of Commons, the democratically elected house of the UK Parliament, is responsible for making laws and checking the work of Government.Time then, that Parliament 'CHECKED' Brexit, as in 'stopped it'.  
So, Carwyn's party have voted against #Wales having a say in the #Brexit negotiations, Not really any fucking surprise there,Labour serve only two things, Themselves and London... 
"I'm the rebel" says Ken Clarke in a #Brexit bill debate, apparently he's not very happy   
.Most of the loudest, most obnoxious Brexit accounts are likely to be Bots - starve them of oxygen & the attention they crave.  
The Brexit Elite got into Brexit so they could dodge the taxes normal people pay. They made a mistake when they teamed up with foreign agents. They’ll go down for this.  
Just voted for @Plaid_Cymru amendment to #EUWithdrawalBill to give devolved administrations a greater say on #Brexit  - don’t understand why most Labour MPs didn’t 
To tie ourselves to a Brexit date is pointless, dangerous & smacks of an ideological statement without value: Grieve  
Out of 22 Million Tweets last Year during the referendum only 412 Tweets stemmed from Russian accounts, it's a stretch to think that everyone that voted leave was influenced by their Tweets but Theresa May seems to thinks so  
Never tire of watching Boris Johnson’s face as Ken Clarke exposes Tory hopeless lack of direction on Brexit:   via @LondonEconomic 
Wow. Respect to Tory MP Dominic Grieve QC, writing in Evening Standard...He believes Brexit to be 'a historic mistake' but one which must be accepted *unless* the public decide they want a different path. Read between the lines there, folks. Ditching Brexit is on the table.  
Wales will now be silenced on Brexit as Labour didn’t bother voting. Our fate is in the hands of the Tories in Westminster. #EUWithdrawalBill 
The moment the government voted in favour of Clause 1 which repeals the European Communities Act, ending the supremacy of EU law on Brexit day Ayes - 318Noes - 68  
Thanks to Brexit and the weak pound, food keeps getting more and more expensive in the UK  
Aston Martin says it will stop making cars if there's no Brexit deal  
Brexit switched me from a 'no' at last referendum to a 'yes' now. I voted SNP for first time in over 40 years at last election. I am not a Nationalist, just completely lost confidence in what is emanating out of far right/left in England. 
'We’ve voted for Brexit!’ Hartley-Brewer slams Cable for RELENTLESS second referendum bid.  
How Brexit impacts on motor manufacturers. But do Brexiteers care? The price of blue passports  
When the people of Aberdeen and the rest of Scotland voted NO in 2014 they meant it. The SNP must take another referendum off of the table now.2/2  
 Tory and Labour MPs joined together to reject the place of devolved administrations within the #Brexit process. Get the fact here. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Anti #BREXIT #TRAITOR #Tory #MP's @NickyMorgan01 @AnnaSoubry & #DominicGrieve now officially the most hated #REMOANERS in the #ConservativeParty! @theresa_may @Conservatives #Conservatives #Conservative #UK #EU #NEWS #BBC #SKY #LABOUR #UKIP #Beaconsfield 
Looks like Labour have just abstained on giving the Scottish Parliament a binding say on Brexit.  "The party of devolution" - if you believe that, you'll believe anything. 
MPs have voted 318 to 52 against an amendment to the European Union Withdrawal Bill calling for the devolved administrations to give their consent before Brexit 
Labour’s Brexit spokesman, Sir Keir Starmer QC, is seeking to perpetuate in every conceivable way the jurisdiction of the European Court of Justice over the UK after we have left the EU. | Martin Howe QC  
Labour turning out to abstain in person on the repeal bill again. Bodes well for them holding this Government’s chaotic Brexit to account..... 
John Lewis should do a Christmas ad gently breaking the following to people:Brexit can't workFarage doesn't give a shit about democracyPutin doesn't give a shit about RussiansTrump doesn't give a shit about poor AmericansSanta is an hallucinogenic pee-drinking shaman 
Normal service is resumed in Westminster where Labour MPs abstain on a @Plaid_Cymru motion which would have given Wales a say in the Brexit process.  Standing up for Wales my arse. 
Guys... #Brexit promised us unicorns... but I have some bad news... #StopBrexit 
Voted against Clause 1 of EU Withdrawal Bill. Absolute madness to tie our hands to an exit date, forcing us towards a no deal Brexit. I am happy to let history be the judge. 
Co-Op supermarket switches to BRITISH MEAT ONLY in Brexit boost  via @Your Brexit 
The whole of Brexit is a bloody gimmick. Britain will gain nothing from leaving the EU. In fact it has everything to lose. It's time to stop the madness, take back control and #StopBrexit 
Ken Clarke ends with a reference to Burke's address to his constituents, the fundamental statement of the role of an MP.  Here:#StopBrexit #Brexit #WithdrawalBill 
More and more of my friends who voted for Brexit are in private rather sheepishly admitting they were wrong 
Frank Field is far too good to be a member of this @UKLabour party!#Brexit#EUWithdrawalBill 
The reality of a no deal Brexit - please RT:  
Read this and tell me why Theresa May's Tory Brexit won't be deeply harmful to the British economy.  
Please read Shock Doctrine if you haven't already - it explains how billionaires create and use chaos to enrich themselves.Aka Disaster Capitalism. Brexit looks more and more like a Shock Doctrine scenario.  
#TRAITOR & all round #SCUMBAG #DominicGrieve the sanctimonious #Conservative #MP who is trying all his legal skills to STOP YOUR #BREXIT! #DESELECT #TORY #TRAITORS NOW! @theresa_may @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #Conservative #UK #EU #NEWS #BBC #SKY #ITV #LABOUR #UKIP 
In June I started FOI’ing Brexit departments about meetings w/Legatum. *This* is kind of response am still getting  
Roger Español lost an eye when he was shot with a rubber bullet by Spanish police on the day of the referendum. He is taking legal action and hopes to be last person in Spain this happens to   . 
Brexit isn’t Left vs Right but dogmatism vs pragmatism. It says so much about the state of politics today that Ken Clarke is making the speech Jeremy Corbyn should be making, but he can’t because he’s been ideologically committed to Brexit for thirty years.  
I can't understand why Ken Clarke hasn't crossed the floor and joined the Liberal Democrats. He looks like a fish out of water sitting on the same benches as this rancid government and its Brexit-supporting headbangers. 
."When, in a few yrs, a PUBLIC INQUIRY is held into the debacle that is by then Brexit, one of the easier targets will be Redwood". 
What's the matter your heroes getting a bit nervous. Brexit is a scam & they're all busy back peddling. It's a poisoned chalice - step away. #stopbrexit #putinwantsbrexit #houseofcards 
‘This house cannot veto #Brexit’ Bernard Jenkin MP. Wrong, yes it can. Parliament is sovereign! 
Im hardly an admirer but hes right about this. The one thing he was always passionate about was the EU and both he and Hesseltine have watched in despair as these mediocrities have enabled Murdoch to drag us out. Brexit IS A TAX DODGERS CHARTER. Nothing else. Youve been cheated 
If you don't believe "Remoaners" like me that Brexit will be bad, listen to @johnredwood whose £180k second job is spent advising people to invest elsewhere. Fine for those with the means to do so, less good for everyone else 
The Brazilians are here with a mock-coffin that says “Brexit” on it  
Remoaners who disrespect and dishonour Brexit-voting veterans who fought for our country, whose friends died in that struggle to give us here in the UK the freedom we deserve, are not worthy to lick the soles of those patriots' boots. They are a national disgrace. 
The 'sovereignty' basis for Brexit is a sham. The UK had full veto on laws and never faced a law that hadn't been approved. Stop this madness. #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles #EUWithdrawalBill 
Where are the #Brexit impact papers? There can be no excuse for not producing them. The goverment must be relying on them to frame their plans, or does the government just shoot in the dark at shadows. 
Been saying this from day ONE. Brexit is a scam , govt on payroll of Faustian self proclaimed Demi gods such as dacre banks & mercer. Time for the decent MPs to stand up now & demand rescind A50 investigate brexit w/ register of all MPs & financiers interests & #stopbrexit 
Tuesday just got better  
Found the UK Brexit plan.  
Just spoke in Commons for Amdmnt 386; stops concentration of power in Ministers' hands & requires Parliamentary vote on Bill on terms of Brexit before exit day  
Where are those pesky 58 Brexit reports? #FBPE 
A reminder to Brexiters. Churchill understood the lesson of WW2, that nationalism in Europe had to be ended. That is why he passionately advocated a US of Europe and in the early 1960s wanted Britain to join the EEC. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Chuck Schumer on Donald Trump’s HHS nominee Alex Azar:"This confirmation process will be a referendum on the Trump administration's repeated efforts to sabotage our health care system" 
The anger at PM’s decision to legislate Brexit date is not abating. By the way this substantive policy was not put to full Cabinet before being announced, I am told  
'We’ve voted for Brexit!’ Hartley-Brewer slams Cable for RELENTLESS second referendum bid  
I have never said this before but after a brilliant speech about the madness of Brexit and Theresa May's intentions-well done #kenclarke! 
A reminder to Brexiters. WW2 was not a victory of one nationalism over another. It was a victory over the demon of nationalism which in two world wars had brought such terrible suffering to Europe. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Surely then, Labour MPs, especially Welsh ones should be supporting the @Plaid_Cymru amendment tonight to make Wales's voice matter on #Brexit? Otherwise they are voting to deny Wales a say.  
We now have the leading political figure behind #brexit railing against gays & Jewish money. Guys trust me as a resident of Germany this is not going to end well. #brexit  
Ken Clarke delivers a rousing tour de force speech against Brexit and receives a well deserved round of applause from MPs in the House of Commons.#EUWithdrawalBill #KenClarke#Brexit 
Love this @depechemode photo of Andy Fletcher in Dublin 1983 at time of Eight Amendment Referendum. Photo via @brandnewretro @NME #repealthe8th Can't wait for gig. #Globalspirittour 
Dominic Grieve now says he will categorically not vote for "barmy" cut off date under any circumstances. #Brexit 
Please RT! Gov't amendments to the Withdrawal Bill show they are preparing for 'no deal'! They do not have a mandate for 'no deal' #Brexit  
Dominic Grieve says he seriously doubts the competence of the UK Govt in light of amendment 381 which fixes exit day in stone and he won't vote for it. He's not alone #EUWithdrawalBill #brexit 
Emerging from court, I gather I might have missed a storming Ken Clarke MP calling out a lot of nonsense. #Brexit 
As a #PATRIOTIC #BRITISH #JEW who voted #Leave, this is how I see the so called #EuropeanUnion which was founded by Ex #Nazis such as #WalterHallstein founding President of the #Brussels #EUCommission! #UK #EU #NEWS #BBC #SKY #TORY #LABOUR #UKIP #Libdems #USA #BREXIT #ITV 
Paris battles to cash in from Brexit: 'I think we can gain 10,000 jobs'  
May repeatedly calls for MPs and businesses to support her Brexit plan. Having one would be a good start. 
Dominic Grieve now describes Government amendment to its own Bill as "mad" - very strong stuff from a figure respected across the House of Commons #Brexit 
Dominic Grieve elegantly pointing out that the referendum was a vote for a unicorn on a stick.#EUWithdrawalBill 
It's not only our fruit and veg that we'll have to grow after Brexit, looks like it's our own car components too  
"Ken Clarke" Clarke epitomises the arrogant pro EU attitude that lost the referendum and continues to alienate those who really believe in democracy. He's a disgrace 
Car manufacturers warn of ‘catastrophic’ consequences of crashing out of the EU without a deal. Govt must ensure its approach to Brexit doesn't damage British businesses.  
You've seen the political class try to use Brexit to scrap corporation tax, erode parliamentary sovereignty, lower workers rights and human rights, and You've seen the negotiations.Please keep an eye on where this is going and whether you still want it.#EUWithdrawalBill 
First Minister @NicolaSturgeon has spoken outside No 10 after a "constructive and cordial" meeting with Theresa May over Brexit  
George Freeman, Tory MP for Mid Norfolk, has reportedly "predicted young people could leave the country as the economy tanks and job prospects look better overseas." Brexit is surely the most damaging project in a generation and is likely to impact badly on the whole of the UK.  
Division that #brexit created no more obvious when biggest cheers came from the other side of the chamber  
The chemicals industry has released a joint statement with its EU counterpart to demand "regulatory consistency" post-Brexit. (Vote Leave cited chemicals regulations as an eg. of EU's "stupid rules") 
We elected MPs in June to implement #EURef outcome of 23/6/16Instead all MPs do is to enact the Referendum debate over & over & over again.EnoughThe #EURef is overJust get us OUT and stop of the dither and time wastingPeople are bored out of their minds with all the nonsense 
REVEALED: The 58 Secret Brexit studies, in full...  
Food price inflation has hit a four-year high of 4.1%. Consumer price inflation overall remains at 3%, way up from 0.5% since last year’s referendum, ONS figures revealed today #stopbrexit 
MPs who today spent forever arguing whether Brexit will happen at 11pm or 11:59pm need to look at this letter and check up on the meaning of the word “priority”.  
Is there a single, recorded case of a Brexit campaigner telling voters we would - or even might - end up with no deal? 
Ken Clarke says putting Brexit date in law is a "sop" to Johnson and Gove & could be "positively harmful to the national interest" - he wins applause from Labour 
It doesn't matter if we Brexit in March 2019, April 2019, or indeed December 2020. But it *does* matter if folk can create the open-ended possibility that we may never leave at all - which is precisely what some are trying to do.  
Ken Clarke delivers an outstanding speech during #EUwithdrawalbill debate and he gets a hearty round of applause at the end.  #Brexit  
Brexit: Theresa May adviser warns EU withdrawal could be ‘the moment we finally failed as a great nation’ 
How many Brits know anything about Georges Soros? But here retweeted by Arron Banks is Nigel Farage attacking him. Guess who does hate and loathe Soros, that's right, Vladimir Putin! Putin's #Brexit tools!#StopBrexit 
Pretty clear today from #FrankFields principled speech on #Brexit that most Labour MPs are still in thrall with the EU.....even if their constituents aren’t.  Top bloke Frank.  
Bill Cash is in the House of Commons, claiming the First and Second World War dead died for Brexit. He is, as ever, repellent to any notion of dignity. 
The date of Scotland's new independence referendum will be determined, not by the prejudices of British Nationalist ideologues and fiat of the British state, but by political reality and the democratic will of Scotland's people. #ScotRef #Referendum2018 
If you have 20 mins, please watch Ken Clarke's speech on Brexit today - funny, kind, wise - everything political debate should be. What an absolute titan.  
Tour de force from Ken Clarke. Shredding his Govnt's hard Brexit. And he is absolutely right that amendment on exit day destroys any idea of a "meaningful vote" on final deal. 
For crying out loud, exploiting the narrow referendum win for full-blown turbo #Brexit is nothing short of insane. #StopTheMadness #StopBrexit 
#brexit Ken Clarke gets huge round of applause for making the pro EU case. It's amazing what you can do with a good vocabulary, experience, evidence, facts and an unimpeachable logic #eudebate #parliament 
Standing up for the majority of Angus yesterday to explain the lack of desire from my constituents for a second independence referendum. The SNP demonstrated no signs of relenting - continually putting their interests before those of the Scottish people.  
Germany will ‘not allow’ May to speak directly to members on Brexit  
Let us get #oldiesagainstbrexit trending shall we.I'm 68 and think #Brexit stinks 
No wonder John Redwood backs Brexit. He will make money out of it, after all | Joris Luyendijk  
Tory Traitor trying to wreck #Brexit & keep us in the #EU by the backdoor @NickyMorgan01 
Ken Clarke gets a long round of applause - v.unusual in the chamber - after his tour de force against the Govt amendments and his clinical demolition of the case for a hard Brexit. Bill Cash, IDS and others walk out. A pleasure to listen to and witness #EUWithdrawalBill 
Applause and cheers for Ken Clarke after tour de force in Commons exposing the shambolic and cynical approach of the Government on #Brexit 
Hard brexit, soft brexit, squidgy brexit, can't we just have a brexit where we leave the EU? So we are not subjected to its laws, we don't pay them money and they can't tell us what to do! That would be leaving the EU right? That's what was voted for! 
The new Austin Brexit  
Roger Español, the man who lost an eye after he was shot with a rubber bullet by the Spanish police on the referendum day, filed a complaint against members of the police force . 
Ken Clarke currently destroying his Government’s case for a hard Brexit in the Commons. Tory MPs all looking glum as he talks on the backbenches. Universities Minister Jo Johnson very gently nodding in agreement throughout the speech. 
I'm also not a Brexit denier. I'm not seeing the effect of Brexit and saying that a unicorn I can't name will borrow money from  unicorn bank and set up a unicorn factory making unicorns somewhere I can't name 
Ken Clarke points out the idiocy of fixing an immovable #Brexit day in law; negotiations couldn’t be extended even if all parties wanted so to do. 
#Brexit debate on @BBCParliament will put many in a state of despairIt beggars belief how & why MPs are making the simple task of leaving the EU so complicated76% of all MPs voted to activate Article 50They knew that when they voted for Article 50 we would LEAVE 2 yrs later. 
Setting a date for withdrawal from the #EU in the Withdrawal Bill is mere political window dressing by a government in chaos #Brexit  
‘Our departure from the EU is a settled matter’ @PaulBlomfieldMP (Shadow Existing the EU Minister) just now in the Commons. No it’s not! If the #Brexit deal is ruinous to Britain we must have an option to #Remain 
Your average rabid brexiteer, not to be confused with a casual voter, not only hasn't a clue about the complexities of JIT, they don't want to know; their goal was to get their country back a country, and sovereignty, we had all along! 
Labour frontbench saying triggering of Article 50 "made Brexit a legal certainty". Odd, given it was clarified just last week by its author, Lord Kerr, that it can in fact be withdrawn at any point before March 2019. 
This film about Brexit is first I’ve come across where Scotlands pro European stance is recognised & explored. Tx both - can’t wait to see the finished product.  
If a parliamentary vote on final Brexit deal does not include a NO Brexit option, surely it’s just a vote on the frying pan or the fire? 
Aston Martin warns it could have to stop making cars if Brexit talks fail  
Minister Baker shrugs off concerns expressed by Aston Martin that a No Deal #Brexit would be a semi catastrophe. Still insisting on setting an arbitrary leave date which increases the risk of No Deal. 
Ireland's Foreign Minister gives his view on the state of play in the Irish part of the Brexit negotiations. And points to a trilemma.  
Because this - THIS - is the most important argument to be having about Brexit. And I bet Field thinks he's being bloody clever... I despair. It's a disaster whatever bloody time it happens.  
Campaign to restore Maine instant-runoff voting collects over half the signatures needed for a veto referendum while at the polls last week  
Breaking. Mrs May appoints Miss Rosa Klebb to lead independent inquiry into Russian involvement in EU Referendum.  
Facebook says Russia did try to meddle in Brexit vote  by @riptari 
@StephenTries your latest video is fucking class. If you're not highest paid comedian by 2020 then I'm pro brexit. 
It's possible Parliament just started the process of a Brexit reversal  
Ken Clarke asks the minister for Brexit if there's a single law he can name where the British government have wanted to oppose it but the EU have over ruled them. There isn't one - he says it's about the principle. It doesn't even make any sense. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Theresa May is blaming the Russians on Brexit . Apparently 17.4 million British voters have been radicalised by the Russians. 
Brexit's a doddle, folks. What would WTO terms and a non-friction-free border mean to Honda? This:  
What a bizarre country we've become. The PM complains about Russian interference to destroy western institutions but demands everyone carry out the results of Putin's interference just the same with #brexit.  
Aston Martin warns "semi catastrophic" no deal #Brexit would mean temporarily stopping production. People’s jobs are on the line, but still the hard Brexiteers are peddling the fantasy that we could crash out of Europe with no deal. 
Labour at war:Frank Field likens Brexit to buying house. Hilary Benn intervenes and says you wouldn't buy a house without seeing it. Field fires back: "I always bought my houses, I never inherited them."Benn yells: "So have I."Field retracts comment after heckling from MPs. 
BREAKING: Aston Martin Chief says no-deal Brexit would be "semi-catastophic" and would mean suspending production. 
This was when we were listening to frank claim the bigger the labour majority in election, the higher the vote for brexit - am guessing residents in walthamstow may have something to say on that… #brexithaos 
Frank Field argues with fellow Labour MPs about the views of Labour voters on #Brexit  
Astonishing.Lab MPs are trying to shout down their elder statesman Frank Field just because he is speaking in favour of #Brexit.He tells them some home truths.Many of the Lab MPs represent #Brexit constituencies but they are hell bent on keeping us in the EU. 
A great shot of @frankfieldteam standing up for #Brexit and facing down colleagues in his own party during #EUWithdrawalBill debate. 
Frank Field is making some great arguments, much to the annoyance of his own party, especially highlighting the Barnier rule of 'All take and no give'. #EUWithdrawalBill #Brexit 
.@nigelmp reminds MPs that the taxpayer paid for a booklet for every household which stated the government will enact the outcome of the referendum, regardless of the result #EUWithdrawalBill 
Imposing a Brexit deal on the British people without giving them a say would be theft of democracy. The @LibDems will continue to fight to ensure that the people, not politicians, get the final say, with a chance to exit from Brexit and stay in the EU.  
Frank Field says the Labour side needs educating on their own voters views in regards to Brexit. Labour MPs jeer, but he's correct 
Two things that Theresa May says:1 - Russia hijacked our democratic process2 - Brexit is THE WILL OF THE PEOPLE and must be enabled no matter how much harm it does to our nation.These statements are not connected. No. Not at all. pic.twitter.com/NqeTxlp300 
#Inflation has peaked at 3%. Interest rates have soared to 0.5%. #Employment at record highs. #Unemployment at record lows. All sectors of the economy growing. Budget deficit still falling. Damned #Brexit   
Time to DEMAND we are told WHY our Politicians are pursuing Brexit. We deserve to know IF there are benefits for US. We know the attraction for the #Tories & rich/elite, but I want to know how will WE benefit? Tired of asking, so pls help! #StopBrexit #NoConfidence @StopBrexit17 
Tell EU27 you want to withdraw Article 50. Set out your position clearly in your manifesto then call a general election. If you win a mandate, hold another referendum, properly this time, in line with democratic norms & with impact studies in public domain. THIS IS TOO IMPORTANT.  
If you are a member of the Tory Party you own this disgusting racism and xenophobia this Daily hate is the centre of Brexit  
If you really want to understand Brexit then at its core is the relationship between British Prime Minister Theresa May and Paul Dacre  
So @RachelReevesMP is basically doing a live Brexit/ No Deal impact study on the car industry with five other @CommonsBEIS MPs 
Jacob Rees-Mogg: hard Brexit would boost UK by £135bn over 5 years  
George Freeman MP has warned the UK could become “an old people’s home that can’t pay for itself” after Brexit. He was imagining what a bad deal could mean.  
Evidence that Russia manipulated the referendum. Evidence that the referendum fell short of democratic norms. We know key constituencies were disenfranchised. The win was wafer thin. It was advisory. Evidence it will massively harm the country. WHY ARE WE DOING THIS?? 
Referendum Roadblocks in Kenya 1. Under Art.255 2(a)- Ensure that 24 counties fail to vote or ensure less than...  
So much for the SNP listening to people. They will use any excuse to have #IndyRef2. It’s a complete outrage. Nicola Sturgeon needs to take this threat off the table immediately. End the games - and stop using #Brexit to try to split our country in two.  
who needs Putin or Russian bots when we have Theresa May and Paul Dacre #brexit  
I'm going now through my talk on science under the Nazis. I haven't given it before post Brexit/post-Trump, and it is now utterly bloody chilling. 
The brexiteers know that if brexit gets stopped there will be an eventual criminal investigation into what they did.Feeling uncomfortable yet? @BorisJohnson @michaelgove @LiamFox @DavidDavisMP @Arron_banks @Nigel_Farage#FBPE #remain #StopBrexit #exitfrombrexit 
Most Brits now think Brexit was a mistake says European Parliament president  
Aston Martin chief financial officer: difficult to understand whether we are getting through or not [to govt on Brexit hit to car industry] 
Tory rebel Dominic Grieve calls Theresa May's latest Brexit plan 'thoroughly stupid'  
Another day another Banquet for Theresa May meanwhile Grenfell Bailiffs and Brexit  
A brief little reminder that @Nigel_Farage  is a person of interest of the FBI, and is his mate @Arron_banks  is under investigation by the election Commission in the UK in what many suspect is the use of illegal Russian money in the brexit referendum. #FBPE #StopBrexit #remain 
Honda’s Patrick Keating tells @CommonsBeis that they are getting messages that Europe will not allow VCA type approvals post-Brexit/ no deal 
Whichever way Brexit goes, there ought to be a full inquiry into what happened, all those who misled the British people, & their varied influences - with consequences for their actions. 
Snap election between proEU conservative Ken Clarke and Corbyn. Who gets your vote? RT for big sample #brexit #labour #Conservatives #Liberals #greens #remain #stopbrexit #leaveEU 
There is no evidence that Russia influenced our referendum but there definitely was an American President who visited the UK and tried to influence us to remain. Obama failed and so did you! Get over it and leave Russia out of your whinging! @ShelaghFogarty 
Anyway, we shouldn't worry about climate change or brexit, we'll have these fellows looking after us.... we hope. 
Top Tory adviser just said Brexit could be 'the moment Britain failed'  
Polling Matters returns tomorrow:Why aren't the polls moving?Who do the public prefer in No 10?How long will the government last?How is Brexit going?And more...Good to be backfeat @leobarasi & @MattSingh_ 
The choice being offered to MPs by the government on the Brexit deal - it's this or nothing - is basically the same "meaningful vote" Mama used to give me as a kid about the vegetables on my plate. 
On my way to London. I've been invited to the Spanish Consulate to talk about the impact of #Brexit onto the recruitment & retention of Nurses from Spain into #NHS. 
Richard Branson repeatedly intervened in the #Brexit referendum #ForeignAgent 
Soubrying again, even more than usual lately, even talking about her regrets over Article 50,  but come the next vote on this - particularly now the Govt looks so fragile - I've no doubt she will vote for Brexit  
So 17.4 million British voters were led by the nose by the Russians in the #Brexit referendum? If only the Bolsheviks had known it was so easy...#TheRussiansAreComing #SnowOnTheirBoots 
May faces second Brexit humiliation  
On point as always, @iandunt on yet another Alice in Wonderland David Davis bingo session. "nihilism" "lunatic" "unsurprising for anyone who has been following brexit closely"  
How public opinion is now moving against Brexit.  
Brexit could turn UK into an 'old people's home' warns influential Tory MP  
The 'meaningful vote' was the EU referendum. There will be all hell on if you turn that meaningful vote into a #FakeMeaningfulVote. 
The Brexit Bill is back this afternoon. There have been well over 300 amendments put down. But why should MPs have all the fun? Find out your own, personal Brexit Bill amendment here!  
David Davis has said alternatives to maintaining a "relatively invisible border" between Northern Ireland and the Republic after Brexit would be "expensive but not impossible"  
This by Yoram Hazony is excellent. Explains Brexit and the rise of Trump through the lens of a split between conservatives and classical liberals  
A majority of British people now think it was 'wrong' to vote for Brexit  
Entrepreneurialism is not a magic wand - which will fix brexit. We need to create the fundamental conditions - a total systems approach, driving innovation in government, policy, regulation, human development, institutional infrastructure, Public R&D & cities..  
England’s daily politics show discussing England’s Brexit with English politicians again. Still few Welsh, Scots & NI voices or opinions on subject. #bbcdp 
.@mrjamesob: The Russians influenced Brexit and no one cares  
Today’s @Adamstoon1 @EveningStandard as Government makes its u-turns on Brexit bill  
The only Brexit argument you'll ever need  
Brexiters: "We will trade with other countries". We already trade with other countries. Ever bought a Samsung TV, Honda car or Iphone? But, Brexit means losing access to over 700 EU global trading deals. So the chances are that your new TV, car and phone will be more expensive. 
Guardian: "Tory policy chief: 'very real prospect' Brexit could lead to national decline." Oh, really? 
The only trade alternative to the EU is a comprehensive deal with the USA, but then that would mean much of our domestic policy being dictated from Washington for a deal which, due to distance, would be much less beneficial than our current EU membership. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
'Manufactured Culture War Outrage Calendar 2018 (UK).' Tangentially #Brexit-related, via @joemuggs : 
If you missed it, here's my explosive @talkRADIO interview with LibDem leader & Remoaner @vincecable on MPs getting a vote on the final Brexit deal.  
“On the whole, in favour of Brexit, because I am in favour of national sovereignty, but it does not stop me being European” @Roger_Scruton 
Oh ladies and gentlemen, boys and girls, do we have a treat coming for you @Byline_Media tomorrow...the Russia/Brexit bot research we’ve been doing has been married to a second set of data...It’s the mic drop. 
The existing deal is better than a good deal, a bad deal or no deal. #Brexit 
Beyond millions of #Brexit shares from Russian trolls and bots and false Facebook accounts we know that the disinformation was: A. Shared by politicians (albeit unwittingly)B. Republished as public opinion by most major media organisationsIt worked, folks. 
"I believe that by now, a majority of the population sees Brexit as a mistake. Even in the British government disillusionment has come..." 
Brexit could be “the moment we finally failed as a great nation and became a second or third tier nation” - Tory policy chief George Freeman MP veering wildly off-message...  
It's not the politicians who will suffer under Brexit - it's families.  
So: if Russia fixed Brexit and Brexit finished David Cameron, that means if not for Putin, Theresa May would not have been PM #TheMancurianCandidate @RT_com 
If you voted for Brexit, it doesn't necessarily mean you were stupid or racist. Being ill informed & sold an undeliverable economic dream doesn't necessarily mean you were stupid or racist.How can you support Brexit now there is so much more evidence it will devastate the UK? 
#brexit Why does Labour's @Keir_Starmer  want to give European court continued jurisdiction in the UK? It will be a completely foreign court after Brexit. 
I’m told @jeremycorbyn and shadow cabinet will make common cause with Tory Remain rebels on opposing @theresa_may amendment to EU Withdrawal Bill to set hard date of March 29 2019 for Brexit - because would constrain Brexit talks. It will be key vote, for UK & PM’s future 
I agree with Simon Stevens - Brexit must deliver £350 million a week for the NHS and can pay for it. 
Genuine question.When does it get to the point when a vote of no confidence is brought for this government? Everything they touch turns to disaster:- Brexit- NHS- Social welfare - The economy- SecurityHas there ever been a more inept government?Vote of #NoConfidence 
You see what he did there? The face of Brexit.  
Blimey. Who knew? You'll betelling me they had a hand in the referendum next!#EUWithdrawalBill 
Japanese ambassador warns that progress on Brexit talks is crucial if companies from his country are to continue to invest in the UK. Please RT:  
Brexit negotiations are a matter for the Executive. Parliament's job is to scrutinise those negotiations and to give any deal domestic legal effect. If Parliament doesn't like conduct of negotiations, motion of no confidence would be appropriate. 
Thanks to @openDemocracy and your investigations this story has now become mainstream. But where were the Brexit press and politically wet BBC until now?  
Liam Fox's Department for Trade  tweets article attacking Treasury for making "false assumptions" over Brexit, a week before the Budget. Now deleted, but here it is in case you missed it  
Theresa May: Russia is meddling in our democracy in order to force the outcome it wants to create chaos and undermine usAlso Theresa May: Brexit is extremely good and fair and we are 100% committed to going through with it obviously 
Excellent read from @chakrabortty, while I'm (ironically) waiting for my decimated social housing to be sorted out >>>"Austerity, not Brexit, has doomed the Tory Party" :  
CRACKERS: EU Parliament Prez reckons Brexit bill should be “at least” €60 billion. British government must stand firm - no to ransom demand!  
BREAKING (finally): confirmation from Facebook  (via @BuzzFeed and @justinhendrix) that Russia did interfere in the Brexit vote #BrexitRussia. Now what about you @Twitter @jack  
Brexit will be overwhelmingly positive for the UK economy provided the government adopts the right policies  
Must watch - A brilliant and humorous take on the desperation of the Anti Brexit fake news.  Please watch and share.  
Historic manifestation 7 December in Brussels to claim x 1. Police violences > Catalan referendum ( +1.000 injured people) 2. Internet censure and press manipulation 3. Political jailed ( no crime detected )4. Possible human right violations 5. Auto determination right  
What is the point of @theresa_may “warning” Russia while at the same time implementing an advisory referendum whose result was influenced by Russia?  
May will criticise Putin but continue to pursue the most damaging form of Brexit in line with Russian desires. #insanity 
The Public Accounts Committee report exposes the major threat Brexit poses to our ports, businesses & food supply. Thousands of businesses risk being left in the lurch because of the extreme #Brexit this gvt has chosen.   
The UK is the world’s only major economy set to see a fall in the number of millionaires over the next five years. Credit Suisse says it’s down to Brexit  
On #BREXIT @ForBritainParty is clearWe should LEAVE without further delayNO divorce paymentsNO transition periodNO more open door EU immigrationNO more foreign boats in UK's fishing groundsNO more kowtowing to EU lawYES to free trade with EUYES to good relations with EU 
What about Obama coming to interfere in Referendum and threaten us? The millions that cost was an undeclared notional donation to Remain.  
'You're not going to rest until you've destroyed Brexit': Listen to @juliaHB1's clash with pro-EU thinktank director @eurorealist  
We’re about to unveil our Budget for Brexit alongside @Jacob_Rees_Mogg - tune in to our Facebook page to watch it live. pic.twitter.com/OiqZb79G9S 
To understand the severe impact Brexit already has on real lives of real people, look no further than this heartbreaking *Letter to Santa* by @Subiedoo77’s daughter. Voted leave? This is on you. 1/ 
"The idea that somehow the British people were misinformed about Brexit is absolute nonsense" ~ IDS  
How to stop Brexit  1/4We, the people stopped the Poll Tax. We now need to #StopBrexit .Public opinion has changed but how do we get out of our echo chamber and mobilise it? 
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: Britain can expect £135 BILLION windfall after EU divorce, experts say 
The all new Austin Brexit - Take back control @HabsyP @N13lCl @PaulbrooksAMG @Mrwaterbiscuit @paulrobertsrcz @cubasteve57 @gingersteps @GeorgeCochrane1 @CCCuration @ScouserDrew @kirtonskeldyke @W0rd5w0rth @Seb_Lanc99 @davefowles86 @propsandpistons 
The government wants the Brexit vote to be meaningless - but it can easily run out of their control  
The Queen died in 2016 and has been replaced by a lookalike because we cannot announce her passing until Brexit is resolved due to the effect on the economy: a conspiracy theory 
Er, no. Here's my @thetimes letter on my we need a powerful new environmental protection body to hold governments to account after Brexit. Ensuring that governments aren't above the law is the essence of democracy.  
A new poll reveals that 62% of Brits believe the EU is trying to punish the UK for #Brexit.  
David beats Goliath! Biggest shock in the EU since Brexit? Italy miss out on World Cup in Football for first time in 60 years. Sweden back in global finals for first time since 2006. Never underestimate a small country. It will be a great  summer!  
Households hit with relentless Brexit squeeze as food prices rise at fastest rate in 4 years. Reminder to MPs debating Withdrawal Bill today that people's living standards are at stake 
Why is an official Government Twitter account endorsing a report produced by discredited, voodoo economics who support a hard #Brexit  
Brexit legend Nigel Farage is exposing the activities of globalist billionaire George Soros and his huge influence over the corrupt European Union. It's about time somebody revealed the truth about this man - bravo Nigel! 
Definitely no hardline anti-Brexit sentiment on Whitehall. Oh no.  
It's crazy to set an end date on Brexit. It is just a underhand method of ensuring we leave the EU without a deal. It shows we can't trust the Brexit Tories. They lied to win the Brexit vote and they continue to lie. The best deal for Britian is inside the EU. #StopBrexit 
The government that won’t release Brexit impact studies is approvingly quoting Economists for Free Trade’s estimate   
This makes me laugh. I contacted the press officer of the Greens Pre-Indy, he was rude & officious, unwilling to have the Greens appear on Referendum TV. They have gatekeepers, so this is just bullshit from Mr Sanctimonious & frankly convenient lies.  
.@Tim_Roache laying down the invite (again) to Government - TUs like @GMB_union are ready and willing to talk about Brexit. Still no engagement from Govt.  
Remember: Those arguing that the final vote does not respect the sovereignty of parliament campaigned during the referendum to keep the EU in control of our laws, borders, money and trade.  
With 500 days to go until Brexit, the PM must stand up to the Brexit extremists who are hijacking her government and sabotaging negotiations. 
I will be outlining Economists for Brexit’s positive budget proposals at 11.30  
#honestpoll How do you think you will fare financially after #brexit  ? Please #retweet to increase sample size and tell us why! #voiceofuk #davis #eu #leave #remain 
#brexit European parliament president Antonio Tajani wants to double spending to £250 billion. Thank heavens we're leaving 
Jacob Rees-Mogg says Brexit will give Britain a £135bn windfall as he launches his own Budget for leaving the EU  
I think quite a few are realising that BREXIT IS A CATASTROPHE.....  
IN LIMBO - a book of testimonials from EU citizens left in limbo due to Brexit - is *so nearly* fully financed for its new versions. Such an important book. Do chip in! --> @The3Million 
Does anyone really believe this, apart from Hardline Brexiteers? #Brexit is biggest act of UK economic self-harm since mid-70s when IMF support was needed. At least then Jim Callaghan was honest about how bad things were!  
Spot-on account of German business attitudes to Brexit:  
I voted Brexit because of the amusing Kek-related trolling photos of frogs in Russia posted by @RussianEmbassy 
EU businesses frustrated at the apparent lack of urgency tell May that if businesses don’t have certainty, they will simply go away. CBI says “Firms will soon have no choice but to assume the worst in terms of planning for no deal.” #StopBrexit #Brexit 
May would not have mentioned Putin unless she was frightened. She knows the depth of his involvement in the Leave campaign. She's wanting to appear aware while actually doing Putin's work. May's Brexit will destabilise Europe. Just what Putin wants.  
The Labour party and Tory rebels are still trying to prevent a real Brexit - they must be stopped!  
Austerity, not Brexit, has doomed the Tory party | Aditya Chakrabortty  
German and UK businesses who have spoken to UK Government Ministers all told me that they do not believe Theresa May's Ministers fully appreciate the adverse practical consequences of the type of Brexit they are pursuing (taking us out of the Single Market, ruling out EEA etc) /6 
It should be screamed from the rooftops that Brexit is a coup - engineered by the extreme right. They convinced 37% that Austerity was down to the EU, that our legal system had been made a tool of Brussels and that we don't need immigrants. V Clever. V Tragic.  
.@jeremycorbyn must come out now & oppose #Brexit.What the .@Conservatives are doing will damage the U.K. & it’s citizens for decades.It’s not a game.I don’t care if you think it’s disrespecting the outcome of the referendum. So be it. 
The bloke behind Nigel seems to be counting down the seconds until Brexit so he never has to share a room with the anthropomorphic bile duct ever again.  
What if there is no #Brexit deal before 29/3/19?We leave anyway.Adopt WTO tariffs.UK will be £7,000,000,000 a yr BETTER off.We can use that windfall to fund NHS,elderly,schools etc.#HappyDays 
MPs and peers will vote on agreement, but will have no say in case of no-deal Brexit, will not be able to reverse decision and will not be able to reopen talks  
May on Russia: I suspect she means ‘Russia lost me my majority in the GE’ and less keen to say ‘it influenced the Referendum.’ But if she’s serious about this, both are thereby invalidated, & a complete reset is necessary. In view of the unholy mess we’re in, that’s essential. 
General Secretary @Tim_Roache speaking at IPPR event on the economy - calling for public sector pay rise, investment in infrastructure & that any Brexit deal must benefit workers.  
Brexit will be good for our economy. Facebook is looking for 700,000 square feet of office accommodation in London to help its big expansion plans here. Google already has 1 m square feet of space at Kings Cross. So much for the doom mongers. 
German businesses think the UK leaving the EU is bad for them and for us.  They would be very happy to see the UK change its mind if, at the end of the process, Brexit is not what we thought; German businesses do not anticipate their Government having any issue with that /4 
For the #Brexit Steering Group in the European Parliament the priority are the citizens' rights. EU citizens in the UK and UK citizens in the EU should not be the victims of a Brexit #Eplenary 
The only thing that “Tory rebels” are rebelling against is the will of the British people to BREXIT!  
Last week we have seen again that there is no progress in #Brexit negotiations. It cannot continue like this. We only have one more year. Let’s move forward #EPlenary 
David Davis' Brexit vote offer fails to win over Tory rebels  
Thread: Spoke at the German British Forum's conference of UK and German businesses in Liverpool this morning. Very interesting feedback on Brexit which the German Ambassador described as a 'tragedy' to the gathering /1 
MPs have a duty to ensure that No Deal means No Brexit. Simple as that, really. They have the ‘sovereignty’ and the moral obligation to save us from economic ruin  
With 500 days to go until the UK leaves the EU, we've called for certainty surrounding the immigration status of EU academics. Read our 'Brexit Means...' report online now:  
If #TheresaMay means it, she should HALT #BREXIT IMMEDIATELY, as the #RussiaGate investigations revealed that Russian twitter accounts were churning out pro-Brexit propaganda during the #EUref. #repealbill #EUWithdrawalBill #StopBrexit #ExitFromBrexit 
I asked drunk people outside the European Parliament how they think Brexit is going:  
Britain's food prices have risen by the most in 4 years  
So the following words are being spoken by a woman who is bypassing democracy in order to introduce a damaging policy based on a referendum result influenced by Russia.  
One in five European doctors planning to quit UK. Brexit, with falling £ and citizen rights insecurity is making UK less attractive.  
We’re heading for a Customs melt down as HMRC fail to plan for Brexit  via @richardjmurphy 
MPs just released a 'catastrophic' warning over Brexit  
The EU is going further than any of the treaties envisioned when it comes to budgets and policies. It's time to leave whilst we still can! #Brexit #AFCO 
Does Theresa May expect us to believe Vladimir Putin meddled in elections but not in EU referendum? Does she really believe #Brexit will lead to united UK-EU front against Putin? She’s seriously deluded if she does.  
Some MPs seem to think that they could unilaterally change any “final” Brexit deal in Westminster. Sorry guys. You’d have get 27 other countries to agree. 
Most Brits now think Brexit was a mistake, European Parliament president Antonio Tajani says  
#Brexit sends the message to Europeans that they’re no longer welcome in Britain. Most Tories love this, not least because the #NHS is dependent on foreign workers & they want to privatise it as quickly as possible.#ToriesOut 
Brexit Reality:-1:5 European NHS doctors planning to quit UK-Number of EU nurses coming to UK 89% down-#Brexit supposed to boost NHS by £350m a week-Instead it's a brain drain 
Dear @EU_Commission,I know you have a rule about not meddling in internal member state votes, but you just sat back and let @Nigel_Farage make Brexit voters think you were forcing 1000s of refugees on us!#TackleFakeNews 
A parliamentary report has warned failure to complete the introduction of a new customs system by the date of Brexit in 2019 would be "catastrophic" 
ECB's Nouy "For banks looking to leave the UK after Brexit, the clock is ticking, and the affected banks have to move quickly"Translation - FFS, why are the banks not leaving the UK? 
HOW #FAKENEWS CAUSED #BREXIT: It’s becoming increasingly obvious that fake news in some of our leading newspapers helped to cause Brexit. Please read and share our report, and watch @Jon_Danzig’s 14-minute video on fake news. Link:  
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: Britain can expect £135 BILLION windfall after EU divorce, experts say  
One basic problem of Brexit continues to be that politicians treated the referendum as binding when it was only advisory, and now want to treat the Article 50 notification as advisory, when it is (unless something exceptional happens) binding. 
When will it sink in to ministers' heads that the way the government is taking us on #brexit has catastrophic consequences for the British economy: 
Let's be upbeat about the benefits of Brexit - now is the time to be bold.  
Theresa May is currently the worst PM in the world.Using #Russia as scapegoat for her failures in #Brexit negotiations and other domestic issues won't help her to regain popularity.  
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg will deliver the keynote speech at our Budget for Brexit event today - offering positive suggestions for a bold Brexit.  
The UK Government’s Brexit bill shouldn’t be imposed on Wales without our consent, argues @HywelPlaidCymru 
Finally, I am hugely grateful to the producers  - @partinator basically got it made, @KudosTV @DiederickSant were great. And now, if I haven't been blocked or unfollowed by everyone, normal service can resume, with endless tweeting about Brexit and Pizza Express. Much love. x 
Facebook has finally opened the door to admitting Russia meddled in Brexit 
There are 3 major delusions in this quote from Peter Hargreaves. 1. Before Brexit our economy was strong and our "butts" were already in gear.2. Insecurity on a national scale breeds xenophobia, division and hate.3. Even Churchill refused to describe Dunkirk as a victory.  
A worrying number of doctors are considering leaving the UK as a result of the #Brexit vote; we need an end to the uncertainty about what the future holds for our EU workforce  
Austerity, not Brexit, has doomed the Tory party | Aditya Chakrabortty  
Almost half of NHS doctors from Europe are considering quitting the UK because of Brexit, according to a new survey.  
What can parliament do, and what can parliament not do, about Brexit?1/ 
It’s scandalous (but unsurprising) that Redwood has different Brexit-mitigation advice for clients and constituents.  
Fellow Brexiteers: Starmer is not just referring to Tory Leavers. He is labelling us all as 'Brexit extremists'. I am beginning to dislike this Remoaner even more than Gina Miller  
Almost one in five of the #NHS ’s European doctors have made plans to quit Britain, according to research that has raised fresh fears of a #Brexit-induced medical brain drain. 
Dave Brown on Boris Johnson and Michael Gove’s influence on Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Uncomfortable reading: @GoodwinMJ on why most aspects of Brexit are discussed more than immigration  
Deal or No Deal. Either way, Brexit is happening!  
Theresa May is facing a challenge over her over-reaching Brexit Withdrawal bill - from her own party. Tory MPs are looking to challenge the PM to ensure there is flexibility. Total #brexitShambles 
Highway code updated for BREXIT BRITAIN!  
Robin Walker: The Brexit minister who sounds very much as if he wouldn't vote to leave the EU if there were another referendum. #bbcr4today 
‘People who don’t share your optimism - which includes you, btw since you voted Remain’ @bbcnickrobinson to Brexit minister  Robin Walker 
More awesome Brexit news! (I invite you to do the maths regarding our ratio of doctorspopulation.)"European NHS" 
Serial #Brexit tease Anna Soubry all across TV, radio and the papers again. Labelled a “leading Tory Brexit rebel” in reality she HASN’T VOTED AGAINST THE GOVERNEMNT ONCE on Brexit. Put your vote where your mouth is or shut up. 
Nearly a fifth of European doctors are planning to quit the NHS because of Brexit  
Snakeoil Starmer continues to puruse his Brexit-wrecking agenda. Once again Corbyn is in hiding with no comment to make. No ECJ for the UK!  
Does Anna Soubry MP ever have time to eat, sleep or attend to her constituents' needs.  She is for ever on TV and radio berating BREXIT! 
If Theresa May fails Scotland, there will need to be a second referendum on independence. 
So rather than £350m more a week for the NHS, Brexit so far has resulted in: - 1 in 5 European NHS doctors plans to quit UK- 67% rise in nurses/midwives leaving UK register since ref Bloody immigrants refusing to stay and save lives!! 
Dyson and Redwood call for the most radical type of Brexit while simultaneously investing outside the UK.Are they ... 
Tory MP Luke Graham says, "This just proves that every vote for SNP is a vote for another independence referendum". This boy is sharp ! 
Mrs May saying we need Brexit to thwart Russia is as mad as Churchill saying in 1939 we’ve all decided to become Nazis to thwart Germany. 
150,000 care home workers are EU immigrants who don't know if they're allowed to stay. There are another 92,000 vacancies, so clearly not enough Brits want the job.Over 65s were the only age group where a majority voted for Brexit.Turkeys. Christmas.  
Parliament could have chosen a binding Referendum. It did on other occasions. But a binding Referendum would likely have had stronger safeguards. 
The thing about an advisory Referendum is that it's for Parliament to decide what to do with that advice. New facts may properly lead Parliament to ignore it. 
Working age EU migrants living in UK,who don't have a job,account for a city size of BristolOne in seven of the 2,733,000 EU migrants aged 16-64 a total of 390,000are unemployed or “inactive”Amazingly the Tories are to allow them to stay after #Brexit 
David Davis throws out parliamentary sovereignty again with his Brexit U-turn. The 'meaningful' final Brexit deal vote is 'back our deal or face the catastrophe of no deal'. We need a no-Brexit option!! #StopBrexit #ToriesOut #r4today 
Brexit deal3 million EU citizens allowed to stay in UK permanently & will get same rights as BritsPM doesn't want to“break up families”Which is clear indication that spouses & children of EU nationalswho live abroad, will be eligible to join them in UK 
Russia is responsible for ... TrumpRussia is responsible for ... BrexitRussia is responsible for ... Catalonia independenceThe mainstream media, mainstream politics are responsible for ... #FakeNews 
Top: David Davis wants to set date of Brexit in law for 11pm March 29, 2019. Bottom: Yvette Cooper wants to prevent that from happening and instead link the date of Brexit to when MPs have actually voted on a final Brexit deal.Key battle.  
Ikea counts the cost of Brexit as furniture import prices soar  
In a significant concession, British government says it will allow Parliament to vote on a final Brexit deal  
It seems Parliament is beginning to understand what a huge error it was to agree to trigger Art50 without any idea of the shape of Brexit. 
Good that @Theresa_May is addressing Putin's efforts to attack & divide democracies. His biggest target is the EU, as he would kill (abd has) to stop former Soviet countries joining. Pushing Brexit is part of this effort 
."Latest suggestion that a derailment of the Brexit talks over the Border would be Dublin’s fault is a LAUGHABLE .....". 
.Sham Offerfrom a Sham Ministerin a Sham Governmentforcing through 'result' from a Sham Referendum. 
The consumer spending peak you can see here was when Leavers said there was a Brexit boom.We said it wouldn't last.We were right.  
Former National Security Advisor, Mark Lyall Grant, on @BBCr4today hints that Russia influenced Brexit plebiscite. Are we sure the vote of 37% of electorate that seriously weakens UK internationally can't be questioned? @Hugodixon @lukeharding1968 @edwardlucas @CER_Grant 
WTAF - I just had the weirdest dream last night. We were stupid enough to vote for Brexit, Donald Trump was President and I was PM and then I lost my majority and now Corbyn is ahead in the polls.Fucking hell - it's great to be back in the real world though. 
Mayday!! Putin Bozo Russia Brexitas Tory sociopaths ask how much should we care about Grenfelll? poor men die 22yrs before wealthy in K&C  
This, is of deep concern. The problem for Leave, and us all, is that Brexit was fundamentally compromised by its leaders collaboration with enemy agents. #LeaveGate 
Brexit would:- wipe out large parts of UK manufacturing- decimate financial services- cripple agriculture- destroy the NHS- herald a devastating new wave of austerityBut on the plus side... No, still nothing #brexitshambles #stopbrexit 
Jacob Rees-Mogg took aim at the BBC for presenting an unbalanced view of Britain’s prospects outside the EU.#Brexit #MoggMentum 
Norway’s EEA & EU Minister @maritrosland on the way to her first EEA Council meeting to discuss  brexit, the EEA Agreement and economic development. #Brexit and meeting @MichelBarnier first on the agenda. 
BREXIT:The real concern of Labour, and Tory Remainers, is not the freedom of Nazanin Zaghari-Ratcliffe in Iran. It's to get Brexit’s most senior & popular politician... sacked.  
Fintan O’Toole: Brexit means we are bordering on the absurd  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
More or less disingenuous than those pretending Parliament, if Brexit falls short of what was promised, can't change its mind, @NickBoles? 
Leading Brexit man advises companies not to put their money in the UK any longer.   
Language skills 'must be a priority for schools as Brexit approaches'  via @tes #mfltwitterati 
So, with #AlternativeWar put to bed, it’s time for a step change. We aren’t looking at theory, or what if. Now it’s time to focus on what next.Tomorrow I’m publishing a repository of Russia Brexit memes which have been collected.Article to come at @Byline_Media 
Excellent thread. Key points: 1. MPs only now realising their error in triggering Article 50; 2. MPs & Lords can amend Bill to require A50 be revoked in event of No Deal (or v poor deal). In other words, Parliament can stop Brexit if it wants to.  
Praying for all tweeps, esp those involved in Brexit negotiations, and, on the feast of St Dyfrig, our local parishes. #prayer 
Brexit Britain's £135 BILLION windfall! 
In Brexit news, MPs "audibly gasped" when informed of a basic domain problem that was obvious 500 days ago  
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: Britain can expect £135 BILLION windfall after EU divorce, experts sayBRITAIN can look forward to a post-Brexit windfall worth a staggering £135billion after leaving the European Union, according to a new report.  
Austerity, not Brexit, has doomed the Tory party. My col  
Parliament getting a vote on the Brexit deal isn’t enough! No option to Remain.If you show a chink in your armour the enemy will take advantage. We’ve now seen a chink so let  #Bresistance begin! Write, email or tweet your MP NOW & demand that #Remain is an option! #stopbrexit 
Just because the majority of MPs, the MSM and the electorate have so far failed to understand the complexities of how Brexit's 'will of the people' was the subject of outside influence, doesn't mean it didn't happen; the evidence is being uncovered by @J_amesp & @carolecadwalla 
I wrote Article 50. This government can reverse Brexit if it wants to...  
25% of Politics/IR staff are from other EU states: UK risks mass exodus of EU academics post-Brexit, finds report  
#onemillionvoices :So the ‘Government’ aka David Davis have revealed their position on any deal on Brexit :A Parliamentary vote on either ;Accept the deal & Brexit OrRefuse the deal & Hard Brexit.So is this the ‘will of the people ‘ ? 
Thanks to your support, we passed all three referendum questions on the ballot. We have the resources we need to build for the future, advance the innovation, and continue the excellence. Our students, teachers and staff have just one message - THANK YOU!  
Fintan O’Toole: Brexit means we are bordering on the absurd  
Absolutely! And like decades of Murdoch /Fox here gave us Trump, decades of Murdoch /Tabloids in Britain gave them Brexit 
Koutsantonis tells #saparli he wants a referendum on renewable energy, minutes after spruiking his plan to spend $410m on diesel generators 
I agree about uncertainty. By the way, here's what I said about Brexit and POTUS:   
Ah memories: After the Irish referendum I asked @lanesainty to explain why we didn't need one here 
#AmLiveNTV in case secession fails, Parliamentary system will do. Soon we will be going for referendum to determine the fate of our future. And that is the Kenya we want. 
Brexit: MPs to scrutinise EU Withdrawal bill  
This 2 meltdowns in one evening Pete. Your threads are now more about ranting and raving than solid facts. Brexit is falling apart. 
All you want is the chance to overturn the verdict of the referendum. You dinosaurs need to accept that your regime is coming to an end. We voted to get rid of you.  
UK is drifting towards Brexit disaster, writes @FT @gideonrachman 
NRI Releases Reports Commissioned Under its Bougainville Referendum Research Project  
Brexit 'guerilla warfare' kicks off in the Commons over EU Withdrawal Bill  
Have some cheer from this:A new referendum is a constitutional requirement.  
UK universities warn of exodus by EU academics post-Brexit  
Where shall I begin?Referendum was advisory & none of Leave promises realistically achievable, esp not in 2 years. Democracy means one can oppose, plus change one's mind. The world did not stop on 24 June 2016. Low£,lowest growth in EU countries & loss of EU rights, #StopBrexit 
Brexit is like another Berlin Wall but I reckon it'll be torn down before it ever gets built as long as we keep campaigning to #StopBrexit 
We know @LeaveEUOfficial encouraged the death threats to @thatginamiller. If there's ANY sign any other #Brexit campaign colluded with the foreign sponsored racism of the last two years, they should be barred from public office 
One fifth of EU doctors have made plans to leave NHS because of Brexit  
David Davis and his Brexit mob reach full blown mad hatter's tea party: "MPs and peers will vote on agreement, but will have no say in case of no-deal Brexit, will not be able to reverse decision and will not be able to reopen talks"Well, as long as we get our sovereignty back.  
Spain says it has intel suggesting Russian-based groups used social media to spread "misinformation" related to Catalonia's independence referendum  pic.twitter.com/DyWNQeURin 
Brexit 'concession' by David Davis is a SHAM - don't believe the Tory/Leave-supporting press…  
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: Britain can expect £135 BILLION windfall after EU divorce, experts say  
Red, white and blue Brexit#StopBrexit 
Admire Tom Brake but *the people voted to leave the EU/ the people must have the option to stay* is not good enough. It was not *the will of the people* but the lies of Leavers & the will of Putin. Gov't & MPs have a duty to overturn this wretched Brexit in the name of democracy.  
The British Prime Minister appears to be suggesting that the Brexit vote could have been swung by the Kremlin.But, knowing that, she’s going to carry on with it anyway.I’m not sure that’s what Thatcher or Churchill would have done.  
#Newsnight People have "a right" to see the he Brexit impact studies.  … I do not understand, if leaving the EU means more prosperity and jobs; why is it then, we are not allowed to see the good news? - Agree RT 
David Davis wants to restore the sovereignty of Parliament so much from the "EU dictators" that only he and he alone will tell the parliament when and how Brexit will happen. 
Imagine an independent Scotland. Own central bank & currency, new financial regulatory setup, new and/or reformed banks, it's own stock exchange, national investment bank, full fiscal control, no sodding Brexit. What a great place it would be eh. 
Sadiq Khan calls for urgent action to stop drain of European builders, and warns that losing skilled workers could be “catastrophic” for building plans.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
The heads of the CBI & Business Europe, & other European business leaders met the PM & Ministers on Brexit on Monday, but their read-outs seem to be rather different to DExEU's 1/  
Reminder that in the Marriage Equality referendum in Ireland in 2015, LGBT youth services saw a TEN TIMES increase in young people needing urgent support.That's the kind of thing this media stuff does. It ruins people's health. 
You can't even call them the Seven Dwarves anymore because of Brexit or Xmas or something  
Brilliant. Just brilliant. Suddenly Bennelong becomes a referendum on the Govt 
*finally* business is speaking up on Brexit.But they need to do way better: progress towards a disastrous outcome is no progress at all.  
Brexit hits the pound yet again despite the Bank of England's rate rise. More higher prices coming soon and the inevitable Brexit fall in standards of living that will follow. It is time to take back control and #StopBrexit 
So what is the UK government's Brexit policy now hanging by?Thread. 
Treasonous .@EU_Commission moves on military agreement just as .@Nigel_Farage warned: “They’ve got the fund, the structures set up...divvying up which country will do the helicopter work, which country will be the major naval provider.”#EUArmy #Brexit 
It's beginning to look like Brexit was NOT the "Will of the People", but WAS the "Will of the Russian People"?#FBPE #StopBrexit #followbackProEU #Brexit #RussianBots #brexitshambles #BrexitBill #Brexiteers #brexitmeansbrexit #brexitvote #Remain #BrexitCrisis 
So, this evening @DavidDavisMP played a blinder by backing #Brexit rebel MP’s into a corner..And our lovely PM @Theresa_May just called out Putin &Russia’s interference in Western Politics. All in all I’d say it’s been a great day to be a #Brexiteer & a #Conservative. #Proud 
Well yes, Carole. My guess is that MI5 , MI6 and GCHQ have now told May that the game is up , they have the evidence that Putin subverted the Referendum , AND that Johnson is implicated . Did you see the great film on Burgess on TV just now ? 
When I met you after #Brexit @OliverHealdUK you said that #A50 was not the time to object, rather that time would come with the #EUWithdrawalBill. That time has come, so I hope you  be true to your word and stand up against this bill to prevent our country from further damage. 
I can never understand why @carolecadwalla isn't in the @guardian or the Observer every day. For a year she's been the ONLY mainstream press journo covering Trump, Brexit, Russia connections. The BIGGEST story of our era  
So we acknowledge Russian interference in elections such as #Brexit but to stay in power I’m gonna plough ahead with it.  #StopBrexit Ps she confirms @J_amesp ‘s #AlternativeWar ! 
A veritable flood of Brexiteers claiming that a combination of DD’s statement and the Gina Miller case means that Brexit is now 100% irreversible.  Not sure whether to keep on correcting or let them fester in their smug ignorance. #FBPE 
And finally the penny drops. It'll now only be another two years before she wakes up in the middle of the night and yells "Wait! I bet they meddled in the EU referendum too!"  
Tuesday’s GUARDIAN: “Tory rebels not convinced by Brexit U-turn” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
#Brexit Can we just get on with Brexit FFS.!!!Conservatives fighting each over. Bloody labour trying to derail Brexit every day.       
So @theresa_may you accuse Russia of interfering in elections and fake news, while ignoring Russia's interference in Brexit politics, and slavishly furthering Putin's project to break up the Western democracies in your pursuit of #Brexit. #StopBrexit /1 
Remember the children’s rights referendum a few years ago? Enshrining children’s rights in our constitution. And how many children TONIGHT are sleeping in hotel rooms? What will be the damage to them in future? #CBlive 
So when the overtly anti-democratic Lammy called for a "meaningful" vote, what he actually meant by "meaningful" was "a vote that enables Parliament to override the Referendum result & block Brexit"Glad we've got that clear.  
Delighted to announce that EFT Adviser @Jacob_Rees_Mogg will be the keynote speaker at our Budget for Brexit event tomorrow, sign up here:  
PM accuses Russia of interfering in elections. But strangely forgets to mention Brexit 
A negative supply shock means reducing your economy's productive capacity. We can debate how big is the harm, which industries get hit, what happens after the UK adjusts, but there is no disputing this sort of shock will result from Brexit.By @AdamPosen 
'The government backs down and offers Parliament a vote on the Brexit deal'. #5live Keep clutching them straws #BBC This getting really funny. 
Where is the opposition in this country? Is there NO politician who will stand up and represent what is now a majority of citizens who think Brexit is an act of self-immolation? 
Something v. strange going on..Last week: Boris - ZERO evidence of Russian interferenceTonight: PM - the Russians interfered.????AND NOT A SINGLE MENTION OF BREXIT  
'Maybe' was an option in the 1995 Quebec referendum. #fakehistoryfromcanada 
The three leading Tory #Brexit rebels:Dominic Grieve, sacked Attorney General.Anna Soubry, sacked Business Minister.Nicky Morgan, sacked Education Secretary.I just can't see a connection. 
Theresa May wants to enshrine a date for Brexit, despite the investigation into Putin's manipulation, which will take some time, and the fact that David Davis couldn't negotiate his way out of a Portaloo. Her way would lead to a dodgy deal, based on lies and fake news.#Newsnight 
Tory rebels will have to bring down the government if they want to stop Brexit  
UK people get Brexit Twitter in the day, Trump Twitter in the evening. Like wallowing in bin juice all day then going for a nice refreshing swim in the sewer 
Only EU theology prevents the UK and Ireland from resolving their Brexit border issues says @CharlesHMoore 
If Brexit were in any way beneficial to the UK it would fly through parliament and Theresa May would not look as if she were trying to digest raw gravel. #bbcnews 
Jesus. I know you’ve got the right to protest but Good Lord, it’s enough to make you want to leave with No Deal #Brexit  
I don't want another referendum. I don't want another divisive campaign. If Nicola is stupid enough to ask for one and Theresa is stupid enough to grant it, I'm not worried about the outcome. 
Global Britain after Brexit will stop Russia influence FFS!!! Brexit was their idea!?  Just how dopey is Teereza? 
'Labour says it's a significant climbdown'. Giving Parliament a vote on the Brexit deal that amounts to 'yes' or 'no'. And if 'No' we walk anyway. Give me a climbdown like that any day. #BBC 
Interesting piece by @campbellclaret in @TheNewEuropean 'We can have #Brexit or the #NHS We can't have both' See 
Vote Leave chief Matthew Elliot's connection with suspected Russian spy Sergey Nalobin, who we can also see in this photo with with Boris Johnson. #StopBrexit #Brexit pic.twitter.com/voRlI6wG58 
Yo @carolecadwalla makes the nugget about @JulianAssange as would be Aussie Ambassador to America somewhat relevant to Blighty, no?#Brexit cc @GCHQ @nadaburger 
No Brexit, for the many, not the few.#revokeA50forthwith#StopBrexit 
Which country is that, Nathan? The Brexit bill is undermining democracy in my country. Wales.  
Brexit was never in the best interests of the country.Brexit was always in the interests of the select few.Any Brexit deal will always be worse than what we already have.A No Brexit deal will always be the worse possible outcome.#revokeA50forthwith#StopBrexit 
Brexit is what the Russians wanted. Those bots were not for Remain. Even Mrs May cannot be this determinedly thick.  
Welcome May finally admitting this is a problem. Timing interesting. Strange she doesn’t mention EU Referendum  
The government insults the British people and Parliament with its grant to Parliament of the 'choice' to accept the final deal or wreck the country. We demand a democratic referendum on the final deal!Who are the democrats!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Would UK really leave with no deal if MPs voted down Brexit? I'm sceptical. Politics would intervene. 
In which case the EU referendum is even more suspect. What is May going to do about that?  
It's almost as if Brexit is a giant turd that no one wants to claim.  
Been in Australia for 3 weeks and have lost touch. Can someone remind me whether the Tory rebels are pro-hard brexit or anti-hard brexit?  
And the cull goes on.. quietly, systematically, deliberately, whilst everyone's attention is on.. Brexit (EU doesn't give a damn what we do, they are sick of the power game Tory incompetence) then sex scandals, then Johnson.. Boring.. Meanwhile.. pic.twitter.com/XvIxAupe4A 
The Tory linked #LegatumInstitute has been pushing the hard #Brexit claim that Mutual Recognition Agreements will solve the problem of trade with the EU. This is nonsense, as is explained here #StopBrexit 
My views on BREXIT on the box today..   
Stop the Brexit Bus we want to get off. #RemainersNow #Remain 
#DavidDavis and the rest of #theresamay's craven Tory cabinet are intent to drive Britain onto the reef of Brexit sinking all hopes of a pleasant life for the ordinary worker. 
UK Parliament will get vote on final Brexit deal before the country leaves EU, minister Davis tells MPsUK people won’t get vote, though 
Tomorrow, Westminster will start discussing amendments to the #WithdrawalBill. Our #GiveWalesASay amendment will make sure Wales's voice is heard. Read why it's so important here: 11 things Westminster doesn't want you to know about Brexit 
.Journalists are uncovering how Russia interfered in the EU referendum & she makes a ridiculous speech like this?. 
Britain's shoppers are cutting back, with big falls reported in spending over the past month  
EU ILLUSION! London will thrive after Brexit, German business expert warns Brussels  
Brexit latest: Britain will leave EU with NO DEAL if MPs reject agreement fumes Davis  
Brexit. The EU have had plenty of time to justify their demand for a massive divorce bill but they haven't managed to do so. So terrified are they that others might follow the UK out the door they are punishing UK as an example and don't care a jot. 
The government is ignoring advice on EU #citizensrights that could save a Brexit deal says @PaulineBock in the @NewStatesman 
The Remain campaign offered project fear because they had nothing positive to say about the EU. Brexit supporters believe in Britain  
Whaaaaaaat?! A final vote, but if it doesn't get approved there's no deal. Political blackmail? You bet, but it's so unbelievable it's unreal! THIS GOVERNMENT IS A FARCE! At the very least there should be a fresh referendum on EU membership. Too democratic, no doubt. #StopBrexit 
When Mike Hind of @TheNewEuropean talks about elderly #Brexit voters being killed off by a "bad winter" and predicts their grandchildren will "spit on their graves", he's referring to men like Geoffrey Pattison.  
Brexit is damaging investment, which is damaging housebuilding. YAY. You're never allowed to change your democratic decision in Brexit Britain  
Appears that DDavies is either completely incompetent or complicit in behind the scenes dealings that are not in the interests of the UK. We need to see all 58 unredacted Brexit assessments... @acgrayling 
I’ll stop after this, but I want to flag this one last time because there really is no way I could overstate how angry this has made me. It also serves to illustrate a reason for how we got Brexit. 1/  
Tories shattered in to a million tiny pieces. Brexit is destroying them hour by hour, day by day. Delicious   
Tory rebels will have to bring down the government if they want to stop Brexit. (My latest for Reaction @reactionlife) 
The Brexiters who yell "We won!" "Get over it!" are not patriots. They are betraying their country with their carelessness, willful ignorance, and pride in a refusal to reason about the consequences of #Brexit.#StopBrexit 
I've told @theresa_may that the City will do its utmost to support her government's work in securing a #Brexit deal that will ensure the UK's prosperity for generations  
Today, @the3million was in the Belgian capital to get an update on the #Brexit negotiations and present our alternative proposal to settled status to the EU negotiators. #citizensrightsWatch us on @BBCLondonNews ! #PeopleB4Politics  
Absolute Brexit. Some people don't deserve Korg.  
How the Brexit con trick works:1 Identify social problems2 Identify scapegoats3 Blame 1 on 24 Whip up hatred5 Narrowly win election6 Continue wrongly blaming 27 Sit back and let country collapse so you and the rest of your grubby 1% will get even richer8 Rot in hell 
How about listening to them then? every single one of them thinks your hard Brexit plan is a total disaster  
'GRAVE CONSEQUENCES' Germany will lose BILLIONS in a Brexit no deal, warns business leader  
With MPs now allowed to vote whether to accept the final Brexit deal or not, are you still confused about what the outcome options are? Here's our handy guide:  
“Worried about #Brexit? Let #Denmark fix it!”Those cheeky Danes...HT @anderspreben 
In 2009, #Kurdistan region and #Barzani were determined to hold a referendum for constitution, but our American friends pressured no to, they gave promises and asked to resolve problems by negotiating with Baghdad.We did listen before, but guess what! Nothing happened.  
I've been@ HOME for days. My People SINCERELY want  SECESSION. They want a REFERENDUM.#PressPass 
I will be on @LBC Radio later this evening talking about the parliamentary vote on the final #Brexit deal - the government shouldn’t blackmail parliament with “this-deal-brexit or no-deal-brexit”  without a choice to renegotiate or reconsider 
Some reflections on Brexit and Economic policy. See my talk at David Hume Institute this evening.  
Scottish Parliament has already debated a second independence referendum and voted in favour of it. The people of Scotland have also given the SNP two election mandates for it. Anyone who tries to prevent another independence referendum is being anti-democratic and dictatorial.  
I reckon UK Govt's definition of exit day is just political window dressing to disguise legal reality that transitional deal will mean continued membership of CU, SM & jurisdiction of #ECJ. It will be #Brexit only in name  
RETWEET if you Love BREXIT and the UK and think MP's should listen to populist opinions FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
I'm afraid it might not be just a Brexit recession—we're bound to have one of those—but a deep Brexit depression, and social catastrophe.  
I wrote Article 50. This government can reverse Brexit if it wants to 
dodging challenges to brexit like  
I believe Theresa May's attempt to fix the date of Brexit in law would be illegal. The court has said only parliament can take the UK out of the EU. It has to have time to debate and amend any deal, and there has to be time for it to go back to the EU and then back to parliament  
All the UK's big car plants are foreign owned, and mostly ship their cars abroad to Europe. #Brexit is therefore a big problem.  
James Dyson's pronouncement yesterday shows what Brexit  could mean. How can Labour support Brexit knowing Dyson, Vamfirx would scrap workers' rights? 
Tonight’s topics. 1. Dyson and Brexit  2. Tiaras and tutus 3. Moderate Islam.  
The UK should pay a Brexit bill of “at least €60 billion,” Antonio Tajani says  
Publicly, the MP is a parochial Colonel Blimp for Berkshire. Privately, he is really the MP for a vulture fund preying on Brexit.  
So UK vote Leave. Tories go hard #Brexit that no one wants, call election for mandate, don't get it, carry on regardless, now pretend only 2 options - their deal or no deal, when reversing perfectly possible. And no one thinks this is a coup???  
If you are a patriot the most important thing you can do now is STOP dodgy David Davis leading Brexit negotiations. He will blackmail parliament into accepting a damaging deal. He and May have been so poor that what we need now is an extension to the negotiation period 
Davis David will give Parliament a vote on #Brexit deal, but it is a classic “false dilemma”. Totally ignores the option of abandoning #Brexit  
So Remainers accuse us, who voted Brexit, of being rich. I’m dead poor and voted for Brexit. R.T. if ditto 
I've always been puzzled as to why, after many decades, the EU has not managed to negotiate a trade deal with any of the 3 largest economies in the world. Having seen the stubborn, bordering on bully boy tactics they've employed regarding Brexit it all makes perfect sense. 
Brexit deal will need to pass through European Parliament before hand. Very unlikely to pass if EU citizens’ rights are weakened.  
Europe is no longer the sick man of the world economy (but it's a different story for Britain)  
Any Conservative MP who would join forces with Labour to subvert Brexit is a traitor to this country.  
Had a psychotic mate once after selling his ghetto blaster. Wanted £20. Nobody offered more than £15. So he smashed it up with a baseball bat. That's common current Brexit thinking. 
Theresa May allows Parliament a Brexit vote but denies freedom to choose a good outcome.  
The bill meant to implement BrexitWon't pass until parliament chexitAnd gives it some scrutinySo if Tories mutinyIt may be the Commons rejexit. 
John Redwood MP - "The CBI is catastrophically wrong on big issues." "They talked us into the ERM which gave a huge recession. They wanted us to go into the euro and told us the City would be greatly damaged if we didn’t." #Brexit  
I get the impression that many Brexit supporters bloody love democracy, but only if it is confined strictly to 23 June 2016.Nothing before or after counts to them.#FBPE #StopBrexit #exitfrombrexit #Remain 
David Davis promises a final vote on Brexit - but claims MPs won't be able to vote it down.  
I presume the MPs gasped because it’s a load of tosh from Davis, not because they actually believed him?#Brexit  
David Davis offer of a final vote on the #Brexit deal for MPs is holding a gun to their heads. He's passing the buck to you. This gives even more reason why you should vote for Amendments 120 (ref on final deal) and 124 (remain in single market) in the #EUWithdrawalBill tomorrow. 
Season 2, Episode 1 - 13th November 2017Today:Brexit petsKids’ clothesHappy high streetsPlanet watching#BritishRationals #BritishRationals2 
The UK must leave the EU in its entirety, including taking back all fishing rights & all of our waters. UK fisher folk were sold down the river in the EU & they must not be abandoned again in any DEAL. Fishing rights are off the table!!! #UKIP #Brexit 
Lamentable performance from David Davis, the Govt's Brexit cheerleader. He still believes that a meaningful vote for MPs is one that offers a choice between a bad deal and a catastrophic deal. Sham democracy. 
'Austin Brexit' is our car of the week  
."Brexit cannot be allowed to get one over on Good Friday AgrmtWe can't allow anyone to take us back to the dark days". 
Defence Specialist Warns Armed Forces Will Be ‘Pawns in Brexit Negotiation Game’ After EU Signs Military Pact  
In what amounts to parliamentary blackmail, David Davis has stated that Britain will leave the EU without a deal if MPs vote down any EU #Brexit deal. So much for all of that Brexiter "taking back control of parliamentary sovereignty." 
Scrutiny is not Treachery:My column featuring Nobel prize economists, famines, Russian bots, Brexit & the Commons  
The Secession Bill is ready and submitted to @IEBCKenya to plan a referendum. What do you think? #ResistanceIsReal 
She said it. She meant it. #DealOrNoDeal #Brexit 
Definition : “taking back control” = like it or lump it       (eg “MPs can take back control by voting on Brexit deal but if they reject it Britain crashes out of EU with no deal”) 
.@Jon_Danzig’s call for #Leavers and #Remainers to unite in protest against the lies that #Britain was told about #Brexit during the #EUReferendum has now been published on his blog. Please share widely. Link:  
I’m sharing this because stopping Brexit is a patriotic duty.#StopBrexit#StopTheLies 
#Brexit isn't just going to make exporting finished cars more expensive. The parts will be mre costly, and supply lines will gum up. 
Arch #brexiteer Redwood criticised over advice to big businesses to pull money out of the UK before the economy tanks post #Brexit. You couldn't make it up.  
We've got the first evidence that Russia used Twitter to influence Brexit• Small network of accounts followed by 268,643 people • Posted anti-immigration, Islamophonic propaganda • Retweeted one another to falsely amplify their message 
Brexit: May's  plan to fix date of Britain's EU withdrawal into law is 'thoroughly stupid', says leading Tory rebel  
Absolutely Robert! It is such a shame that so many persist in portraying Brexit as an absolute disaster waiting to happen, rather than a fantastic opportunity for greater trade, self-determination and greater control of UK's laws and overall sovereignty! Keep posting. Best wishes 
Wouldn't it be absolutely delicious if Labour MPs decided to grandstand by voting against the final #Brexit deal, and true Leaver MPs then decided to join them to kill the deal & force a 'no deal'? Beautiful! 
Some again saying Article 50 means Brexit is inevitable (with or without a deal). But Lord Kerr and EU leaders have made clear Article 50 is revocable (and UK can ask for more time).  
MPs to get a vote on Brexit deal. Not what Cameron said "Your decision. Nobody elses. Not politicians. Not Parliament." Yet again the MPs try to usurp the voters  
The same rules & institutions that govern Presidential elections govern referendum.Let them do the donkey work. They will meet us pale pale 
Govt forced to agree new Bill on Withdrawal Agreement (as we called for in NC3) but won't commit to Bill BEFORE Brexit day. Not good enough  
*Some MPs in the House of Commons gasp at something almost everyone else understood would be the case ages ago* #Brexit  
Proud to speak against a second independence referendum and make the positive case for the Union. Scotland is different from other parts of the UK, but it is not separate. We are best served by continuing to face the challenges of the world together, as one United Kingdom 
@JasonKander Hello from Scotland. I just wanted to thank you. Your advice on how to talk to Trump voters has helped me speak with love to family members about how their vote for Brexit has affected me & my Greek boyfriend (without fighting about it!) Can’t wait for your podcast 
A parliamentary vote on the final #Brexit deal is meaningless if it’s a blackmailing choice of   “this-deal- brexit or no-deal-brexit”  with no chance to renegotiate or reconsider 
I imagine @JunckerEU now appreciates what happens when you screw with the UK. #Brexit  
After today’s events, which Kier Starmer is desperately trying to paint as a climbdown, @DavidDavisMP is now in a position to deliver UK Parliament with a #DealOrNoDeal option! Better make it a good deal now Merkel!#Brexit  
Parliament will get a vote on the final Brexit deal before the UK leaves the EU, minister David Davis has told MPs.  If they vote NO, it will not stop #Brexit but mean we are leaving with no deal! 
The government is making a mockery of Parliament and is using a 37% vote in an advisory referendum to deny the British people any further democratic rights on #Brexit. This is not politics. This is a crime against the British people. #StopBrexit 
Brexiteers are unanimous in their support of Britain as a free and independent sovereign nation state unencumbered by further membership of the EU. Remoaners (Remainers who refuse to accept the Referendum result) meanwhile, are not confident in the UK's abilities or prospects. 
So the government's concession is to give Parliament the chance to vote to reject the final deal and throw all but the top 1% off the economic cliff. This is the mentality of a Mafia gang. We are ruled by crooks.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Meanwhile. We have no idea about Google/YouTube Russian ads in Brexit. Because Google won't say...  
As Brexiter, man-of-the-people, and great "patriot" John Redwood advises investors to get their money out of the UK, I feel compelled to remind those misguided progressives who still support Brexit of something I wrote last year. And if you don't get it yet, you never will.  
WATCH: @Alison_McGovern urges the Gov for clarity as to how they can set a specific Brexit date & strike a last minute deal. Please RT:  
Should parliament get vote on final #Brexit deal? This means that Parliament will be given time to scrutinise, debate and vote on the final deal we strike with the EU RETWEET & VOTE  #YourVoiceMatters 
Quite outrageous too - shows utter contempt for parliament from the man who led campaign that claimed to to be all about parliamentary  sovereignty...#Brexit  
Schumer on HHS nominee Alex Azar: "This confirmation process will be a referendum on the Trump administration's repeated efforts to sabotage our health care system."  
MPs can vote on final #Brexit bill & govt can ignore them. So the only people 'taking back' control are the ones who always had it. #JoinWE 
David Davis announces MPs will get a "meaningful vote on the new Brexit Bill", but won't have the power to change the outcome, so more of a meaningless vote then. 
So, in short, the #Brexit deal negotiated by the government will go through parliament, in order to become law.  In the event of it being rejected, no deal rules will apply, because Article 50 was triggered. 
A Brexit date fixed in law means in the event of no deal Parliament will have no say we can’t continue negotiations or go for Norway model  
MPs will get a binding vote on the final #Brexit deal says @DavidDavisMP. Watch his statement on EU exit negotiations 
.The Brexit Slide Begins.....More pushing required before we see it off for goodPut your shoulder to the wheel . 
We seem to be walking into a Blatant power grab of the U.K. with our eyes wide open! Brexit is "Not" about saving this Country Money! It's about saving the Tories Tax Havens and their offshore Trust funds! Wake up before it's Too Bloody Late To save ourselves From Poverty Decades 
Must read thread for Brexit followers. Heartening that MPs appear to be ahead of the Government's game.  
Davis:”It will be a meaningful vote, but not meaningful in the sense that you can reverse the whole decision”So, parliament will be offered no real option but to accept the Brexit deal that’s on offer. Taking back control and sovereignty, eh?  
David Davis is still denying MPs a "meaningful vote" on Brexit, writes @georgeeaton. 
French industry preparing for No Deal Brexit  
.@ThomasBrake: David Davis offering a parliamentary vote on Brexit deal is not good enough. British people must get final say, with choice to stay in EU  
Judgement in my and @mishcondereya case will be upheld! #Parliament will get binding vote on final #Brexit deal! 
Brexit latest: Britain will leave EU with NO DEAL if MPs reject agreement fumes @DavidDavisMP 
You’re really struggling to get this - SNP position is to stop Scotland leaving the EU - as per the referendum result... 
Why the surprise? The Supreme Court ruling proved that Article 50 made Brexit final - so a "no deal" outcome is the default. If Parliament rejects a deal, then it votes for no-deal. My take:  
If Labour were interested in stopping Brexit, they would NOT have supported the unamended A50 bill with a 3 line whip, they would NOT have blocked an amendment to the Queen's speech calling for a ref on the final deal, and they would NOT be against FOM for workers. 
Thank goodness for Dominic Grieve: PM's move to enshrine Brexit day in law is 'thoroughly stupid'  
This is an attempt to frame those unhappy with whatever the Government has negotiated by 2019 as responsible for tipping Britain into a chaotic no-deal Brexit. It won't work.  
When Remoaners hear MPs will now get a vote to approve final #Brexit deal and then they hear if MPs reject it, we will leave with 'no deal'.  
David Davis on the final Brexit vote: "It's a meaningful vote but it's not meaningful in the sense that you can reverse the whole decision." 
Brexit's Irish Problem:  @IanDunt @GuitarMoog @BrexitBin @AdamRamsay #brexitshambles 
And why a second referendum wouldn’t work either  
During the referendum I took part in a debate with Anna Soubry in her constituency.  Most were for leave by the end. #respecttheresult 
Daily Mail on the run. They seem to think Brexit needs saving and believe  these two shysters are the ones to do it. @Labour4EU 
Indeed. I can at least respect @nick_clegg for being transparent about his opposition to #Brexit. Those MPs who say they will honour the referendum result but use every parliamentary trick to kill it? They are why politicians are so distrusted  
MPs who want the worst possible terms, in the hope that Brexit might be overturned, can only ever get the first half of what they want.  
Every single one of Theresa’s Scottish Tories are in Westminster Hall for the petitions debate on a 2nd independence referendum. They’re against, in case you didn’t know.... 
Too many MPs still don’t get it.  They loath the electorate and want to reverse the referendum result  
When asked today the Brexit Sec David Davis MP could give no answer to the Qu of when the EU27 might agree to the 2yr transition period, that the PM May begged for in Florence in September. 
So there's to be a final vote on the #Brexit deal. It was quickly and readily conceded. Was this because enshrining an Exit date in law will mean the final vote on the deal is moot? Have we been had by devious Davis and his bunch of crooked #brexiteers? 
Despite today's climbdown @DavidDavisMP is unable to accept the implications of my point that a transitional deal means staying in CU, SM & under jurisdiction of #ECJ. Clause 6 of #EUwithdrawalbill needs to go #Brexit 
Weaker than ever, May faces test in UK parliament over Brexit plans  
We wrote that this would happen in an explainer on *24 June 2016*. It's a genuine disgrace how little work MPs have done to learn the mechanics of Brexit.  
.@DavidDavisMP A parliamentary vote simply isn’t good enough. The people voted to leave the EU, they should get to decide whether to accept the deal the government has negotiated. If they reject the government's Brexit deal, they must have the option to stay in the EU. #Brexit 
I don’t normally retweet Labour messages but this one rather drives home a simple Brexit truth  
But the choice before parliament remains Deal or No Deal Brexit. Not No Brexit 
IMPORTANT: David Davis has spun this as: vote for the deal we get, regardless of what it is, or have no deal at all. Those are pretty much the choices Parliament will have and essentially permits Tory hard Brexit. Those nuclear options will NOT allow for proper scrutiny! 
Now that MPs will be given a vote on the Brexit deal, we have a chance to challenge and stop the government from forcing a bad deal on the country.Support us to build the campaign to challenge a Brexit that will harm the country:  
The government is still refusing to allow a parliamentary vote on Brexit, with the option of UK staying in in the event of a bad deal or no deal.But: a concession like this at this early stage, with the Lords to go, is significant. 
MPs gasped that the referendum result will be respected. Says it all about the establishment. 
Portcullis House flotsam 1:Asked a Tory MP which wd be worse, Corbyn-led Labour gvt or no deal brexit. He replied he wasn't sure. 
Dominic Grieves: Welcomes move."Anxiety heightened" by insistence on Brexit date in bill and idea House could vote after Brexit day. 
If they amend it, it would undo the deal. And they might only get to vote on it after Brexit has happened. 
Clever by David Davis don't you think? DD can dare Remainer MPs sometime later next year to vote against the Government's final Brexit deal - and see their warnings about falling off a cliff edge come to pass. 
If Govnt puts Brexit date into the Bill then Parliament vote doesn't matter. Parliament must have a say on that withdrawal agreement with all options on the table before we leave. 
David Davis says UK will leave the EU with no deal if MPs reject Brexit bill - not a "meaningful vote". 
PARLIAMENT’S BREXIT VOTE- Politicians can veto UK-EU Deal- If they do UK still leaves with No Deal  
At a popular level #Brexit is about an English nationalism for which Ireland is a far away country of which we know little and care less. #StopBrexit 
BREAKING: Parliament will have to approve the final Brexit deal before we leave the EU  
SENSE OF ENTITLEMENT AND PRESERVATION is the reason secession and referendum will be supported by 70% of Kenyans. Kenya is not for a few.  #Resist 
UK Parliament will get vote on final Brexit deal before the country leaves EU, minister David Davis tells MPs  
No answer from Davis. Dreadful response to Starmer from the Brexit secretary, devoid of any meaning. 
HUGE: David Davis has announced there will be a separate piece of legislation on the EU withdrawal agreement. This is crucial because it means MPs and Lords WILL have a vote on the Brexit deal BEFORE we leave. 
^ and not just EU languages either. The UK press still hasn’t caught up to my reporting on Putin’s bots. I include bots posting in Japanese and bots from Africa. @PutinRF altright war is global #Brexit  
Ex-cabinet minister Dominic Grieve says he is unlikely to support legislating a date for Brexit.  
This means MPs and Lords will have a vote on the Brexit deal itself in the run up to our actual departure 
EU business leaders tell PM: agree Brexit deal or face collapse in confidence  
We need a serious investigation into Russia's role influencing the Brexit vote - my @theipaper column  
BREAKING: MPs to be given the right to vote down final Brexit deal. Big concession by David Davis. 
This piece covered Russian bots for Trump, Brexit and Le Pen and led to “Mike Flynn’s Treason Tour” exclusive on @Patribotics - @GenFlynn coordinated this across Europe for Putin. Right @AndyWigmore?   
READ: the car industry has been warning gov for months about the devastation it could face from a hard & destructive Brexit. Please RT:  
My piece of last year that broke the “Russian Bots For Brexit” story included alt-right Russian bots posting in EVERY EU language; examples for Le Pen and Orban   
“The Putinbot Link Between #Brexit and Trump” My exclusive piece of last September; another reason I have IC sources in #FVEY.   
The joy is unfinished. David Davis now up in the Commons to update House on Brexit talks. 
Theresa May's hard #Brexit is doing a brilliant job of destroying our incredibly successful car industry. Here's why. 
It’s nice to see the UK press catching up with my reporting, but I broke Russia’s bots for Brexit before anybody else. Last year.  
Brexit was just yes or no. What you think about Grenfell tragedy is more nuanced, according to Tories.  
Today I'm fed up with all the f@*kwittery of Brexit. Here's my message to all #Tories #Brexiteers #Kippers & anyone else who can't take the time to work out we need to #StopBrexit 
"If you reach no agreement on even the border in Northern Ireland, that government shouldn't continue."Shadow Brexit Secretary Keir Starmer  #r4today 
#Brexit is a monumental act of self harm. When Brexit causes another recession, it won't be the fault of Remainers talking the country down, the EU or immigrants. Brexiters may try and shift the blame, but, they will have no one to blame but themselves. 
Incredible this about John Redwood: always on the BBC promoting Brexit; in his other, £180k a year job, advising people to pull their money out of the UK   
Brexit for the plebs - not for the rich.Leading Tory Brexiter tells wealthy investors to move money out of UK:  
Claims Brexit means "taking back control" exposed as myth by trade White Paper  via @LondonEconomic 
It's great you are tackling #fakenews . Perhaps you could start here. There are ten lies the British public were fed by the media during the 2016 referendum. All of which have been proven fake  
Spain’s police operation against Catalan referendum classified as ‘state secret’  
Irish foreign min @simoncoveney rejects DUP veto on Brexit policy. “I don’t accept that the options should be limited on the basis of the political arithmetic in the HoC. That is now how a decision as fundamental and important to Ireland’s and Britain’s future should be made.” 
This is called #cognitivedissonance.The  EU is not seeking a trade  deal with the UK.It's the other way around.#Brexiteers are now gaslighting themselves!#Brexit-#gaslight#JohnRedwood 
Vince Cable urges opposition parties to unite and vote against committing to 29 March 2019 as Brexit date -  
The special Miller / Brexit issue of Public Law is now available on @WestlawUK!With papers by: Sir Louis Blom-Cooper QC, @RobertCraig3, Paul Craig, @pauldalyesq, @DrKirstyHughes, @tobiaslock, @patrickcobrien, @Prof_Phillipson & Alison Young, and myself () 
If Brexit isn't stopped, then sure I hope we make the best of it.But I'm not looking at uncertainty. Law was my degree, EU law was my specialisation. I've spent the past 3 years working in EU affairs.Brexit isn't an "uncertainty" from where I'm standing. It's certain harm, 
The hypocritical Brexit extremists in the Tory party can quote and use the Churchill analogies all they like, as long as they acknowledge his dream of a united Europe, something they are working against. It time to stay united and #StopBrexit 
This is what the leavers are doing to our Great Country, the pound is below 1.31 dollars, food prices rising, NHS nurses leaving, Industry moving out of the UK including Banking Lets have a meaningful vote on Brexit 
The European Union's chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier is preparing for talks with the UK to collapse. 
Agree. Everyone has gone hysterical. Everyone needs to take a chill pill. And I wish everyone would stop refighting the wretched referendum!  
READ: Sheer hypocrisy from John Redwood as he advises investors to move money out of Britain while pushing for a destructive hard Brexit in Parliament:  
Given that the Environment Sec has impact assessments on it but isn't releasing them.Given that much of our food comes from EU and Brexit increases regulatory costs.Given that the pound has fallen so the cost of importing has risen.Given that food prices have already risenYes 
#brexit Michel Barnier now floats idea that cats & dogs will be banned from travelling to the Continent if there is no deal. Madness. Has he been bitten by a rabid dog? 
No party can deliver a good Brexit now even if it exists and nobody has the time to do it properlySo donate to #a50 challenge and to press "reset" in the interests of everyone - not just RemainersDonate, RT, share or any one of the above 
Our data, tracking early signs of Russian trolling, provides the first evidence that Russia used Twitter to influence the UK's Brexit vote.  
#Brexit is unraveling  
.@vincecable - Opposition leaders must unite against Brexit date amendment to avoid stitch-up  
The EU’s Anti Tax Avoidance Directive that comes into force on 1st January 2019 is the main reason why the Brexit Tories want to leave in such a hurry.  
EU to TAX people of Europe until the pips squeak!EU Parliament Boss Antonio Tajani calls for DOUBLING of EU funding to €280Billion as Brussels increasingly desperate to plug mammoth budget black hole without UK cash!So glad we're Leaving..#Brexit #EU 
The McKenna judgement was very clear: Public Money cannot be used to fund one side of a referendum campaign. The @NWCI is 93% funded by the taxpayer and is openly spending that money to campaign on #repealthe8th. Someone should take a case. 
Trying to be glass-half-full about Brexit; but it's increasingly clear it's half full of piss. 
80% of environmental laws come from the EU. This week MP's will have a chance to ensure all EU environmental laws into UK law via the Withdrawal Bill. Ask your MP to vote to protect these laws after #Brexit:  
. @Keir_Starmer it is unclear whether you are deluded or lying or both. But it is all too clear that you, like the Tories, are misleading the British people about #Brexit.#StopBrexit 
Major investors may be able to move their money abroad, but it is ordinary people who will suffer from the impact of a hard Brexit  
Claws of Axos is basically Brexit, Green Death is about how we're gonna kill ourselves via pollution, solidly a third of Pertwee's stories are about colonialism, and Liz Shaw, Jo Grant, and Sarah Jane all call out patriarchal bullshit and explicitly mention the feminist movement.  
Well this story hasn't aged well... Theresa Villiers claims ‘no need to erect border controls' after Brexit  
This is getting a bit desperate & absurd from @pablocasado_ & @PPopular - clearly to divert attention from the corruption scandals. I had no idea the Russians infiltrated the Scottish & Brexit referendums. Did they also teach Messi how to play football?  
Dominic Grieve's group of Conservative MPs want to amend the EU Withdrawal Bill to make sure Parliament has the final say on any Brexit deal.But these Labour MPs may stop them by continuing to vote with Theresa May. They want Brexit at any price.  
‘No deal’ is the default position: we crash out March 2019 unless we Stop Brexit. Vital therefore to support & donate: 
Britain's companies are a decade behind Denmark in technology, industry group says  
‘Ireland will not be pushed aside’ in Brexit talksvia @IrishTimes 
French industry preparing for No Deal Brexit. The British government should be as well!  
I'm not anti Labour. I'm anti Austerity, anti Brexit, and anti Corbyn.  
Why did Dyson really want Brexit? Because his vexatious legal attempts to bend EU to his will didn’t work. Bet on UK govt would be easier to manipulate. 
Will Brexit Ever Be A Good Idea?  
Russian interference in the Brexit campaign is now taking as a given in US media. Whatever the reality of the matter, this will influence US perceptions of Brexit and Brexiters. 
Puigdemont reveals that he offered Rajoy to hold a referendum every three years and asks whether the PP has “right” to decide on Catalan people’s future  
Cornwall votes for Brexit.Cornwall concerned about the impact of Brexit.Cornwall asks the government for financial help because of Brexit.Turkeys & Christmas spring to mind.#Brexshit #Brexit 
Should #Brexit Be Cancelled? #BrexitCrisis #EU 
Just when the Tories are falling apart over Brexit, we (Labour) are stuck with Corbyn who is, in effect, propping the Tories up with his absurd stance on #Brexit It really is stupidity beyond belief.  
Unelected peers must respect the mandate of the referendum to #TakeBackControl of our laws, borders, money and trade 
The government must stick to its Brexit strategy. It must steer its own ship and not become completely at the mercy of a wide group that openly intended to undermine Brexit negotiations and reverse the referendum result. 
Is @theresa_may anything more than a mouthpiece for Dacre now? Did he promise to be nice 2 her if she just makes #brexit happen 1 way or another? @campbellclaret @DavidLammy @TheNewEuropean @Labour4EU @UKLabour @LibDems @Greens #stopbrexit 
#Agroforestry is the new game-changer for UK agriculture.  Farming Minister George Eustice MP, has expressed a keen commitment to  include agroforestry in future domestic Agricultural Policy post Brexit. 
Crops rotting in fields in #Cornwall due to #Brexit labour shortage and chickens coming home to roost.#BrexitReality #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
6. With @IDSMP making bullying #Brexit pronouncements (no, we're not all #Brexiters now, Iain) & loathsome Leadsom leading the way in subverting British democracy, this meme on their fraudulent CVs has been popular.#StopBrexit #exitfrombrexit #revokeA50forthwith #FBPE 
Homebuilders have warned Brexit could make London’s housing crisis even worse. The Government must take action to help me ensure the genuinely affordable homes Londoners need to buy and rent get built.  
Labour ‘Open’ to EU Courts Retaining Power over UK After Brexit  
.@campbellclaret I want to stop Brexit, if possible, as much as youONLY one way to do it IMOPeople like us need to persuade people who don't agree If next autumn there is a clear majority to stop it, THEN there will be a second ref.Persuasion!(Insulting Corbyn not helpful) 
We might as well be Brexit Britain looking at Europe like “hey, friend...” and getting back a  ¯\_(ツ)_/¯  
Best of luck to Morduant. Hopefully she has a better grip on reality now than in the Brexit campaign, when she claimed 'We don't have a veto on Turkey joining the EU' - a blatant lie. 
Car firms employing more than 16,000 people say Brexit could do huge damage to their businesses  
Former Conservative Education Secretary Nicky Morgan calls Theresa May's Telegraph article on Brexit and the EU Withdrawal Bill 'tone-deaf and tin eared" #bbcdp It's time for this inept and hollow Tory government to go, this chaos cannot continue, our country deserves better. 
Dyson demands Brexit should end workers' rights - as Labour prepares to enshrine them in UK law  via @MidWalesMike 
WATCH | "We should have a proper, thought-out 'No Deal' stance. Anyone going into a negotiation would have that in their armoury."Frank Field blasts government for lack of dedication to Brexit, calls for a Brexit Cabinet to be in constant session "like Churchill's War Cabinet".  
The schools have been taken over by a bunch of fucking lunatics who say you can have a fanny and still be a boy. The world's gone mad. Hard Brexit needed and wallops administered to all left wing teachers  
BREXIT: Senior German finance official admits he doesn’t see a UK-EU deal being done.  
How much more public money will be pissed up against a wall before it occurs to both of these parties that Brexit was an unbelievably stupid idea? 
Let me put this into context: I read about Brexit for some light relief  
Nicky Morgan publicly calling May weak and inept and attacking Boris can mean only one thing. The Tories are about to have a leadership election. Labour should prepare for government and to take over Brexit negotiations  #bbcdp 
@BirgitRichards @InLimboBrexit Brexit stole my 7 yr olds innocence, she shouldn't have to worry about losing her friends, the only home she's ever known... She is British as is her dad, I'm German. Whom is she going to live with and where? #childreninlimbo 
I've got huge ambitions for my year in office, including securing a mutually beneficial #Brexit deal, refocussing the @LMAppeal, and restoring trust in business. Read more in @CityAM 
Nicky Morgan taking a Tommy gun to Theresa May. Frank Field wanting to hide the Brexit impact assessments. Nazanin's husband begging Boris to stay. A totally disorienting edition of #bbcdp. 
BLIMEY !Nicky Morgan #bbcdp socks it to the PM (tin ears & tone deaf) - Gove & BoJo. #Brexit inpact assessments don't exist et etc.That's your career down the Ubend Nicky ! 
Agenda now clearer of James Dyson, vacuum cleaner king who campaigns for Brexit: wants it to be easier to sack people, and no corporation tax.  
Good thread. But Brexit bill not payment for trade deal but price of orderly departure. Value of that shouldn't be underestimated.  
Back to London. Brexit committee stage starts tomorrow with UKG in disarray. But first, looking forward to leading for @theSNP in debate on indyref2 this pm. 
We are past the midway point until Brexit. There's still no strategy, no clue on what we want, no progress in the negotiations, the cabinet is all over the place and we have a PM with no authority - surely it can't get any worse in the second half? 
From @timesredbox today, majority now think gov't is handling #Brexit very badly/fairly badly. People can change their mind as #NewBrexitFacts emerge and we can pause or stop #Article50. #LeaveWatch 
My latest column: Brexit Britain is at Europe’s mercy  via @FT 
Grinning billionaire Peter Hargreaves is not worried about #Brexit.In fact he paid to help promote it.Because "insecurity is fantastic".(For billionaires.)#disastercapitalism 
I'd put more on Blair decision not to impose controls in 2004 & then Cameron's undeliverable promise to cut migration. Both Blair & Cameron the accidental architects of Brexit.  
Nicky Morgan calls Theresa May's Telegraph article on Brexit and the EU Withdrawal Bill 'tone-deaf and tin eared". No love lost there. #bbcdp 
Oh dear, have a weird feeling I'm gonna agree more with Nicky Morgan than Frank Field today...absurd that Frank feels there's no need to publish the Brexit impact papers. #bbcdp 
'The Brexit process will shape our country for decades...Powers ceded to the [EU] should be returned to the British parliament as the cornerstone of our democracy,rather than concentrated just in the hands of government ministers.'Wise words from @YvetteCooperMP & @NickyMorgan01 
Great report from @wired on Russian bots influencing Brexit - remember this tweet being shared in a bunch of (now updated) news reports?  
Remainers like @NickyMorgan01 revealing their true agenda in opposing a fixed leaving date for #Brexit. They want to overturn the referendum result. 
On the eve of the #Brexit Bill returning to Commons a reminder from @eurelationsappg why leaving the Customs Union is such madness  
At 1.19pm we are at the midway point until #Brexit. Holly mother of fuck. So glad we have such a clearly defined position, such a strong PM, a united cabinet and the negotiation is proceeding so smoothly. 
Johnson and Gove join forces again in push for hard Brexit 
There is absolutely no doubt that if the Iron Lady was in charge we would be out of the EU with a trade deal and have them begging for our friendship by now!Love or loth her, she was the last real leader this country has had.#Brexit #EU #UKIP #Labour #Conservative #Swindon 
Not the kind of headlines Vote Leave wanted to see more than a year after the Brexit vote  
The ugly face of EU loyalism: @TheNewEuropean journo @MikeH_PR speculates on older #Brexit voters dying in “a bad winter” and predicts their grandchildren will “spit on their graves” – on Remembrance Sunday weekend.  
Given Brexit & the general state of things, it’d be a good time for Marvel to do a Captain Britain book, you know.  
Putin to meet tomorrow with leader of South Ossetia, who is planning a referendum on officially joining Russia and has said he is "100% sure" his region will become part of Russia. Something to watch.  
As the #EU Common Defence Fund is being launched way before #Brexit the #UK will be providing 13% of the cash 
Scotland’s First Minister will tomorrow meet Tory BritNat PM for talks over Tories disaster #Brexit FM will lay it on the line to weak Tory PM!                           You have to meet her PM  
Quite impressed with Remainers arguing simultaneously that we will have unsold food gluts and food shortages post-Brexit. Doublethink unplusgood. 
Remoaners are attacking Michael Gove and Boris Johnson for trying to ensure a real Brexit.  
After #Brexit, Germany would have to pay about €3.8B more each year to keep the EU budget at its current levels.  
On #WorldKindnessDay, I think it would be an act of kindness to put Brexit out of its misery. The poor little idiotic idea is at death's door.  
Important nuance added to the debate over Brexit and identity by @SocSciMcAndrew @NeemaBegum and @p_surridge. 
#bbcdp Remoaner bore Nicky Morgan on.!!! Wait for non stop Brexit bashing doom& gloom talk. She will do everything to derail Brexit.    
Food prices would soar after no-deal Brexit, warns major dairy boss. Brexit is putting food security and standards at risk. #StopBrexit. 
Spain’s police operation against Catalan referendum classified as ‘state secret’  
@mrjamesob: Why you can't trust James Dyson on Brexit  
Brexit timeline; key dates to watch  
16/ There’s also good evidence that the rich Leavers want to protect their finances from new EU legislation on tax havens and tax avoidance, which comes into force next year. So THAT’S why Theresa May and friends need a ‘hard Brexit’.  
14/ Only after the fact i.e. after Cameron ran away from the mess he made, and May became PM, did ‘Brexit mean Brexit’. Many Leavers did not vote to leave the single market. They sure as hell did not vote to become poorer. 
Total Capitulation! : Labour 'open' to ECJ keeping influence over UK in long term post-Brexit - The Telegraph  
Dear Brexit, thanks for showing me that being educated at Eton can't make an idiot become clever, but it can make an idiot become Foreign Secretary. #KillBrexitWithKindness 
WATCH | If Has-been Heseltine - who backs another referendum - loves democracy so much, why is it he had just 3% attendance in the Lords last Parliament?The House of Lords is an embarrassment and needs radical reform. #DrainTheSwamp 
7/ The question we were asked – Remain or Leave? – was impossible to answer. There were so many types of Leave to consider. At the time, Leave campaigners assured us that Brexit would mean staying in the single market and customs union – something like the ‘Norway option’.  
Please note: this tweet - and my endorsement of it, by sharing - is not the expression by either of us of a desire for political opponents to die. Nor a celebration of people dying. It's data. Which is significant to the Brexit situation.  
2/ The fact that he appears to have deliberately concealed his role as MP and involvement with Brexit campaign from investors supports this view 
I think Redwood's role as MP and involvement with Brexit campaign may fall foul of FCA rules regarding conflict of interest 1/ 
It's now more than 370,000 dead leavers & over 525,000 young remain voters are now over 18.Dead leavers trump live remainers in Brexit Britain. 
GALLOWAY: We’re witnessing slow-moving coup to stop Brexit.  
The #SupremeCourt was not asked to  adjudicate on what you're talking about, @IainDale  re #Article50#GinaMiller asked if it was #Parliament and NOT HM Gov't that had the power to trigger  #Article50 .Supreme Court ruled  #ParliamentIsSupreme in this matter.That's all#Brexit  
Why you shouldn't listen to James Dyson on Brexit: @mrjamesob. 
Brexit Lexicon: The EU demanding outstanding obligations be settled: "exit fee."The EU defending its own interests: "intransigence."The EU putting coherence single market first and thus refusing UK a sweet deal: "punishment." 
UK government tensions rise after leak of Johnson-Gove letter to May. Instead of making demands for a hard Brexit they should be making demands to Iran for the release of Nazanin Zaghari-Ratcliffe so she can be reunited with her family again.  
Of course, Britain will deny anything to do with Russia being involved in Brexit. And the ‘friendships’ they have with Silicon Valley companies will help smooth it all over. 
Brexit isn't about canny negotiations and backroom deals. You can't negotiate your way out of the law. My piece:  
Theresa May set to meet the CBI again today on Brexit. CBI are trying to undermine government strategy, but worth noting that on every major economic issue in the last 100 years, the CBI have been wrong. Wrong then, wrong now.  
Talk of 'UK changing its mind' is misleading. The majority never wanted #Brexit in the first place. 
More #NewBrexitFacts emerge as chief exec of one of the UK’s largest dairy producers warns food prices would soar after no-deal #Brexit.  This is not what the British people voted for. #LeaveWatch 
When T May retires, as she must one day, if she wants to look back with any self-respect left in tact she must resign as PM now, sit on the back benches and oppose #Brexit with every fibre of her being.If not she is just a power crazed country-wrecker 
Why don't these Tory eurosceptic & #UKIP #patriots forego their #goldengoodbye pay re #Brexit?After all, we gotta pay for it.Maybe MPs like Bill Cash,  #JohnRedwood, Kate Hoey, #Moggmentum might want to #DonateYourPay .Help us out! 
Become a supporter of our Article 50 Brexit challenge:#a50challenge 
Dominic Grieve tells @adamboultonSKY the Government setting the date of Brexit in law is an "incoherent and thoroughly stupid amendment and it won't have my support" 
Redwood tells investors to take their money out of the UK, while at the same time advocating a no-deal Brexit! Does the man have no shame? Great piece by @Frances_Coppola  
...and Labour is helping them! - If Labour came out as anti-Brexit they would smash this government & the Conservative Party to smithereens for a generation. ‘Respect the referendum result’? - ie respect only 37% of the total electorate many of whom voted for lies? No. 
First evidence Russia-based Twitter trolls attacking US election also stoked racial hatred in #Brexit. One passed themselves off as patriotic Texan. 
...and our social fabric. The doctrinaire Brexit leaders are out to scrap consumer & employee protections, environmental safeguards, get themselves low taxes (goodbye good schools & NHS) so THEY can be even richer - the rest of us subsidising them.  
Dear Brexit, thank you for once and for all dispelling the myth of British exceptionalism.Although it will be painful, we will now finally have to form a realistic national identity, rather than a sepia-toned post-imperial wank fantasy.#KillBrexitWithKindness#WorldKindnessDay 
Is it just me or does anybody else  think Ebenezer Scrooge and Jacob Marley everytime they see Gove and Johnson? 
Dominic Grieve says the amendment tabled by the government saying there's a day we have got to leave the #EU   is "incoherent and a thoroughly stupid amendment and it won't have my support" #Brexit #brexitshambles @adamboultonSKY 
Labour would allow ECJ jurisdiction after Brexit. Leave voters would not accept this! 
.@Mike_Fabricant denies claims there are 'up to 40 Conservative MPs ready to sign a letter of no confidence in Theresa May' #Brexit  
Excellent @telegraph column by @RogerBootle ‘The political turmoil over Brexit is at odds with the economic reality’  
Dominic Grieve Tory MP on Sky News says:"If voters show they have decided Brexit is a mistake, and they should do so by emailing their MPs their concerns, then the Gov't should act accordingly to fulfill that will." 
EU Citizens on way to EU Commission say they are "bargaining chips" in Brexit negotiations - describe is as like being children of divorced parents. #citizenslobbyingEU 
The Brexit Advent Calendar. It is £350million and we don't know what is behind any of the doors. 
EU Citizens and immigration solicitor heading to Brussels to lobby Brexit negotiators over rights @The3Million 
It's crux time in Brexit negotiations. Our government should ignore this at their peril. Very wise words from a UK wealth creator!  
British families will be barred from taking their pets to the continent if Brexit negotiations collapse, the EU's chief Brexit negotiator has suggested #premium 
Galloway: We’re witnessing slow-moving coup to destabilise system and derail Brexit – Westmonster  
Pound falls 1% as political pressure on Theresa May adds to her Brexit problems  
The Eurozone is heading toward a golden period of low-inflationary expansion in  stark contrast to the outlook for the U.K. The claims that the Eurozone was collapsing were just more #LeaveLies.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
From punching above our weight to punching each other: how #Brexit diminishes Britain on the world stage 
It’s blindingly obvious we are not going to get a better deal than we have now and blindingly obvious we WILL NOT be better off if we leave.Brexit is for the super rich tax haven league.Brexit is a giant con.Article 50 is reversible. #StopBrexit before it’s too late! 
#KeirStarmer obfuscation over #Brexit is just a smoke screen. All Labour want is power to introduce their totalitarian Marxist agenda. That’s it. Nothing more to see. 
What possible reason can anyone have of wanting to keep Britain in the Europèan court of justice. It is inferior to our own courts with the standards of judges being embarrassingly low. Trapping us for extra time in the ECJ is just another attack or delaying attempt on brexit. 
Brexit is our resignation from the world  
Some British Asians voted for #Brexit because they believed promises that it would lead to freer immigration from south Asia. They should note that much support for Brexit stems from a xenophobia which could quite easily turn against them. #StopBrexit 
#StopBrexit Please RT !!!Email your queries about Brexit directly to the government at:queries@dexeu.gov.uk  
Speaking of campaign posters ...The #Danish Social-Liberal Party has this one out:“Worried about #Brexit? Let #Denmark fix it!”  
EU Uses Sleazy Negotiating Tactics To Extort More Cash In Brexit Talks  
To be clear, the old white Brits who voted for Brexit had the full benefit of socialist policies, then voted Thatcher to tug up the ladder, now voting to destroy last remnants of NHS etc. 
Let us be clear: the report from a sectoral analysis detailing the impact of Brexit is absolutely NOT a Brexit impact report. 
#Brexit is going to be bad..@Lord_Sugar knows it. Encouraging the .@Conservatives to jump out of the moving car then claim no responsibility. Shameful. 
Theresa May has been told she does not have the authority to deliver Brexit  
'If you walk away they’ll come to us!' James Dyson's brilliant argument FOR no deal Brexit  
In Germany last week, I was as ever droning on about Brexit. 'Nobody cares any more, Tim,' a pal told me. 'We've moved on. Britain doesn't matter any more to Europe or anyone else.'   
"It's blindingly obvious... that the final agreement with the EU is not going to have been agreed by 2019"Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer has written to Theresa May questioning the government's #EU Withdrawal Bill 
I don't normally recommend articles so highly but this from @J_amesp lays out convincingly & well sourced the way democracy in UK & US is being subverted by Putin & his western allies. A must read for those interested in #brexit & #Trump 
Poor old Ian Duncan Smith clearly not in the loop that as matter of law under #Art50 a transitional deal means we stay under jurisdiction of #ECJ #brexit #RealityCheck @BBCr4today 
Good bit of work by Richard here, the EP has done a lot of research into brexit, all open and public, unlike the UK government’s papers which may or may not exist.  
Shadow Brexit Secretary Keir Starmer has written a letter to warn Theresa May she does not have the authority to deliver Brexit  
The Dutch are whining about not being able to fish in our waters post brexit. Their concern for Britain getting fair treatment has not yet emerged so bollox to them. Keep out of our waters. Sauce for the goose is. . . . . . 
Half the farms in Northern Ireland would be wiped out by Brexit - they get 90% of their income from the EU  
Misconceived understanding of “balance” again led @BBCr4today to give Richard Tice of Leave Means Leave airtime again in a discussion of “what business thinks about Brexit”.  
Theresa May's ability to deliver Brexit in doubt amid growing threat to her leadership  
Tory MP said: “Supporting Brexit will destroy UK. Opposing Brexit will destroy Tories.”Time Tories put our country…BEFORE THEMSELVES 
The euro-area economy may be entering a period of golden growth  
As EU (Withdrawal) Bill returns to Commons, a reminder that talk of Parliament 'blocking' no-deal Brexit assumes it controls what it started when it allowed Art 50 to be triggered. But answer to Q on which this hinges — can Art 50 be unilaterally reversed? — remains unclear.  
The Brexit bill is still to face "a new dose of shredding as high-ranking constitutional experts". The fight is far from over.  
Michael Gove & Boris Johnson sent an 'Orwellian' set of secret demands to Theresa May - attempting to force a hard Brexit & her end. Both face calls for their resignation already - re: Zaghari-Ratcliffe... What a #ToryShambles #ToriesOut #r4today 
READ: A 'badly-handled' Brexit could lead to higher prices for food from April 2019, with dairy & meat products particularly hit, warns chief of one of the UK’s largest dairy producers  
David Davis dismisses Michel Barnier's two-week divorce bill deadline | Theresa May to urge EU businesses to press for Brexit trade talks at Downing Street meeting today | Growth accelerates in almost every corner of the UK  
BOOM: Brexit could boost UK economy by £65bn-a-year, a new report reveals. So much for Project Fear's doomsayers! 
Expecting to hear if the Government are in ‘contempt of the House’ for refusing to pass on the Brexit analysts papers later today. 
Even Michel Barnier says it’s time to prepare for ‘no deal’ on Brexit. My blog on why he should be taken seriously;  
If I was PM May. I would resign put the gov in a tail spin.Force an election let Corbyn win. Then say over to you big shot Jeremy re Brexit. Result will be a disaster and Torys will be back in 5 years time. 
“the referendum could only have been called, and the leave campaign only fought, by politicians with a fundamental lack of seriousness, a puerile indifference to the outcome of their decisions.” 
"If you reach no agreement on even the border in Northern Ireland, that government shouldn't continue."Shadow Brexit Secretary Keir Starmer talks about no-deal Brexit #r4today 
Those on @MarrShow and @BBCr4today talking up no deal Brexit and becoming a "great global trading nation" won't pay the price for no deal Brexit. My constituents will. 
READ | Brexit could boost the UK economy by £65bn a year. Not quite what Project Fear had in mind, is it? Now's the time for Remoaner Hammond to grow up, get over his brutal referendum defeat, and take advantage of huge Brexit opportunities! 
Brexit campaigns were funded by billionaires looking at expanding their own fortunes: Arron Banks, Jeremy Hosking, Peter Hargreaves, Robert Edmiston & Crispen Odey. We lose they win. We must #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles #r4today 
The man who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can still be stopped  
The UK signing up to the EU defence force post Brexit is a grave mistake and keeps up in the EU  
Unless of course, @UKLabour @Keir_Starmer you get down off the fence & start fighting for what is right. By all means respect the vote to leave but acknowledge that no one voted for the future we now face. No one voted for no deal. Fight the causes of Brexit. #revokeA50forthwith 
Even die hard Brexiteers are losing faith in what Brexit means for UK  
If NZ had another flag referendum right now, the Tongan flag would win.  
Pound falls as Theresa May faces more pressure over Brexit and her leadership  
I wish Brexiters would believe the evidence on post-Brexit food issues (and everything else). They seem to believe that we can just eat sovereignty. 
A call for investors to remove their money from Britain, by @johnredwood, whose support for #Brexit was all about the national interest:  
The next 5 weeks are critical for Brexit. These are the big moments to look out for  
James Dyson - Billionaire Tax Evader, Brexit Zealot and Exporter of UK jobs to cheaper economies. He wants to hit workers rights after Brexit so he can bleed more money out of the UK #NastyPieceOfWork #StopBrexit #DontBuyDyson #DitchDyson #r4today 
Trade deals made by #EU are subject to democratic control: ratification by @Europarl_EN & (often) 28 gov’ts in Council. Seems UK gov’t wants to avoid parliamentary scrutiny of post #Brexit trade deals.  
The Brexit vote has caused a significant rise in prices, especially food  
Economists SLAM negative Brexit forecasts and announce UK could be £65BILLION better off  
MPs duty is to people of UK not to their party. They have to exercise this now & demand clarity over impact of Brexit. Can’t be left to small inner circle. 
Tory Brexit zealot John Redwood told Chancellor Philip Hammond to be more optimistic about economic forecasts. A month later he is advising investors to take their money out of UK. We need to #StopBrexit as Brexit is being driven by self-serving idiots #BrexitShambles #r4today 
Morning! Here's your shouty but on point 2 min analysis of Tory Brexit disaster. Have a good day!  
Boss of Associated British Foods says Brexit can boost productivity in UK agriculture.   
There’s no right wing backlash, rise of far-right extremistsTheres awakening by ordinary decent people that they are being betrayed#Brexit #Nexit #Frexit #Grexit#EUisTheProblem 
Monday briefing: Boris and the 'Orwellian' Brexit manual  
‘May will see Brexit through in spirit of Churchill, says David Davis’I presume he means whisky. 
There is no such thing as a hard Brexit. There is only a total departure from the EU. Which is what we voted for!  
Suffering from #Brexit blindness? Here’s three reasons why businesses should prepare and plan now >  
Sir James Dyson on hiring/firing reminds us Brexit vs Remain for our rulers was really an argument about 'best' way to keep wages down: in a bloc (EU) or in the world. 
As May faces possible defeats on #Brexit votes, ministers are ‘aghast’ at demands for hard Brexit from Gove &Johnson  
I respect the result of their gerrymandered referendum, now I'd like an ungerrymandered one. #Brexshit 
NEW: @Keir_Starmer writes to Theresa May urging her to back Labour’s call for no Brexit cliff-edge.“It has become increasingly clear that you alone do not have the authority to deliver a transitional deal with Europe [that will] protect jobs and the economy.”  
Very beautifully written and accurate piece by Nick Clegg. Beware post-Brexit dreams of Canada  via @FT 
Brexit is a chance to sell British food around the world: Twinings tea maker cheers an export boom.  
500 days since #Brexit vote summarized:- Jun '16-Mar '17: UK preparing Art50- Apr '17-Jun '17: UK preparing election- Since Jul '17: UK preparing May successionWhen will UK prepare Brexit? 
Brexit fanatic Julia Hartley-Brewer spoke on #SkyPapers of "Saving Brexit" & "Brexit slipping away"... and so it should be after that gerrymandered referendum. 
I wonder if @SenPaterson took advice from those geniuses Howard used to foil the Republic referendum. “Make ‘em an offer they can’t accept.” 
The  problem with this article is that it still believes Soft Brexit is possible. It isn't. Soft Brexit is an illusion, and the sooner our journalists and politicians wise up to that fact the better  
Obviously I wasn't expecting Trump to elevate the tone of political discourse in this country.That said, I'm still shocked that the 1st year has been a referendum on how you feel about Russian spies, Nazis in khakis, and child molesters in the Senate. 
Oh @jeremycorbyn , you perfidious ideologue. Why do you continue to betray the many you claim to care about in the face of growing evidence that Brexit will be toxic for them and lucrative for the few? #StopBrexit 
For 18 Months the EU has propagandized Media outside UK to attempt to create a perception that there is a massive cost to leaving the EU because they know if Brexit is a success the EU is over. UK should walk away from negotiations and give the EU an ultimatum. Dyson = 100% right  
I started by respecting the vote to leave the EU. I trusted that we'd be able to have a govt that would competently manage the process. Instead we have a weak, divided & inept govt, negotiations going badly & more besides. In balance Brexit's a bad idea & needs stopping. 
I wondered that myself. Are they working for a foreign power?  A frenemy - Priti Patel ? Farage USA?  There are no benefits to Brexit so why so hell bent on it. This Gov isn't just incompetent - it couldn't care less. Deliberately negligent it seems. We have a hostile UK media 2  
You know about Labour's socialist objections to EU? Such as the "Posted Workers' Directive" (now dumped).It affected 1% of EU workers. Macron did a tour of European capitals to sort it.Corbyn's solution was to back the Tories backing Brexit. #FBPE 
In Starbucks, they call your name out when your coffee is ready. Give an anti brexit name. Buck Frexit. Stop brexit... Any suggestions? 
Imagine being so stupid that you would trigger Article 50 with no Brexit strategy and hadn’t already met with EU business leaders. 
UK's #Brexit negotiator: “(British taxpayers) would not want me to just come along and just give away billions of pounds" On the other hand, they seem happy to follow a strategy that costs hundreds if not thousands of billions... 
Pro Brexit = Pro Trump = Pro Putin  
And Corbyn's Labour still supporting this Dyson hard Brexit  #geez 
Polls now consistently showing a majority believe #Brexit was a mistake. This is in the face of overwhelming forecasts ranging from "bad for our country" to "total economic collapse." Why are our elected representatives letting this happen?! #StopBrexit 
Paddington 2 is an anti-Brexit film that celebrates London's inclusiveness 
Dyson wants less workers rights, no Corporation Tax, he took his manufacturing away from UK, he wants to avoid paying Tax....Sounds like he's looking out for himself, rather than UK Public.Well, that's put me right off buying #Dyson Products.#Brexit or #Remain Go #HENRY 
CNN Investigation: The same Russian government-linked network of Twitter accounts that meddled in US elections posted pro-Brexit tweets on the day of the UK referendum  
I am increasingly concerned that we are headed for a no deal #Brexit that will lead to rapid collapse of our economy. I predict that we will shortly see the collapse of May's govt & a snap GE early 2018. What's next is anybody's guess; is there still a chance we can #StopBrexit? 
The campaign against Brexit must go beyond Parliament - it must persuade the people. Keep making the case to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Apparently Vladimir Putin ordered me to defend the right for Catalans to hold a referendum and I never realised. All along I assumed it was something I'd decided for myself. Bon nit. 
If leading Brexiteer and Billionaire James Dysons comments about making it easier to hire and fire people after Brexit doesn't make you realise that the whole thing is an absolute stitch up you really don't deserve being saved from this mess. 
I’m pro #Brexit because our laws should be made by our elected representatives not unelected officials in a foreign country and because as a major economy we should trade worldwide unrestrained by #EU restrictions. 
."It’s time for Tory rebels to put up or shut upFor the DUP to stand up for UlsterAnd for Labour to back away from Brexit"#StopBrexit 
Quite right Jess that's why the majority voted for #Brexit and kept Labour out.  
This morning on #Marr, James Dyson called for govt to abolish corporation tax and make it easier to hire and fire workers after Brexit in order to boost manufacturing and stimulate the economy. Which is a little odd... 
The new Brexit foreign policy. With the ideal foreign secretay to carry it out  
Whilst the rest of the  world laughs at the Brexiters, we let them continue in Parliament and give them airtime on news and current affairs programmes!!! 
It's going to be a bleak mid winter for T May! EU preparing for possible collapse of Brexit talks - Barnier  
Is Mike Hind, @TheNewEuropean contributor who has been tweeting about elderly Brexit voters dying in the winter and how their grandchildren will "spit on their graves", really in a position to be racially abusing people as "gammon-faced white men"? #PeopleInGlassHouses 
As many others have said here, by far the best course of action is to stop brexit. Sentiment is changing as people see its consequences. Please act decisively to bring this whole episode to an end. 
Feeling sympathy for @Anna_Soubry on @BBCWestminHour where the 2 other pro #brexit panelists seem to wish to portray reasonable scrutiny of #EUWithdrawalBill as treason & sabotage. Ridiculous 
Anna Soubry (who interrupts constantly) has just said to Frank Field that he would have “banged on” in favour of Brexit if Remain had won, whereas she is respecting the outcome @BBCWestminHour 
Labour's support of Brexit is either stupid or a lie. If there was a GE tomorrow, Labour couldn't win a majority without taking Scotland. So even if they were the largest party, they'd need a coalition partner. And all possible partners support Remain.#StopBrexit 
You're welcome. Thank you. I've been fighting this since I changed my mind shortly after the referendum. Together we can #StopBrexit 
"Back in my day, a tackle was a tackle. Diving was sumfing you did down the baths. And Britain was British. Don't give me all that diversity shite. Kick 'em all out and close the borders. We need a rock solid, psycho Pearce Brexit" pic.twitter.com/m5HBhuSGTU 
This is why I switched from Remain to Leave. For the sake of decency, democracy & respect I implore Remainers to back the referendum result & stop this slide into division. It's division within the UK that is the real threat, not Brexit.  
#StopBrexit I understand many believe we should honour the referendum result. Normally, I'd agree totally. Unfortunately, it is not in this country's best interests to cut ourselves off and crash our economy. Many like me have changed our mind, despite denials and intimidation... 
Economists SLAM negative Brexit forecasts and announce UK could be £65BILLION better off  
Homeless ex-soldier, 82, dies hours after being evicted from squat GOVERNMENTS SHAME ON YOU 
It gets worse. Politics is not about putting one’s finger in one’s ear and saying, “I can’t hear you”. Leave if you want one, but for Christ’s sake do it competently #brexit  
Project Fear was wrong in 2016 and it is wrong now. Brexit will be a shot in the arm for the UK economy | @Econs4FreeTrade 
The EU is an abscess in the TORY Party that cannot be drained #BrexitIt has been the *Nemesis* of Tory LeadersIt *did* for Major, Hague, IDS, Cameron - and it will *do* for May.It will haunt the Tories like Banquo's Ghost. 
I have written to PM. The only way to face down her Brexit extremists, who will drive us to 'no deal', is to accept Labour's amendments to the Withdrawal Bill. Act now in the national interest; not party interest.  
Absolutely right @jeremycorbyn. Precisely why we should oppose Brexit with all our might. #StopBrexit 
The Tories have sunk the ship, and now they are over-turning the lifeboats. Only an idiot would want to drown alongside these fools. Cut them adrift. Sail to oblivion, failures #Brexit 
This conversation between @Nigel_Farage and a devout Remoaner is easily my highlight of the post #EU Referendum (#EURef) period so far!The caller claims that the @Independent is "Independent".Honestly, I almost wet myself laughing so hard!  
Regardless of what you WANT, do you THINK Brexit will actually happen? 
Brussels negotiator Michel Barnier admits UK may QUIT trade talks WITHOUT paying Brexit blackmail of £88Billion.On 29 March 2019, Britain will become an independent sovereign nation free of EU interference...#Brexit #EU 
Michael Heseltine said today that It’s a good thing that Brexiters are in charge of Brexit so that they can be seen to fail and they have nobody else to blame but themselves. 
Presume UK govt thinks legislating precise moment of #Brexit will show #EU we really mean it despite lack of plan. #whatplanet? 
Just reminding you that the day of the Referendum, the value of Nigel Farage's salary in the UK went up.  
Tomorrow @ScotNational Tory MPs line up to oust May: 40 Conservatives agree to sign letter of no confidence in Prime Minister as Brexit talks falter and EU concern grows that government will collapse  
Pretty much all the media I was exposed to (and I would include most BBC output) backed Remain. And yet none of the immediate post-referendum catastrophes foretold came to pass. But my decision was based on democratic fundamentals anyway and not economics. 
#Brexit is for the few, not the many . Surprising Labour hasn’t woken up to that yet…  
If the Brits renege on the divorce bill, the EU will be stuck paying for Farage. #FBPEPS His pension will be peanuts compared to the money he'll make speculating on Brexit.  
Don't miss Irish finance minister @Paschald tomorrow at Brookings for a discussion on how Brexit could affect Ireland and the United States  
Nigel Farage declared devotion to ex-aide 'with heart and body' in secret love letter - as he 'lied to save Brexit' 
As someone on here reminded me, what about Gibraltar? Haven’t heard anything about there in ages but obviously would pose huge issues too #brexit  
James Dyson, who fired at least 590 British workers when he moved a factory abroad in 2002 & is worth almost £8 billion, thinks Brexit will let his company fire people more easily & pay less tax. 
I fear a no deal #Brexit, but I fear more a situation where we tell the majority that their votes cannot change the regime. 
Because without Arron Banks Brexit would NEVER have happened.  
‘How could I know?’ Theresa May jokes Juncker ‘could have been DRUNK’ during Brexit chat  
The Brexit Russia connection. Boris Johnson said he never met Joseph Mifsud, a key figure in the FBI's Russia-Trump investigation.Yet here they are together.Surely he didn't lie? pic.twitter.com/pYF2pgAQZX 
Only good thing to be said about Brexit is it’s turned a lot of people who’d otherwise probably be quite boring into magnificent radicals. 
#AwfullyBritishBrexitNegotiations...The Tory Brexit team have fallen into in-fighting#NoDealBrexit 
Brexit is for the few, not the many.  
Instructions from Boris and Gove are just what the country needs, they are speaking for the 52% who voted for Brexit and are looking forward to a future outside of the EU.  
But hey at least they’ll have a hard border and the threat to the peace process to look forward to cos of ur Brexit  
Brexit is reversible, according to one of the people who drafted Article 50  
Britain is leaderless and drifting towards a grave act of national self-harm - Matthew Parris on Brexit. #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
'The result does not represent the will of the people—it cannot, for “Brexit” as such is ill defined—and Leave voters should know that this vagueness predestined their vote to be misused by the Leave camp'  
Dyson is all I hate about brexit what a scumbag he wants to pay no taxes sells his overpriced Hoover made in sweatshops in Malaysia, anyway most brexiter can't afford his hoover no remainer will buy it, let's boycott that brand everywhere  
In the 70's @theSNP said that the oil in Scottish waters was worth 10 times what the UK Gvnt said. In the 80's SNP said Thatcher would decimate Scotland's industries. In the 90's SNP said UK intervention in Iraq would be disastrous. SNP said #Brexit would be bad for Scotland.  
I wrote Article 50. This government can reverse Brexit if it wants to 
Wanted, an opposition to #Brexit @TheGreenParty @LibDems @theSNP @Plaid_Cymru most @UKLabour members and voters (Just not the leadership) So join forces! 
"Tonight on my television show, I would like to introduce one of the UK's foremost experts on Brexit, the EU and Scottish independence...."  
How democratic is a Tory Brexit machine intent on ramming a hard Brexit down the throat of all those in the UK who voted against leaving. Hard Brexit is not Democratic. It’s autocratic and demented politics. The country is as divided as during the Civil War...  
MI5 Says Russia's goal is to breakup the WEST! Clear evidence Russia was involved with Brexit by spreading disinformation on massive scale! 
INDEPENDENT reports UK employers are having to...RAISE WAGES, because Brexit is threatenening EU immigration. The horror!  
There’s no such a conflict between Catalonia and Spain: it is amongst catalans.Secessionists tried to impose a unilateral independence against the will of the 60% of the catalans based on an illegal referendum in which that 60% rejected to participate.@CNNImpact @BBCWorld 
Brexit: Winter Edition(Turn your sound on)  
And imagine how it might look if 1, the main Opposition Party argued for change. 2. we didn't have the most biased pro Brexit media imaginable. 3. People were fully aware A50 is revocable  
We need a serious investigation into Russia's role influencing the Brexit vote - my @theipaper column  
Brexit: why Northern Ireland comes first - an explainer 
Britain has 10 times more to lose than Germany by leaving the EU without a deal, report says  
Tory MP said: “Opposing Brexit will destroy Tories. Supporting Brexit will destroy UK.”Time the Tories put our country BEFORE THEMSELVES. 
."May in no hurry to confront REAL-WORLD consequences of her pledge that Brexit heralds rebirth of 'Global Britain'". 
The two key questions that need answering are easy:1) How much illegally hacked data from Russian shores up the huge datasets of the Trump and Brexit targeting firms?And2) Who approached who for it?Those are the two nails left to hit. 
The man who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can still be stopped  
I thought Brexit was gong to be a windfall for us - why do we have to find extra money (taxes?)  
Brexit news: Expect rich pickings from trade - Liam Fox  
Classic tales of #Brexit#StopBrexit 
The EU are preparing for Britain to walk away from the table before the talks have even finished, despite getting a Brexit agreement being the “the easiest deal in human history” according Liam Fox. Just shows the Tories couldn't organise a piss-up in a brewery. #StopBrexit 
Britain won't offer a new figure on Brexit bill to unlock talks: minister  
Do you believe #Brexit is the will of the British people?RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
'Make it easier to hire and fire people' and scrap corporation tax, says Sir James Dyson" Finally the real reasons for #Brexit begin to leak out.  The 1% have duped millions with their lies. #StopBrexit 
Brexit will revive the UK fishing industry, regenerating several coastal towns  
The incompetence of the British government continues to mystify officials in Brussels. Senior figures in the EU suspect that ministers do not understand either the politics of Brexit, or the laws.#FBPE#StopBrexit 
#AnambraDecides Tough questions for Chidoka and he answered them with precision and even expanded the narrative -I also love the campaign ad, "Election is a Referendum on our future". Really proud to be onye ANAMBRA today. We have at least 3 good options to choose from. Progress! 
For the record - NO I DO NOT SUPPORT BREXIT.We're NOT all Brexiters now. Some of are still determined to stop #Brexit#StopBrexit #StopBrexitHour #StopBrexitNow #Remain #FinalSay 
BREXIT: “Leave the EU without a deal” says a multimillionaire based outside Europe and with a vested financial interest in seeing Britain become a tax haven.  
Cornwall (voted Brexit) - can we have exemptionWeatherspoons (boss supports Brexit) - can we have FoMGrimsby (voted leave) -can we have an exemptionAs it affects people they realise how serious#StopBrexit #StopBrexitHour 
Advocates hard brexit. Advices rich clients to take money out of UK. Redwood should resign @Frances_Coppola 
EU's Brexit chief  said without a deal on trade terms, the EU and UK would revert to WTO tariffs, with trade ties "like those we have with China"  
translation: British govt suddenly admits Irish border poses an entirely predictable (and widely predicted) hurdle to Brexit talks  
READ | Even after their huge loss in the referendum, sore loser Remoaners are still trying to shut down Brexit in parliament.They'll be humiliated badly at the ballot box if they don't stop trying to defy the will of the people! 
Sorry to be thick but why are the views of James Dyson, a manufacturer of electrical goods in Malaysia & Singapore, relevant to #Brexit? Can’t we get the views of someone who believes in Britain? 
It's going to be hard for The Sun to accuse #Marr of interviewing too many Remainers. They've interviewed probably 25%, or more, of all the major business owners backing Brexit, and that's just today! 
Do you think @MichelBarnier has been trying to rip off Britain? He said British taxpayers "would not want me to just come along and just give away billions of pounds". @DavidDavisMP - EU preparing for possible collapse of Brexit talks  
We believe any Brexit is bad for the UK's place in the world, for our society and economy. But 'no deal', it's catastrophic and we'll fight it with every breath.#StopBrexit 
It wasn't 'Russian Propaganda' that put out these headlines pre 2014 Independence Referendum and continues to pump out thousands more?  
How can hacks be so credulous!? Hard Brexit compels a bonfire of environmental regulations. *HE'S PLAYING YOU*  
I will fight Brexit to the end, for the sake of the young generations. #StopBrexit 
#StopBrexitHour#StopBrexitDo you really want to be poorer?Do you really want the tax avoiding owners of the Mail, Express and Telegraph to escape from EU tax avoiding  regulation in 2019?The real reason for brexitMay is scared of themIt’s more than about trade  
The same old names pop up in these extreme Brexit groups. Economists for Free is advised by this crew.Their chair Minford devastated Labour areas in the 80s, now reckons everyone will be richer whilst manufacturing will be wiped out. Go figure.#StopBrexit 
A "flood" of financial firms may quit Britain if there's no Brexit transition deal soon, Lords committee chair says  
#StopBrexit Brexit is a massive con-trick.A clique of the super-rich, including tax-dodging press barons & their political hangers-on, duping people into thinking it's about sovereignty & immigration in order to get themselves a tax haven. 
Patrick Minford says #Brexit's great because there's a growth dividend by mid 2020s.  But.... 
The government now claims that the Republic of Ireland is "within the United Kingdom". It's not. It's really not. Pretending it is will not stop brexit wrecking the Good Friday Agreement. Just #StopBrexit. 
‘Boris Johnson is a great Foreign Secretary’ @DavidDavisMP A man with this lack of judgement is negotiating #Brexit 
‘It is inconceivable that a vote for Brexit would not have a negative impact on the (Irish) Border, bringing cost and disruption to trade and to people’s lives.’ Theres May, May 2016 
Suggest you go away and “learn some respect” for our Parliamentary democracy.  The narrow vote in the advisory referendum was to leave the EU not the Single market or Customs Union. Taking account of new facts, Parliament must decide how, when and indeed whether to implement it.  
WTAF. John Redwood is on record advising investors NOT to put money into the UK, indicating he knows damage is coming. At the same time he's a politician actively pushing for a 'no deal' Brexit. Where are his priorities?  
So thousands of people will have been mislead and have no idea that what they read was actually incorrect?Well, isn’t that just the Brexit strategy in a nutshell?  
Supporting #Brexit ERGEDLAFDBNPUKIP (Farage, Hoey) KKKTrumpPutinISISFront National (Le Pen) Party 4 Freedom (Geert Wilders) Cambridge AnalyticaLegatumHopkinsHartley-BrewerMoggGoveRedwoodBorisDavisDuncan-SmithMayFoxCorbyn DysonMartin#StopBrexit#FBPE 
EU preparing for possible collapse of Brexit talks - Barnier  
£65bn Brexit windfall: Britain could gain if Chancellor grabs opportunity, economists say 
Brexit should be prevented due to its "far-reaching" impact, German government advisers say  
There's no mandate for Brexit. There never was. The ballot paper might as well have been written in Klingon, for all that voters really understood the question. 
Farage reveals how he will LEAD Brexit frontline if 'establishment' BOTCHES divorce deal  
How is it defying Brexit for London to have its own immigration policy?'Defying Brexit' is becoming a flag for any immigration, law, regulation or trade policies tabloids don't like. 
Brexit will not happen because:1) It is wrong2) It is undemocratic3) It is impossiblePls Quote tweet to help get #StopBrexit trending 
As the Commons considers the EU (Withdrawal) Bill in the coming week, @DavidDavisMP writes “Parliament faces a choice — a smooth or a chaotic Brexit” 
Nigel Farage - "If British parliament betrays the will of the people, I will be there in the front line contesting the European elections and I will give them, the establishment a result which they can't even bear to look at." #Brexit  
So, James Dyson is angling for No Deal Brexit.First rule of logic club:When a billionaire urges for a particular Government action, it's for his benefit not for the other 65 million of us. #Marr 
"For us, it remains possible for the UK to stay in the Customs Union and the Single Market" after Brexit says Barnier.  
#Marr had Michael Gove,  James Dyson and a Sunday Express hack. May as well have had a banner up saying: "BBC BACKS HARD BREXIT" and had Putin and someone from National Action on 
Very long piece in Saturday's NYT about religious hate crimes being up 30 percent in London "primarily against Muslims." My first thought when I read that line is "how many of these 'hate crimes' involve speech only?" Also the author blames this increase on Brexit & terrorism 
.We need to start talking about walking away from Brexit. via @FT. 
The Russia Threat – CNN finds pro-Brexit Russia trolls flooded the zone on EU referendum day.  
Rebirth of UK fishing ports, Brexit will net £3bn when we take back control of our seas & create 30,000 jobs boosting the economy, long neglected ports given a new lease of life. 
Observer editorial: If only to avoid total meltdown, it is time for a time-out on Brexit  
23rd June 2016 was not a clarion call for the dismantling of the state. Yet that‘s what Brexit is.  
Let's call a spade a spade. Remoaner MPs only want a Parliament vote on final EU deal to give them a veto to block #Brexit. It MUST be resisted & they MUST be faced down. 
David Davis: Britain won't offer a new figure on Brexit bill to unlock talks. Music to this British taxpayer's ears!  
He is right you know nothing has Changed! Paradise Papers, Panama Papers! All prove in the end Brexit is a Scam so the Tories can hold onto their offshore "Tax Havens!" They are a Party funded by "Tax Avoiders" and Hedge Fund Managers!  
I was wrong about EU referendum result, wrong about US presidential election result, and wrong about UK general election result. So I’m going to tip Switzerland to beat N Ireland in the hope that I’m wrong again. Come on @NorthernIreland shock the world. #gawa 
This really is a remarkable story. Redwood is warning investors to pull out. Needs to be serious conversation about disaster capitalists backing Brexit  
Brexiteer @johnredwood warns investors to get their money out of the UK, then tells the UK to go for hard Brexit. #disasatercapitalism  cc @FlipChartRick 
Wrong, wrong wrong. Is it any wonder brexit is a shambolic and humiliating disaster when THIS is the best that brexit shills can manage? I'm not expecting legal expertise. But this fails on basic reading and comprehension.#StopBrexit 
Let’s see how much what we contribute to the EU contribute to NHS spendingWhat about the cost of Brexit and loss of NHS staff?#StopBrexit 
Take it from the Swiss: the Brexit referendum wasn’t legitimate  
James Dyson on a post Brexit UK:  It should be easier to hire and fire and Corporation Tax should be eliminated and I get everything and you get nothing, nothing at all #Marr 
If I am aware of any businessman who backed Brexit I totally boycott their products as well as I don’t recommend their pubs or hotels to clients of mine as they are not worthy of my hard earned cash Let their supporters fill their tills for them as I will not support any brexiter 
There we have it. The true purpose of Brexit. Screwing the whole population to make a handful of super-rich even richer still.(While losing Scotland & NI in the process PS: good luck to them).#FBPE 
Minister admits it will take up to 'three weeks' to publish secret #Brexit studies. No doubt to give them time to doctor the findings. Should be forced to publish them as they are. Bunch of crooks, the lot of them.  
PROOFPapadopoulos’ London “professor” met #Brexit bad boy, Boris Johnson@LouiseMensch @20committee @counterchekist @lauferlaw @ChristynRoyce @MelissaJPeltier @aliasvaughn 
Sir James Dyson: Britain should walk away from Brexit negotiations over 'outrageous' demands for divorce bill #premium 
Domestic Workers’ Salaries’ Surge As Migrant Labour Declines in Brexit Britain  
UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson photographed last month w/Papa’s “prof” Joseph Mifsud.Mifsud told colleagues he planned to discuss #Brexit w/Boris 
Brexit is merely an arm of the Tories’ class war, and it’s time Labour inflicts a killer blow [OPINION]  
.@Econs4FreeTrade agree that no deal is better than a bad deal - sign up below to see them unveil their 'Budget for Brexit' on Tuesday, tickets in limited supply.  
Wired: has evidence Russia used twitter propaganda accounts to influence Brexit referendum:  
Sir James Dyson slams the #EU for demanding ‘billions and billions’ in a divorce bill and says Britain should WALK AWAY from #Brexit talks to get the best deal: via @MailOnline 
'We will never be your slaves!'Italy in crisis as 10,000 people on the streets demand EXIT from 'EU MAFIA'#Brexit 
Yup, that post-Brexit socialist paradise is looking closer by the minute.  
Putin is a nationalist autocrat who supports other nationalist autocrats—Trump, Le Pen, the Brexit movement etc. It’s not about Cold War posture, it’s about ideology and geopolitical advantage. 
Almost 17 months after the Brexit Referendum, has anyone got a clue what Labour’s definitive position is on this matter?  #clueless 
What are your experiences of explaining #Brexit to non British people?#StopBrexit @BritishInEurope @euromove @_Britain4Europe @IanDunt @acgrayling #FBPE Please Retweet 
So Brexiter James Dyson wants Brexit to make it easier to fire people - we are starting to see the true Brexit agenda. #StopBrexit. 
James Dyson has called for 0% corporation tax to compensate for Brexit. How much should we cut corporation tax to compensate for Brexit? 
James Dyson, who fired at least 590 British workers when he moved a factory abroad in 2002 & is worth almost £8 billion, thinks Brexit will let his company fire people more easily & pay less tax. 
Britain won't offer a new figure on Brexit bill to unlock talks: minister  
James Dyson: UK should walk away from #Brexit talks  via  
Spain's police operation against Catalan voters on the Oct. 1st referendum declared a "state secret." 
50 London banks are in advanced talks with the European Central Bank about moving operations to the European mainland. As #Brexit nears, they are considering Frankfurt, Paris or Dublin.  
How the UK is seen abroad... "Theresa May's cabinet upon leaving the EU." #Brexit @SPIEGELONLINE 
If you deploy the argument that only 37% of the electorate voted to leave the EU, how do you square that circle in light of the fact UK euro-election *turnout* was only 35.6 and only 42.6 overall? Where is their mandate?#Brexit 
The information concerning repression and police brutality during the Catalan Referendum has been classified as a 'State Secret'. More than 900 voters hurt, but no one will be held accountable, for Spain tries to cover it. Rajoy, following the steps of Erdogan.  
No Deal Brexit would obviously make it impossible to remain part of EU scheme, but interesting Barnier brought it up #Ferrexit #Petxit 
"Demanding billions and billions to leave is quite outrageous," inventor Sir James Dyson says of the EU's Brexit bill demands  
It's not even a slightly better vacuum. Henry Hoover is better, cheaper, didn't vote for Brexit and has a smiley face on it 
Hands up who saw that the endgame of Brexit was going to be “This is all Ireland’s fault.” 
Billion inventor James Dyson lashes out at ‘outrageous’ Brexit divorce bill and urges Theresa May to walk away fro…  
Anti-Brexit peer Hugh Dykes warns that the Lords are ready to take up the fight when it reaches them.  
Dyson hates the UK, unless it's to plunder its ingenuity and its educated. The country's better off without the likes of him and Tim Martin - parasites. 
EU planning for collapse of Brexit talks, says Michel Barnier  
Margaret Thatcher was pro European Union and would’ve stopped Brexit 
7. And backtracking this network to even before the vote on Brexit, they all sound pretty similar. All the time.  
Ireland will not threaten to veto Brexit talks 'at this stage', PM says  
With credit to @tmvmedia for pointing me to this collection of all Referendum materials (leaflets etc. for Remain & Leave) - plenty of #StopBrexit ammunition! Please spread the word with an RT:  
Compared to the horrors of total war and the defence of civilisation, Brexit is little more than a coalition disagreement of command and control, writes @SamuelCoates 
We're still on a journey in NI, coming to terms with trauma- making sense of what has emerged after decades of conflict.Nearly 20 years on after GFA our footsteps are faltering. We need stability,co-operation, pragmatism.Davis' attitude to Brexit so far has flown in face of this 
.@bbcpolitics Who is balancing John Redwood’s fantastical tales of the wonders of Brexit and the untarnished reputation of the present government? #wato 
the notion that the irish border has created an "unexpected" hurdle for the brexiteers seems really stupid to most people - but i think it's literally true it never occurred to the brexit crowd that ireland might pose a problem  
READ | Barnier calls for "No Deal" Brexit preparations.After begging like a dog for British money over the last seven months, even he is starting to realise that the UK could very easily make a clean break from Brussels! 
I’ve been running an analysis of Russian Brexit trolls and bots. It’s worse than we thought even yesterday. (THREAD) 
He is making the UK a laughing stock around the world, yet crows that we'll be a great global force when we Brexit to become Empire 2.0. #BoJoToGo #BorisMustGo #ToriesInCrisis #NoConfidence #StopBrexit 
Today Gove praises EU habitats directive. In referendum, he attacked it with fake argument about cats chasing birds  
How much more suffering can our badly led country take is the real question?! There's doggedness & there's arrant dogmatic stubbornness in pursuit of #Brexit at any cost...the cost will be high & we'll all be the losers. Stop her #StopBrexit now. 
Leading Brexit voice Dyson wants to eliminate corporate taxes. #ParadisePapers #StopBrexit 
We need to talk about Patriots...The Russia/Brexit Network is bigger and darker than imagined.Via @Byline_Media 
Frankly, if Labour were genuinely united against Brexit, they could stop it. Since they've chosen not to stop it you have to conclude they support it, and therefore are as culpable as the Tories. 
Remainers don't need to agree on ANYTHING but being against Brexit. In fact we simply want to retain our right to vehemently disagree with each other within the EU. 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and your Country and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
This thread looks more 'on the money' by the day.If May does succumb to the Brexit 'no deal' cult in December, we'll have to take to the streets in our millions for the future of the country.#StopBrexit 
Brexit of the right by the right for the right. And Dyson a vested interest who should be challenged more @BBCNews 
We wish Brits who seek the truth about Russian election interference well in their quest to determine the legitimacy of the Brexit vote.  
'If you walk away they’ll come to us!' James Dyson's brilliant argument FOR no deal Brexit  
Journalists please god don't write about the Irish border issue of Brexit being 'unexpected'. Some of us were giving dire warnings about it before the vote even took place. 
Son, Brexit gives me the chance to move manufacturing jobs offshore, pay no corporation tax, & claim to love Britain  
We need a serious investigation into Russia's role influencing the Brexit vote - my @theipaper column  
REALITY: German MEP hits out at EU’s ‘punishment’ approach to Brexit negotiations aimed at stopping other countries from leaving.  
Dyson let's his true Brexit motivations show. Deregulate, reduce workers' rights, get rid of corporation tax. Brexit voters didn't want this, Brexit leaders do.  
This is what the face of Brexit looks like.  
Being callous about the deaths of anyone doesn't show your strong support for Europe only for intolerance. And you won't keep Britain in Europe with that attitude. #Brexit  
Does no-deal need parliamentary approval? My blog on Article 50, the Supreme Court and Brexit:  
Brexit will lead us straight to recession. This act of self harm must stop.  
Guess who is driving the Brexit agenda? It is not the majority of parliament, most of which think deep down that hard Brexit is a disaster for Britain, it is the Brexit extremists. They are the ones bullying the country and dictating it's future. #StopBrexit 
Brexiteer inventor James Dyson says UK should take 'no deal' Brexit then cut workers rights and get rid of corporation tax.  
If you want to stop Brexit - as I do - then IMO you should1.Try and persuade people who support it to change their minds2. Not pick fights with people on your own sideIf there's a clear majority to stop Brexit, then I believe Corbyn would support a 2nd referendum  
Yet more talk of Russian influence in Brexski/Brexit  
Britain could gain a £65 billion windfall from Brexit if the Chancellor seizes its "economic opportunities", says @Econs4FreeTrade 
I mean the way the Irish political class accept a situation where the German government has a veto over our relationship with the UK is baffling to me. Tell them to get stuffed. We're an independent country. #Brexit  
Pay less tax, and be able to fire people at will. #brexit was always a plan to enrich the wealthy by impoverishing the poor. 
The Irish #Brexit problem is easily solved. Bilateral trade agreement with the UK. Tell the EU to kick us out if they don't like it. They won't. Stand up for ourselves for once. 
James Dyson has torn into the EU for demanding a sky-high divorce bill and said Britain should walk away from the #Brexit talks. via @MailOnline 
In our ‘Budget for Brexit’ launching this week, we proclaim a heresy: Brexit will be good for the British economy.  
Should Britain walk away from the EU? Sir James @Dyson says Britian should "walk way" from the #EU without a deal. "If you walk away, they will come to us" #marr #Brexit RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
At last the truth from a leading Brexiter; Brexit means destruction of workers rights and tax cuts at the top.  
The Observer view of Britain’s shambolic Brexit negotiations | Observer editorial  
The hunger is for Independence for Scotland DickScotland wants nothing to do with your full English Brexit or your illegal wars or you and your Tory collaborators  
MPs are demanding a meaningful vote on the final Brexit deal. Theresa May has insisted on denying that. A forthcoming veto vote could be an embarrassing defeat for Tories. #ReleaseTheReports #StopBrexit #NoConfidence #Paterson #Marr 
Today, Michael Gove has announced ambitions for a new environmental watchdog to ensure that wildlife protection and laws are maintained and not weakened after Brexit.  
Here's why Nigel Farage could get £150,000 for the UK leaving the EU through #Brexit  
We applaud Boris Johnson and Michael Gove for ensuring May delivers a full Brexit! 
German MEP rages at Barnier for 'unfair' #Brexit strategy towards UK'Game plan of what should be agreed 1st until getting to 2nd, 3rd & 4th stage has not been developed jointly by Britain & EU - it has been FORCED down the throat of Britain by the EU'#EU 
Russian interference in Brexit through targeted social media propaganda revealed. WIRED magazine reports coordinated network of Russian-based Twitter accounts spread racial hatred to disrupt politics in the UK & EU27 in 2016.  
Reversing Brexit...  
Ah. *that* kind of Brexit.  
The Daily Express are really getting desperate. Now they are using the predictions of a psychic to support their claims that the Brexit fantasy will be a success. And according to the attached poll over 50% of their readers think he is right. The Leavers have lost it. #StopBrexit 
How awful for this outstanding public servant who has given her life to her country to see it torn apart by the poison of Brexit & the tidal wave of intolerance & deceit it has unleashed. Disunited Kingdom.  
Madness of a hard-right Brexit laud bare: Lie to the gullible, call for measures that you know will plunge this country into chaos, but all worthwhile bc the ‘reward’ is the birth of a US-style Tory Utopia which sees end to NHS & welfare state.  
Andrew Marr, hang your head in shame, asking pre-read questions, to a billionaire who uses foreign workers to produce his wares about the signifigance of #Brexit. Hang your head in shame @AndrewMarr9 
Lots of EU27 papers are focusing on Barnier's statement that a no-deal #Brexit is a possibility. If that happens, the family lives of millions of citizens will be in grave peril. We must #StopBrexit to protect our rights! 
James Dyson on #Brexit  - "If we walk away the EU will come to us because they want to export all their products to us. They will come back to us. "We are in a very very strong position, incredibly strong position."  
Brexit.Created by 'haves' those who already have and don't want you to have.Voted for by 'have nots' those who don't have and don't want you to have  either.#StopBrexit#revokea50forthwith 
The ‘unique solution’ he is seeking for the Irish border will be provided by the unicorns who will come galloping down from the sunlit Brexit uplands any day now  
When you’re so Brexit that you’re genuinely presenting monolingualism as a selling point.  
EXCL: British MEPs'  €6million golden goodbyes will have to come out of the UK Brexit bill-not paid by Brussels.  
Asked my Catalan taxi driver what he though of Brexit: ‘Hombre, es malo. Para Vostoros.’ Told. #strawpoll 
Jeremy Corbyn says Brexit pushed through by in-fighting Tories is 'biggest risk' to Britain  
Hear @DavidDavisMP give a positive update on #Brexit negotiations.It appears EU and UK citizens will be OK, and he makes some very valid and interesting points on the budget side of things, which is progressing well. 
10 UK regions to hit Fishing JACKPOT after BrexitBritain to see UK Fishing industry BOOM by 50%, creating 30,000 extra jobs & regenerating seaside towns & BOOSTING UK economy by £3 BILLIONLet's get on with #Brexit#EU 
James Dyson, having spent ten minutes speaking about the post-Brexit manufacturing boom in Britain:Marr: So where will you be manufacturing the Dyson car?Dyson: Probably somewhere in the Middle East.#Marr 
If you never buy another James Dyson product,you'll be doing the UK economy a great favour. His means of production is outside the UK; his money is hidden offshore; and he wants Brexit so UK doesn't have to comply with forthcoming EU tax-haven laws #DontBuyDyson #StopBrexit #Marr 
According to research from Economists for Free Trade, Britain could gain £65 BILLION from Brexit! 
"Huge amount of progress" in Brexit negotiations says @DavidDavisMP to @skynewsniall ... 
Discredited Professor Patrick Minford and his team have been at it again. They written a report based on a flawed economic model and the Brexit press are putting it out there like it is the word of God. It just another part of the Brexit fantasy. None of it is real. #StopBrexit 
So Mr Dyson, What was it about not having to bother about EU worker rights or EU threat to tax havens that attracted you to Brexit position? 
Not surprisingly, since he moved his manufacturing to Malaysia some time ago. British manufacturer, he is not. He stands to gain from Brexit if UK unilaterally lowers tariffs as he wants.  
When I stop and think about how the Irish border question is now occupying centre stage in discussions....w/o a NI Executive in place....just unbelievable. What a crying shame all round for the people of Northern Ireland - well beyond Brexit too 
I don't disagree, Al. As a businessman, his mind is finely honed. My point is, he's supporting #Brexit for his own narrow purposes, not the greater good he purports. 
UK here - thanks for electing Trump. You helped us to get over our embarrassment with the whole Brexit thing. 
First @SirSocks and now @Dyson - do you really think these people don't know how to negotiate? #Brexit #WalkAway 
Why only Forty Conservative MPs? Do the others really want a weak and wobbly leader who is so pathetic that she can't stand up to Brexit headbangers and takes orders from Boris Johnson and Michael Gove? 
WATCH | James Dyson explains big benefits of Brexit & why Theresa May should walk away from talks with Eurocrats! 
HA!Now you've SEEN it folks !Presenting the FACE of UK post #HardBrexitDrum roll !!!James Dyson #Marr* walk away from EU neg* Don't meet financial liabilities* scrap corporation tax* easier to *flex* labour force ie hire & fireThe UGLY face of #Brexit 
Michael Gove wants to push for a bonfire of green regulations post-Brexit. Not in anyway to help the environment, but to aid industry and the profit lines of investors. #GoveOut #Marr #Paterson #SaveOurPlanet 
Me, when the Irish government is getting blamed for Brexit  
I agree. He wants further deregulation as most entrepreneurs would. I suspect most of those who voted for brexit (ie not millionaires) might disagree 
DYSON ON BREXIT - UK in strong position - Don’t hand EU money  - Walk away - Let them come to us Are you listening Theresa May?  
James Dyson, the man who made his British workers redundant and moved operations to Malaysia, preaching on the benefits of Brexit to "the British worker" #Dyson #Marr 
James Dyson - pro ultra-hard Brexit ("we should walk away now"), pro-reduction in workers rights. Pro- abolition of corporation tax. Looks to Singapore as a paragon. But happy to take millions in farm subsidies.  
No corporation tax and firms able to hire and fire at will. That's James Dyson's vision for Brexit Britain - and families will pay the price. 
I  James ! Saying what I’ve been saying since day one of brexit ! Walk away and give them nothing as EU need us more than we need them  
Measured, reasoned reflection by @SeemaMalhotra1 on the Brexit vacuum caused by govt's lack of "end state" vision & failure to engage Plmnt.  
There will be electoral consequences for Remoaner MPs who try to block Brexit!  
Dyson is economically illiterate about #brexit. On #marr he stated the government (aka taxpayers) should compensate car manufacturers for 10% EU tariffs on UK car exports. He wants to retain engineers in UK but leaving EU means quotas on foreign skilled workers #brexitshambles 
Dyson thoughtful, balanced and above all optimistic in his Marr interview about post-Brexit Britain. #Marr 
Dyson very clear about appeal of Brexit for him: most exports go outside EU and admirer of Singapore and reduced employment standards #marr 
Businessmen supporting Brexit:Dyson: shipped his manufacturing jobs to MalaysiaBamford: Fined by EU for breaking competition rulesTim Martin: Wants an exemption so he can still get EU migrants working in Wethersppons#marr 
.@SadiqKhan blames Brexit for one of the reasons why the number of houses being built in London is falling #marr 
Theresa May faces defeat by MPs demanding vote on final Brexit deal  
At least we can agree about something! : Barnier: Everyone should prepare for no EU deal with Brexit Britain  
#MichaelGove "backed the EU" and "Experts praised him for listening to the evidence" How about you do the same regarding #Brexit??? Tosspot. #Stopbrexit 
REVEALED: The 10 regions to hit fishing jackpot as Brexit to see industry boom 50 per cent  
This remains the underlying problem in Brexit talks: More than 500 days since the referendum and Britain is still negotiating with itself  
Dyson, one of the few business people supporting #Brexit, who has no production in the UK, is interviewed on @MarrShow. Why not interview the huge number of UK based industrialists at risk from Brexit? 
Jeremy Corbyn is the only politician who can get us to a second EU referendum. He should state his Euroscepticism, but announce that a Labour government would legislate for a second referendum because he's come to the conclusion that #Brexit would be an economic catastrophe. 
If the Tory "government" does carry out its suicidal Brexit plan, the one benefit will be the death of the Conservative Party.They could not survive being responsible for inflicting such unprecedented hardship on the public. 
Boris and Gove's secret memo to Theresa May dictating terms for a clean Brexit | Michael Gove's plan for a green revolution after Brexit | Britain could gain a £65 billion windfall from Brexit, find Economists for Free Trade  
Wondering how many Brexit voters are no longer with us. And what a bad winter might mean for for the wall of gammon  
The @Conservatives will create 'world-leading body to give the environment a voice'. Whether you voted remain or leave, a green Brexit is something everyone can get behind. Huge congratulations to @michaelgove @ZacGoldsmith and @GreenerUK_ 
Liam the Chlorinated Chicken setting up arms deals with despots & Brexit Pots of Jam#marr #ElectClownsExpectCircus 
Johnson and Gove want re-education to 'clarify the minds' of Cabinet members not committed to Brexit, says leaked letter to May  terrifying 
The campaign against Brexit must go beyond Parliament  
Waking up to the fact that No Deal is the default, and that HoC cannot stop Brexit by messing up Brexit legislation, Remainiacs lash out 
Looking forward to joining @AndrewMarr9 on @MarrShow to talk London, Brexit, #Budget2017 and #RemembranceDay2017. Live from 9am. #Marr 
Anyone else desperate to see the revival our fishing industry and seaside towns? This part our identity, as a small island nation, was stolen from us and can’t be returned soon enough #BREXIT 
Showing remarkable patience with an abusive #Brexit ranter, @EdwardJDavey sets out reality. #EU membership enabled UK to multiply its influence in many fields - foreign policy, trade etc. 
I know we've been here before but define a "jobs-first Brexit". If there ever was, there now is no beneficial way fwd for Brexit Britain. 
2/ The woment HM Treasury starts planning for No Deal Brexit, the moment OBR/HMT have to tell truth about its fiscal cost. Massive hike in debt & deficit; collapsing growth (in short term) plus border chaos 
Gove and Johnson letter  based on deluded idea they can fallback to No Deal Brexit. 1/~ But May can't get that past Commons... 
Germany's biggest business group just warned Brexit is impossible  
EU wasted 500 million quid of Our Money on impractical 'climate change' technology. And have been wasting it for 8 years! The Man in Brussels does not know best. He hasn't a flaming clueViva Brexit 
Most dangerous aspect of May government meltdown is UK interests endangered in EU negotiations by perception of weakness. Gove as PM and Rees-Mogg as Brexit Secretary would give essential message of strength, resolve and confidence in UK independent future  
Brexit will speed up economic growth, create extra jobs and generate additional revenues to be spent on tax cuts, spending increases or a combination of the two | @Econs4FreeTrade 
Sort out Brexit, history and the football all in oneFrom Guardian football section comments#coybig 
‘We can't be quiet’: Gruffalo co-creator and fellow illustrators respond to Brexit  
#Brexit Britain alone will be economic carrion preyed on by vultures. In trade there is strength in EU numbers  
Is there any accession or referendum gifting POK to your home land Pakistan? Do tell. We won’t surrender our land because @chintskap wants a visa. Why not act in Pak films instead?Just like hordes of wannabes descend on us from there. 
Tomorrow there is going to be a debate in the UK Parliament on the topic of another referendum. It’s your last chance to urge your MP to attend and back the majority against another divisive referendum.  
#Brexit firmed up:29 March 2019 fixed! Theresa May listen idea, (but) May not tolerate attempts to halt it!  
It is in Britain and Europe’s best interests to stop the clock on #Brexit before yet more damage is done  
On this #ArmisticeDay @vincecable has claimed that a number of members of the public who want “to revisit the basic question” of Brexit “will rise” as the Government “lacks ability” to secure a satisfactory deal." 
The man who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can still be stopped  
All benefits of Brexit promised by David Davis et al have dissipated. Brexiters clinging to the abstract idea of sovereignty as the last reason for staying with Brexit. UK will be much less sovereign when in hock to corporates & hedge funds #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles #paterson 
Imagine a project manager coming back to his paymaster 500 days after getting his brief and admitting he's got no plan, nothing at all. That's David Davis and his #Brexit negotiations. 
so the same ppl who days ago ruled out a referendum for Indigenous recognition in the constitution now want one to recognise themselves in the constitution 
#Chitrakoot  is a Congress Bastion BJP lost here in 2013 despite winning 165/230 seats in MP Congress is winning the byelection after its sitting MLA diedSo extrapolating it as referendum on @ChouhanShivraj is utter stupidity 
WALK AWAY: Tory poll shows nearly half want Theresa May to declare NO DEAL on Brexit  
Adani Australia have confirmed on Facebook that they need a $1 billion Australian taxpayer funded concessional loan to proceed with their coal mine.#QldVotes2017 is a referendum on #Adani's mine.#Qldpol #Auspol #Qldvotes #NAIF 
Here are 2 British Patriots worth a follow, they support #Maga & #Brexit. @pritch12 & @MohamedPorcine pls follow & RT 
Theresa May faces rebellion as 40 Tory MPs say she must go  /via @thetimes #Brexit 
With all the opinion polls and speculation that Congress going to give tough fight to BJP in Gujarat. My impression is BJP will easily win in the end and claim victory is referendum on success of Modi Policies 
Important this.... Secrecy, lying, subterfuge and Robert Mercer.Why does the DUP appear to be above the law?The law says that it is illegal for companies to be used as a front or agent for a foreigner to channel money to a party. 
Leaked by a "senior Government figure, who has seen the letter" that would be Theresa May then. Reads like another Sarah Vine missive if I'm honest; we all know who wears the trousers in the Gove household  
Michael Gove plans new environment watchdog after Brexit  
Well this side of the pond there are quite a few things we think he was lying about too. Including his part in our referendum. So we'd like to #stopbrexit until we know what he did do - & then decide. #LeaveGate 
This is really troubling because I absolutely hate Varadkar but I also refuse to let anyone but the Brits take the blame for Brexit  
The whole key to Brexit is Freedom of Movement for EU workers.Accept it and our Brexit problems disappear.Reject it and we'll leave without a deal. It's that simple.#StopBrexit 
If UK leaves the EU @DanielJHannan and @Nigel_Farage will each receive a "golden goodbye" of £147,000 - money that will be added to UK's Brexit bill and paid by British taxpayers.British MEPs in line for €6m 'golden goodbye' when UK leaves EU - Sky News 
Apparently David Davis indicated over 2 weeks ago to the Dexeu Committee regarding the Brexit impact assessments:“They are in excruciating detail”.Then it seems they might not exist, or do they? It’s all shrouded in mystery, yet its absolutely crucial to OUR future.  
Brexit is an exceptional idea. Brexit:Except the motor industryExcept the fishing industryExcept for agriculture Who is next?#StopBrexit #stopbrexit #revokea50forthwith #revokeA50forthwith 
Just for extra clarity: the Supreme Court's role is to interpret UK law. It cannot overrule parliament. So if parliament decides to reverse Brexit. It can be revoked, as Article 50 doesn't stop a country changing its mind. I think you're the one who needs "learn their law".  
Yes I completely understand. The Supreme Court has no sovereignty over international treaties and conventions, ergo if the sovereign UK parliament decides to reverse Brexit, with primary legislation if necessary, then an appeal court won't stop it. 
Brexit BOOST: £65BILLION to be pumped into UK economy through tax cuts and public spending  
Karma: even if that was true (and it is not until ECJ decides), both the UK and EU Parliaments are sovereigns.Means they BOTH can do or amend ANY law as they wish.Means Article 50 and Brexit can be reversed.Exactly the same way May triggered it.By the Parliament.HTH 
.@francesbarber13Here is the thing.I was not attacking you. I NEVER attack anyone in the Labour Party on Twitter. I do have polite, proper discussions all the time on Twitter - it IS possible.Your attitude is mystifying. We were agreeing on Brexit which we were discussing...  
Brexit is going so well that Iain Dale spends his Saturday nights clutching at straws about the irreversibility of Article 50...  
Theresa May faces defeat by MPs demanding vote on final Brexit deal  
.Green Brexit? - from this charlatan who's demanding his OWN personal Brexit conditions?Not buying it #StopBrexit 
.There's a nasty smell coming from the back of the Tory Party - if they force Britain to Brexit - the smell will NEVER go away#StopBrexit 
Brexit in a nutshell  
one time for mr brexit hahahah thanks yal im back in the hood n me again  
Brexit has polarised the British like nothing else I've ever known. It's a battle of the intelligent, caring, cultured and integrated against the stupid, selfish, greedy, racist, cruel and ignorant. It's lovers against haters. It has the quality of a Shakespearean tragedy. 
."Tories still deeply divided over Brexit & single market & when May finally goes, this may break out into open civil war". 
The next few weeks are critical for our country. It's time MPs stood up to the Brexit crazy gang and blasted them back to the political margins.#StopBrexit 
Letters: Trading on WTO terms after Brexit would not be the disaster many fear  
New line coming out of planet Tory is Theresa May didn't want to be prime minister but has been "doing her duty"Sod off, she used Brexit & smears about Corbyn to try to steal a landslide but the UK doesn't like her. Good riddance but let's not have a hard right extremist next  
The Observer hits the nail on the head: “A crisis point is looming and, if only to avoid total meltdown, it is time for a time-out on Brexit. It is time to stop the clock. Common sense demands it; the empirical evidence dictates it. “  
The brexitocracy *cannot* prevent Parliament from voting out brexit. Parliament can pass any law and revoke any law, whenever it likes. Parliament can #StopBrexit tomorrow. 
No. It isn’t at all. I lived in Derry the past year. Situation is absolutely dire. Brexit is a monstrous betrayal. What do you propose to replace the farming subsidies with? The investment in tech and science sectors? The peace funds which are crucial to continuing shared future 
Roadblock to sensible Brexit deal isn't Brussels but UK Cabinet. Can't negotiate with EU27 while they're negotiating with each other.  
Help Stop The Great  Brexit Betrayal of our Fishing Communities -  
Heart sinks at prospect of more #brexit “advice” from Gove and Johnson ...  
INDEPENDENT ON SUNDAY: Lords ready for fight on Brexit bill, says Cable #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Cornwall (#brexit supporting county) says crops ‘rotting in fields’ due to Brexit labour shortage  
What's up?-681,000 Americans taxed without representation -30,000 veterans denied a voice & vote in Congress-more people than 2 states-pay more fed taxes than 20 states -84% voters approved referendum on #DCStatehood in 2016 
The Observer view of Britain’s shambolic Brexit negotiations | Observer editorial  
Boris and Gove send May secret letter with instructions for a hard Brexit  
Theresa May faces defeat by MPs demanding vote on final Brexit deal 
Labour to force through Brexit workers' rights vote to ensure they are protected  
No self-respecting nation goes into time-limited negotiations with completely delusional ideas about its negotiating position and what it might be able to achieve. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Lest we forget, you applied for a German passport immediately after the Brexit vote.  
Northern Ireland is always viewed as separate from GB by people in England. It’s a periphery afterthought on most people’s minds. Stop trying to rally sectarian currents to your cause. Brexit is a disaster for N. Ireland and possibly the single biggest push factor to end UK rule 
Johnson & Gove’s ultimatum to weak May to force an extreme damaging #Brexit on the rest of us   
How a meeting with Guy Verhofstadt made MP realise UK must leave WITHOUT Brexit deal  
Michael Gove: "Nothing can be more vital than the future of our environment & natural world. We are their custodians & we must safeguard their future if our ambition for a Green Brexit is to become a reality. We have the chance to set the gold standard for environmental science" 
Putin MO is to disrupt Democracy & sew chaos. Evidence reveals Russian hacking was behind Catalan succession & Brexit vote in England. Putin is interrupting the Democratic process..“This is a serious issue, where democracy must confront the challenges of new technologies.”  
#Marr Every time Marr, Question Time, Daily Politics Sunday Politics. Bloody guardian bore on. All Brexit bashing  doom & gloom. Go away  
This from AOL. Poll finds strong support for Brexit reversal. It is a matter of time. The people will not accept brexit. We are #PeoplesPatriots fighting for our country.  
Hands up who thinks a referendum to change section 44 would be the tidiest solution to this debacle? 
Okay, give me a 'positive Brexit news' piece and I'll retweet it. News mind, not opinion.  
Boris Johnson and Michael Gove reportedly penned a secret letter to PM @theresa_may giving her Brexit instructions  
.Democracy, Gove & Johnson-styleThreatening letters to Theresa May dictating their OWN personal Brexit termsAND she agrees to it & plans to set Brexit date into law FOR THEM . 
Britain could gain a £65 billion windfall from Brexit, Economists for Free Trade report says - The Telegraph  
Theresa May faces defeat by MPs demanding vote on final Brexit deal  
Sunday Telegraph splash -  "Gove: My plan for a green Brexit revolution"  
BREAKING: Labour to force through Brexit workers' rights vote to ensure they are protected - with statement from @Keir_Starmer 
The craziness of the lies knows no limit ... And I guess this is exactly why Grimsby seafood industry reps recently pleaded for a Brexit exemption, right?!  
The Observer view of Britain’s shambolic Brexit negotiations | Observer editorial  
Dear Britain, Brexit is your own fucking fault. Stop trying to blame Ireland and the EU for your own shit-the-bed incompetence. 
SUNDAY TELEGRAPH: Gove: My plan for a green Brexit revolution #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Brexit border row: DUP slaps down Brussels over 'bully-boy tactics' to weaken integrity of the UK 
The truth about Foreign Investment in the UK since the Brexit ref.  
Remainers - no matter how little or how much you do to stop brexit. You are all the #PeoplesPatriots  . Respect. 
Ireland vows to be "stubborn" and stand firm on its border in Brexit talks  
WATCH – Bannon on Brexit: ‘You Can’t Just Vote for Your Country Back, You Have to Take It Back’  
What’s going on here? If Brexit is so brilliant why is leading brexiteer John Redwood telling people to move money from the UK to the EU?  
#Brexit is turning out in every aspect to be as deplorable as the worst Remainers' nightmares, stripping the UK of everything it used to value and sinking it into a foul swamp of banality, overweening nostalgia and uselessness.  #ExitBrexit  
Here is the first evidence #Russia used #Twitter to influence #Brexit. #DefendingDemocracy 
Put together by @RCorbettMEP an excellent collection of vital studies about effects of #Brexit on UK and Eu, including by sector - vital reading for anyone who wants to understand more about the impact on our future  
"Hello, I called Brexit, Trump and the 2017 General Election wrong and i'm here to tell you that after losing seats for 20 years, Labour under Liz Kendall or Tristram Hunt would win a majority of 150"  
UK investment by the non-profit making European Investment Bank was worth two-thirds of our net EU membership fee per year. They have now stopped investing in the UK because of Brexit. 
There is nothing democratic about a referendum gerrymandered so millions are persuaded to vote Leave expecting the Norway model, only to be told immediately after the ref it was never available.  
Dear Labour,You still support Brexit.Please name one tangible, practical improvement it will bring to our daily life.  
Theresa May faces defeat by MPs demanding vote on final Brexit deal  
If they do not have the courage to speak out and save us from Brexit then they do not have the integrity necessary to serve the nation.  
Investigation shows the "Brexit caused staffing crisis in NHS heavily-reliant on EU workers" scare-story to be complete hokum.>Quelle énorme surprise.... 
WALK AWAY: Tory poll shows nearly half want Theresa May to declare NO DEAL on Brexit  
Many MPs are convinced Brexit will do enormous harm to this country. They are right.  I hope they speak out for what they really believe  
EU is DESPERATE: May told not to ‘blink’ on Brexit bill as money ‘CRITICAL’ to good deal  
To those leavers who have hijacked the poppy and Union flag. My son was part of the guard of honour today at the Menin gate. He serves. He's a remainer, a European. He's a #peoplespatriot fighting brexit, as am I. 
Theresa May faces defeat by MPs demanding vote on final Brexit deal  
Why should Leo Varadkar care if he derails Brexit. He just wants a border-free Ireland - which UK signed up to under Good Friday peace deal. 
Good story but the real question is whether Labour will support or oppose Government attempt to ensure Brexit takes place March 2019 even if there's no deal, regardless of whatever damage DExEU assessments reveal it will do  
'Ireland will not be ignored' on post-Brexit border question. Britain will not be allowed to dictate the future of the Irish border post-Brexit, Ireland’s foreign minister has warned in a hardening of rhetoric over the UK’s decision to leave the EU.  
When @Open_Britain first started they were in favour of Soft Brexit.I criticised them strongly for that.Now they appear to be in favour of full out Remain.That's good. I welcome it. #StopBrexit #Remain 
Derail? C’mere Bloomberg, #brexitshambles is the Tories fault. 6+ months after the triggering of article 50, Britain’s attitude towards the NI border can be politely described as “contradictory”. If may won’t offer a coherent workable plan, Ireland must be ready. 
Brexit boss Michel Barnier vows to call the UK’s ‘bluff’ because he doesn’t believe Britain will walk away with ‘no deal’.      
.“I hope MPs will choose this moment to take a stand.You can’t claim to be “anti-austerity” & also allow Brexit to happen, because it means we’ll have less money to spend.THIS is the time to make the argument for staying in. It’s now or never.". 
House of Lords are ready to unite and defeat Government over Brexit, Vince Cable warns  
Sir Vince Cable:  House of Lords is ready to defeat parts of Theresa May's Brexit Bill - The Independent  
Ireland's PM may have to consider whether he risks derailing the whole Brexit process  
British ppl now waking up to the truth abt #Brexit. Being in the EU gives Britain huge advantages that we lose if we leave. Why throw our future away?  
Irish border is an unexpected problem in the Brexit talks.Unexpected here used in the sense that it was unexpected that a house guest would be murdered whilst Poirot stayed over for a weekend shooting party. 
I have absolutely no time for Ruth Davidson or other politicians like her. As the overnight reversal of her position on Brexit showed she has no principles, little understanding of global economic & industrial affairs & zero respect for her constituent's views.  
Support for Brexit is slumping. A growing majority think we are wrong to leave the EU. We are not “all Brexiteers now”. #ExitFromBrexit. #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Both parties are gearing up for the first nationwide referendum on President Trump: the 2018 midterms.  
But we haven't changed our minds and we won't. Additionally, the worse the negotiations become the stronger and more united the #brexit resolve will become.  
Nobody in the UK has ever voted for multiculturalism;or the Barcelona agreement We deserve the right to choose our own future, for the British people by the British people. We must not let self serving career politicians sell us out to foreign powers. Its time for action. #Brexit 
So #Trump pulls US out Asian agreement..and remaining nations make a new one amongst themselves. The 21st Century is about intra-connectivity.Not walls, Nor borders.me-@TheNewEuropean#Brexit 
Any chance of a bit of info about your plans for Brexit? No? Just walking pigs eh? Cheers for that, you fucking knobs.  
#BBC Anti Brexit non stop morning noon & night pathetic.!! FFS running down Brexit and Donald Trump all the bloody time. BBC HORRENDOUS.   
#StopBrexit #exitfrombrexit @theresa_may. How dare you tell people not to oppose Brexit. That THEY are going against the "Will of the people" 48 million people DID NOT VOTE LEAVE. Only 1 in 4 did. You have NO MANDATE. @eucopresident  A Gerrymandered vote. 
I think there is a 25/30% chance Brexit can be stoppedAll who want that should urgently seek to persuade friends & as many others as possible Unrealistic IMO to expect Corbyn to lead public opinion on this issue - but I think he'd follow it.  
Catalan separatists took to the streets of Barcelona again today in protest at the arrest of politicians who carried out the banned referendum on independence  
Kate Hoey, a master in the art of problem-solving We won’t have a hard border in Ireland after Brexit if we refuse to build it  
Labour to force through Brexit workers' rights vote to ensure they are protected 
Cornwall says crops ‘rotting in fields’ due to Brexit labour shortage  
There is no way @theresa_may (who has no mandate for hard Brexit) should be allowed to set a #BrexitDate while the influence of Putin (who wants to break up the EU) is being investigated.  Here's a pretty picture to brighten up my  tweet 
Brexski was a major effort by Comrade Nigel and Mother Russia. #Brexit #Brexski #NigelLovesPutin 
Brexit will embolden Switzerland, Norway, Iceland and Liechtenstein. It will inspire Poland, Hungary, the Czech Republic and Denmark. 
The man who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can still be stopped  
I've never known war.My strong young sons have never known conscription.We haven't thought enough about the implications of Brexit.  
True British patriots voted for Brexski #Brexit #Brexski #UsefulIdiots #NigelLovesPutin 
There is no Conservative party any more, there is only a rabid, frothing, lying, greedy, incompetent, authoritarian nationalist UKIP clone. On June 23 2016 the Conservative party died. Would someone be so kind as to write its obituary.#StopBrexit #Brexit. @Anna_Soubry 
Let's be very clear! Brexit is no longer the 'Will of the People'. A 5 poll rolling average for 2017, show people now believe it was the wrong decision and that has grown over the last few months. We now represent the majority...#stopbrexit #exitfrombrexit #bremain 
Swiss EU Membership Referendum held in 2001. They said NO. Switzerland's GDP Growth:  +1.4% 2001+0.1% 2002+0.0% 2003+2.8% 2004+3.0% 2005+4.0% 2006+4.1% 2007Adverse immediate impact. However, NO recession. And, quickly, the Swiss economy returned to positive growth. 
This is a slow-burn, but will increasingly be fast-burn, disaster for UK jobs. Once these decisions get made they won't be reversed, and they'll be made in big numbers over next few months. So govt have very little time to get real about Brexit.  
Brexit will cost £4bn for Leave-voting Lincolnshire. Let’s #StopBrexit and fund areas that need investment.  
WALK AWAY: Tory poll shows nearly half want Theresa May to declare NO DEAL on Brexit  
.@francesbarber13 is wrong.If public opinion moves so there is a clear majority for stopping Brexit, Corbyn & Starmer will push for a 2nd ref, I believe. (But they have good reasons for not moving first)If you want to stop Brexit stop attacking Corbyn and GO AND PERSUADE PEOPLE  
People who voted for Brexit need to keep asking themselves who is benefiting from it? Just for starters, Russia will soon be able to charge us - as an isolated customer, not part of a strong union - a lot more for its gas. 
And every one of them a #brexit backer.....  
Bit of a stir now as FG member Barry Walsh asks where the push  for a referendum is coming from. 'Women,' shout members of the audience. 'Open your ears' shouts another. #FGNC17 
Bank of England policy maker says banks may leave before a Brexit deal is agreed upon  
'Ireland will not be ignored' on post-Brexit border question  
Russia’s Brexit Subversion A new wave of revelations strongly suggests that Russia interfered in last year’s Brexit referendum. Why is the UK government staying silent? 
It's only your country. You don't get to know who spent £435k buying Brexit. But the fine suggests even the Electoral Commission don't know.  
A prediction. When Russia’s role in EU Referendum is fully understood,it’ll be the end of May & Brexit. Keep signing  
.@francesbarber13 if Brexit is to stopped as I earnestly wish, it NEEDS a shift in public opinion so that there is a clear majority to stop Brexit & *then* there will be 2nd referendum. Let's *all* work for that and lets desist from personal attacks on Corbyn (or Blair) - PLEASE!  
I don't know what the truth is about Russian interference in Trump/Brexit. But what I don't understand is, what their motive might be. 
Lies, Lies, Lies! The people did not decide to #Brexit. 37% of a rigged electorate voted for a catch-all 4 word slogan. And Brexiters want to deny the people a chance to vote on the final deal!Hypocrites and liars!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FinalSay 
How a meeting with Guy Verhofstadt made MP realise UK must leave WITHOUT Brexit deal  
What better way to honour those who fought against mindless right-wing nationalism in Europe than to use their deaths as currency in Brexit negotiations?1 Fallen = €1.13  
We'll soon witness queues of determined Leave voters rolling up their sleeves to replace that migrant labour and make Brexit Britain work.  
Anna Soubry Tells May: ‘I’ll Quit Tories Over Hard Brexit’  
We might Brexit but we will rejoin because the Remainers are right about the damage and we will see off the Brexiters.  
... and I suspect many of us - who are the silent majority of #brexit voters across the pond in the UK - flippin' well admire your President too!  
More evidence of Russia dark money influencing brexit vote@No10Vigil @spaceangel1964 @BremainInSpain @RemainingKind @nickreeves9876 @superEUgirl @BrexitBin @Mcr4EU @EUflagmafia @RemainerAction @AcademyOfRock 
.I really don't think they do......“If there is an alternative proposal from the UK side, we would like to see it.It is 18-months since the referendum.They must, at this stage, have a counter proposal.”. 
Ruth Dudley Edwards simply can’t imagine a world in which a small state-Ireland-effectively uses its voice in #EU. Irl diplomacy has been much more effective than shambolic #Brexit Britain’s negotiating strategy  
Jeepers....a number as yet unsuspended Brexit/Russia accounts are in sleep mode....still live...others suspended not in Senate list... 
Of course. Brexit was a perfect testing ground.   
Because he’s TRYING TO GET FIRED so he can sit out Brexit on the backbenches before returning as The Saviour Of The Nation, and if some woman has to die in an Iranian jail to make this happen… well, you can’t make an omelette without breaking some plebs.  
This manoeuvre is an appeal to May's last remaining support base: the Brexit supporting press.  
John Redwood, the right wing Tory MP and long time #brexiter promised #brexit would be positive for the UK. Now, as the UK loses hundreds of billions in investment and purchasing power, he's advising people to invest in Europe! #nevervotetory #stopbrexit #toriesout 
Education level of Trump voters, Brexit voters, and pro-Spain unionists in #Catalonia. Now stop calling "populism" to the Catalan pro-independence movement. 
All parts of the UK now crying over the consequences of BrexitFrom Cornish farmers to Grimbsy fishermenAll now begging UK gov to help them with "special deals" whilst Scots look to Indy to set their own rules 
We value the contribution EU nationals make to our society. It's time to stop the uncertainty and stop Brexit altogether in the national interest. #StopBrexit #EUAreValued @Labour4EU 
WATCH – Bannon on Brexit: ‘You Can’t Just Vote for Your Country Back, You Have to Take It Back’  @3lectric5heep 
Instead of thinking of giving away more of our money to secure talks with the EU the Treasury should be preparing to spend the money we save on our own priorities as soon as possible. That is what we voted for in the referendum. There is no need to pay to talk! 
Quite enjoying everyone finally realising that the Irish border issue is pretty significant in the context of Brexit. 
#EU #Army plan (denied by anti-#Brexit #ProjectFear) is set to become a reality: @_HenryBolton @UKIP just said: As leader of #UKIP let me be clear. The #Tory Government is about to give away our military #Independence. Traitorous! (#Tories #Conservative) 
8/ #FinancialServicesLiberals - chase bond yields and equity returns. Trump is totalitarian, Brexit is booboo, Modi maniacal. Civilization can die but cessnas should not stop flying. 
Christopher Chope MP discovers reality of Brexit, calls it 'punishment' & then demands to shoot his own face off  
Fixing a date for Brexit is ridiculous given how little progress you have made @theresa_may. Rather than a transitional period it's better to get longer for negotiations. A fixed date would lead to a desperate deal 
Ireland vows to be "stubborn" and stand firm on its border in Brexit talks  
"A new wave of revelations strongly suggests that Russia interfered in last year’s Brexit referendum."  
Grimsby: Regrexitly, we appear to have shot ourselves in the fisheries foot.Cornwall: Hold my Arthurian goblet.Cornwall appeals to government as crops ‘rot in fields’ due to shortage in migrant labour after Brexit. 
Can you explain this @theresa_may. Not a good idea considering investigation into Russian influence in Brexit vote  
Tory Jacob Rees-Mogg pocketed a $680,000 payment while working for an offshore investment firm. Tory Tax Haven #Brexit#StopBrexit 
Mogg is a Disaster Capitalist. Your poverty and hardship will make him rich. That's why he and his cronies want Brexit at any cost. Please, Leave voters, wake up, smell the treason and let your MP (& everyone else) know you've changed to Remain. 
SUPER EXCITED FOR THIS! Tough panel, it looks like i'm the only #Remainer on #BBC Radio 4 Any Questions next week...But never fear! It only takes one #EUsupergirl to save the #UK from #Brexit! 
The #tories want to turn the UK into a tax haven. Their ridiculous, pointless, divisive #brexit has already cost us hundreds of billions in investment and in purchasing power. There are massive issues with brexit. #stopbrexit #toriesout #nevervotingtory 
.@kayleighmcenany Thoughts on Demos Wins in Virginia:  For Democrats to say this is a referendum on @POTUS, that's false Democrat’s  playbook appears to be move closer to the President Change their stance on some issues is a ploy to get votes #MAGA 
In fact I'd estimate that without Brexit, we would have 4000 more EU nurses than we currently do. That's 4000 nurses that we desperately need. /11  
When a #Brexit troll challenges me on the correct translation of a Greek saying - yes, really - there's only one thing to do: Explain why he is wrong, at length, in Greek. Don't come to a gun fight armed with a plastic spork.  
Brilliant morning in Weardale farming community, with a guided tour of Landieu Farm, followed by a discussion about challenges facing farmers: of paperwork, the future of payments & consequences of Brexit. Thank you to John & Ann, our hosts, for giving their time so generously. pic.twitter.com/lcfHJOryyv 
Sick of this #willofthepeople & one-way democracy nonsense on #Brexit. If all the paddlers in a canoe voted to turn left at a fork in a river, then round the corner, spot a massive waterfall - they are surely allowed to change their minds and row back?  #bbcaq 
Brexit border row: DUP slaps down Brussels over 'bully-boy tactics' to weaken integrity of the UK #premium 
#Brexit folk hope we'll just accept it, gradually forget their lies and then just move on. We must never let that happen. They must never get away with it.#NeverForget #StopBrexit 
.@kayleighmcenany: "For Democrats to say this is a referendum on @POTUS, that's false." 
Brilliant article on vital importance of addressing absolutely legitimate grievances behind #Brexit- campaign for referendum on final deal must be based on this   
Given that Cameron called the Referendum to save Tory Party & May has taken it upon herself to go for a catastrophic Brexit, again putting Party before country, let's hit them where it hurts. RT the hell out if this if you're #NeverVotingTory #StopBrexit @Film2240 @mrjamesob @GMB 
The Government has completely, utterly, hopelessly lost the plot. Everyone in Irish politics is united against an unworkable Brexit deal, not just SF. Easiest way out of this is to accelerate plans for Irish unity. 
#Brexit is the only election result in history where the winners demand that the losers provide the solutions to the problems caused by the winners. #stopbrexit 
.AND Brexit is a DISASTER for Scottish unionism too¯\_(ツ)_/¯#StopBrexit 
RAF father buried in Holland, Polish freedom fighter stepfather, mother Irish descent - don't talk to me of Brexit.  
Politicians in the UK have to look at the very clear links between Russia, Trump and Brexit, and pick a side  
Brexit vote already delivering as wages increase  
Dynamics of Brexit are about politics. Process itself is about law. Davis doesn't grasp either. Me in @prospect_uk:  
Morally we have a right to change our mind, and legally we have a right to change our mind. We can and will change our minds. Thank you, Chuka, for refusing to be intimidated by the brexit bullies. 
In the U.K., the Russians also recruited a useful idiot. His name is Boris Johnson and now Britain is FUBAR. #Brexit  
Sickening to see the English media revving up to place the blame for their stupid, disastrous Brexit on the Irish. 
Brexiters have every right to campaign for #Brexit. They have no right to try to rob others of their right to oppose it. #StopBrexit #FinalSay 
A clean, swift Brexit on WTO terms is the best way to avoid a bad Brussels deal.  
Watching Irish Twitter totally running out of patience with British Twitter today over Brexit. 
As Ireland teams up with The EU  to make our Brexit life difficult, have they considered how difficult their lives may become  if they force the UK to leave with no deal in place? Ireland should be seeking an urgent border solution, not blocking one. 
What WE'LL never forget is the people, OUR people, who made sacrifices to fight the fascist scourge, a movement you and your cohorts NOW so willingly embrace by speaking at AfD rallies.Hide your treacherous face in shame Herr Farage. 
‘London is open’! Mayor Sadiq Khan vows to DEFY Brexit and offer City visas to migrants. Is this legal?   #fo2eu 
The DUP's Brexit donors were fined £6,000. We worked out what law they broke: failure to disclose funders:  
The #Brexit #Trade Bill is a second massive power grab by the government, using #brexitshambles as an excuse @InFactsOrg 
Sixth fattest country in the world, very embarrassing. This what happens when you end national service and women go out to work instead of cooking proper meals for their kids. Very Hard Brexit needed!  
The only Brexit deal being offered by Brussels would be far worse for the UK than leaving without a deal  
."Brexit is a DISASTER for Ulster unionism." 
The craziness of @jeremycorbyn's support for #Brexit.#StopBrexitHour #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #leave #4EU #FBPE #FollowBackProEU #Labour #Corbyn #JeremyCorbyn 
Finally, Brexit department reveals proposed solutions to Irish border question.  
Soubry and her Remoaner cronies must stop trying to derail Brexit. We are leaving in March 2019 - no delays! 
We've a question; what the fuck are we doing having this lying, charlatan philanderer as Foreign Secretary? 
Why would Theresa May discuss brexit with Sturgeon, after her display of malicious clyping against Kezia Dugdale?..  defo not to be trusted.   . 
Catherine Bearder is right: Brexit should be reversed.We must keep making the argument, in essence we were all deceived and/or misled: Leavers and Remainers. Public opinion is shifting, we should have all been properly ‘informed’ not ‘misinformed’.  
The Russian Twitter accounts disrupting the US election also focussed on Brexit. @wireduk has evidence the accounts tried to influence European politics. A story I published yesterday evening 
If there is a no-deal or hard #Brexit our trade negotiations with the USA will go thus:USA - Give our businesses access to the #NHSUK - Yes sir.USA - Buy our chlorinated chickenUK - Yes sir. .... #StopBrexit 
The victory in 1945 was a victory over nationalism, not as many Brexiters see it a victory of British over German nationalism. Churchill understood this, which is why he wanted a US of Europe, and UK EEC membership in the early 1960s.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
The difficulty of getting out of the EU jail shows why it’s worth the effort  #Brexit 
‘We can't be quiet’: Gruffalo co-creator and fellow illustrators respond to Brexit  
Curious how little thought the Unionist Brexiteers gave to any of this pre Referendum. #Brexitchaos  
Cracks are starting to show for Britain's homebuilders as Brexit bites  pic.twitter.com/0ydfAuow2o 
Police investigate claims of illegitimate #UKIP ‘donations’ linked to Brietbart in #brexit referendum 
The only Brexit deal being offered by Brussels would be far worse for the UK than no deal  
British Workers Wanted: reality bites in Brexit Britain  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
WALK AWAY: Tory poll shows nearly half want Theresa May to declare NO DEAL on Brexit  
Johnson must be suspended immediately; A50 rescinded & brexit fully investigated by MI5 & special commission; along with full register declaring MPs & financiers interests. #stopbrexit #leavegate 
Ireland faces a diplomatic dilemma. Needs to use leverage to push for NI Brexit deal, but it can't use its veto.  
Right, onwards. Need to hoover and send some evidence on Brexit/Russia to the Media and Culture Committee chair. 
“As Green we cannot support anything that goes directly against the very basics of democracy. Which the current Brexit process is.” @MollyMEP at #EuropeHouse 
"Show me a visual representation of how the Brexit negotiations are going"  
1. The #UKGovt, the #Tory Party, like #Brexit is functioning on life support in a persistent vegetative state dreaming of unicorns chasing rainbows. It's a busted flush & can't be resuscitated...can we not just pull the plug on the whole tragedy?!#FinalSay in 2018 + #StopBrexit 
The Irish border has thrown an unexpected hurdle into Brexit talks  
Report from trustworthy CNN revealing Russian supper for brexit @nickreeves9876 @superEUgirl @BrexitBin @BremainInSpain @spaceangel1964 @No10Vigil @Mcr4EU @RemainingKind @mikegalsworthy 
Budget Nov 22In 2 weeks (by Nov 24) UK clarification on €s or no December transition/trade talkin 3 wks (by Nov 28) Brexit sector studies 
It wasn't 'Russian Propoganda' that put out these headlines pre 2014 Independence Referendum and continues to pump out thousands more?  
Brexit has caused a sharp drop in the number of migrant workers - crops are rotting in the fields. Cornwall has appealed to Government to implement specific laws to help. Multi-million pound losses in Farming industry #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Life comes at you fast  #Brexit  
Keep an eye out folks, thrilling new instalment in @AdamRamsay and I’s DUP #brexit dark money trawl dropping within the hour... 
SHOCK POLL! WALK AWAY: Tory poll shows nearly half want Theresa May to declare NO DEAL on Brexit 
Once again Brexit demands a huge ransom from the British People with no promise of anything in return. Time to say enough.#FinalSay #RemainerNow #StopBrexit 
The author of Article 50 claims Theresa May is misleading the public. It CAN be withdrawn and Brexit CAN be stopped.  
The Great Brexit Lie...10,000 left NHS because Brexit.  ActuallyDoctors up by 441Consultants up by 333Midwives up by  27Ambulance staff up by 136Science & Tech up by 841Simply Remoaner #ProjectFear 
76 - yes 76 - articles this year by @J_amesp covering Russian intervention in Trump and Brexit (and beyond). For god sake fund this guy "Brexit, Trump, Russia: The Whole Story"  
The Continuity Remain agenda is clear now in clear view: Delegitimise referendum result.  Withdraw Art 50 notification. Demand 2nd ref  
Brexit, Trump, Russia: The Whole Story.Living archive of investigations at @Byline_Media into the #AlternativeWar  
Sorry, this is not from a "leading city analyst", it is from a group of Brexit headbangers, who reside at 55 Tufton Street alongside climate change deniers.Their figures are one-eyed laughable, publishing them as credible is a disgrace.#StopBrexit 
Fixing Brexit date in law is "panic measure... to ensure public opinion doesn't have a chance to exert itself"  
In this week’s Helping The Just About Managing, homelessness rises 13% in a year, just in time for Brexit to make us poorer. 
Almost two-thirds of EU businesses "are planning to pull back from their British suppliers"  
The ‘symbols of racism’ list is growing:- Remembrance poppy - Statues - White people - Border control - Union Flag - St George’s Flag - National Anthem - Bank notes - University libraries - #Brexit Good job Twitter extended the character limit eh.  
I forget. They are just Brexit friends  
WATCH – Bannon on Brexit: ‘You Can’t Just Vote for Your Country Back, You Have to Take It Back’  
Almost as if choices have consequences, eh?  Cornwall appeals to government as crops ‘rot in fields’ due to shortage in migrant labour after Brexit  
Do you support #Brexit? Vote and retweet for a big sample please 
Britain's priority at the moment is to get HSBC the Aramco IPO & its client, BAE, more lucrative arms sales to Saudi Arabia. Oh, and Brexit.  
Cornwall says crops ‘rotting in fields’ due to Brexit labour shortage  
Me: I wonder how Brexit negotiations are going on(Checks, sees MP on Brexit committee advocating "no deal" as the best outcome)... ... ... 
So inaccurate, so misleading, and so daft, but worth reading as a warning of the nonsense #Brexit sadly encourages.  
'Don't be bullied by the EU' Rees-Mogg tells Brussels to forget Brexit divorce bill,JACOB-REES MOGG accused the EU of using ‘bullying tactics’ against Britain in the Brexit negotiations,urging Theresa May to not give into the bloc’s financial “threats”,he should be PM.GO MOGG GO 
"Only 40-odd percent turned up" to the Catalan referendum, lies @SkyNews shamefully. Also falsely claims support for indy has "waned" since. 
First Grimsby now Cornwall: voted for Brexit now want exception for themselves:  
Boris, Russia and the Referendum: Boris with 'London professor' Mifsud who offered to get George Papadopolous dirt/emails on Hillary Clinton weeks before the hacks. Boris said he had never met him. He lied - again! @campbellclaret @JolyonMaugham @acgrayling 
TODAY: We avoid all suggestion of news lest our readers discover Brexit isn’t going as well as we promised it would. Still, hooray for the inherited privilege of the monarchy, hey?  
Brexit Boris has some explaining to do ...  
Car manufacturers warn a Brexit no deal could mean more than 10% being added to the cost of building a car here, and Honda warns it might be forced to close UK facilities. They also warn on movement of labour and border check delays.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
A50challenge will lead us out of this mess, Brexit is illegal, we need war chest to ensure capacity through to ECJ and need all to pledge &RT! 
800 retweets in and the only counterargument is "you can't ignore the [narrow] result of the [advisory] referendum". No one's even claiming it's good advice any more.Of course we should ignore bad advice. No past mistake compels us to knowlingly carry through on harmful policies  
We've got the first evidence that Russia used Twitter to influence Brexit• Small network of accounts followed by 268,643 people • Posted anti-immigration, Islamophonic propaganda • Retweeted one another to falsely amplify their message 
And this was the backgrounder. Boris, Russia, Spies, Tories & £££.Brexit, the ministers, the professor and the spy: how Russia pulls strings in UK  
Over a year since #brexit and I still do not have a clue where @jeremycorbyn or @labour stand on it. They seem to be telling the public that they back it, whilst simultaneously trying to block it. 
I interviewed Katie Hopkins on Irish radio on this exact issue She says United Ireland now inevitable...Price of Brexit quite extraordinary 
‘We can't be quiet’: Gruffalo co-creator and fellow illustrators respond to Brexit  
Wow. Children's illustrators are responding to Brexit... 
Any politician with any guts would say: “Brexit is a huge mistake. I cannot impoverish my children and grandchildren. We must think again.” 
The Govt was told this was a cost of a Hard Brexit. They went ahead anyway. The destruction of the Union is totally on them.  
#r4today Irish senator @nealerichmond said @BorisJohnson asked Ireland to put pressure on Europe over status of Irish border after #Brexit. Boris firmly put in his place and told "No way,  we are Europe."  
A quick chat with Tony Blair about why there won’t be a new centrist political party, why he fears a post-Brexit Corbyn government, and why he doesn’t consider himself a Centrist Dad.  
‘We can't be quiet’: Gruffalo co-creator and fellow illustrators respond to Brexit  
Theresa May says Brexit will be “hard wired” as 29 March 2019 - instead of a day we leave the EU lawfully under Article 50 IF that ever happens.  Find out why by reading the update here: 
Take it from the Swiss: the Brexit referendum wasn’t legitimate  
"Where's the person who can forge a sense of common purpose?" Matthew Parris nails Britain's newest Brexit crisis. Leaderless on both sides.  
Not a surprise after US revelations, but confirmation that #Russia used same techniques to exploit divisions in UK over #Brexit. RT Here's the first evidence Russia used Twitter to influence Brexit  
Follow the money. The downward slope of the pound since the referendum speaks volumes. It’s all you need to know. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
TB: Brexit or no Brexit, the revolution of tech has to be matched in a revolution in policy. Read his full foreword to our new report here:  #r4today #TBItech 
Billions of £tax unpaid, sex assaults from MPs, cabinet minsters going AWOL, Tories in disarray, non-existent Brexit assessments ... But Alex's doing a chatshow.... media meltdown.@farrochie 
Labour Party supported Article 50. In its #GE2017 manifesto it said "Labour accepts the referendum result." Now a Labour MP openly calls for both to be stopped. This is not what Labour Leavers voted for. This is what you get when you vote for liars.  
BREXIT:We’ve made commitments on payments. We've made commitments on citizens’ rights. We've made commitments on the Irish Border. And in return we've got nothing back from the EU. Their arrogant pig-headedness shows how right we were to vote out.  
Some binge watching on a rainy day. There are now 4 of my unscripted TV talks on BBC iplayer: Turning Points-1979 election, SDP, Smith to Blair, the 2008 crash. To come-Brexit Ref and 2017 election. 
Ya don't say... #cornwall #brexit  
Chair of Irish Senate’s Brexit Committee tells #r4today that Boris Johnson suggested Ireland “lean on the EU” over the border issue. Was told to get stuffed. 
EU migration essential & beneficial for Scotland..#Brexit...EU citizens 'worth £4.42bn to Scotland' - BBC News...  
£51,120 of £75,000 raised.WE CAN DO THIS!Please support @A50Challenge.Sit down, have a coffee, get your wallet out.  That’s exactly what the Brexit donors have been doing for YEARS!Let’s show them what the REAL “will of the people” looks like.  
Former Kurdish President @Masoud_Barzani has said that the United States did not promise to “support” a #Kurdish referendum for independence at a later time if it were postponed  
The Brexit negotiations have staggered to a halt. David proved himself inadequate to the task. Time to #StopBrexit 
Brexiters who want Britain to walk away from EU #Brexit negotiations, create a 'no deal' scenario and sign up to WTO trading rules need to be very careful what they wish for:Here's why:-  
Why aren’t those who had jobs stolen out in the fields. They wanted EU immigrants to go home. They got what they voted for..didn’t they?? Hello Cornwall?Head out of arse now then?#Brexit idiots  
Newton-Dim gets it badly wrong in his attempt to blame anyone but those who want Brexit.  
Brexiters say, "the EU needs us as much as we need them". Post-Brexit:EU: free trade, a market of 500 million people, 759 global trading deals in place.UK: 20%-45% tariffs, a market of 65 million people, 0 global trade deals in place.We need the EU more than they need us. 
Re-upping today's other story on Russia and Brexit  via @aminterest 
The former diplomat who drafted article 50 says the UK could opt to reverse Brexit up to the moment we leave. Would you want to cancel Brexit now?  
Let's be clear. I've just listed 1,370,000 jobs, many highly skilled, most vital to our economy and society. And we have to replace them in 12 months. I voted against Brexit, but if you want it to work, solve this. 
£12 for a box of Nos?? Fuck Brexit. 
Even if you dispute the accuracy of the polls, they show the folly of implementing #Brexit on the basis of such a tiny majority on one day in June 2016. A small shift in public opinion is all it takes to invalidate the referendum result.  
The man who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can still be stopped  
Funny how Brexiteers simultaneously want to ‘protect the UK’s borders’ whilst not wanting hard border between Ireland/NI. Reconciling hard Brexit with Good Friday agreement is an impossibility. 
Babbling about Brexit progress, Dave oozes defeat  How does Barnier resist banging Davis' head against a brick wall? 
26% of NHS doctors are migrants. Post-brexit, they're leaving in record numbers. It takes 7 years to train a doctor. Where are the courses to urgently train 23,000 replacement doctors we'll need? If you want Brexit or the NHS, you - the leavers - need to answer this. 
Barnier hits the nail on the head. Will UK "diverge with Europe to better converge towards others - towards less regulation, environmental, sanitary, food, probably also financial, fiscal and social"?Brexit - for the few not the many. #FBPE 
We now know the exact second Britain will exit the European Union, but little else about Brexit is certain  
"NHS is not in chaos 'because of Brexit'" Read the original research and story from #Brexit Facts4EU:  
Cornwall: elderly, farmers, restaurants suffering consequences of Brexit. And Government policy is to make it worse.  
After meeting the EU's Brexit team I now think no deal is the best deal says Christopher Chope MP   
‘#Brexit’s most pressing challenge to the HE sector is people…If we can get the people dimension right for universities, this could help strengthen international links in the long term.’ Sarah Stevens of @RussellGroup  
77% of Cornish votes were for Brexit.   
66% of voters think the government is bungling #Brexit - the rest have not heard of us**and multiple other issues 
In much of the Western World that’s unraveling; Russia has become the bogey. And this is typical @CamAnalytica propaganda...the sort that won #Brexit purely on fearmongering. 
One surefire way to reveal the madness of Brexit: Ask a Leave voter to solve the Irish border problem 
BREXIT Britain's business future will "clearly" be outside the single market and the customs union as Brussels admits it needs the UK to grow stronger.  
Russian trolls pushed pro-Brexit spin on day of referendum  via @CNNMoney 
.@RichardDiNatale using a commonwealth allowance for profit via negative gearing. Increased equity, reduced taxation & often a capital gain. LAFHA was never intended to do this. There was no referendum. How many are breaching the constitution? #auspol 
The latest on our Brexit-Russia investigation in @brianstelter’s @ReliableSources newsletter tonight.  Read the full story here:  
"Fear" in Hollywood; Louis C.K. fesses up; Hannity interviews Moore; Murdoch's call; Russia and Brexit:  
I can’t tell if pro #Brexit views of people like @SirSocks now are UK establishment trying to preserve itself, or if they were mad all along 
No self respecting nation:- holds a referendum without a plan for both outcomes- triggers Art 50, heaping pressure on itself#Brexit  
Here's the first evidence Russia used Twitter to influence BrexitRussia-based Twitter accounts that targeted the US presidential election also used divisive and racist rhetoric in an attempt to disrupt politics in the UK and Europe.   
Someone’s still gutted about the Flag Referendum  
Alabama Senate race a referendum on whether values still apply for Republicans as Pedophile Moore won't step aside  
Which kicked off the refugee crisis that led to the rise of RW groups in Europe, Brexit, isolationism in US...so basically: destabilization of the West. Now who would want to do that?  
Dear @guyverhofstadt  Please enact all anti-tax haven legislation well in advance of March, 2019. This will halt #Brexit in it's tracks. 
2 simple Brexit facts:1. Company decisions on the continent for the financial year 2019 begins in 31 workdays.2. We only have 264 workdays left for a deal or Remain. Otherwise it's no deal. 
If government and MPs got their acts together, a bill to alter sec 44(i) could pass through the Parliament this year and be put to referendum in late February/early March next year. 
Friday night, Podcast night!!New Episode 11: Developing Countries & (Non-) AdjustmentEp 10 No-Deal BrexitEp 9 GATT 70th BirthdayEp 8 NAFTA IIEp 7 BombardierEp 6 UncertaintyEp 5 Solar TariffsEp 4 WTOEp 3 Steel Trade War Ep 2 KORUSEp 1 NAFTA I 
My latest: Is there any legal basis to Jason Kenney’s threat of a referendum to back Alberta’s demands for changes to equalization? More than you’d think.  
Gotta laugh- Brexiteer Tory Ministers running off to The S*n complaining that Sinn Féin is making their deluded vision of Brexit difficult! Too right- the 6 Counties voted remain. Ireland can’t be part-in part-out of Europe. No European frontier in Ireland  
He doesn't care, that's why. I'm so exasperated & fed up to be patronise by horrid people like Farage,Rees-Mogg,Hannan,Patel, Duncan Smith,Davis,Johnson,May,Fox,all the other Brexit talibans. Their immorality, inhumanity and cynicism is destroying Britain and eroding moral values  
The man who essentially wrote Article 50 says the UK can ignore Brexit and stay in the EU  
What absolute garbage this is. UK ministers are clueless if this is what they’re spinning.IRA's political wing Sinn Fein to blame for new Brexit stand off over Northern Ireland border, ministers say  
The only possible reason Britain is likely to join the EU Army is that our government sees the armed forces as nothing more than a Brexit bargaining chip.  
Putin uses lies, not so much to have them believed, but to sow confusion, discord, and distrust and thus undermine democracy The industrial scale lies of the right-wing #Brexit press & politicians are having the same effect.They are an attack our democracy.#StopBrexit. 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
The #Brexit referendum question should have been:Should the United Kingdom remain a member of the European Union or leave the European Union?Remain a member of the European UnionLeave the European Union and I enclose payment of £5000 to fund this 
Barzani on #Kurdistan and #Catalonia referendum: - "The suppressed nations have to depend on themselves."- "Claims about human rights, rights of nations, freedom and democracy, they are all baseless"  
Brexit, weak growth and an ageing population risk sinking the NHS  
If you voted Brexit because of what this man told you about "experts", here he is getting cross at WHO over cigarettes.  
Well said! . I’m thoroughly sick and tired of the British media focussing on the EU’s perspective at the expense of reporting about the British Government. They seem to have forgotten who their audience is and what we voted for. #Brexit  
Meanwhile Corbyn supporters think “Brexit May be terrible, but if we get Jeremy elected, it’ll be worth it.”  
Brexit is reversible even after date is set, says Article 50 author Lord Kerr. Good to see so many MPs sharing this. #StopBrexit. #FBPE.  
.@masoud_barzani to @CNN's @camanpour: Baghdad planned to attack the #Kurdistan Region event before the independence referendum. #TwitterKurds 
Russia and Brexit  
Brexit is a really shit idea. 
Tom, this is nonsense. And it is frightening if British ministers actually believe it. One suggests a flight to Dublin and a few chats #brexit #ireland 
Former Irish Taoiseach Bertie Ahern tells #newsnight a reunification referendum is back on the agenda because of Brexit.  
So who is going to erect the hard border and customs checks if @TheUKGovernment is not @EU_Commission  we have to call their bluff @DavidDavisMP @RepublicofIre must stop using Brexit as a ruse to try and get NI to be cut adrift from UK 
Cannot overstate my opposition to this article. 1. The EU designed following the wars was not the EU we see today. 2. You can support Brexit and advocate refuge for refugees. 3. No one has the right to rule over who can, and can’t, wear a poppy  
The Tory rebels haven't given up their fight for what is right. The minority of Brexit fundamentalists MPs don't have the right to tie the hands of parliament and force Britain off the Brexit cliff edge at 11pm on Match 29th 2019. Support the Tory rebels and help #StopBrexit 
Labour MPs were evidently happy to mislead the public to win votes.Many pretended to accept the democratic will of the people, and now want to castrate democracy and stop #Brexit. Respect democracy.  
“I’ve got it! I know how to stop Brexit! I’ll draw an owl for The Guardian!”  
Britain must not cave in to EU demands for a bigger Brexit divorce bill after Brussels set a two-week deadline for the UK to concede, allies of Boris Johnson have warned  
Christopher Chope MP - After meeting Michel Barnier and Guy Verhofstadt, I’ve concluded that no #Brexit deal will be better than their deal  
From now on I'll think of Brexit as a really, really long transfer window  
Setting precise day and hour for #Brexit weakens negotiation & legislation & is bad politics too - sop to Brexiteers from weak & wobbly  PM 
The man who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can still be stopped  
It's time people realised that there is a difference in nationalism.BREXIT = British nationalistsINDEPENDENCE = Scottish nationistsI AM PROUD TO BE A SCOTTISH NATIONALIST"SAOR ALBA"  #indyref2 
We just shot ourselves in the groin, again. Brexit is the most incompetent negotiation I've seen by anyone anywhere.  
Brendan O'Neill on Brexit from this week's spiked newsletter  
Leave won the EU referendum. We are going to leave the European Union on 29 March 2019. Everyone in the UK (whether they voted Leave or Remain at the referendum) should be helping to ensure that our departure is a huge success so we can all reap the benefits of it. 
 the Govt are in panic over how much the @A50Challenge has raised so quickly. Because they know it will end brexit 
Excl: Ministers blame Sinn Fein and Varadkar's weakness for the serious new Brexit stand off over Northern Ireland’s border; 
Brexit polls are about as relevant as a poll on who should have won the Battle of Hastings. We all know who won. Whether we like the result or not. Stop conducting Brexit polls. 
. @ChukaUmunna:  "If I was in a position to stop Brexit I'd put that before everything."#StopBrexit #FinalSay #Brexit  
'There IS anger' Fury amid fears UK could join EU Army AFTER Brexit  
Every day I wake up praying 4 a final nail in the Govt's & #Brexit's coffin, will be hammered home. I've never known such a shabby bunch of politicians, with such a bankrupt agenda surviving so long...not helped by an Opposition just waiting for the implosion. Soon I hope.  
15 European business groups have a message for Theresa May: get the Brexit talks moving  
Cornwall set to 'lose millions' after #Brexit - from Cornwall Live  
It is a #Brexit scandal that neither press nor politicians have seriously asked why May rushed to see Murdoch in New York so soon after becoming PM!#StopBrexit 
Trump & Brexit of white voters of small towns left behind by globalisation, if not modernity itself:Economic anxietyIdentityImmigrationLossNostalgiaSense of reduced statusAlienation from the country taking shape around them 
As the arragont Tories now inform us of the exact time & date of our Brexit suicide, shame, shame, shame on Labour, for not opposing them on every aspect of this Tory fiasco... 
Good for you, Chuka. One of the few politicians with the guts to speak up for ordinary people. The BBC is happy to throw us to the brexit billionaire wolves. 
"I am determined to give our country the best possible Brexit" - @theresa_may  
Russia used Twitter to affect the Brexit vote; same tactics used on 2016 US election.  
you can't run a country and be this bad at stacking a dish washer! i was worried by Brexit , now i won't sleep  
Britain is in a big mess thanks to #Brexit  
Britain has two weeks to make a better offer on Brexit financial settlement, Michel Barnier says  
I don’t live in the UK, and wish Brexit to be a incredible success, as well as teaching the EU elite a little humility. 
What Brexiters fail to understand is that #Brexit actually reduces national sovereignty rather than increasing it. It will also cause Britain to lose control rather than taking control.Brexit is nothing more than a British empire delusion.… 
The man who essentially wrote Article 50 says the UK can ignore Brexit and stay in the EU  
#BenWhishaw and the cast on the making of #Paddington2."I do remember him [writer-director Paul King] joking in rehearsal: 'How did Brexit happen? Did people not watch Paddington?!'" Ben Whishawsource:  
1921, 1948,1979,2001 - four times Ireland has followed separate course from UK, says Leo Varadkar at FG conference.  Brexit is latest case - says IRL will stay at heart of EU (and gets biggest cheer of the speech from delegates). 
The bullying hand of the #EU is discernible behind Ireland's surprise Brexit ultimatum:it should be rejected & treated with contempt.>Convincing from @RuthDE. 
Delighted to attend event in Newry today focused on Brexit and young people.16 and 17 year olds will live with the disastrous consequences of Brexit yet if they'd been allowed to vote, all polls suggest they would have changed the outcome. #OurBrexitToo 
."American direct investment in financial services that would normally head for Britain will be diverted in part to Dublin because of Brexit.". 
I'm not . I wish other MPs wld be as honest . It's already a disaster & we haven't left yet. So many investigations into foreign interference & dark money , no release of 58 impact reports . Nothing patriotic about Brexit. Time to stop & fully investigate. #stopbrexit #leavegate 
After the training experience of the Scottish independence referendum I can now easily identify any state broadcaster. 
Absolute nonsense "will of the people" is invoked only in an attempt to  stop debate and to try to prevent  a non-binding referendum result being  overturned - BUT IT WILL BE OVERTURNED ! 
Brexit is reversible and people should have the right to change their minds, Article 50 architect says  
There are so many legal, political, ethical issues at play here. No way can this be allowed.  Murdoch led Britain to Brexit, and us to Trump. Enough. 
Delighted to be at home after long, tiring but successful week: 2018 Budget passed; Brexit withdrawal legislation policy approved; BIC Summit in Jersey; and responding to whole pile of high profile, simplistic, sensationalist, politicised nonsense about some stolen data. 
Northern Ireland voted to remain in the EU Referendum by a majority of 56% to 44%. Yet PM rejected NI being part of customs union and single market as suggested by EU, endangering Good Friday Agreement. She has bought DUP support and no one asks the Irish People! 
Brexit is a 5 Act Play.We are at act 5, scene 1.It's dark, some bad forces are ascendant.But there is a happy ending. Be part of it. 
"this mess doesn’t have to happen."That's a Labour MP calling for the result of a national democratic referendum to be cast aside. At least the "we only want a good deal" pretence is now over.  
."We’ll never stop Brexit or Trump until we address the anger fuelling both.If we want to be tough on Brexit, we need to be tough on the causes of Brexit." 
Brexit has been set for 11pm on 29.03.2019.That leaves just 340 workdays until Brexit.Take away 3 weeks holiday in 2018 and 3 months for EU27 ratification in 2019, and that leaves just 264 workdays to get a Brexit deal.Or we could just Remain.  
Paddington 2 is an anti-Brexit film that celebrates London's inclusiveness 
Two of the biggest untruths told during the referendum was that the EU could be reformed from within & the refusal to acknowledge the very existence of plans for an EU Army.  
'Don't be bullied by the EU' Brexiteer @Jacob_Rees_Mogg tells Brussels to forget Brexit divorce bill  @theresa_may 
Our new #Brexit briefing on retained EU law, for day two of the EU (Withdrawal) Bill Committee Stage next week  
Brexit will cost GERMANY billions.Wait, what? I thought England was supposed to be hurt the worst from this? 
If people doubt the Russian aided Islamophobic #Brexit propaganda had any real life effects: just remember what Jo Cox's killer during the EU ref shouted: "Britain First"  
Analysis shows that the massive network of Brexit Twitter troll accounts was the same as the Russian network active during the US election:at: 
MSM Push Anti-Brexit Article 50 Author Lord Kerr, Who Said UK Needs Migrants Because Brits ‘So Bloody Stupid’  
Remember her words about people seeking a legal test of the government's powers "trying to subvert" democracy. Theresa May instinctively sees democracy and law as obstacles to government.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FinalSay 
Democrats win when they focus on the issues. They lose when the dialogue becomes a scorched-earth referendum on who is less terrible. Let the GOP do whataboutism; Dems should stick to what about the voters. 
We’ll never stop Brexit or Trump until we address the anger fuelling both | Jonathan Freedland  
“Wrong to leave” has the lead in the @YouGov Brexit tracker for the third month running - and the margin is growing. Via @MSmithsonPB. #StopBrexit. 
Architects of Brexit Louise Mensch/ Farage/Banks/ Wigmore  knew about the Putinbots & Russian interference  during EU referendum. Louise Mensch admits she  stayed mum so as to not "endanger result" of vote  
We need to be tough on Brexit, tough on the causes of Brexit. And tough on Trump, tough on the causes of Trump. My column  
President Barzani on @CNNWorld : the international claims of human rights, democracy and freedom proved to be baseless. We practiced our democratic right by holding referendum on September 25th  
8. So yes, Russian accounts were active in Brexit as in the US...and they still are now. By the thousands...  
Setting aside this tone of technocratic superiority, a European politician would accept a referendum & then fight to death to win it.  
President Barzani on @CNNWorld told @camanpour :US asked to postpone referendum for 2 yrs & they respect holding it, we asked to write US will support holding referendum in 2 yrs, they refused to offer that.  
Brexit Day: 11pm 29 March 2019  
So, about whether those pesky Russians used social media during Brexit...spoiler: they did...(THREAD) 
."The local Tory MP called the suggestion “a sign of the post-Brexit optimism” rather than calling it out for the tooth numbingly ill-informed delusional unworkable nonsense that it truly is." 
Disaster for the peace process in Northern Ireland. The #Brexit zealots will sacrifice anything. They have to be stopped.  
I wouldn't trust RT for a nanosecond about Ukraine or Chechnya - but I'm not sure I was right to trust the BBC about the Iraq War or Northern Ireland.  UK media was pretty appalling during the 2014 referendum. 
This afternoon @WiredUK published some of the first public evidence that Russia interfered with the UK's Brexit vote on social media  
I wrote Article 50. This government can reverse Brexit if it wants to 
Who do you think will be best person to deal with #Brexit ? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
2016: Celebrity deaths2017: Sexual misconduct2018: Trump legalises slavery2019: Brexit2020: Twitter's still moaning about #280characters 
Better to stop Brexit than be Labour leader says @ChukaUmunna. Hear him talk leadership, integration and Brexit in the latest #politicalthinking with @bbcnickrobinson - download it here   
Gotta love how unionists have pounced on Alex's RT show when we could be talking about #PritiPatel, #ParadisePapers, harassment, or how May still hasn't got a clue about #Brexit 
Brexit means:The rich evade taxThe rest of us pay more#StopBrexitIt’s not a done deal@StopBrexit17 @spaceangel1964 @BrexitBin @BritainStays @MarieAnnUK @AlisonKMurray @nickreeves9876 
'Don't be bullied by the EU' Rees-Mogg tells Brussels to forget Brexit divorce bill  
I commend @SirSocks for pithy and informed #Brexit insights. 
Russian trolls pushed pro Brexit propaganda on day of #euref. V important story from @donie. Questions mount about our referendum  
We're going through Brexit largely because of papers like the Daily Mail. Those papers are also agents of oppression for many groups in the UK. And Spain has abandoned democracy, & the UK media - especially broadcast media - is largely ignoring it. 
Democracy isn’t one person, one vote, one time: If the Brexit you voted for isn’t the one you are getting, you can change your mindpic.twitter.com/ndC4JNlM2t 
Don't understand environmentalists who also back Brexit. Those that do should think about this piece and follow @UKELA_LAW which offers informed counsel on where Brexit will impact on environmental law.  
You can smell it. #Brexiters know #Brexit is going off the rails but are terrified of having to accept the blame for the unholy mess. Clinging on to their delusion. 
EU gives UK two-week deadline on #Brexit divorce bill  
Some very welcome statements from @strathearnrose this week on Scotland continuing to align to EU environmental standards and principles. #Brexit  
More revelations suggest Russia interfered in UK's Brexit vote  
We have a PM who says her government will not "tolerate" democratic opposition to #Brexit in Parliament. She is using the language of tyranny. This venal, incompetent and mendacious government is at war with our democracy.#StopBrexit 
CNN Investigation: The same Russian government-linked network of Twitter accounts that meddled in US elections posted pro-Brexit tweets on the day of the UK referendum  
Kremlin Twitter Trolls pushed pro-Brexit spin on day of referendum (straight out of the Gerasimov and Dugin playbooks).  via @donie 
Our government has rejected the EU's Brexit bill, but still refuses to name a figure of its own. No wonder the EU is running out of patience!  
Why are we doing Brexit though? Can we ask again? Almost everyone will say it's a mistake. We know they will. Theresa May could ask again and be the hero that turned it around. Doesn't she like being a hero??? 
"We are a rainbow of Europeans in my family..." @ChukaUmunna told @BBCNickRobinson why he'd stop #Brexit if he could. It's the #PoliticalThinking podcast. 
Our democracy has now shifted into a dictatorship. a 52/48 advisory referendum with a Government that has no majority - that had to pay @theDUP  £1bn to give it the status of Government is now corrupt & with no official opposition from @UKLabour Totally disgraceful. #StopBrexit 
A big find from @donie: Russian trolls pushed pro-Brexit spin on the day of the referendum.  
"Eastern European Young People in Brexit Britain"Interesting report by @MigrantYouth  on the effect of #Brexit on young Eastern Europeans in the UK 
How about her tolerating the calling of an early general election where you lose your mandate for hard Brexit and delete months of finite negotiating time? Asking for a friend  
"How are you feeling about Brexit, Theresa?""Well, if anything I feel like I have too much freedom within which to negotiate, too many factors that are within my control and too few hostages to fortune, so... Hey! Wait a minute!"*scribbles furiously*  
On the plus side if Corbyn had been PM he wanted to trigger it the next day. Brexit would be June 2018.  
Yet more evidence that should be leading #Tories & @UKLabour to understand that the version of Brexit they’re pursuing is NOT the Will of the People. Need to #StopBrexit now.  @Rowland72James @campbellclaret 
Experts claim the gender pay gap will take 100 years to close, or to put it another way: before Brexit happens. 
Sock Puppets: Multiple accounts controlled by a single organisation. THIS is why Brexiteers are being bombarded by Anti-Brexit accounts on Twitter with tiny numbers of Followers who appear to be so 'fact'-driven. They are fake accounts and should be blocked, not engaged with. 
should Britain ignore 2 week ultimatum from EU over Brexit & walk away from the table. No deal better than a bad deal? join me @lbc from 7 
The problem with the "Will of the People" is not a matter of numbers. It is rather that this democratic-sounding notion can be used to justify the delegitimising & overriding or elimination of democratic & legal checks on government power.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FinalSay 
Have you heard a good (ie. justified and justifiable) reason for #Brexit? Please RT 
#brexit . Quite right. Even Remainers like @sirsocks (Christopher Meyer) are sick to death of the bully boy tactics of the EU. 
Brexit is promising to be far worse even than the Remain campaign warned it would be.  
The tide is turning. Because Brexit will hurt working class people most. It's time for courage @UKLabour  Time to #StopBrexit @Labour4EU 
"We survived two world wars", I heard the other day, "we can survive Brexit". Yes. Yes. YES! The Spirit of the Blitz was an AMAZING thing. Umm. Key distinction, however: we weren't bombing ourselves. 
Margaret Thatcher reiterated Lord Attlee's warning that the referendum is a "device of dictators and demagogues" May's comment on not being willing to "tolerate" attempts to slow or block Brexit shows just how right their warning was.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FinalSay 
How to block Brexit -  @ChukaUmunna explains on new Political Thinking podcast. Download or listen now 
This is what Tory Brexit looks like.  Even John Major Major can see it.They must be laughing at us.  Can’t believe their luck.  
Theresa May writing a Brexit Date into law is about as smart as chaining us all to a bomb to give us confidence that she can defuse it in time.  
The #Brexit Network and its Russian Origins. Artfully explained by @J_amesp 
500 days to save Britain from the most reactionary, illiberal, xenophobic policy we have ever faced. Unite and fight #Brexit! 
Are we going to let @theresa_may get away with this? Or are we going to stand up and fight for our country and the millions of citizens whose lives will be ruined by #Brexit? Join the #Bresistance! #FBPE 
Brexit was about UK Parliament taking back control, we were told. But, at every opportunity, Theresa May TAKES AWAY control from Parliament. 
Brexit is "biggest disaster in peacetime", and announcing a date is going to "choke off the democratic process", says Lord Heseltine  
The EU has given the UK a two-week deadline to agree a Brexit divorce bill. What should our tactics be?  
Dear Mr @MichelBarnier 1. After Brexit we owe you NOTHING, insistence on anything else is EXTORTION & BLACKMAIL. 2. Regarding the Irish Border, THAT is a matter for the sovereign UK & Ireland & NONE OF YOUR DAMNED BUSINESS. 
Fed up with Brexit Britain? Come to work in Denmark | Morten Østergaard  YES! Tempting. 
EU wants Brexit money this month, Davis seeks 'political' fix  
Imagine passing any confidential Brexit information to Sturgeon. It would be fed straight back to Michel Barnier, Jean-Claude Juncker & as from yesterday, Vladimir Putin. 
‘We can't be quiet’: Gruffalo co-creator and EU illustrators respond to Brexit  
Brexit is a crime! Spotted in a library. In the Crime section. #FBPE #EUflagmafia #StopBrexit 
Babbling about Brexit progress, Dave only oozes defeat | John Crace  
'David Davis' messy handling of the Brexit negotiations shows that he doesn’t understand the realities of diplomacy'  
Theresa May and her fellow Brexiters are insulting Parliament & the British people by denying them a meaningful vote on the final deal. They are not carrying out democracy, they are trying to obliterate it. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FinalSay 
Is Brexit a revolving door? According to the author of Article 50, we can change our minds on leaving the EU, @Peston blogs 
I love this headline: "EU gives UK two weeks to spell out Brexit money."  My answer: N.O.T.A.P.E.N.N.Y 
Great stuff from @RCorbettMEP on Brexit being reversible if people change their minds. That's democracy!  
We need to talk about social media..How one Russia troll confirms Russia were active in BrexitVia @Byline_Media 
NI will not be divided from the rest of the UK after Brexit: Dodds | Democratic Unionist Party  
Britain has two weeks to prevent itself from falling off a Brexit cliff | Dan Roberts  
I remember when Stella used to say she accepted the result of the referendum...  
Without the Withdrawal Bill there will be a chaotic Brexit, involving enormous uncertainty for businesses, employers and citizens says @CSBarnard24 
#Brexit bill: Barnier gives UK two weeks to clarify key issues - The British people need clarity as well  
Oh, yes! Go Axel!"Silly old Leavers, don't they get it?There's no such thing as a good Brexit."  #Gruffalo 
'Brexit is reversible,' says man who wrote article 50 – video  
the Riches to Rags clothing company brings you the #BREXIT  COLLECTION designed by Davin no downsides Davis  
Sorry to be an Eeyore but we are really, truly screwed if Corbyn gets into power. Brexit won't be stopped, nor the housing crisis and the economy won't recover, says Stephen Daisley  
Lord Kerr, author of Article 50, sets out how Brexit can be reversed if people change their minds. That's democracy.  
At our event this morning, Gordon Brown insisted Remain campaigners could win a second EU referendum - @benglaze for @MirrorPolitics 
It’s official: Britons are happy with Brexit but Labour wants to change that  
Our most read this week is @RCorbettMEP: 'Why the Tories are terrified of releasing the Brexit impact papers'  
Fresh Brexit Negotiations Delayed As Theresa May Spends Hour Pushing Door Marked 'Pull'  
RT UK Government confirm Northern Ireland will be leaving the Single Market and Customs Union along with rest of the UK, and there will be no internal border within UK. It's up to EU if they impose a hard border between North and South of Ireland. #Brexit 
On Jeremy Corbyn being PM, Gordon Brown says 'don't assume something is going to happen'. Yet, on Brexit he is ASSUMING next summer will bring a 'crisis point', justifying a second referendum. Contradictory. 
May's decision to put the 'exit day' on the face of the Brexit bill has left some Brexiteers and Remainers alike perplexed. Senior Brexiteer tells me he doesn't see why its necessary while a senior remainer tells me it's 'crass'.......  
Things @BremainInSpain will tolerate: loving our neighbours, protecting our rights, keeping an open mind, looking forward.Things @BremainInSpain won't tolerate: losing any rights or freedoms, being misrepresented, accepting it's too late, Brexit in any form.  
Support for #Brexit is now ebbing away...  
I sever my country for 15 years in Northern Ireland, Sierra Leone, Iraq and Afghanistan. I voted for brexit. HAVE I NO RIGHT TO WEAR A POPPY. I would be very interested in meeting this journalist face to face. And discuss this disgusting piece of so called journalism #poppy 
If we want to trade with the EU after Brexit then we will need to conform to their regulations. Inside the EU we have a say creating those regulations but outside we will subservient to them. So much for taking back control. It's time to #StopBrexit 
David Davis' position is that Rep. Ireland will have to Brexit to keep UKGOV propped up by DUP  
Lord Heseltine continues to LASH Brexit and claims it is biggest DISASTER in his lifetime. Do you think its anything to do with the 900,000 pounds he makes every year in EU subsidies. . . . . . .!!! 
#Corbyn's war on rising inequality and stagnant wages is 'absolutely right. His support of Brexit is 'absolutely wrong' #labour 
Jaguar blames #Brexit effect for slumping UK and European sales @thetimes 
Remain campaigners could win a second EU referendum claims Gordon Brown 
Sturgeon 'substantially in dark' over Brexit talks - it's not going well, is it?  
PBC BREAKING BREXIT NEWS: Letter From Theresa May, Prime Minister  
As the facts change voters are entitled to take a different view on Brexit - my speech at the @Open_Britain event with Lord Kerr today 
10. The complexity of Brexit shows us that the EU is far from a simple trade bloc and we are in far deeper than a public vote would ever have allowed if asked. Brexit also demonstrates that our politicians have zero idea what they signed us up to. 
All polls since August show there is no majority for brexit nor for a minority gov w/o mandate to ruin the country - yet you press ahead making the rest of us pay so a few can keep their tax dodges. History will judge you badly. #paradisepapers #stopbrexit 
People who voted Leave are in increasing numbers changing their minds & no longer supporting Brexit. As David Davis said, a democracy ceases to be a democracy if people can’t change their minds.  
Now that the lies are being exposed we are legally entitled to change our mind and stop this chaos. If the Labour Party facilitates Brexit for political expediency, rather than stopping it, it's just as guilty as the Tories.  
Karma..it was Gina Miller's action taking Brexit to the Supreme Court that enabled the court to rule Article 50 is in fact irreversible  
Remember 2 key things:Brexit is unnecessary.It can be stopped. 
Brexit means.... ‘a prime minister actively sabotaging the national interest to prove her worth to a cabal of lunatics.’Too early for gin? @JulieOwenMoylan 
The EU's chief negotiator said he needs time to discuss the U.K.'s Brexit progress with European governments  
Anyone from the BBC, who beat the drums of Blair's Iraq war, Brexit, and serves up pish from Nick Robinson, Jackie Bird, and Laura Kuenssberg, please refrain from giving us shite about RT "propaganda", cheers. #AlexSalmond 
Good Friday Agreement may prevent north from being cut from EU after #Brexit, says SDLP   
A swift, clean Brexit would be the best deal in the face of continued Brussels blustering.  
Good job we have a Parliamentary debate on a second referendum for a #FinalSay on Brexit, December 11th despite DExEU trying to suppress democracy.Will you support it please?#SupportFinalSay#BetterSafeThanSorry#RemainerNow#exitfrombrexit#StopBrexit 
Labour's Frank Field has the right idea saying PM should have an all Party Brexit Cabinet, common sense must drive talks forward like Churchill's War Cabinet. 
May's lunatic idea to set the Brexit date in legislation actively limits our own leverage  
When can we see the Brexit impact studies? 
The Brexit fundamentalist government aren't listening to the businesses that provides jobs and wealth to the country. They are set on a course of national self harm. They must be stopped. We must #StopBrexit 
Pearson slagging off Brexit voters to the Tory Telegraph, it's making me sick. Big shock this has been. You think you know somebody! 
Article 50 architect says Brexit can be reversed  
Despite the £ being worth much less than it was before the #Brexit vote, we still managed to spend £9billion more on imports than we earned on exports in last 3 months! And we increased exports to #EU while reducing exports to rest of world!Well done #Tories - doing a GREAT job! 
This might surprise a few but if #Brexit wasn’t happening the economy would still be crashing and ppl would still be starving. Stop blaming Brexit for the effects of austerity. 
BREXIT MEANS:THE RICH WINTHE REST LOSE#StopBexitIt’s not a done deal@StopBrexit17 @spaceangel1964 @BrexitBin @BritainStays @MarieAnnUK @AlisonKMurray @nickreeves9876 
Labours #Brexit negotiating stance translates to “ The meek shall inherit the earth.....if that’s all right with the rest of you “. 
Tory Brexit team arrive back at Downing Street to brief @theresa_may 
Reminder: When weighted by circulation there was an 82% to 18% bias in favour of Leave in the national press during the referendum campaign. Why respect the referendum result?#StopBrexit #Brexit #FinalSay 
Nigel Pearson being a Remainer is the biggest shock since Brexit. 
And I am, together with millions more, determined to stop it. Because Brexit will destroy this country.  
CCHQ misleading the public again here - UK has always been a sovereign nation that makes its own laws.(Also note that Monday after exit would be April fools day).#Article50#Brexit  
You can fool some of the people all of the time, that is what happens in a General Election.You can fool some of the people all of the time, that was the Brexit referendum. Time for the truth to come out, you cannot fool all of the people all of the time.Time to #StopBrexit 
EU gives UK two-week deadline on Brexit divorce bill  
& this more than incompetence is why May & her autocratic #Brexit cabal must go...because she states categorically we the Ppl aren't allowed to change our minds; that is a patent denial of a fundamental democratic principle.We can & we will. #FinalSay 2018 #StopBrexit #LeaveGate 
Follow back Friday.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
My one takeaway from today's update on the Brexit negotiations: There has been no breakthrough, no significant movement and we are still very much stuck. Worrying. 
Quite. @theresa_may has added the date and time to the #Brexit bill because she's aware that more and more people want to #StopBrexit. She's trying to take the option of changing their mind away from Leave voters. WHY? 
Correct me if I am wrong but in essence, parliament has called the government's bluff. It appears to have lied about the existence of the impact assessments. So basically they have fuck all clue what will happen after Brexit. We're all Brexiters now? The fuck I am. #StopBrexit 
How dare the @Independent tell Brexit supporters not to wear poppies. I will be wearing mine with pride.  
Sorry but the EU made very clear the substantive trade elements of #Brexit wd only be discussed in phase II. For goods (esp) moving across Irish border, that cant be tackled suddenly now as a condition for "sufficient progress" 
The Brexit extremists are hiding their money in offshore accounts to avoid paying tax. It is no wonder they want to leave the EU, they don't want the EU tightening tax laws, they have too much to lose. It is time for honest tax payers to demand we #StopBrexit 
UK Brexit referendum was 505 days ago.Brexit will happen in 505 days time. But deepening uncertainty over terms.  
I wrote Article 50. This government can reverse Brexit if it wants to 
THE GOOD NEWS: From 11pm, 29 March 2019, Britain will no longer have the highest rates of childhood obesity, divorce, cocaine use, gonorrhoea & teenage pregnancy in the #EU. THE BAD NEWS:  That's because we'll no longer be in EU.#ExitDay #Brexit #brexitshambles #Withdrawal 
Beyond the spin, each round of #Brexit negotiations is the embodiment of nationalist post-imperial fantasy crashing into implacable economic reality.And -despite horrific consequences for me personally- I recognise it's an adjustment to the British psyche that was well overdue. 
If at the end of the process, Brexit turns out to be far worse than as it was sold, people have a right to change their mind. #Article50 
The author of #Article50 says it can be revoked if the public changes its mind on #Brexit so why not let us have a say on the final deal?  
Man, even the people that actually wanted Brexit must be bored of it by now - and it hasn’t even happened yet. Rolling news coverage is so depressing.It’s like the government have forgotten about doing anything else...well, except for shady arms deals & sexual harassment. 
"We are not required to withdraw just because Mrs May sent her letter. We can change our minds at any stage during the process," says Lord Kerr, the architect of Article 50 #Brexit  
Labour manifesto: “Labour accepts the referendum result.”  Referendum result:Leave: 17,410,742Remain: 16,141,241  
UK TV media unable to interpret the outcome of today's Brexit news conference. Simply dare not explain what a total clusterfuck it all is. #stopbrexit 
On #BREXIT @ForBritainParty is clearWe should LEAVE without further delayNO divorce paymentsNO transition periodNO more open door EU immigrationNO more foreign boats in UK's fishing groundsNO more kowtowing to EU lawYES to free trade with EUYES to good relations with EU 
WATCH: Lord Kerr's speech today - we can change our minds on Brexit at any stage of the process. Please RT:  
Brexit never? Britain can still change its mind, says Article 50 author  
The worst car I ever owned (and it was a blue one, like this) has become a meme for Brexit.  If you sat in the back of mine, the seat collapsed.  
This is where I live. Bristol.The most culturally, economically and technically advanced city in the South West.Economically positive and strongly for remaining in the EU.We sacked one of our MP's who was "51% for Brexit"#thisismyshithole pic.twitter.com/Kl5Ueco6As 
'Brexit is reversible,' says man who wrote article 50 – video  
"Delivering Brexit"  A "no deal" Brexit isn't delivering anything, it is a failure, it is literally the only outcome you can reach by doing nothing, a vaguely sentient plant pot could "deliver" this outcome.  We are being governed by morons 
#MichelBarnier: 'Two weeks to agree #Brexitbill or else' This is not a negotiation but a ransom demand. The #UK government must not bend to the will of #Brussels - legally we don't owe them a penny!  #BBC #SKY #EU #NEWS #TORY @Conservatives #Brexit #NODeal 
I want an Exit from Brexit to save jobs, cut prices and keep Britain safe. The author of Article 50 says it can be done! Let’s act before it’s too late #exitfrombrexit 
Slowing down Brexit by doing something stupid like calling a general election immediately after triggering art. 50? 
Theresa May is about to fulfil her historical mission for which her Party has kept her in no.10: to agree to a huge Brexit bill unconditional on future trade arrangements. She will soak up the Brexiteers' fury. And then her Party will depose her & move on.  
We will not tolerate attempts to slow down Brexit, says Prime Minister whose government still hasn't published a detailed Brexit plan since the UK voted to leave over 500 days ago. 
We have 2 weeks to explain how we are to pay the ‘divorce bill’ - how about we give them 2 weeks to explain how they came up with the figure and why! #Brexit 
We fully agree with @MichelBarnier on divorce financial settlement: we have waited long enough and need concrete results. #Brexit @EPPGroup 
Also, I don't get why Brexiteers are offended by a Kremlin influenced tv channel. My understanding is Russia loves Brexit. 
Although it is rather ironic that Brexit will hit the Brexit heartlands hardest,  Remain want a prosperous future for the whole of Britain. That can only be achieved if we #StopBrexit 
For the 3rd successive month YouGov Brexit tracker has “wrong to leave” in lead  
Author of #Article50 is clear that no legal barrier to revocation if the public changes its mind on #Brexit. Thanks Lord Kerr. 
Lord Kerr, the author or Article 50, tells @mrjamesob a no deal Brexit would be a "disaster" - but it looks a real possibility  
The referendum was fought on hypotheticals, but now we are getting hard facts. We have the right to change our minds at any time. #Article50 
"No middle way"? No worries - no deal is the best deal, allowing us to seize a £135bn Brexit boost to the economy.  
Reus City Government summoned by Spanish court to critizice Police Violence on Referendum day; prosecutor says that criticize it is a “hate crime”  
If you vote for your MP & they let you down, you can change your mind & vote against them next time.Brexit is reversible if the British people change their minds:  
LABOUR: How can we deliver the best Brexit for you?YOUNG PEOPLE: Cancel itINDUSTRIALISTS: Cancel itECONOMISTS: Cancel itNORTHERN IRISH: Cancel itEU NATIONALS: Cancel itMILLIONS MORE: Cancel itDAILY MAIL: hiLABOUR: So, leave EU, end customs union & free movement then? 
The EU just warned Britain has 14 days to agree Brexit bill  
It's really a political intervention. Remain need to get past the view - quite widely held in public - that Brexit is irreversible. 
Brexit date: I think uncertainty in British politics means there is a > 40 per cent chance we do not "leave" at 11pm March 29 2019 in the way currently conceived 
This will come as no surprise to those of us who have been consulting with businesses in our constituencies & across Scotland. It's time for the @ScotTories to start listening to business on #Brexit & #immigration 
BARNIER: UK has 2 weeks to agree Brexit bill. Negotiation or ransom demand?  
Brexit, Stella Artois, making peace with Leicester's owners, enjoying his own space...& that ostrich - an interview with Nigel Pearson, who has rediscovered his love of football in the Belgian second division:  
Theresa May won't 'tolerate' attempts to undermine Brexit  
Barnier confirms UK has 2 weeks to progress on #Brexit divorce issues otherwise won't begin talks on trade and transition in Dec 
May: "Let no-one doubt our resolve: Brexit is happening." Every time she does this it has the exact opposite effect of what she is hoping for. 
Brexit groundhog day. Barnier looking for "real and sincere" sufficient progress.Davis calls for "flexibility and imagination". 
Brexit is reversible - as new facts come to light, people can take a different view. Please RT:  
2) After you overturn Brexit Stella, what’s next? Shall we just ignore GE result if you lose? Local council elections? School governors if you didn’t vote for them? This is communism! Not democracy. Overturn Brexit at UK peril. 
NEWS! Theresa May sets out precise timetable for ballsing up Brexit  
Kathy Gyngell: The good news about Brexit – not brought to you by the BBC | The Conservative Woman  via @TheConWom 
Hands up if we should change our minds about Brexit 
Interview: Nigel Pearson on his new life in Belgium with @ohl_official, #lcfc, the ostrich, Shakey and Brexit  via @telefootball 
THREAD: Dear @Conservatives , Theresa May backed the wrong horse after the EU ref when she chose to pretend that Brexit was a mandate, when it is in fact an act of self-harm. She could have extracted us skilfully w impact assessments & addressing causes of grievances. She didn't. 
Article 50 can be revoked.Brexit can be stopped.#art50challenge 
A part of me just wants to fast forward twenty years and read the history books’ accounts of how and why Brexit turned out how it did. 
David Davis is talking about leaving the Irish border open.If Brexit is supposed to "save" the UK from open borders, does Northern Ireland not count as part of the UK?  
We want to bring back certainty where #Brexit has created "uncertainty" & "concern" - @MichelBarnier  
505 days after the referendum and still zero clarity re how the Irish border issue gets resolved. Clueless 
Theresa May is trying to force through Brexit as the 'will of the people'. The lies & the promises have dissipated & we're left with the stark horror of potential mass poverty while the rich continue to profit. We can #StopBrexit - we need to do it now #Fabians #EndAusterity 
"Further work" needed before EU accepts #Brexit deal for EU citizens in UK, @MichelBarnier warns @DavidDavisMP. But sounds like a lot of work needed as agenda still includes family reunification rights, benefits rights, and EU court oversight. @The3Million @BritishInEurope 
*Round 6 of The Brexit Negotiations*  
As the Hard Brexit mob train their fire on Lord Kerr... it's worth remembering there's decent evidence the Government agrees with him.  
SDLP leader on EU Brexit border paper: ''Never has a statement of the obvious been so welcome.' 
So easy to get in, so very hard to leave!Monday, 1st January 1973"Britain passed peacefully into Europe at midnight last night...""It was difficult to tell that anything of importance had occurred!"No transition period!No cliff edge!No tantrums!#Brexit #EU 
#MichaelHeaver:  "Where #Brexit #Britain goes, many others are going to follow once they see you can trade, have cooperation & control your borders, act in your national interest & not rely on bureaucrats in #Brussels to do everything for you!"   #BBC 
Watch live as the EU’s Barnier and the U.K.’s Davis give an update on Brexit talks   
Press conference by @MichelBarnier the European Commission's Chief Negotiator, and David Davis, UK Secretary of State for Exiting the European Union #Brexit #Article50 
Friday lunchtime newsletter about to go out, in which I lose the will to live over May's latest Brexit-date idiocy. Sign up on homepage  
Went in to John Lewis yesterday. Crammed full of the people who voted for Brexit but wil be least affected by it. #JohnLewisChristmas 
Brexit has ZERO EFFECT on this.EU Defence policy requires unanimity, so the UK army could NEVER be conscripted.They can form an army by themselves, but Brexit doesn't change that!Using "EU Army" to scare us into Brexit IS A LIE!! 
So Theresa May will not tolerate dissent from Brexit. Sounds like a Malignant Narcissist parent who will not tolerate his spouse and children trying to escape from his manipulation. The lunatics have taken over the asylum. 
With her stance on #Brexit Victoria Atkins, shows how seriously the @Conservatives take democracy & delivering government that serves the people, not vice versa. #ToryRisingStar 
We can change our minds if we want to. There is nothing inevitable about Brexit. We can get out of this mess if we change our minds. And Lord Kerr should know, he wrote Article 50.  
Britain can change its mind about Brexit at any time before it's finalised, the man who wrote Article 50 says  
The latest Brexit talks all came down to  UK honoring or not its past financial commitments, and then went nowhere 
We're halfway to Brexit! At 1.19pm today  it's precisely the midway point until the UK leaves the EU #5liveDaily 
.@DrewAltman on the role of health care in Virginia's elections and the referendum on #Medicaid expansion in Maine. His assessment: the elections and the referendum will have a bigger impact on upcoming policy debates than on upcoming elections.  
"The Europeans have to be grateful for so many things Britain has brought to Europe, during war, before war, after war, but now they have to pay.” Juncker, 2017Britain finally paid off WWII debt to US in 2006Before I disliked the EU. Now I detest itHARD BREXIT NOW  
I have great respect and affection for Ireland. But Dublin’s idea that Brexit Britain should remain in the EU’s Customs Union is just plain daft. 
Why do you imagine that forcing through Brexit will not result in a disaffected youth? The dangers from Civil disobedience from the 65+ age group pales into insignificance compared to an angry youth IMO 
It seems Theresa May is reasserting her authority. MPs should not undermine Brexit! 
I'm about to ask Chuka Umunna a very important question.If people do change their mind about Brexit, how exactly do you wish them to express it to you?  
'We can still change our mind on Brexit', the man who authored Article 50 has said - as he accused the government of 'misleading' the public by suggesting the process is irreversible  
Brexit is reversible even after date is set, says author of article 50  
Rollover of EU trade deals to UK after Brexit isn't automatic – countries may want better terms: @beth_oppenheim 
I'll just leave this one here.People are starting to see that #Brexit is neither intellectually nor fiscally: defensible.#Brexit#Brexiteers"#Article50-is not irrevocable"-#LordKerr.  Oh....and he wrote it. 
EU Withdrawal Bill to confiem Brexit Day: as11pm 29 March 2019. Even Labour have signed up - Guido Fawkes  
When something is a really, really BAD idea, do you:a) Carry on regardless?b) Stop it?As no one has convinced me that there is a single benefit of Brexit, I want #StopBrexit RT if you do too! @StopBrexit17 @BrexitBin @Labour4EU @Scientists4EU @IanDunt @terrychristian  
#Brexit will cost Germany €3.8 billion annually in contributions to #EU budget 
Lord Kerr...telling it as it is...all options #Remain available to us until Mar 2019; there is no inevitability...#Brexit can be reversed...give us a democratic #FinalSay & #StopBrexit B4 we lose the BEST DEAL we already have! 
Very constructive meeting with dep prime minister @FitzgeraldFrncs to set up working group on how to help Irish business deal with brexit.  
WATCH | @Michael_Heaver: "Where Brexit Britain goes, many others are going to follow once they see you can trade, have cooperation and control your borders, act in your national interest and not rely on bureaucrats in Brussels to do everything for you!"   
With Brexit being such an act of national self harm & getting ever closer more & more people are talking about stopping Brexit.  
Our Constitution protects #ChildRights, but what more can Irish society do to support children? CEO @Tanya_Ward's op ed today examines what progress we've made #5YearsOn from the Referendum - when too many children still experience "hellish" abuse  
That’s why today’s EAT decision kicking out #Uber appeal so important. Post #Brexit many Tories want to see #Uber business model as standard 
Interesting thread in which Fawkes challenges my argument that Brexitists are necessarily uninterested in the details of Brexit by being repeatedly and insistently uninterested in the details of Brexit.   
From my new poll out today: who has the stronger hand in the Brexit negotiations - UK or EU?  
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg on the opportunities that #Brexit will provide.Only the #Conservatives can deliver on #Brexit for us all.  
UKGov policy is Brexit, with any or no deal, at absolutely any cost, no matter what happens. Parliament must surely reject.  
Lab MPs who stood on a Brexit manifesto in June now openly calling for Article 50 to be revoked. Total contempt for the electorate. 
Just arrived in Jersey in the Channel Islands for British Irish Council. Talks on NI, Brexit and Ireland's creative industries.  
Two hugely important developments today:1. Lord Kerr confirms #Article50 can be revoked if we want it to be.2. TM seeking to enshrine #brexit date in law shows govt is on the back foot, clutching at straws.We can do this. 
The man who helped write the rule book on leaving the EU says Brexit is reversible  
Did you vote for the Referendum Bill that handed this decision to the people and then to trigger Article 50, Stella?  
‘Just because Westminster elite repeatedly tell you that you don’t now have a choice about Brexit, does not mean it is true.’ @ChukaUmunna 
Are you a Brexiteer who hates the tax avoidance scandal?Try staying in the EU as it is introduces regulations to stop tax avoidance from 2019 (which is the main reason our tax avoiding print media so heavily promoted Brexit).The EU. Doing shit Westminster should do since 1974 
So since brexit, we've had 2 films about Churchill, 1 about Dunkirk, a film and a series about the queen - all popular.  what does that say... ? 
Daily Briefing:- Germany's political parties begin formal coalition talks- UK and EU Brexit negotiators brief Brussels media- World stocks down, ending global winning streak 
"Brexit date to be enshrined in law"  
RT this thread! Article 50 can be stopped - and so brexit rethought-  according to man who wrote it. Aka this mess doesn’t have to happen.  
Agreed Seb - no value in putting the date in stone; instead the govt should focus on releasing the elusive sectoral impact studies so people can see what Brexit means for jobs, for business, for travel and for our standing in the world.  
OMG Remoaners taking the airways thick & fast today saying Brexit can be reversed, if they get their way democracy will be lost & Britain will remain under EU control = no confidence in Parliament. 
Having voted for the EU Referendum Bill, then for triggering Article 50, it is disgusting that so many MPs are now trying to block Brexit. 
Speech by Lord Kerr (author of Article 50) is essential reading for anyone concerned with Brexit.  
LK: "The national debate about Brexit needs the facts. The letter can be withdrawn, with no cost and no penalty. A standstill (transition deal) is no panacea. And if we want time to go back and ask the people again, we can have it." 
The national debate about Brexit should take account of all the facts. Once out, there is not easy way back in, and there would be a price to pay. While still in, the option to stop the clock to consult the British people is always open, says Lord Kerr #Article50 #Brexit 
Reminder: Prominent Brexiter John Redwood advised investors to avoid Britain as the country’s economy “hits the brakes”. Before the vote Redwood advised that the “economic gains of leaving the EU will be considerable”. …#StopBrexit #Brexit #LeaveLies 
Incredibly important #Brexit intervention this morning from Lord Kerr, who wrote #Article50. The British people have the right to unilaterally change their mind on Brexit, despite what the Government says. #Article50 can be revoked. 
David Cameron knows #Brexit is a disaster for Britain. But he stays quiet as he makes his millions. Shameful  
Lord Kerr: The national debate about Brexit should take account of the facts that: 
Lord Kerr, who drafted Article 50, says he's frustrated that the Govt have hidden facts from the public: We have options... 1) for more time on Brexit or even 2) to ditch the Brexit process... but people just aren't being told.  
I am really puzzled by UK suggestions that agreements on the future relationship can be done by next year. Canadian agreement took 7 years. Getting widely drawn agreements ratified can be tricky, says Lord Kerr #Brexit #Article50 
End of the EU? Italy breaks ranks and hails 'important step' taken by Brexit Britain  
When we said Brexit was about independence, we meant that we should be able to force a sovereign nation to do something it doesn’t want to do.  
Lord Kerr: the British people have the right to change their minds on Brexit and they need to know this 
Lord Kerr (author of Article 50) speaking at @Open_Britain event. We have the right to revoke Article 50 notification if we want to... ie, we can ditch Brexit at any stage of the process: "the letter can be taken back" he just said.  
May’s #Article50 letter was only notifying of the UK’s intention to withdraw. But intentions can change and people can change their mind, says Lord Kerr. The letter can be taken back. #Brexit 
Brexit will be reversed. Keep making the argument. Public opinion is shifting already.  
Reconciliation is still possible, and we are not required to withdraw just because of May’s letter... Time limit can be extended if all parties agree, says Lord Kerr #Article50 #Brexit 
Packed house for Lord Kerr's crucial intervention on #Brexit. We can change our minds if we want to. That's democracy.  
No doubt Brexit is happening: May issues leave date, time, and stark warning for bill blockers  
The people are already turning against Brexit as recent polls have shown. Only the people are capable of saving Britain. The politicians in power are just self serving weak liars. #StopBrexit 
Hard Bredixteers are attempting to hoodwink the British people by not being clear about the options available in the Brexit process. The Government are also refusing to publish their legal advice or #Brexit risk assessments. #Article50 
Public opinion on #Brexit is shifting, the Tory party will be left holding the baby, says Lord Heseltine  
Big booze up at the Nags Head that night then. Then I can finally hang myself the following morning, safe in the knowledge ex-forces men have taken us out of the EU forever. Granite Brexit needed!  
The Government has accepted the first of my four amendments for a slimline, Lords-proof #Brexit bill  
Fixing a date is "a panic measure" reflecting growing hostility to #Brexit, says Lord Heseltine  
Impossible to seal Brexit deal by 2019: German industry group BDI  
The EU has insisted throughout that there is a Brexit bill to pay though it cannot produce any legal basis for such a bill. It has insisted on only talking about three main chosen issues & declining to talk about the important wider issues of the future relationship. 
#Brexit is "biggest disaster in peacetime", and announcing a date is going to "choke off the democratic process", says Lord Heseltine  
The latest EU economic forecasts are out:- Euro area to grow this year by 2.2%- That's the fastest pace in a decade - Britain heads into extended slowdown- It may see worst performance in 10 years#StopBrexit #Brexit 
“As Scottish Labour Leader I will be tough, uncompromising and principled on any Brexit deal.  The Tories handling of negotiations have been a diplomatic and negotiating disaster."  
We passionately believe that Britain is better off in the EU. We will fight against the Conservatives disastrous hard Brexit - their choice to make the UK a poorer place. We want an Exit from Brexit. Sign the petition today >  
Brexit date would be reversible, says man who wrote article 50  
Heseltine says people are entitled to hear anti Brexit arguments, especially given the scale of alarm within industry about the disastrous economic impacts. #FBPE 
Heseltine this morning describes Brexit as the biggest peacetime disaster in our history. 
so the first day at work after brexit will be april 1st?put me in a box i'm done  
Germany's biggest business group just warned Brexit is impossible  
There is nothing to stop the UK changing its mind over Brexit and I suspect enough UK citizens already have!We need to #exitfrombrexit 
Putin has been promoting a brand of political nihilism based on mass lying. Even if people don't fully believe the lies, it confuses them & they tend to shift from evidence-based to emotive/tribal politics, and that favours the nationalists and authoritarians.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
It is impossible to defend Brexit without lying... I have noticed. 
what if the monster in the john lewis advert.....is brexit 
Remember the ‘ministerial code’ Theresa May was banging on about last week? You know, the one which states ministers need to be open, honest & transparent? Apparently it doesn’t apply to real ministers....#Brexit  
BIG news today:Article 50 author says Theresa May is misleading the public on reversing the result.#brexit CAN be stopped.RT  
Kerr et al are entirely right. Brexit can be stopped. All it will take is the complete collapse of public trust in government and politicians. 
Nice to wake up on a Friday to a contract from Australian State Broadcasting to make a documentary cycling the Irish border before Brexit. 
Great thread on the psychology of Brexit.  
Funny how Ireland has to make all the sacrifices to make Brexit work. 
In #Brexit news, Prime Minister @theresa_may has revealed that our EU exit date is to be enshrined in UK Law. 11pm, 29th March 2019, is party time folks. 
Time for Corbyn to step down. His leadership is interfering destructively with the process by which common sense ought to have brought Brexit to a grinding and permanent halt. 
Article 50 is reversible. So when Parliament comes to vote on the Brexit deal (if we get one) it must not be a vote for 'this deal or no deal'. All options must be on the table.  
Sturgeon 'substantially in dark' over Brexit talks. Excellent, that way she can make the least trouble for everyone. 
#ParadisePapers #stopbrexit Tax dodging & brexit are linked.  
21 Feb 2017: Article 50 is actually reversible, says Lord Kerr, author of the Brexit treaty clause. The government has pretended not to know this & has been misleading the British people #StopBrexit #Brexit #FinalSay 
The Brits have always been among the least likely to identify with a European identity/"demos". That was the foundation of Brexit.  
Brexit Day: 11PM 29 March 2019  
Brexiters must be worried when @MailOnline publicises how children will be damaged by #Brexit Suffer the little children to have their future in hands of heartless Brexiters. Anyone happy with no deal Brexit wants no care for our neediest in society. Scrooge would vote Brexit  
This from #LordKerr-the man who wrote #Article50It can be withdrawn.No wonder #Brexiteers want the withdrawal date made into law.Many  say that those of us who oppose  #Brexit are not #patriots .But it is they who deny The People THIS  knowledgeWhy? 
May will not "tolerate" the vast majority of UK citizens who now have serious doubts about the wisdom of #Brexit. This is a coup, folks, no mistake. #StopTheMadness #FBPE 
This analysis is much closer to the real cost of our EU membership. Almost a billion pounds a week is serious money and obviously the sooner we are out of the EU the better. #Brexit  
Danish MP @nvillumsen in @VilaWeb: "The desirable situation would be for the Spanish government to stop the repression and violence and let the people of #Catalonia decide in a democratic #referendum." #dkpol #eupol 
Sturgeon 'substantially in dark' over Brexit talks.Aw, poor Nicola. Not getting enough attention?   
Brexit is legally reversible, says key architect of Article 50 legislation  
Important reminder - UK can reverse #Article50 if it chooses #Brexit  
There is nothing stopping us withdrawing from the Brexit process. We can #StopBrexit any time we like until we formally leave the EU. Saying it is too late is just another lie from Brexit extremists.  
WATCH: @ChukaUmunna agrees with Lord Kerr that it is right to say that the British people still have a choice on Brexit. Please RT:  
Article 50: Theresa May and the government have been deliberately misleading the public about the most important aspect of Britain's most important post-1945 political decision.#JailTheLeaveLiars!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Writing a binding #Brexit day into law rules out an Art 50 extension. It keeps the impossible time pressure on us. Idiotic. 
Hilarious that Lord Kerr claims British voters are being misled over Brexit. As if we weren't misled for 40 years about the growth of the EU super-state!  
UK ministers must privately dread move to phase 2 of #Brexit negs. Will actually have to agree what they want & make choices. 
Among many favourite moments on the epic day of the referendum flotilla, this was definitely up there  
Lord Kerr drafted Art. 50 and entirely right that BREXIT can be halted at any time. Odds are against but all governments' lives are finite. 
That's really good news then because people are changing their minds over Brexit.Nottingham, Birmingham and Wales no longer want to leave the EU.  
We still have the choice. Article 50 can be reversed.Brexit is not inevitable.  
Fascinating & compelling: Brexit is legally reversible, says key architect of Article 50 legislation  
It's about time this point got more coverage. In the face of a Hard Brexit disaster, it can be stopped.  
Lord Kerr has said Article 50 CAN be stopped. Then we should try as hard to do so as we would if a baby in a pushchair was rolling towards a cliff. Brexit would harm millions of young people 
READ | Brexit has a date, to be written in law, but will it look anything like independence? If the Government gets its disastrous transition deal, it certainly will not  
#BrexitReports #BrexitPapers By contrast with #DavidDavis studies, the #Brexit Impact Studies by the European Parliament (@Europarl_EN ) are publicly available for all to see: 
This is the key part of the EU Brexit Task Force working paper suggesting NI remain in the customs union & single market pic.twitter.com/wHMG9YFUu3 
Hello @Catalan_Gov, as you can see, there are now more than 230 Committees for the Defense of the Referendum/Republic.For us, you are our legitimate government...  
Enshrining Brexit day in law at this premature stage actually weakens Parliament, argues @JolyonMaugham 
The “guy who wrote Article 50” - the framework for Brexit talks - wants you to know this (he’s Lord Kerr)  
The man who wrote Article 50 says  Brexit can still be stopped  
Expert warns that smoking will kill you. Farage would rather die than listen to expert. We have gone peak Brexit.  
If #R4Today is *still* saying ‘over 50% of the population voted for Brexit’ then what hope do we have they can inform accurately on any of this Brexit mess? 
The diplomat who helped write Article 50 has said that Britain can stop Brexit at any point  
#r4today - Please don’t use the lie that over 50% of the population voted for Brexit. Only 37% of a restricted electorate voted for Brexit. And only 27% of our overall population voted for it. It is tyranny of the minority. 
The man who wrote Article 50 says Theresa May is misleading the public on stopping Brexit 
Lord Kerr on #BBCR4today: We have the ability to take back the Article 50 letter. We can change our minds on #Brexit whenever we want. 
It becomes ever more obvious that May’s approach to Brexit has no connection at all to actual negotiations, or reality, but is solely about internal party politics and crude image management for UK audience. 
The Brexiters who put their money offshore including Leadsom and Rees-Mogg. Please share with Leaver friends the real motivation for #Brexit 
Hugely important intervention on #Brexit by the man who invented Article 50 - John Kerr - we *can* change course:   
Theresa Mayhem appoints Penny Morbid the new Minister of Xenophobia of Fear Hate and Prejudice to deliver Brexit  
Article 50 author, Lord Kerr, says Theresa May is misleading public on reversing Brexit referendum result. She is failing to be straight with voters #BrexitShambles #ToryDeceipt #SoveOurCountry #r4today 
If the people want to stop Brexit they get to stop Brexit. That's democracy, folks.  
Many of us warning that fixing 'exit day' in Withdrawal Bill is another basic error. Plmnt must not agree. It's Brexit by any means, at any cost.  
Brexit date and time to be enshrined in law. Theresa May has warned she will not "tolerate" any attempt to block it. It's "11pm GMT on 29 March 2019".  
A govt so torn it can't even discuss what it wants from trade talks. Another basic error by May. Brexit by any means, at any cost.  
Asked @david_cameron his most embarrassing moment at Aditya Birla summit. He didn't say Brexit defeat ! Said he once left his 9 year old daughter behind at a local pub   
What has brought these tensions to the surface? Brexit and terrorism.  
The shit that EU Citizens are being put through during this farce called #Brexit makes me sick to my core. If this is what being British is about in this day & age I am thoroughly ashamed of my country. Looking at Brexiteer sentiments makes it even worse. All ignorant. 
Brexit is legally reversible, says key architect of Article 50 legislation  
Lawyer who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can be reversed; PM is authoritarian and misleading the country #StopBrexit 
Wobbly May setting her alarm for 2300 GMT on 29/03/19 is less  about Brexit than her trying to cling on as PM until then 
The neuroscience of no regrets: why people still support Brexit and Trump   | By @garwboy 
.@NaomiAKlein said this one year ago, today: “Trump speaks directly to that pain. The Brexit campaign spoke to that pain. So do all of the rising far-right parties in Europe... Elite neoliberalism has nothing to offer that pain..”  
When Trump won USA it seemed all the US press went to work to oust him, and he took them head on and won. I think Mrs May needs to see that and get started on the UK press. How do they not see we need to be perceived as strong and united for the benefit of all in the UK #brexit 
“We are not required to withdraw just because Mrs May sent her letter. We can change our minds at any stage during the process.” 
Article 50 architect says Brexit can be reversed  
The #Bougainville Peace Agreement and #Referendum @SatishCha @emmswaim @pngnri  #PNG #autonomy 
I don’t see the confusion and I even don’t see the referendum. It’s just dishonest to consult amongst NRM leaders and pass it off as Kabale district. This, as I understand, was the NRM leadership of Kabale 
@theresa_may  today warns pro-European Tory rebels that she will not "tolerate" any attempts to undermine Brexit as she unveils plans to enshrine in law the date that Britain leaves the EU....Well done PM...courage & leadership...Let's get Brexit done.  
Brexit WILL happen: May warns Remoaner MPs she 'will NOT tolerate' bids to weaken divorce  
I know. It beggars belief. I’ve heard them described as “a safe pair of hands “ with the rider..”unlike Corbyn”. Also: “Maybe Brexit will be bad, but it’ll be worse under Corbyn”. Remainers being badly let down. #StopBrexitNow 
Today the BC Conservatives declared their support for holding an electoral reform referendum. It's only the BC Liberals who oppose giving the electorate their say on using a better voting system. #bcpoli 
Brexit never? Britain can still change its mind, says Article 50 author  
May: the decision to put the date of Brexit "on the front page" of the EU Withdrawal Bill showed the government was determined to see the process through.Me:Trust me millions more are determined 2 see you don't!#FinalSay in 2018 + #StopBrexit/#Remain 
Gordon Brown predicts Brexit 'crisis point'He predicted it would become clear ...that the UK was not going to get "proper control" of its borders, trade & laws, saying: "We will still be governed in many ways by the ECJ."THIS IS REALITY!!  
With a new referendum, Chicago activists push rent control  
What's the point Bernie. When you sold out to Hillary, after she F-ed you with the DNC. All of your followers left you. As far as a referendum on Trump? That's a laugh. Everyone get a trophy in the Dem party for making a blue state blue still, again, always.Smooth Pal, smooth! 
When Britain and France almost merged into one country—and how it helps explain Brexit, by Dominic Tierney  
Bernie Sanders: This week's election was "a referendum on the disastrous Trump administration"  
Wow. Alex Salmond, the man who brought about the Scottish independence referendum, to host talkshow for Russian broadcaster RT  
A reminder of what our new International Development Secretary @PennyMordaunt said on #Turkey during #EU referendum: that Britain couldn't veto its membership and that it was going to join (endorsing *that* poster). Both untrue.  
Sometimes when I watch Great British Bake Off I think about which contestants voted for Brexit, b/c you know at least a few definitely did 
Now we are doomed to have 3rd & 4th  rate ministers replacing 2nd rate ministers because the one and only essential qualification is a religious zeal for Brexit 
Time and date of Brexit to be written in law 
11 Catalan leaders are in jail tonight for their role in October's independence referendum. None are violent, none have been convicted of any crime. Incredible.  
Brexit WILL happen: May warns Remoaner MPs she 'will NOT tolerate' bids to weaken divorce  
Special Branch tapped the phones of trade unionists. Russia funded Brexit FFS, but it's an Alex Salmond talk show that knots their knickers. 
Brexit: fighting talk - Barnier in an uncompromising mood ...  #Brexit.  
The British legal expert who wrote Article 50 will make a major speech on Friday accusing Theresa May of “misleading” the public over whether Brexit can be reversed. #StopBrexit #FBPE  
Brexit: Article 50 author says Theresa May is misleading the public on reversing result - The Independent  
Spain Says It Might Allow Independence Referendum as Catalan Protests Rage  #Catalonia 
In all my pointless Twitter exchanges with Brexit enthusiasts I’ve only ever come across 3 things they actually want to change once they’ve taken back control:1. Immigration2. Restrictions on vaping3. Bendy bananas 
BBC Newsnight: Lord Heseltine 'in favour' of voting for 'horrific' Corbyn to STOP Brexit  #BBC #Newsnight #Brexit 
Most of the people who shout that NATS will not accept referendum result are the same ones who will not accept the SNP dominate in Scottish politics. 
We know the under-55 UK population don't want Brexit, and with 73% of 18-24-year-olds voting Remain, and more people turning 18 every day, stopping Brexit is the only sensible thing to do.THAT is the will of the people!  
Brexit Is Legally Reversible, Says Key Architect Of Article 50 Legislation  
What's the word for when the things Brexit-sceptics warned would happen (IE political instability, jeopardising the NI/RoI peace process) start to happen & then Brexiteers say, "Well, how did this happen?"  
So first working day post Brexit will be Monday April 1st... 
May told to admit that #Brexit can be stopped. Lord Kerr — who drafted Article 50 — says she is making "a political decision to withhold the truth".  
Lord Kerr: the Prime Minister withholding the fact that the Government can unilaterally stop Brexit if it wants to  
Brilliant effort by Sally to get a 5% swing in the safest Tory seat in Wandsworth. We fell short today but got a positive result by listening to local people on Brexit, school cuts and affordable housing. Bring on May 2018!  
Delighted that the date the UK will leave the EU is to be officially put into legislation! "Exit day" will be 11pm on 29th March 2019. This is very welcome news! #bbcqt #Brexit  
Britain’s exit date from the EU - 11pm Irish time on March 29th 2019 - is to be enshrined in legislation, namely the EU Withdrawal Bill. This would make the UK’s first working day outside the EU April Fools Day #Brexit #ExitDay 
So much for the meaningful vote; like with the publication of the impact studies Tories are a law unto themselves whilst an impotent Labour stands by achieving the square root of zero. 
Does the UK want to distance itself from the European model? asks @MichelBarnier. Did he miss our referendum?  
Gordon Brown predicts 'CRISIS POINT' which will see Brexit REVERSED. Like he got the price of Gold right!  
It is pathetic how eager this desperate, incompetent and venal government is to lick Trump's backside. So much for #Brexit sovereignty. #StopBrexit 
#Brexit is a wonderful means for distracting people from the massive increase in the wealth of the super-rich relative to everyone else, and from their massive tax-dodging. #StopBrexit. 
Between that and the Nigel Farage talking about how "Jews are the real threat" is there any doubt any more about what Brexit was really about?  
The #MSM is saying #TuesdayElections were a #referendum on #PresidentTrump. Trump never won #Virginia or #NewJersey in the #2016Election. #EdGelespie is from the #Establishment and refused Trump’s help.#PresidentTrump is still winning.  
Lord Kerr, author of Article 50, will say in a speech tomorrow that Brexit can be reversed 'at any stage' if the British people change their minds. Please RT:  
Remain folks. May wants to name 29/03 in Brexit bill, making any final vote meaningless. Don’t let this happen. #Brexit  
So much for taking back control of our borders once we leave the EU. It looks like we will be opening them even wider afield to find workers. Another Brexit lie exposed. The best deal for Britain can only be achieved if we #StopBrexit 
Considering the BBC gave us Brexit on the back of constant right wing Ukippery beamed nightly onto our televisions, doubt they really have any moral high ground to talk "propaganda"... 
Yet more Brexit chaos. #StopBrexit 
MUST-READ: Lord Kerr, author of Article 50 says Theresa May is misleading the public on reversing Brexit  
Brexit day: Divorce will happen at 11pm to make separation 'crystal clear'   
Brexit: UK will leave the EU at 11pm on 29 March 2019 - "Exit Day" - says government  
“We’re going to come to a crisis point next summer” – former PM Gordon Brown on Brexit #newsnight 
What a total bawbag, typical Brexit angry man syndrome #bbcqt 
Now Brown on Newsnight plotting to block Brexit. Heseltine, Philp, Halfon, Kerr, Brown. Every voice so far was for Remain in the Referendum. 
If you're a conservative and would consider voting Corbyn because you don't like Brexit, you're not a conservative to begin with.  
Lord Heseltine tells @nicholaswatt his supporters face a “traumatic dilemma” over whether to vote for @jeremycorbyn over Brexit #newsnight 
.@stellacreasy says that the failure of the government to be "strong and stable" is having a damaging impact not just upon Brexit, but other issues in the UK #bbcqt 
There is nothing inevitable about this process as new Brexit facts continue to emerge  
@theresa_may Why is #UK signing up to #PESCO when we are in full #Brexit mode. Are British troops going to be sent to subdue Catalans, Greeks etc?  
Brexit is legally reversible, says key architect of Article 50 legislation  
The man who wrote Article 50 says Theresa May is misleading the public on stopping Brexit  
Important Brexit intervention tmr morning from Lord Kerr, author of Art 50 and ex head of the FCO: "The country still has a free choice about whether to proceed. As new facts emerge, people are entitled to take a different view."  
INDEPENDENT DIGITAL: May told to admit that Brexit can be stopped #tomorrowspaperstoday 
For clarity, the man who told us Brexit would be great and without any risk also thinks smoking is great and without any risk.  
Crops rotting in fields in Cornwall following drop in European workers. Brexit isn’t working. #StopBrexit. 
Unreal anti-Brexit bias on Newsnight tonight. Lop-sided intro from Kirsty and then we are into an interview with....Michael Heseltine! 
Brexit date and time to be enshrined in law  
3. Boris needs to be on the back benches during the Brexit transition because he - like everyone else in the government- knows it's going to be a clusterfuck of Biblical proportions. He needs NOT to be a part of its implementation. 
Exclusive: Theresa May warns pro-EU Tory rebels that she will not 'tolerate' attempts to undermine Brexit #premium 
Bernie Sanders: This week's election was "a referendum on the disastrous Trump administration"  
Theresa May today warns pro-European Tory rebels that she will not "tolerate" any attempts to undermine Brexit as she unveils plans to enshrine in law the date that Britain leaves the EU.    
You can have Brexit. Or you can have the Union. But you can't have both.  
#bbcqt TORY Brexit team arrived back in Brussels today...Brexit is barmy.  
Threats to this country:1. Brexit2. Boris3. Global Warming4. IDS5. Farage6. Russia7. Daily Mail8. Murdoch9. Loss of bees10. Maybot 
We mustn't let people forget: @DavidDavisMP sat in front of brexit committee & told them that the impact studies had summaries & that the PM had read them. 
Claims Brexit means "taking back control" exposed as myth by trade White Paper  via @LondonEconomic 
@ForcadellCarme the President of the Catalan Parliament is in jail tonight.I stood with her before the Referendum with @SandraWhiteSNP . My thoughts are with her tonight. This is shameful from Spain 
Just realised the moment of Brexit is going to be 11pm on a *Friday night*. That's going to be a very messy night out, for both sides. 
Even beyond tariffs, Ford, Honda, Vauxhall & SMMT (industry lobby group) warn complexity of new customs checks ("non-tariff barriers") after Brexit could cost the industry tens of millions of poundsBy @PeterCampbell1 
Theresa May is going to table legislation setting the exact moment of Brexit at 11pm on 29 March 2019. (This is still under technically under embargo but newspapers just tweet their front pages early as if the internet doesn't exist.)  
BBC BREAKING CELEBRITY NEWS. Tonight we showcase Gordon Brown and give him a national TV platform to trash Brexit, pass the buck for his past failures, bang the drum for increased immigration  and support Jeremy Corbyn! 
Interesting Brexit news.EU asking that N Ireland stay inside customs union. 
Oh don't even start me on that. Watching news & seeing pollies suggest a referendum for s44 when have just dissed Indiginious in the most reprehensible manner makes me want to throw something at the TV. 
We know, at the very least, Russian controlled bots pushed the #Brexit message. There are also multiple interactions between SVR agents and the Leave campaigns. Prima facie, worthy of investigation  
The whole Brexit scam has been a complete disaster. Broken promises, lies and deceit from self serving opportunists. Time to stop it.#StopBrexit 
Is Brexit boring? Yes, says @MattChorley. No, say @iainmartin1 and @jennirsl. What do you think?  #knowyourtimes 
Leaving the #EU without a deal could cost the country an astonishing £430 billion over five years says @vincecable@LibDems leader said the figures were a ‘real indictment’ of David Davis ‘talking up’ the possibility of a no-deal #Brexit 
Britain's economy is on course for an extended slowdown, European Commission forecasts  
No offence, but I actually want to break up the UK. I officially stopped giving a fuck about the UK in 2014. And then Brexit... and now I'm supposed to be considerate about some British nationalists losing their sense of Britishness in Scotland? Fuck that 
Gordon Brown urges Jeremy Corbyn to back second EU referendum 'when Brexit reaches crisis point'  
If EU actually honoured its own April negotiating principle-nothing is agreed till everything is agreed-the Brexit talks could move ahead tomorrow morning.Terrible loss of nerve on their part. 
1,000 voters contacted in just one day. Labour members are telling us they want a leader who will fight a hard Tory Brexit.  
If anything, Brexit lowers our ability to prevent the EU Army!So yes @Nigel_Farage, using "EU Army" as a reason for Brexit... is....a.... LIE 
A welcome dose of reality here from a former Minister in the Brexit Department: 
Job Opening: International Development Secretary (Temp)Company: All BadEssential: Brexit fantasist, proven liarDesirable: Keeps the PM in a job for a few weeksExperience: None requiredNotice Period: Could be gone any minuteRealists need not apply 
They don't have to live with the outcome at all Mr Starmer .@Keir_Starmer, you know it is bad, even the government knows it's bad. There is no future & Brexit. Stop acting like you cannot do anything, give the young a future. Stop Brexit #StopBrexit 
Brexit has ZERO impact on this!Defence policy requires unanimity. Our army CANNOT be conscripted.They can form an EU army themselves, but again...Brexit has ZERO impact on this! 
The fact that the European Kalergi Project is imploding into regionalism, as evidenced dy Catalan and Basque secessionist movments, as well as Central & Eastern European nations who have lived under a previous Soviet tyranny, shows how Brexit was merely the catalyst for change.  
UK Will Be ‘Colony’ of EU if It Wants Brexit Trade Deal, Taunts EU Official  
Brexit proving to be more of a disaster as each day unfolds....  
Brexit talks thrown into chaos after Ireland makes fresh border demands in leaked document #premium 
Philip Stephens: Brexit has broken British politics  
Everybody knows the Brexit poll was rigged. It was not 52% who voted for Britain to leave the failing EU cult. It was nearer 66% on exit polls, but the Liberal elite & its Deep State sycopants couldn't rig it enough to steal it. Crime doesn't pay. Apart from if your name is Bliar  
Translation:Devout Remainer hopes for Brexit failure,even if it ruins the country.BBC News - Gordon Brown predicts Brexit 'crisis point'  
Bercow to consider contempt against Tory ministers over Brexit impact studies  
A lot of people say the U.K will "sink" after Brexit:- Strong service sector growth- Plethora of investment - lowest unemployment in decades- wellbeing rose in the U.K post BrexitIs this what Brexit holds? Then good!More of the same we want. 
Brexit - "This is what happens when the subtle checks and balances of representative democracy are subordinated to the crude majoritarianism of referendums." Worse still, it wasn't even a majority! 
MI6 is probably working on Brexit and spying on other EU nations, according to two academics  
You are correct of course - I constantly refer to the super role the welsh people played in securing brexit long may it continue  
You were lied to about whether the referendum made any decision!Are you going to put up with that or help us reach our £75,000 in the next 8 days?Pledge or get a friend to do so tonight - nobody voted for this!#a50challenge  … 
The UK could end up paying even more in its Brexit deal with the EU, as Theresa May prepares to up her offer  
Disagree with Grattan on this one  Due Diligence by MPs & Senators is cheaper & easier than a Referendum to change Constitution. #CitizenshipX 
Will UK  be economically better off post Brexit? #EU  #BREXIT RETWEET & VOTE  #YourVoiceMatters 
Can I remind brexiteers who write “ proud to be English” etc. Welsh played significant role for Brexit and like with past wars most of us Welsh stand shoulder to should with our English cousins for “our” country, for our monarch. Now, this Century we must stand together again 
Just before he jets off to Brussels for more Brexit talks, @DavidDavisMP join @ChristianJMay (and me) at the @CityAM #CityAMawards tonight. I think I made more effort than Davis, to be fair... 
I've tweeted many times previously about how Brexit could wipe out much of the auto sector in the UK. Seems I'm not the only one.  
UK has done ENOUGH: Irish PM hits back at EU and says there is sufficient Brexit progress  
Oh Chuka, words fail millions of us, if only we had a robust opposition to Brexit and Brexit Government. It could be you... but I fear that stability will not materialise until Labour addresses its Brexit demons.  
Just back from meetings in Brussels & Paris where all agreed #Brexit is a looming disaster for the UK economy. Hilarious to come home to find Tories and their tax dodging mates still firmly in denial & chasing squirrels  
The meaning of Brexit, by Emmanuel Macron, in this week's Spectator:  
Petition: Investigate covert foreign interference in the EU referendum .                                    Only on 16,000! Come on, what are you waiting for. We need 100,000 for a debate in House of Commons.Sign, RT, share on Facebook, send to friends! 
If at all possible I avoid reading articles about Brexit, Make an exception for this easy to read tour de force from former Brexit minister George Bridges:  
A little bit about that Turkey lie by Mordaunt. It fits two big problems during both the Brexit referendum and Trump.... 1/n 
Amnesty from Brexit for Leave voters? Grimsby, you get your f@cking arses down to your MPs and   media and beg them to get us all out this shit you dropped us in. 
These Brexit tax dodgers pretended to love England so thick poor people would vote to help them dodge even more tax   
They “can’t have their hake and eat it” #Brexit  
BBC News - Gordon Brown predicts Brexit 'crisis point' when leave voters realise they won't get what they were promised by the #Leave camp lies #StopBrexit 
Deleted a Brexit-related tweet earlier. When you delete a tweet people think it is some admission of defeat or being wrong. It's normally: can't be arsed with people whose profiles are made of flags clogging up the notifications with roars of dumbness. 
It’s not a crime for #IPOB to be free from unholy marriage with Nigeria, it’s not a crime for Biafrans to fight for their self determination right of In’l law, it’s not a crime for Biafrans to demand the right to exist, all IPOB are asking is Referendum #support #BiafraReferendum 
Really good thread, Alan. There is a strand of Brexit thinking that looks like clasdic Hofstadter anti-intellectualism - analysis is feeble, action heroic, truths 'self-evident', the status quo corrupt. I see lits of that in Brexiter comments. 
The European Parliament just told Britain its offer on EU citizens isn't good enough It can't be..on-going EU cits rights can't be guaranteed W/O the ECJ. #Brexit Tories will never accept long term ECJ =IMPASSE#StopBrexit keep the current deal & be happy! 
Confidence in Britain needs to be rebuilt in the wake of Brexit, former prime minister Gordon Brown tells ITV News 
BREAKING NEWS: People speaking out about sexual harassment "should shut up as it's distracting us from Brexit", say arseholes.  
Bratislava and Milan lead race for EU medicines agency after Brexit, Barcelona has been blown off course by the Catalan crisis 
EU business groups to urge @TheresaMay to fight for an immediate #Brexit transition deal 
Brexit was the ‘working class against the elite’- another false narrative, it was driven by taxophobic rich boys  
Finally some truths on corrupt EU may be aired! Priti Patel allies warn she is ready to 'go off like a shotgun' on Brexit  via @MailOnline 
#MakeMeAngryIn5WordsBrexit was a good idea 
One reason EU delaying Brexit talks is because they want May’s Security Treaty in place & UK fully signed up to their military plans first. 
Since I've also been told to go back and keep my mouth shut on brexit, #thisismyshithole . I probably won't move back to the exact same place, but I will feel more at home than I do here now. pic.twitter.com/7LnksOfmp5 
Gordon Brown predicts the Brexiters' four red lines' will be crossed next summer, causing Leave voters to rethink if Brexit is possible.  #FBPE BBC News - Gordon Brown predicts Brexit 'crisis point'  
Big banks ‘preparing to move London jobs abroad’ due to #Brexit uncertainty, Good Fuck Off and Bankrupt another country, before you go, dont forget to pay back £1.5tn to HMRC and dont come back #vermin 
Penny beginning to drop - Legatum Institute - "UK’s post-Brexit success hinges on persuading the EU and other leading trading partners such as the United States to agree to an entirely new type of trade deal - the only alternative is to remain in the EU." 
All this crap about Parliament having a vote on the EU divorce. They had one. They voted 6 - 1 to have a referendum & abide by the result. It is up to the government to achieve what is best for this country and that is, in the voice of 17.4 million voters, to leave the EU ASAP !! 
New wave of revelations strongly suggests Russia interfered in Brexit. Why is the UK Govt staying silent - are they 'accessories after the fact?  
#brexit'ers tell me if you love the EU so much piss off & live there. I did  #thisismyshithole & I love it far more than the UK, plus, I'm welcome. pic.twitter.com/02bBGUiMnw 
Bank of England report finds that wages are being pushed up as a result of the post-referendum reduction in number of EU workers in UK. Fancy that.  
Not a single Prime Minister - past or present - thinks Brexit is a clever idea. There’s a reason for that: it’s a bloody stupid idea.  
Great to see @PennyMordaunt being given such a crucial cabinet position at @DFID_UK  Her positive vision for #GlobalBritain with be invaluable as we #Brexit Congratulations!  
If these 10 predictions on #Brexit -by @CER_Grant- turn out to be correct, there will be a lot of unhappy voters in the UK 
BAsically car industry doing own Brexit impact study via @CommonsBEIS - Vauxhall, Geely, Ford, Honda - not pretty:  
Also today we've been talking to Gordon Brown - most interestingly he predicts Brexit talks will reach 'crisis point' + suggests there's possibility UK may not leave EU - watch our interview later on #newsnight 
Gordon Brown predicts Brexit 'crisis point'  
Little by little, step by step, May inches towards admitting UK will pay close to E50bn Brexit divorce bill  via @FT 
absolutely shocking peddling fear hate and prejudice  penny mordaunt lying for brexit 1M people from turkey to come to the uk in next 8years rewarded with position in cabinet  
Ford Brexit inquiry submission = horror show -doesnt believe customs IT system will be ready, transition “critical”  
Brexit boost: Sainsbury's boss says trade is BOOMING despite Brexit doom-mongering  
This surely cannot surprise anybody. There is no pleasure at all in seeing the consequences of Brexit fall hardest on those who voted for it.  
Blimet: interesting one: ABI warning that post-Brexit tariffs on car parts will push up motor insurance costs:  
Honda says it could not absorb 10 percent tariff after Brexit  
Erm. Farmers are Remain, Fisherman are Remain. All the Cities are Remain. Who does want it Brexit? #RemainerNow 
This is extremely important. It invalidates the referendum. It’s unbelievable that nothing has yet been done to address this.  
Faroe Islands to vote on constitution paving way for independence. The Faroe Islands will hold a referendum on a new constitution in 2018, in preparation for a possible national ballot on separating from Denmark. 
Volumes in European repo markets shot up in the weeks surrounding the Catalan independence referendum  
Remind me someone, why we are leaving the EU.  Is it because Parliament has yet to vote on whether to accept the advice given in the non-binding EU referendum?  
Wetherspoon AGM todayMe+Gareth blagged our way in with suitcase of helium cylinders and balloonsFilled them in gents added bollocks to Brexit stickersRelease them to ceiling above Tim MartinOutside put big EU flag on window behind his chair800W PA system a faux Boris  
How Our Country Works: The Brexit campaigners who put their £££money offshore; includes @Arron_banks & Jacob Rees-Mogg. 
Interesting information on the offshore financial dealings of @Arron_Banks continues to emerge. #Brexit #ParadisePapers 
Thread! Deep thinking about Brexit at the grassroots  
Lawyer of the @catalan_gov : "We have the confirmation that the € 6.5 million budget part for the referendum was not used, although it is to be foreseen that this sum will be seized from the properties of the ministers and their family. We hope this decision will be revoked."  
 Look at this absolutely disaster of a Tory government and the state of Brexit Britain. Now ask why Labour are not capitalising. 
The actuality of Brexit will always be a let-down compared to the dream so there is an (unconscious?) need to prolong the dream and protect it from mundane reality (3/9) 
Lord Sugar predicts a lot of anger when the reality of Brexit hits home.  We can stop this! #exitbrexit  
For a summary of the allegations so far on Russian subvervsion of the EU Referendum, this by Neil Barnett, is unbeatable   
“if we are not honest with ourselves, our plans will be built on sand” says @georgebridges Brexit minister till June  
If the Brexit Impact Assessments say what we fear they will, then Labour must change its stance on Brexit. #StopBrexit. 
EU sources say the UK has only 2 weeks left to make progress on Brexit divorce.Otherwise EU leaders are not likely to vote at their Dec summit to widen talks to include trade and transition deals - as the UK wants.Next opportunity, Mar 2018, is too late for business.- BBC 
In Ireland, #Brexit is called "The Great British Break-off!"Hundreds of indigestible ingredients... 
Empty shelves, shortages of food and increasing food prices await us once we jump off Brexit cliff edge. There nothing to be gain from Brexit just all to lose. It is time to #StopBrexit 
Brexit's just a symptom.Nationalism is the disease.#StopBrexit 
Not so many years ago politically minded folk were getting into a lather about 'spin'. Now Tory MPs and Ministers pour out a torrent of lies with hardly an eyebrow raised. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Serious question, is there any senior pro-#Brexit Tory MP who is not a shameless serial liar?#StopBrexit 
Denverites Resoundingly Vote for More Walking, Biking, and Transit Options: "absolutely" a referendum on the importance of sustainable transportation. 
The political class's meltdown over Brexit is the longest hissy fit in history, says Brendan O'Neill 
Hard Brexit has been cancelled #MakeMeAngryIn5Words 
If @BBCNews says Penny Mordaunt is a Navy reservist and will "keep an even ship" again I will stop buying a licence and watching your meandering drivel. She is helping the Tories stay on a fixed route towards the iceberg of Brexit 
A "progressive" on #Brexit: "Yeah, I feel A LITTLE bad for the 5 million people I just fucked, but my misguided hope of instant socialism was totally worth it. Hope it works out, bro." pic.twitter.com/DG09cYw6dH 
Listen to @TiceRichard dismiss the lies peddled by Project Fear as he speaks of the benefits we can gain from Brexit on @bbc5live 
I think it's time we started seeing some concessions from Brussels with the #Brexit negotiations! What do you think?  
How Brexit will unfold – Britain will get a deal, but it’ll come at a price | Charles Grant  
#Brexit negotiator Guy Verhofstadt warped answer to save DemocracyPush out elected Donald Trump & let EU take over!“Only way to protect the liberal world order is for other powers – beginning with #EU – to step into the breach”So glad we're Leaving EU 
Penny Mordaunt is the newly appointed International Development Secretary. The Portsmouth North MP voted Leave at the EU Referendum. pic.twitter.com/Fw8M31PmgK 
Pretty sad state of affairs when cabinet ministers are appointed not on the basis of competence or experience but their Hard Brexit credentials. God help us.  
Nancyboy Michael Gove banning pesticides to appease lefties. Now I have to tolerate bees landing in my pot noodles next spring if I decide to eat outside. Hard Brexit needed! 
@PennyMordaunt Are you going to apologise for lying to the public before the referendum? If you don't think you were lying, you are too incompetent to be an MP, let alone a minister.@Number10gov@theresa_may@Number10press@Number10cat 
Penny Mordaunt lied shamelessly, that Britain does not have a veto on Turkish accession to the EU. Another one of the #LeaveLies that perverted the #Brexit referendum result. #StopBrexit 
Allies of Priti Patel warn she is ready to speak out over Brexit  
My 10 predictions for the #Brexit talks, including a deal on money and rights in December, a hard border in Ireland and a long transition:  @CER_EU 
Fact is, if either Tories or Labour were against Brexit, it wouldn't happen. So if you're in either party, this is you. 
Penny Mordaunt made false claims about Turkey joining the EU, misled voters that the NHS would be given £350m per week post Brexit, and today she's a cabinet minister! We live in a world now where it's acceptable to spread misinformation about important issues, isn't it good fun?  
#BREXIT #LEGEND @Nigel_Farage: "We want to be an independent, normal nation and that is what we have done and that is what must happen."  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #EU #NEWS #TORY @Conservatives #Conservative #ConservativeParty #Labour #UKIP #NIGELFARAGE #USA 
BREXIT: There is a level of delusion among Mail readers about Britain’s importance in the world that is quite breathtaking.  
Brexit may not be a British crisis, but a European one, says Emmanuel Macron  
#BREXIT #BRITAIN: #PeterShore exposed the #corrupt #EU #ProjectFear #PROPAGANDA! Telling the #BRITISH PEOPLE #Lies and more Lies for over 40 years!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #USA #NEWS #TORY @Conservatives #Conservative #ConservativeParty #Labour #UKIP #Libdems 
Time is running out - 1% want #Brexit by 2019 to avoid #EU  anti tax avoidance directive !!!  
Despite the feeling of political vortex and #Brexit chaos:- 5yrs before UK election- Cons/DUP deal is stable- Cons polling at ~40%- Economy still growing - British people are rather happy 
As Brexit talks resume the EU is maintaining its belligerent and uncompromising attitude. As we approach crunch time in December a No Deal outcome looks more and more attractive.#Brexit #EU #Brussels 
Brexit has, quite literally, created a broken democracy which actively & deliberately rewards the liars who caused it. Penny Mordaunt & Turkey is a text book example. 
David Davies started off brilliantly. What on earth has happened to make him so useless to brexit. The brexit situation is now becoming laughable. 
Love all your efforts & the work of @albawhitewolf but I do wish you & others wouldn't use the phrase "after leaving the EU" or "after Brexit". We prefer "in the event of Brexit". We're not planning to let Brexit happen!  
Oops ...The EU just announced it’s cutting Britain's growth forecast because of Brexit - and raising its own  
Re: Maine Medicaid vote, what about TN? Referendum shot down by R’s. It’s coming back! Call your Rep,Senator to support. #peoplematter 
France 24 Video: Nick Clegg explains how to stop Brexit  
More Bullying and #EUThreats! The #EU has given @theresa_may & the #UK just three weeks to come up with a #EUdivorcesettlement figure for the #EU piggy #Bank basically they want YOUR MONEY! #BBC #SKY # #UK #EU #NEWS #TORY #Conservative #ConservativeParty #Labour #Brexit #NODeal 
Her views on Brexit aside, Penny Mordaunt is sensible, levelheaded & unlikely to do anything odd on holiday, so that could’ve gone worse 
1. The Brexit referendum was advisory 2. If it was binding it needed a supermajority 3. Leave was 5 million votes short of a supermajority Err ... How is the loss of parliamentary sovereignty based on a wafer thin victory in an advisory referendum democratic? 
Woman who lied that Brexit would save our curry houses replaced with woman who lied that UK had no veto on Turkey's EU membership #honestjob 
So Penny Mordaunt supported Brexit & Leadsom, & doesn't understand basic things about the EU. Sounds like she'll fit right in. 
You'd think that you couldn't find someone worse than Priti Patel: but Penny Mordaunt worked on the George W Bush campaign in 2000, falsely claimed during the referendum that the UK couldn't veto Turkey's membership of the EU, and ran 'Leadsom for leader' 
SHOCK NEWS: Brexit Tory woman replaces Brexit Tory woman  
Is lying in the EU Referendum a necessary qualification to be a Minister in @theresa_may's Government? 
This week is both:a) half way point between the EU referendum and Brexit Dayb) half way point of 5 year term won by David Cameron in May 2015!Great spot by @MerrickBadger 
Grimsby's fishing industry asks or Brexit exemption. What about unis, hospitals, the City, Nissan, Northern Ireland, Scotland... oh let's just call it off.  
The Grimsby "fish-cake and eat it" story on LBC.☞ Now Even Fishermen Don't Want Brexit, Reveals James O'Brien  
Didn’t Penny Mordaunt also spread the “We have to leave the EU because Turkey’s joining” nonsense?Yet another fallen Pillar of Brexit.   Not happening. Is lying a prerequisite for May’s Cabinet?  
This is very pithy, almost surgical contribution from @SamuelMarcLowe on Brexit debate.  
If Penny Mordaunt is appointed it will be further reward for lies and deceit: her false claims about Turkey in EU referendum were appalling 
Here's the new @DFID_UK Secretary @PennyMordaunt at @BrexitCentral's rally speaking on how Brexit can be a catalyst that changes the world   
NEW: Downing Street confirms that Theresa May has invited European business leaders to No10 on Monday for a special Brexit summit. 
There's incompetency, there's stupidity and then there's Brexit. 
Wetherspoons boss hits out at the 'highly misleading' Brexit rhetoric of Sainsbury's, Whitbread and Nick Clegg  
Given Patel lost her job for failing to be completely honest, not sure giving it to someone who adopted very liberal approach to truth during EU referendum campaign is good idea  
Fact that so many Tories are demanding May replace Patel with a Brexit enthusiast shows they prefer balancing faction to governing 
What's a little thing like borderline treason, when there's Brexit at stake, huh Nigel?  
Some Brexiters seem to think a person's worth depends on where they were born. There are few more stupid and ignorant doctrines. A person's worth depends on what they do!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Boris Johnson fawns over Trump, Priti Patel wants UK aid to support Israel's army in the Golan Heights, Redwood wants a full Thatcherite Restoration: the Tory Brexiteers view of what comes next after Brexit will have precious few backers among the British public.  
Paul Dacre has spent his career introducing fascist poison into the heart of our political culture - lies, hate, rabid nationalism, xenophobia, anti-intellectualism, and yet our PM celebrates with him. #StopBrexit #Brexit #StopFundingHate 
Isn't it a shame that the establishment and the biased media still refuse to put the exciting and positive case for Brexit?  
Brexit backing Penny Mordaunt front-runner to replace Priti Patel as International Development Secretary  #Premium 
Our paper on UK Competition Policy after #Brexit is now free to download, thanks to Journal of Antitrust Enforcement Editor's Choice @ccp_uea @davidmreader 
Hey Theresa.We know this may seem like a silly idea to you, but how about trying to appoint someone based on their competency & experience instead of how delusionally enthusiastic about Brexit they are? 
Mordaunt, a brexit backing Tory. Not to be confused with Mordant, which was urine, kept in a bucket at the back door. 
Good question. Can May afford to lose a second big Brexit beast?  
While the super rich con people into voting Brexit so they can dodge tax - this is what really makes me ashamed of the UK  
"We are all Brexiteers now" said Iain Duncan Smith. Then you are NOT leading or representing the country as more than half of us aren't. The Brexit campaign was a pack of lies  So....  
This is excellent - on why many people still strongly support Brexit and Trump, despite mounting evidence both are problematic 
Who’d want their money in the U.K. with Brexit happening? Not its principal backers, that’s for sure.  
The neuroscience of no regrets: why people still support Brexit and Trump  
Jacob Rees-Mogg, Arron Banks, the Daily Telegraph's proprietors All offshore and pushing for a hard Brexit  
Merkel ally and MEP @davidmcallister is right when he says that there is no win-loose Brexit scenario. It's a lose-lose, damage-control exercise.  @BBCHARDtalk 
This is silly. Ministers who break ministerial codes & have undisclosed meetings with leaders of foreign powers should go- whether or not they are pro or anti-Brexit.  
Brussels forecasts that after the UK leaves the EU, the UK will self-destruct in a gigantic ball of fire, to burn for all eternity in no-free-trade hell. Because countries are nothing but powerless feathers blowing in the ruthless winds of economic globalisation. #Brexit 
I hate to say this, but it rather looks as though brexit disaster capitalists are the real citizens of nowhere.  
We spoke to many #Wetherspoons shareholders as they entered the AGM unhappy at Tim Martin's stand on brexit. He has UK& EU staff and UK & EU food and beer. Brexit will hurt his business. We gave lots of Bollocks to brexit stickers out, good response outside. Lots of EU flags!!  
1/ THREAD on how EU citizens in the UK could make a human rights complaint against both sides of the #Brexit negotiations.Based on law expert @dimitriosatBLS's article:  
#skynews #bbcnews The Uk is witnessing the most damaging sabotage in history as media & Labour & EU supporters are sytematically destroying Brexit & the Tories so the country needs to sack all the mainstream political parties as they are an insult to the electorate 
As the EU and UK continue #Brexit negotiations, check out Parliament's position  
In 'Clean Brexit' @DrGerardLyons & I provide 25 principles for Article 50 talksNo.8 - WTO rules are fine with UK 
No.  A referendum on voting & impact of not. And an acknowledgment that Democrats fight for our rights. #DemForce 
Tories are hardly hard right and the majority welcome Brexit.  
You’ve got THREE WEEKS! Brussels issues Britain with new deadline over Brexit divorce bill  
17,410,742 people voted for #BREXIT 52% of those who voted in the #EUReferendum, the largest #democratic #vote for anything in #British History! @theresa_may's #cabinet is made up of 86% #Remainers..? BALANCED... NO! #BBC #SKY #UK #EU #NEWS #TORY @Conservatives #CONSERVATIVE 
Self harm> “many northern regions are 50%-60% more dependent on EU markets for their prosperity than London” #Brexit  
People of the UK: This is so serious now. Whether you agree or disagree with Brexit, this Tory Government is incapable of delivering anything other than a disaster. #NoConfidence #ToriesOut 
On behalf of farmers and fishermen, Sturgeon expresses frustration over continuing lack of clarity on Brexit. Applause from all in chamber... except Tories. #FMQs 
I'm done with Remainers who try to derail Brexit and trash my country. Here's a thought. Instead of undermining the UK, and our kids' futures, why don't you do something positive for the country or shut up? Assuming you are British of course?  
I do hope this is true. @PennyMordaunt was terrific in the referendum and has always seemed full of sound common sense to me.  
Rank hypocricy of Labour, Patel's unauthorised talks with Israelis vs Corbyn meeting with Barnier on day of Brexit talks, traitor went behind voters & PMs back. 
By the right, quick march: On cricket, Brexit, and politics.  
Barnier: we want to succeed in these negotiations - with the UK, not against the UK. #Brexit #obbligatiacrescere 
The only reason we are all Brexiters now is half of us are passengers in the back of the Brexit clown car desperately screaming to stop as the idiots in charge drive us all off a cliff.Brexit = economic suicide for everyone. 
EU citizens already in the UK should not suffer as a result of Brexit and they should have the same rights available to them after Brexit as they have now. Anything less is just unacceptable. #StopBrexit 
18. @SZ: "All these scandals, intrigues, accusations & power games in London provide the mood music for 6th sixth round of Brexit negotiations. Michel Barnier has already warned against too much hope for progress."  
Moving to WTO rules means we do not have to give the EU any extra money, unlike a bad EU transitional deal. Let’s take back control of our money with a swift, clean Brexit!  
May is under pressure to replace Priti Patel with another Brexit enthusiast. Go for it, Theresa. The more people see their idiocy, the better. They react to responsibility like a cat reacts to a cucumber.  
Great to speak at @NFUtweets #tenants17 conference today. What is at stake if we get Brexit wrong on farming is far more than the interests of one industry - it’s our nation’s food security, nutrition, environment and public health.  
Any Brexit deal must win the support of the European Parliament. Right now, the Tories are making that very difficult for us.  
Your party claim of Schroedingers Brexit reports . If they exist show them, if they don’t then how utterly criminally negligent can a government be rushing for a cliff edge where they haven’t bothered to see how deep the chasm is. Your party utterly fail the Scots, just go! 
Young people overwhelmingly don’t want #Brexit Keir. Listen hard and act accordingly.  
What an extraordinary article. A whole piece on economic risks and investment and not a mention by businesss, Tories or the Mail of Brexit, the biggest threat we face. The parallel universe of the Unionist Right...  
Clock ticks as Brexit talks resume...  
Seem to remember Leave campaigners promising that Brexit would help our steel industry... 
The eurozone economy is seen growing by 2.2% this year, but it's still vulnerable to Brexit risks  
European Parliament deals fresh blow to Brexit deal on EU citizens rights  
The North will be hardest hit by Brexit 
The #UK is leaving the EU. It is now high time to clarify essential principles of orderly withdrawal. #Brexit 
.@PeterBoneUK: One of the advantages of Brexit is that we can allow developing countries to trade with us, “not blocked by the protectionist regime of the European superstate”  
The SNP aren't damaging the economy.  The Tory govt is with it's austerity & now Brexit & of course decades of it's neoliberal nonsense. It's why Denmark's GDP is ~25% larger than Scotland's,  
@Independent: ‘Liam Fox told a Christmas party in 2000. “What do you call four dogs and a blackbird? The Spice Girls.” ...Be thankful that the Bernard Manning of Brexit survives to condense so much that is tragicomically disgusting about this government into so very few words 
11. Germany's @welt: Dismayed at lack of progress,"major international banks could be executing their contingency plans for 'no deal' Brexit in the next few weeks"  
Brexit is an attack on our economy, our democracy and most of all, on ordinary people. We have the right to defend ourselves and our country. I refuse to be brainwashed by brexit billionaires. 
happy holidays Brexit lilo   
Too damn right we want the scalps of big beast Brexiters in order to bring down this crass incompetent country-shafting #Brexit-loving Govt! They lied, they misled, they deceived...and as Ministers they're still doing it!#FinalSay #StopBrexit #ScraptheGovt & #Remain #FBPE 
328 days after opening of Berlin Wall, Germany had completed reunification.503 days after EU referendum, UK hasn't even got a coherent negotiating position.#StopBrexit 
Here's John Redwood MP in his FT column advising his investor readers to pivot from UK to Eurozone, for obvious reasons.It won't be you or me but hey, someone has to profit from brexit. 
You’ve got THREE WEEKS! Brussels issues Britain with new deadline over Brexit divorce bill. Let every patriot tell the EU and May to F. Off. This has gone on long enough. They have threatened us and their threats are happening. Kick them into touch. 
BREXIT COUNTDOWN UPDATE▓▓▓▓▓▓▓▓░░░░░░░ 50%Referendum day was 505 days ago.Brexit day is in 505 days time. 
Good to hear Remainer, Robert Peston, now admitting that voting for #Brexit was the right thing to do... 
.@mrjamesob on Theresa May: "She's in an impossible position, charged with delivering the lie that we can be better off after Brexit."  
Once article 50 had been triggered the date of leaving was set in stone, now we have talk about transition periods and delays. Both EU and UK seem to be making up the rules as they go along, this is not what the electorate voted for  it's a deliberate attempt to stop #Brexit. 
Did you vote for less staff for the NHS? More Austerity? More food banks? Reduced food standards? Lost jobs, lost opportunities. Desperately unequal trade deals with the US because we've got 'no deal' with the EU? Many voted for Brexit, but not 'no deal' Brexit. 
Tax dodging Labour-run councils funnelled more than £232m through offshore companies  HYPOCRISY 
This "needing someone who is 'enthusiastic' about Brexit" to replace Priti Patel business, is an absurd joke. no wonder we are screwed, those MPs that are 'enthusiastic' are almost without exception utter charlatans. 
Ireland relying on solidarity of other EU countries during #Brexit  negotiations. Most important AGRI meeting yet on the issue is on now. Only 3 out of 40 MEPs from outside ROI and UK are here. Alan matthews speaking to a near empty room. Solidarity?  
If the Brexit Impact Assessments say what we fear they will, then Labour must change its stance on #Brexit  
Nobody can stop Labour's members deciding the party's policy on Brexit, write @Alison_McGovern and @heidi_mp  
Away from Cabinet soap opera - Budget not far: City noticing political weakness+productivity slow down+Brexit uncertainty = fiscal worsening  
The post-Brexit economy is set to get even stronger next year, when the UK will start to see very strong wage growth. 
Last week MPs voted for the #Brexit studies to be released - now the Government faces contempt for failing to do so. 
1. New round of #Brexit talks in Brussels today & #Prexit behind us, let's take stock of what EU papers are saying in Ep 100 of 'Nothing Has Changed.' (Thread.) 
Britain must seize the opportunities Brexit offers!  
Round 6 of #brexit talks or dancing round a standstill? What I'm hearing:  
Grand Designs - the Brexit Special transcript.  
Davis: “Shit! Parliament wants the Brexit Impact Assessements! They’re not written yet!”Mi6: “We’ve got this! Didn’t the EU do some themselves?”#Brexit 
"We are all Brexiteers now," says Iain Duncan Smith on #R4Today. No. Only 26.7% of the population actually voted for #Brexit...and many of those probably now have buyer's remorse.  
The State we're In: British PM celebrates with Dacre, editor of the Brexit Nationalist Daily Mail, the company based in Bermuda and proprietor in France to avoid paying taxes in Britain. 
Useful #brexit discussions in #Dublin. In both Norway’s & #EU’s interest to find orderly solution. Integrity of single market crucial #EEA 
UK general public, you no NO DEAL doesn't mean things staying as they are don't you? #Nodeal means no flights, no EHIC, massive food price hikes due to tariffs. No Brexit is better than no deal. #WakeUP #RemainEUnited #StopBrexit .@BestForBritain 
Brexit negotiations have officially run into the sand. We should all push for a ratification referendum to end this fiasco #StopBrexit 
Five 'Wise' Germans DEMAND Merkel STOPS Britain Leaving the EU to prevent TOTAL COLLAPSE of the EU economy...German Council of Economic Experts (GCEE) say a NO-DEAL scenario could put Europe’s finances in deep jeopardy.#Brexit #EU 
So Iain Duncan Smith told @BBCr4today that we're "all #Brexiteers now". Just for the record - no we're bloody well not! There are a huge amount of people in the UK who hate #Brexit and want to #StopBrexit . #r4today 
If the Brexit Impact Assessments say what we fear they will, then Labour must change its stance on Brexit 
The latest EU economic forecasts are out:- Euro area to grow this year by 2.2%- That's the fastest pace in a decade - Britain heads into extended slowdown- It may see worst performance in 10 years 
No photos but we released EU flags tied to helium balloons at Wetherspoons AGM. Lots AGM wearing bollocks to brexit stickers x flags oitside  
What is the state of the NHS since Brexit and what does its future hold? Find out in the latest episode of Brexit Means... 
And now Sainsbury's have called for special treatment exempting the food industry from Brexit too@mrjamesob @LBC 
A definition of Brexit. Power without responsibility. 
I hope that the many scandals involving #Tory politicians aren't distracting people from the #Brexit papers that might or might not exist... #StopBrexit @Conservatives @UKLabour @LibDems 
Special deal for fishermen.Special deal for banks (re: passporting).Special deal for car manufacturers. Special deal for pharma industry.Special deal for airlines (re: open skies).Special deal for nuclear industry.Special deal for farmers (re: seasonal workers)...#Brexit 
The Brexit effect - "more expensive food imports due to a fall in the value of sterling since Britain voted to leave the European Union and pressure from rising inflation, subdued wage growth and ongoing uncertainty in the UK economy." 
Min @HMcEntee meets with @NorwayMFA Min for European Affairs @maritrosland to discuss #FutureofEurope, #Brexit & strong  relationship  
Brexit will hit north of England the hardest, says thinktank  
While #PritiPatel story drew media attention, remember:David Davis LIED to Parliament about Brexit Impact Papers.Boris Johnson LIED about British Citizen's visit to Iran.Simon Stevens DEMANDED £350m per week for NHS be honoured.Huge issues exposing #ToryShambles 
Reuters : UK firms to offer higher pay as Brexit deters EU workers - great news for British workers -  
#BBCQT Another hopeless panel full of Remoaners.!!BBC anti Brexit every week!! Another guardian dweeb on there everywhere. Talking RUBBISH.  
Lord Sugar: "Brexit will be an absolute nightmare and the public is going to be very angry with the mess we'll be in."  
A spectacularly unrevealing Brexit agenda now on @DExEUgov No use of EU terminology of 'rounds' 
Anti-Brexit protest in front of the @jdwtweet Crosse Keys Wetherspoons for their yearly AGM. Happening now!  
It’s amazing that someone who photoshopped my #Brexit tweet has Americans fooled that I tweeted this?! Why would I say ‘we’ll be electing’ I AM NOT AMERICAN YOU FRUITCAKES  
With everything else going on don’t forget round 6 of Brexit talks start today  
Brexit - sold by mega rich tax dodgers so they can carry on doing it. #paradisepapers #stopbrexit 
It is striking, given the dominant concern for most Leavers, how little we have talked about immigration reform #Brexit  
Sorry to see you go Priti. Please keep fighting for Brexit from the backbenches - we need you to help stop the Remainers wearing us down.  
IDS basically saying we are all in this together. No IDS. You took a tiny majority on an advisory referendum and pursued hard Brexit #NotABrexiteer 
ex-FCO perm sect Sir Simon Fraser full sobering speech on UK foreign policy post-Brexit.  Big sweep.   
‘Stop #Brexit’: Merkel advisers call for UK to remain in EU  
The view from Berlin: Brexit has broken British politics  via @FT 
MARGOT PARKER: We Need To Unite To Fight For A Clean Brexit.   
The Tories seem to think Brexit comes first, the national interest comes second. Brexit will destroy them as a political force for a generation. But unfortunately, Corbyn wants Brexit as well. 
Brexit's about going it alone.Put aside the irrationality of that in a world of shared challenges,I don't want to go it alone with this mob. 
It's #Brexit talks (sorry, er "stock-taking") again, where the sticking point is EU's €60,000,000,000 demand for a financial settlement.So in that context, can someone at Home Office/HMG please explain?... 1/Thread 
MUST-READ: UK has more to lose than Germany over a no Brexit, says new research from Oxford Economics  
1. If you don't want to talk about reshuffle or Brexit, how about the Budget? Nick Boles, Tory moderniser, says govt should forget about paying down the deficit.... claiming 'austerity's worked' 
And Brexit? Remember Brexit, Owen? The disaster that is Brexit? The chief reason for the country’s implosion? ‘Don’t be distracted by the chaos at No 10. The real problem is rotten ideology | Owen Jones  
Is that a huge stop Brexit beer mat outside your AGM this morning #Timmartin of @jdwtweet at the Crosse Keys pub? #FBPE 
Opel/Vauxhall now making its “future plan” under new Groupe PSA management - important for Ellesmere Port plant, Brexit automotive concerns  
Brexit chaos in the news. I would like to hear your views. Then depressed, I'll hit the booze. Ooh I get the shivers. 
EU threatens to scupper Brexit unless the UK keeps giving welfare to foreigners living abroad. It's time to walk away and declare independence now. #nodeal 
'We're all #Brexiters now', Iain Duncan Smith?Advisory #EUref called by LAST Parliament#Art50 invoked by LAST Parliament#GE17 called to win #Brexit mandate#Tories didn't get it"No Parliament may bind its successors"THIS Parliament can #STOPbrexit#r4today #IDS 
HERO: Businessman Tim Martin is a Brexit Champion. Go and visit your local Wetherspoon! @jdwtweet  
Do you think the Brexit vote is seriously hurting the UK economy? 
I'd be interested in what % of Britons, seeing how unreasonable EU is in Brexit talks, now concludes we shld've left sooner 
Coincidence?#ParadisePapers #Brexit  
I definitely feel this when out campaigning in the streets to #StopBrexit Pre Referendum I often got told to shut up but now more and more Brexit supporters are coming forward and admitting its a mess & harming our country  
Choking on my tartine. The cheek of #Brexit.  
Let’s have that Brexit-promised £350m a week now – the NHS can’t afford to wait | Frances O’Grady  
The #brexit negotiations resume today. Could these different attitudes explain the difficulties?  
NO DEAL: Brussels ramping up demands for a bumper Brexit bill. British government must prepare to walk away!  
I’m sure there’s a word or phrase for demanding money linked to a clear threat of punitive action if the money’s not forthcoming - now what is it?  : Brussels ramps up pressure on Brexit bill  
Says the man who promised a once In a lifetime/generation referendum. If Carlsberg did irony.......  
Apparently no one is allowed to criticise Brexit leadership even if they are inept or corrupt #stopbrexit 
When the BBC 'talks down' #brexit you know it's getting bad   
Very useful summary of Irish gov view on state of #Brexit negotiations. Clear sighted and unequivocal from Foreign Minister @simoncoveney 
Read this good article. 'Take it from the Swiss: the Brexit referendum wasn't legitimate'  via @prospect_uk 
Brexiters insisting that cabinet promotions should be on the basis of enthusiasm for Brexit show how Brexit is a cult not a policy. #r4today 
#Brexit FFS what’s going on with Brexit. Conservatives fighting & resigning. Labour trying to derail Brexit. We’re leaving get on with it.  
Germans call for Brexit to be delayed until end of 2020  
Try to justify Brexit all you like. Just remember those petty little arguments in 30 years when you're watching the TV special, "Brexit: A Warning from History."The rest of us will. 
'NHS or Brexit' - you can't have both. And that is why the hard right is so hard Brexit. Time to stop this madness  
The North of England dug its own grave the day it voted for Brexit.  So many people up north still unaware of this tragic fact.  They were conned. They were scammed. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
In 4 days there is to be a debate in the UK Parliament on the topic of another referendum. This has been triggered after a petition against Indyref2 reached 221,514 signatures.  
Could you report on why the government is signing away #UKDefence in the EU #PESCO agreement. UK military will be ruled by Brussels - that’s not #Brexit 
Ex-Labour Party Councillor & NHS England boss, Simon Stevens, has no business sniping about Brexit by trying to discredit Leavers. Civil servants SHOULD NOT take sides.  
A measure of May's commitment to Full Brexit will be the promoting Rees Mogg to replace Patel. 
EU wants Britain TRAPPED!' May told to review Brexit deal as bloc wants MORE RULE over UK. Its painfully obvious that May is taking us down a path where we are going to be told "I have done everything possible but we can´t leave the EU". May is a disgrace & should go now. 
Who would want to be part of an organisation that behaves like this? - EU's threat: Settle the Brexit bill or we'll force UK firms to relocate' @telegraph 
Jacob Rees Mogg blames disgruntled Remainers for Priti Patel’s downfall - perfectl illustration of life in #brexit poisoned Westminster 
.@kayleighmcenany: "For Democrats to say this is a referendum on @POTUS, that's false." 
You're seeing it, but you didn't do it.#Election2017 was a referendum on the strength of progressive Dems who voted for Hillary Clinton, backed her progressive platform & ran for office when she was cheated of the presidency. You wanted her silenced. Her voice rang out Tuesday.  
Nick Clegg explains how to stop #Brexit - Nick puts the democratic case for holding the Brexiteers to account.  
Oh! So #Brexit is not wrecking the City.  
Listen to @yanisvaroufakis' speech on #Brexit at the Royal Society in London: 
Really????  How can they block us from just walking away? EU says it'll BLOCK Brexit unless we keep paying benefits abroad INDEFINITELY  
From her days at the ill-fated Referendum Party through to working with the disastrous William Hague and now the Israeli fiasco, Patel has loser written all over her, yet she's held up as a leading light of the Tories...tells you everything you need to know about this government!  
Yes, it was a referendum on Trump: Reason for hope, a year after the catastrophe  
Philip Stephens: Brexit has broken British politics  
Bernie Sanders: This week's election was "a referendum on the disastrous Trump administration"  
Qatar-Gulf divide,Syrian civilwar, Kurd referendum, turmoil in Lebanon,Saudi palacecoup & Yemen missile threat-India should Keep close watch 
EU leader BLASTS UK 'very weak' and starts plotting for CORBYN to lead Brexit talks. EU are divisive! May get Tough!  
Agree completely.  This was a referendum on the Trump/ Bannon message. And it’s a non-starter.  
EU gives UK 2 to 3 weeks to make Brexit bill offer  
Were last night's big wins for Democrats a referendum on Trump? Trump himself insists no, but some Republicans are worried. #LastWord 
GOP Virginia rep. says Gillespie's loss was a referendum on Trump: "I don't think there's any way you can look at it in a different way"  
Join the Brexit dots!  
GOP Rep. Scott Taylor: Energy on Democratic side contributed to "referendum on the President" in Tuesday's contests  
Sorry kids, last night was not a referendum. Now a sitting President losing 1039 seats during his Presidency is a referendum. So @CNN maybe you should embrace @realDonaldTrump? Needing to be sold, it might be smart. Just Sayin. #MAGA 
Spanish judge gives @Catalan_gov 10 days to 'reveal' cost of independence referendum.CatalanPresident replies:1000 injured314,000€ in damage to schools by Spanish police3 cruise ships at 300,000€/day, perdiems + 38 hotels to house Sp police  
Dear @jeremycorbyn, Euroscepticism is mostly a #Tory thing, the referendum was 100% a Tory thing, & following it through is a #Tory thing. You can oppose #Brexit (& be a real opposition) and let that be your draw at the next GE, creating a de facto plebescite and win a landslide. 
Sen. @BernieSanders: "Yesterday's elections were really a referendum on the disastrous Trump administration"  
DemocRATs calling last night's Victories a referendum on #Trump Worth mentioning all (3) losses were to be expected by Repubs Just for historical purposes here are the numbers #Obamas legacy  will be most remembered by 1,035 Total seats ENJOY YOUR ONE NIGHT STAND 
Why do Brexiters keep citing James Dyson & Tim (Wetherspoons) Martin as Brexit supporters? Dyson manufactures in Malaysia & Martin has already been complainng about staff shortages due to Brexshit. #Brexidiots pic.twitter.com/qh4cBOpjlB 
3. A sensible, competent Govt & indeed Opposition would level with the Ppl & explain there is no way #Brexit can now be made 2 work & that the Ppl should now be allowed a #FinalSay with an option to #StopBrexit & try to salvage our current deal. Sadly these qualities are lacking. 
Grimsby, which voted overwhelmingly for Brexit, asks if it can please stay in the EU.  
Brexit brain drain. Once again, Brexit doesn't mean we get to choose immigrants - they have to choose us.   
Patel was appointed because she was a brexit ideologue, knowing that she was incapable of her ministerial job.Like Johnson, Fox and Davis.  
What drivel from poster boy Taoiseach Leo Varadkar in his convoluted statement on state of play with Brexit negotiations. Why can’t he just spit out he is ready to buckle to a British agenda! 
Cost of an Alberta referendum can range from $2M to $22M, and one on equalization would accomplish roughly squat.  
EU is preparing for fall of May by the end of the year, a possible election, Labour victory and even a reversal of Brexit. 
That doesn't help you guys and this time he's violating a very blatant and obvious law. He's required to execute this referendum. He doesn't have a choice. Sue now. Don't wait 
Deeply sobering long-read from @SimonFraser00, ex-FCO permanent Secretary, on the challenges facing UK Foreign Policy post-Brexit.  
Never thought much of Ed but there’d be no Brexit and no Corbyn. The new Govt policy on speed-humps would be leading the news.  
The @DNC is taking full credit for yesterday’s Trump referendum. No mention of the incredible work by @OurRevolution, @DemSocialists, @NationalNurses, @justicedems, @BrandNew535 , @swingleft, @runforsomething, @flippable_org, @BoldProgressive, @knockeverydoor, others.¯\_(ツ)_/¯ 
South Korea Should "Brexit" The United States  
Exclusive: Nick Clegg explains how to stop Brexit  via @FRANCE24 #StopBrexit 
My 8th grader was happy that Fairfax County voters approved the public schools bonds referendum yesterday. #VirginiaElections 
Surely the whole world will be adopting Brexit UKs standards now? Otherwise how are we sovrin?  
Reality: yesterday's #ElectionDay was a referendum on Trump and the GOP's policies. They lost.GOP: let's double down!  
Theresa May reporting to her line manager / brexit guru and propaganda chief tonight. #FBPE 
This is a very well written thread, from a Leave voter who has had a change of heart, as he sees the effect of the referendum fallout. It's very honest, and quite brave of him to put this up. Fair play to him.  
So Priti Patel — who's just been caught red-handed pushing the policy agenda of a foreign power behind her own government's back— is briefing journos that she intends to be back as the "Guardian of Brexit" & defender of the "national interest". You couldn't make it up. #Newsnight 
European Parliament continues to press for UK & EU citizens to retain current rights after Brexit.   
It's all gone to pot & not a day to waste! Time to grow our Pro-EU networks and Stop Brexit before it stops us. Follow those tweeting #FollowBackProEU #FBPE 
Tory Govt in crisis & leaderless, Brexit chaos & new revelations on harassment every day.  I was interviewed on STV Scotland Tonight. 
May paying homage to Dacre is both repulsive and splendid. She must remind him that is was he more than anyone who created the disaster that is her hopeless, tumbledown government – a disaster so complete it is incapable of delivering his dream of Brexit. He must grind his teeth  
So sad. This disastrous Brexit is working for absolutely no-one.  
Without Brexit, the UK and Scotland in particular would be booming  
Privately, politicians point out that Brexit is a disaster. Publicly, they are scared to say anything. So keep making the case to #StopBrexit. 
EU leaders consider a reversal of #Brexit following fresh elections - The dream scenario!  
It really would be better if Brexit fell apart before the Government did. Or if brexit caused the gov to implode rather than general incompetence. I fear if Corbyn and McDonnell sense they can win power without softening on brexit they will take that chance . 
So much to say on @BBCNewsnight but so little time. Can’t believe half the time was spent on Brexit which had sod all to do with Priti Patel’s travails. 
Oh look! Yet another Brexit idiot  blaming someone else for a Leaver's mistakes  
No chance .. @BorisJohnson was a chancer who jumped on board at the last minute. There have been Tories plotting #Brexit since Maastrict of course. Suggested read @ShippersUnbound brilliant All Out War where he covers it in great detail. 
What a mess the UK has voted itself into. Our parliamentarians need to do their job and stop Brexit and start governing in the interests of all of us. 
EU says it'll BLOCK Brexit unless we keep paying benefits abroad INDEFINITELY. More threats - the situation is appalling. We are being robbed, threatened, abused, insulted and May does nothing but tremble. For Gods sake forget her career, look to our future. She must go now. 
Mrs May is now doing so much backtracking that Tony Blair and Alistair Campbell would be a better bet for brexit. May has lost it. She will go soon but now would be better. She has expertise she can turn to but she ignores it. She is lost and its brexit that is losing. 
Thanks, #Brexiters! How costly #Brexit is already hitting our economy... @InFactsOrg 
Now EU Supergirl hits Germany  @WernerT_Man @superEUgirl @albawhitewolf #Brexit 
No surprise beleaguered PM May & bungling Brexit secretary Davis rolled up to Daily Mail editor Paul Dacre's anniversary bash tonight.She's going to need the propaganda of all her right-wing media allies to fight the huge collapse of confidence in her leadership & government. 
#NHS chief calls for the govt to hand over the battle bus £350m a week brexit dividend. . I would have expected him to know we haven’t left  the EU yet & are still paying. 
A problem occurs when one must RT themselves, right @DrDenaGrayson? Thank you for blocking me, however a referendum is when one party loses 1039 seats. I’m sure @AlanGrayson will be blocking me shortly. Have you two just tried texting? 
JPMorgan chiefs warn May of French Brexit raid on City jobs. What will she do?  
We could lose our place at the worlds top table because of Brexit and our seat on the UN security council. Brexit is bad for Britain and it is our patriotic duty to #StopBrexit 
The @BBCNews at 10 report on NHS waiting list crisis manages to drag in Brexit, but not once mentions effect of mass migration. #biasedBBC 
Really excited to see how Twitter makes the Au Bon Pain + Panera merger a referendum on Trump. 
The election was a referendum on #Trump, and Americans spoke VERY loudlyNO 
May sycophancy to sociopathic hard right Paul Dacre tonight further proof Brexit is of the hard right for the hard right by the hard right 
Aid budget is not a Brexit football. May must appoint someone who supports international development and understands the brief 
.Break.Break TheresaBreak ToriesBREAK Brexit. 
Brexit was 20 years in planning apparently. By underground tories led by @BorisJohnson! I'm guessing the Daily Fail had quite a lot to do with it! 
We want our Brexit cash boost says NHS boss Simon Stevens. Did anyone seriously vote to leave the EU based on a slogan on a bus? #IanOnLBC 
If you are watching the @BBCNews the first two stories are actually all about Brexit. Chaos in govt. Cash shortage for NHS. #stopBrexit 
No sugar coating it @KentBusiness reports in #Kent Training DOWN Investment DOWN Capacity utilisation DOWN Exports DOWN #Brexit uncertainty is battering British business  
I've been in the US for 9 days now, and no one has required me to think about Brexit, and honestly I might just stay here if I could afford healthcare or the president didn't resemble an angry dorito. 
This explains much. Should @theresa_may have such a close relationship with people like this? #brexit. Who took back control? Not the people I think... 
Bernie Sanders says yesterday was a referendum on Donald Trump. I have news for you Bernie yesterday was also a referendum on your BS and constantly trying to divide the Democratic Party. A party that you're not even a member! Now go sit down and shut up you have no base! @AP 
Yes, rotten ideology, @OwenJones84 Like the one that currently drives Labour’s support of hard Brexit.  
Our #Medicaid expansion map is now updated to reflect the result of #Maine's referendum  
Time for Mr Stevens to step down as an unelected public servant if he wants to campaign for more NHS funding or opine on BREXIT. #soundmoney 
There is a lengthy recent history of Republican state officeholders ignoring referendum votes they don't like.  
Just another instance of the hate-inciting lies of the #Brexit press. This behaviour is dividing our society and undermining our democracy. It cannot be allowed to continue with impunity.#StopBrexit 
#Brexit, supported by every far right, fascist group in Europe, opposed by every progressive, liberal, left of centre party. (Apart from @UKLabour) Which side are you on? 
No @BBC  but I've often wondered why you waste tax payers money on this shite when you should be reporting on the corruption in WM, the disaster of Brexit & the shame of people having to be fed from Food banks - any response ?  
I really think we need to stop worrying about Brexit. It's bound to be alright with enough tea.  
No, she's a liar. She would have had to go regardless of her views on brexit. Have some integrity.  
Richard Corbett is right; and it is essential that Labour oppose Brexit which would surely be a complete disaster?  
Now even fishermen don’t want Brexit, reveals James O’Brien  
How Brexit was born in an Oxford café in 1990. Via @Cherwell_Online. 
The Government must stop this farce and release the Brexit studies in full, writes @MollyMEP 
There is an undercurrent in the UK of decent, hard-working people sick of criminals, drug addicts, fiddling state scroungers, Remoaners, Leavers, self-opinionated politicians and pompous, rich celebrities. We had the Brexit vote now let's sort our nation out. 
Exclusive: Nick Clegg explains how to stop Brexit - France 24  
A couple of fish taken out of the Tory pool (perhaps termporarily). That just leaves Brexit, sexual predators, chronic underfunding of the great institutions of our country, universal credit, extra cuts to disabled benefits, women's pensions ... 
Yesterday was a referendum on President Trump, and he lost badly. It’s clear the American people are deeply concerned about his policies and efforts to divide our country up. 
The good thing is @PeteWishart didn't. He wrote to the Speaker yesterday and last night raised point of order - is Govt in contempt by not producing Brexit analysis - Bercow to give "careful consideration". 
EU plots MASSIVE expansion to become 37 country MEGABLOC after Brexit  
The Dems win a state like New Jersey and it’s a national referendum because the people have spoken.Trump defeats the Left, globalists, neocons, their media cartels, and the entire Republican establishment and he’s an illegitimate president.It’s just too sick.#MAGA  
You know...I really don't care if the Tory party collapses and Labour gets into power. It's just one pro Brexit party replacing another. There is only one way out of this mess...and it's not Westminsters way. 
Priti Patel will have a higher profile now, plus cover from Brexit hardliners, minus cabinet responsibility, and no shame (since none seems to stick in politics anymore). She'll have a ball. 
Tim Martin - "There is no #Brexit cliff edge. Wetherspoon is ready now to leave the EU, since almost no preparation is required – as is almost certainly the case for the vast majority of companies." Britain needs more people like Tim Martin.  
Brexit has taken away my identity as a British citizen. This country’s values are now not my values. I feel a citizen of nowhere. 
Bank of England's McCafferty says banks may leave before Brexit deal agreed upon  
Patriotism for May is a Poppy. She sees no inherent contradiction in also trashing this country people have died for with her Brexit agenda. 
Hoping that someone with experience & judgement like @AlistairBurtUK will be appointed to Cabinet. We need to end obsession with Brexit/remain & focus on the actual role of a @DFID_UK Secretary of State 
Utter folly, because the xenophobia whipped up to obtain #Brexit could easily turn against one or more ethnic/religious minorities. 
2 cabinet members have quit in a week & it wasn't the Foreign Secretary who accidentally got a woman's sentence doubled or the Brexit Secretary who when ordered to publish the Brexit Impact Report suddenly didn't have one. 
Ed Gillespie’s loss shows Donald Trump has made Trumpism toxic. The race was referendum on Trump,and he lost. Badly.  
VA GOP Rep: Gillespie Loss 'Referendum on Trump Administration, Divisive Rhetoric'  
Wetherspoon chairman hits out the 'highly misleading' Brexit rhetoric of Sainsbury's, Whitbread and Nick Clegg .  
Why why why are itv news going into Brexit £350million bus promise overdrive tonight. We haven't even left the effing EU yet for God's sake? 
I think it goes deeper than Brexit now. IMO the Beeb is trying to bring down the government. But, hey, I'm only a conspiracy theorist after all. 
It's often tempting to turn to Mr Corbyn in this Brexit penitentiary and then of course I remember he's one of the guards keeping us in it. 
As #PritiPatel 'resigns' with a Brexit flourish, remember her 'save our curry house' Brexit pledges? Yes, me too.  
Wanted: Priti Patel Replacement. Honest, principled politician who will put country before career.  How you voted in the EU Referendum irrelevant. 
It’s time to appoint Jacob Rees-Mogg into the Cabinet. #Moggmemtum #JRM4PM #Brexit 
Maybe promoting people on the basis of how strongly they believe in Brexit isn't the best way to populate a Cabinet. 
Brexiters are saying that people are going after Johnson and Patel because they were leading figures for #Brexit. I think it's more they are both liars, cheats and FOUND OUT. #getagrip 
The UK's success post-Brexit will expose for all the world to see, the EU's inadequacy as a ponderous and protectionist trade bloc. Importantly, other EU states will witness what happens when a so-called member state leaves the fold. Roll on 30 March 2019! 
Priti Patel is sorry she has served as a distraction from the disastrous #brexit cock up and Westminster Sex Scandal, involving 36 Senior Tory Sex Pests  
We support #PritiPatel @patel4witham who supported #BREXIT & 17,410,742 people! Priti you may have resigned today, but you will be back in Government soon! Hopefully in a #BREXIT one without the #Remainer @theresa_may! #NEWS #SKY #BBC #UK #EU #ConservativeParty @Conservatives 
Prexit for Brexit Priti Patel. On permanent holiday now 
Brexit complacency and hubris—hearing very little now about the positive benefits of leaving EU, a lot of excuses that it’s going to be painful 
Lots of love for Priti. She has made right decision. I look forward to working alongside her in supporting Govt towards Brexit we both want 
We’re really going to miss these guys after Brexit... Can’t even defend a political ally on questionable grounds without taking an unnecessary swipe at Belgium  
Offices of State dealing with issues that matter mere pawns and toys in the Brexit Torypsychodrama reducing UK to global irrelevance. Sick 
Good work there people - Brexit is falling apart but will need help along the way for the reversal Britain needs  
German government advisers says Brexit should be prevented due to its “far-reaching impact”  
“BREXIT: What must be avoided and what must be done, now!” – Speech at the Royal Society, London, 7 NOV 2017  
The Government must stop this farce and release the Brexit studies in full. Sign our petition on our website!  
Remember folks:  According to the media, it's only a referendum on Trump if the Democrat wins, if the Republican wins Trump had nothing to do with it. 
#Brexit: European Parliament says Britain's new offer on EU #citizensrights is inadequate. 
JPMorgan chiefs warn May of French Brexit raid on City jobs  
Voters were massively misinformed on major issues before the #Brexit referendum, in every case in favour of #Leave. John Major said it would be deceitful if a vote for Brexit was based on inaccurate information.#StopBrexit 
Aha! I understand now: May is not an impotent incompetent PM surrounded by egotistical idiots but is secretly a PR Genius Who is deliberately distracting UK from economic suicide of Brexit aided by the self sacrifice of the Brexiteers Boris & Patel   
Another sign of public's shift against Brexit. However May & Corbyn don't seem to want to follow public mood!We need to #exitfrombrexit 
Defence Sec resignedUnqualified obscurantist appointedForeign Sec endangered life of a UK citizen abroadInt. Dev Sec involved in political sleaze (and is probably being sacked as I tweet this)BrexitTalk about head in the clouds...  
.@Nigel_Farage has a long list of good Brexit business news you probably won’t hear anywhere else  
.@realDonaldTrump Yesterday's MASSIVE Democrat victories are a referendum on your horrendous/disastrous job as @POTUS. #deplorables 
You lost the popular vote by 3 million votes, your current approval rating is 33%, you’re starting to lose your base, and last night there was a complete referendum on your presidency as the @GOP got shellacked. Keep bragging Donnie! #TrumpDenial #TrumpFail #TrumpCorruption 
Our nature and the environment laws are at risk from Brexit. You can help by emailing your MP now:  
first rule of politics: every election is a referendum on bernie sanders or hillary clinton 
A Conservative, pro-Israel, Brexit campaigner in the Cabinet. Suddenly #bbc News rediscovers the importance of the Ministerial Code! 
I may be slow off the mark, but is the nature of Brexit ‘debate’ moving away from “you thick feckless morons” and towards “You were a duped foot soldier. Not your fault. Let’s nail the generals and fix this”. #FBPE 
Patel is someone who voted against gay marriage, who dog whistles on immigration and who promoted various lies during the EU referendum campaign. She is intellectually lacking and a shameless populist. To say I'll savour her sacking would be an understatement. 
I share your concern, @BBCNews is now totally out of control, absolutely no attempt to provide a balance. Relentless and gleeful, anti-government, anti-#Brexit propaganda.  
I voted Brexit because I believe it will raise wages for the low paid. Now tell me, dear Remainers, what’s wicked about that?  
People, I'm shakin all over in anticipation of this Saturday's @Gwentforeurope event in #Newport. Gonna be a heck of a gig in the old church hall, book early to avoid disappointment (it's free)!  #Brexit #StopBrexit #WednesdayWisdom #EU #Remain #Wales 
#Labour need to take stock #Brexit policy + change course. Evidence in public domain now re: Legatum, Russian £, ParadisePapers, BrexitPapers, EU citizen insecurity, no planning, lies, fear + hatecrimes rise.  We need financial security to rebuild public services @Keir_Starmer 
Ni Brexit ni Catexit: SPEXIT! “The Spanish should voluntarily leave the EU..." 
Simon Stevens is right to demand promised NHS Brexit funds says @KailashChandOBE #PulseViews 
So let me get this right: #brexit doesn't have a risk assessment but that's not the scandal. #boris has condemned a UK citizen to 5 more years in Iran, but wait #damiengreen, but hang on there's #PritiPatel, and Theresa May is definitely strong & stable but can't sack anyone. 
Much of the Brexit-resistance is coming from the so-called "centrists" whilst the Left seems to have a Bennite/Lexit obsession with pushing ahead with hard Brexit.  
Notice 'Dogger'. The Dogger Bank: fully two-thirds of which sits INSIDE British Territorial Waters. Germany, Holland and Denmark plan an island on it, surrounded by wind turbines: a serious breach of UK territorial sovereignty post-Brexit, and damaging to our fishing industry.  
The sad thing is people with relatives and friends who are ill voted for Brexit on the basis of this... and look at the reality they face.  
Have we really got to the point where Remainers need to threaten politicians in order to level the political playing field? The security services must treat these threats as terrorism, and act accordingly  #StopBrexit #Brexit /2 
#PritiPatel is not the biggest story of the day. It's a great distraction for #brexiteers who should be held to account on the disgusting failure to publish #BrexitReports #58Studies #brexit #brexitshambles 
Riots predicted if #Brexit is cancelled, really?More likely to be riots if it goes ahead as the already disadvantaged get poorer and cannot feed themselves anymore. They will have nothing left to lose#Brexit is perfect breeding ground for civil unrest 
Thank you @GuyVerhofstadtLet's put #PeopleB4Politics and deliver the #Brexit @LeaveEUOfficial/@michaelgove promise :"There will be no change for EU citizens already lawfully living in the UK, they will automatically be granted indefinite leave to remain and nothing will change" 
When these bastards are finally forced from power we should officially drop Great from Britain as a lasting reminder of the time they attempted to grind ordinary people into the ground. 
With 86% of the cabinet being #remainers, all seated around the table pretending they love this country? but infact they are undermining #Brexit #Ministers at every opportunity! This #PM needs to get a grip! #BREXIT means #LEAVE understand @theresa_may? GET ON WITH IT! #BBC #SKY 
DO NOT underestimate Mrs May's strong, blinkered sense of duty: "You narrowly chose Brexit even though it is impossible, so we must now destroy the country to deliver it" 
 'Referendum' is trending in response to Election Day 2017. 
I'm not generally one for calling for opponents of Brexit to be fired but CEO of NHS should not be making political interventions. He must go. 
Brits don't have faith in Theresa May's Brexit - no one voted for the Brexit we're getting.  
BREXIT ALREADY DELIVERING HIGHER WAGES   
Much hubris on the Patel story from the left, surely wouldn't have ANYTHING to do with their general widespread hatred of #Israel or #Brexit, no, not at all 
Brilliant FT piece on 759 treaties we’ll have to renegotiate because of Brexit. Government isn’t remotely up to job.  
Another #Brexit Tory MP defending Priti Patel on the BBC news..they don't give a toss about Parliament or its rules. Absolute pond life. 
Theresa May has taken most of a week to NOT sack Priti Patel.  Good luck with having a Brexit before most Brexit voters are dead  
UK agreement to PESCO is on the table this month as a condition for moving on to Brexit trade talks in December.Most MPs don’t understand. 
This is the scheming #Remainer @AmberRuddHR who is behind the attempted removal of her rival @patel4witham! #AmberRudd has been jostling for position to take over from @theresa_may for months! #NEWS #SKY #BBC #UK #EU #Conservatives #ConservativeParty @Conservatives #MP #BREXIT  
.@woodlandsandrew  Wages up: Jobs up. More good news for Brexit Britain  
The Government must stop this farce and release the Brexit studies in full, writes @MollyMEP 
Coherent, compelling, clear - @exitthelemming on Brexit and arts workers. If you didn't know anything about the industry you'd have been informed and convinced after this interview.  
Someone tell me why @UKLabour is pro #Brexit, the most reactionary, illiberal, xenophobic policy ever foisted on the British people by super rich tax dodgers. 
POLL: Question - NHS or Brexit - you can't have both!1) Choose NHS = you want NHS under public owenership, continued investment, & UK to Remain in EU.2) Choose Brexit = NHS will be sold & privatised in a US Trade dealPlse RT widely to increase vote 
After years of betrayal with mass immigration and mad PFI contracts, it's time for our political class to do the right thing and give Brexit Britain the properly funded health service it deserves! 
This Great Lady put her Country first and supported #BREXIT & 17,410,742 people who voted to leave the corrupt #EU! We must support #PritiPatel @patel4witham as #Tory #Remainer #MP's are trying to get rid of her! #NEWS #SKY #BBC #UK #EU #Conservatives #ConservtiveParty 
Unfucknbelievable Tory Brexshit  Minister David Davis admits Brexit Impact Study (excruciating detail) was a ‘Hoax’ pic.twitter.com/QoWtWIE13G 
#PritiPatel is also the fool who spearheaded the "Brexit Will Save Our Curry Houses" campaign  
There is an ongoing campaign by #TORY #Remainer MP's within the @Conservatives to get rid of all #Brexit #Ministers in the #Cabinet! We must support @BorisJohnson & @patel4witham against this attempted #TORY #Remainer coup! #NEWS #SKY #BBC #UK #EU #Conservatives #ConservtiveParty 
Mark Noble, Joe Hart & Stuart Pearce at the same club.Brexit means brexit. 
HARD BREXIT BACKROOM STAFF INCOMING 
It's not just Priti Patel though is it? We have Gauke not defending #uc, Hammond not defending #ParadisePapers tax avoidance, Davis with his phantom brexit studies, Johnson and his constant gaffs. And then there's Theresa May. What actually works? #Toryshambles 
“This is what happens when the people vote.” Yes. And if you were too lazy, apathetic or complacent to vote in 2016, you are to blame for Brexit (if British) Trump (if American).     
Civil servants are leaving in droves because of Brexit  
GOP @RepScottTaylor admits that the Democratic sweep in #Virginia was a response to #Trump"Last night was a referendum."KEEP UP THE PRESSURE#FlipItBlue 
Eight teachers in Catalonia are reportedly under investigation for "hate speech" for criticizing police violence during the independence referendum.  
Even though only one federal office was on the ballot yesterday, anyone who says this wasn't a referendum on Trump is desperately lying. 
A significant moment as Brexit rhetoric collides with reality and EU Withdrawal Bill returns to Parliament next week  
New Def Sec was heavily Remain. He'll continue committing UK to EU common defence post-#Brexit unless we keep publicising it. MPs must be told. MSM must start reporting on this. Watch for our new DefSum in coming days!  
BREXIT: The European Parliament just told Britain its offer on EU citizens isn't good enough / #EU #Brexit  
An equal UnionOne in which we're getting Brexit even although we voted Remain.One in which get the Tories even although we never vote for themOne in which we get another country squanderering our assets. Don't make me laugh. 
"Britain will be economically better off post Brexit":Agree: 37% (-6)Disagree: 40% (+5)via @ORB_Int, 05 NovChanges with October.First crossover in poll series. 
Some are calling the loss of Ed Gillespie in Virginia as a referendum against @realDonaldTrump. I disagree. Gov McAuliffe Allowed felons to vote & Gilespie didn’t embrace our President’s values. Sad.  
Make no mistakeNov 7, 2017 was a referendum on Trump, the GOP, their racist and bigoted agenda America stood up and said NO!  
Norwegian Minister of EEA & EU affairs @maritrosland spoke at thinkthank @iiea in Dublin today on Norway's relationship with EU after #Brexit  
Didn't David Mundell admit those Brexit impact papers existed at a Holyrood Select Committee meeting? Does that mean he lied to the Scottish Parliament? #BrexitPapers 
This is why they don't want us to see the Brexit Impact Papers.  
Regardless of #PritiPatel's recent actions, I'll always have the upmost respect for her for believing our great country & campaigning passionately for #Brexit. Conviction is a rare quality in politics these days. The Cabinet needs reformers with great ideas to shape our future. 
NHS boss demands £350m promised by Brexit-buses  
The British government is in the midst of a nervous breakdown #PritiLittleLiar #Brexit #WhipsOffice #DamienGreen #DUP #StrongandStable #May #BorisJohnson oops running out of characters... 
Brexit: Parliament outlines its red lines on latest UK citizens rights proposals“We don’t recognise reports suggesting deal on citizens' rights  is almost finalised. There are still major issues that have to be  resolved," @GuyVerhofstadt Press release  
No faking injuries so they can go home and play on the Zbox with Hard Brexit Harry Maguire and Jamie Vardy. Tough men, doing their duty for England. I did the same when I served in Northern Ireland 
WATCH | The fake news media laughed at Trump for fighting the establishment - just like Brexit. One year ago, THE PEOPLE humiliated them!   
NHS England's boss says the public want the £350m promised to the NHS by Vote Leave during the EU referendum to be "honoured".  
So, lesson for UK Govt. Denmark really has an Impact Assessment on Brexit & has published it voluntarily. #Brexitshambles 
Progress towards a #Brexit deal on citizen's rights remains inadequate. Citizens were promised nothing would change. UK gov't now needs 25 paragraphs to explain how lives will change. Unacceptable! Full statement:  
Republicans beat their chests and claimed Obama was a tyrant. That they believe the will of the people  should rule.But have no issues with a Republican Governor blatantly ignoring a referendum.  
Nope. A referendum is binding. The legislature could veto it, but Republicans control the House by one vote -- that's unlikely. LePage also does not have authority to veto this, but he'll certainly try like hell to not implement it. 
Tim. Tim.Tim Martin. Have you heard the news? #Brexit is INCREASING the price of beer, NOT lowering it!!! You may want to replace your Wetherspoon's beermats with some of our's    
The Maine Republican governor has vetoed Medicaid expansion five times, and he continues to oppose it despite Tuesday's referendum.  
That's not how it works in this case; states could refuse the expansion, initially. This is a big deal because it's a ballot referendum - popular vote of the people to expand those services. 
Yesterday WAS a referendum on Trump.It WAS a barometer of Democratic engagement.It WAS a bellwether for the nation.Believe these things and make them true. 
Britain has 10 times more to lose than Germany by leaving the EU without a deal, report says  
Virginia GOP Rep. Scott Taylor says Tuesday night's election result was a referendum on President Trump  
"The government is locked into a Brexit death spiral of its own making, and is hurtling willingly towards a catastrophic no deal scenario. Like any friend who goes off the rails, it needs an intervention by loved ones to get it out of its cycle of harm."  
Irish PM has said it's 'likely' that EU leaders will give the go-ahead for Brexit talks to proceed to the next phase when they meet in December. 
Republican Rep. Scott Taylor on the Democratic sweep in Virginia: "Last night was a referendum." (via CNN)  
Tear yourself away from flighttracker! EU side warming up for latest Brexit talks.... a handy ready reckoner of where they think we need to budge...  
We want our Brexit cash boost - NHS boss Simon Stevens  
Negotiations resume w/ #UK tomorrow & Fri. More progress needed on 3 key topics, discussed today with @CommonsEUexit @hilarybennmp #Brexit  
The elite would 'love' another referendum - we wonder why?   
Rep. Scott Taylor, a Republican from Virginia, says the Democrats' victory in his state was a referendum on Trump  
Masoud Barzani said the mistake was not holding the referendum earlier  
READ | Wetherspoons boss Tim Martin has totally exposed the Remoaner lies about a so-called "cliff edge" Brexit. A voice of sanity! 
Dear 52%, when you look at Michael Gove, Boris Johnson, Jacob Rees-Mogg, Liam Fox, Nigel Farage and other Brexit spokesmen, do they strike you as having the interests of regular British people at heart? 
Merkel and Macron’s shock BREXIT BLOCK: Germany and France demand HALT on talks  
No cabinet meeting. No #PMQs. Ministers going rogue. Multiple MPs facing sexual harassment allegations. Brexit analysis doesn't actually exist. Brexit bill is getting higher. Queen using tax haven. Austerity killing the most vulnerable. This is an utter shit storm. 
Boris and Priti should be promoted and made to own the utter shitshow that is Brexit. That would be true punishment  
EU citizens will face much tougher new deportation laws if they commit crimes in the UK after Brexit  
We are extremely grateful for your support of the 2017 school bond referendum! Thank you!  
German government advisers says Brexit should be prevented due to its “far-reaching impact”  
"On every measure it's worked out well" says Hannan on Brexit. Er *every* measure? National purchasing power? Inward investment? NHS & university retention & recruitment? Euratom? European Medicines Agency? Growth in 2017? *Every measure*? The replies to the video are gold.  
Large group of my mother’s friends - all in their 70s & 80s - while visiting my mother in hospital just before last year’s referendum, each told me they voted to Leave so the NHS could get the extra £350m a week  
They say one lie begets another. This Govt is now so wrapped up in its Fantasy Brexit world it's difficult to believe anything they say. We have #NoConfidence 
And yesterday the country offered a historic referendum to him and you. Have a good day with that. 
ICYMI (for those who still think that the prospect of #Brexit is not hurting the #economy ): 
The Government must stop this farce and release the Brexit studies in full, writes @MollyMEP 
What a dishonest bunch we’ve got running affairs right now. Time for an entirely new government & politics.#PritiPatel#Brexit  
the Wetherspoon's boss is literally a giant sentient gammon imbued with the spirit of Brexit.  
Wetherspoon boss: No Deal is no problem for Brexit Britain  
Calling all those who have changed their mind re Brexit....Are you a #RemainerNow? Can you join @simonunion1 & tell us why?Please RT so we can show politicians #WillOfThePeople no longer applies & we need to #StopBrexit #FBPE @Anna_Soubry @UKLabour @BBCNews @thetimes @FT  
Britain WILL be able to deport EU criminals after Brexit, Government papers reveal  
#WednesdayWisdomVA is a tale of two strategies:the Uniter v. the Divider.Was it a repudiation of Trump?Was it a referendum on civility?We've done this legally.We've done this peacefully.We can also do it politely.#ResistanceUnited#BlueWave 
So the GOP lost Virginia and NJ last night but they also lost this 2 States in 2016 and Trump still won the presidencyTHIS NOT A REFERENDUM ON TRUMP, IT'S JUST 2 BLUE STATES. 
Context: Spain dissolved the Catalan parliament for staging a referendum and declaring independence from Madrid.  
It’s pie in the sky to think Brexit talks can move on in December | Jonathan Lis  
Rotten to the core. Read this in the context of Brexit and it gets worse.  
"No deal" Brexit would cost UK ten times more than Germany 
When even the Sun newspaper starts reporting on the perils of Brexit, something is most definitely up.  
The politics of guns are beginning to shift. We'll see tougher laws by referendum and by states, and in a future Congress at federal level.  
11am: NHS Chief makes £350m Brexit funding plea1pm: @Jeremy_Hunt arrives at No 10, for I presume, pre budget chat   
GOP Rep. Scott Taylor on the Democrat election night sweep: "I think last night was a referendum"  
Spain’s FM was recused yesterday by Spanish Parliament for lying to French media about Catalan educational system. Today he goes on lying on BBC: they're NOT considering possibility of allowing legal independence referendum. Just trying to show reasonable to international opinion 
Yes, it was a referendum on Trump: Reason for hope, a year after the catastrophe  
What an absolute mess the #PritiPatel debacle is. Regardless of who knew what when or who didn't know what they should have known, one thing is clear: this is a spectacular omnishambles from the people "managing" #Brexit including the most useless PM ever...  
Brexit should be prevented, say German Government advisers  
Prominent Brexiteer advises investors to avoid UK and invest in EU  #Brexit 
If you didn’t catch our Chair @exitthelemming  talking about Brexit's impact on the arts industry catch up now  
In 1975, The Spectator published Tony Benn's letter to his constituents explaining why he backed Brexit. Here it is  
BREXIT VOTE ALREADY DELIVERING AS WAGES INCREASEGreat news for British workers!      #fo2eu 
In the annals of human civilization, Brexit will go down in British history as every bit as significant as the Magna Carta and the Bill of Rights.  
Trade is about heft, in the end. Scale beats scientific argument. @alanbeattie VG here on realities UK faces on trade post Brexit. 
EU migrants have a positive effect on the Scottish economy - but what happens after #Brexit? 
GOP rep: Va. was "a referendum on this administration," faulting Trump's "divisive rhetoric" @jmartNYT @alexburnsNYT  
Liberals got their binky last night, saying the vote is a referendum on Trump. Whine on pink hats! Trump will be your president for 7 more years. #MAGA #ElectionDay #WednesdayWisdom 
This would be a nationwide referendum for Spain population -47 million people -to decide whether to make it legal to hold Catalan referendum  
PETITION: Stop the Common Fisheries Policy being adopted into UK law post-Brexit 
Meanwhile, in a parallel universe, the Brexit negotiations are going swimmingly. This is like something from a Soviet propaganda machine  
Yesterday the Brexit studies; today Priti Patel. There is so much deceit it is impossible to know where the truth lies, not to mention who is running the country 
The Twitter mobs gathering to see Priti Patel sacked are rather unedifying. She is a good and principled person and has made a great contribution to the Brexit cause. 
Grimsby seeks “Brexit exemption” for port industry despite voting 70% OUT #Brexit  
Wonder if the "we won, you lost" attitude will prevail when the public realise Brexit was driven by the "elite" who don't want the EU to curb tax avoidance in 2019? 
Virginia replaces one corrupt democrat with another corrupt democrat and the Media calls that a big win and a referendum against Trump. Virginia is an extension of DC. Nobody cares. Happy anniversary Mr. President. Hillary still LOST!!! 
Of course, £350m dividend yet another unicorn in the sky. Truth is Brexit will cripple NHS, not boost it. My piece:  
NHS England chief calls for Brexit campaign pledge of extra funding for health service to be honoured 
The extended character limit finally gives us opportunity to list all the benefits of Brexit. Here goes:1.... Erm.... there's er... well that thing with er.... ... the increase in er.... or the opportunity to..... erm.... Oh, nevermind.#BritishJam 
Nail on head, Brexit is a hard right Tory policy from beginning to end; what could any sensible person have in common with the people who promoted this emerging catastrophe...  
On ballot initiatives, voters in Maine easily approved a referendum to expand Medicaid for low-income adults. But in Ohio, a measure to limit the price on prescription drugs purchased by the state was defeated.  
Twitter reacts to Maine becoming 1st state to expand Obamacare by referendum  #p2 #ctl 
.@GarNob highlighting the groups of children left behind by the Referendum - children in homelessness, children with special educational needs and children on waiting lists for mental health services #5yearson 
Brexit Minister: Whose side are Labour on?  
This is a fascinating, sobering view from Geneva on the difficulties of Britain reviving multilateral liberalisation at WTO post-Brexit.   
Just as Brexit is not as it seems, so it appears that Priti Patel’s antics may not be as they seem...The electorate, the world, is being taken for a mighty ride by elites governing a power system that is rotten to its core. 
66% of Brits disapprove of the way @Conservatives​ are handling #Brexit talks in a new poll. It's at the lowest level since talks began.  
Vote Leave director admits they won because they lied to the public  #Brexit #Brex 
GOP lawmaker: Republicans losing in Virginia is a 'referendum' on Trump's presidency  
Despite voting out #Grimsby wants brexit exemption for its fishing industry. So they want to remain, right? #FBPE #StopBrexit 
Top professor SAVAGES 'dysfunctional' BrusselsBritain voted to leave a “dysfunctional and highly unpopular organisation”“Look at Spain. Look at Germany. Look at the whole of eastern Europe. Look at France, a very fragile political situation"#Brexit #EU 
Never forget this Conservative poster from 1992 warning you that getting out of the EU would cost 2.5 million jobs. #Brexit #brexitshambles 
Interesting video from the 1975 EU referendum. Backing Brexit: the Morning Star, Tony Benn and The Spectator.  
"We can't do a U turn on Brexit now, or people will lose all faith in politicians"Me: [Looks at all politics] "Yeah, I wouldn't worry about that" 
This is why this is not a referendum of Trump. Gillespie didn't fully embrace. This was a rejection of GOP Establishment not Trump  
The bullying #EU has (reports say) given the #UK a month to come up with a higher amount re. Brexit bill or no #Trade talks. Do you think UK should tell the EU to get lost & that the UK should end those talks & legislate for IMMEDIATE #Brexit ? Please vote in the poll below. 
The incompetence at this level is nerve wracking. The country is allegedly at a state of high alert and the PM doesnt know where the Caninet are. If there was a COBRA meeting MI6 would have to find them. And these people are negotiating Brexit? 
New @scotgov analysis highlights £4.4bn contribution of EU workers. They are welcome in our communities & workplaces - @scotgov will do all it can to protect EU citizens' right to remain in Scotland #Brexit #EUrwelcome 
READ | Brexit is already boosting starting salaries for British workers. They'll rise even higher once we control our borders! 
#MorningJoe just contradicted its own FALSE NARRATIVE that Virginia is a REFERENDUM on Trump and Bannon, by putting up this tweet! 
I don't understand what needs to happen for govt to collapse.  'Sleaze' lists of MPs Rich MPs evading tax Lying to public re reports Ministers gone rouge Imprisonment of UK nationals abroad due to Foreign Sec Diabolical Brexit negotiations  
Media: Gillespie race is really a referendum on DONALD TRUMP! Trump: Not really.Media: Why is everything always about YOU?!  
#MorningJoe is working the FALSE NARRATIVE that yesterday's results are a REFERENDUM ON @realDonaldTrump.Trump did not campaign with one candidate who lost yesterday. Plus, Virginia and New Jersey are BLUE STATES. 
No expert, but wouldn't it be better all around to simply remain in the EU? There's not one valid advantage to ordinary people just a whole host of disadvantages, such as jobs, costs, social standards and our environment. 
Some time in the near future there must be a major inquiry into how the country could have been put in the hands of such a bunch of shysters, chancers, liars, incompetents & charlatans as the present government.  /1#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Whose side are Labour on? Brexit Britain or the EU?  
Fox has confirmed Britain will free itself from EU regulations after Brexit to forge trade deals with the rest of the world  
Brexit vote already delivering as wages increase  
Apparently Pete Wishart has written to the Speaker outraged at a 3 week delay in releasing the Brexit Impact papers. I'm sure he was also outraged when the SNP had to be dragged through the courts to release the legal advice they didn't have on the EU. 
We haven't had a Government since Referendum Day and we won't have one again, until Brexit is stopped. Brexit consumes everything...#brexitshambles 
Leave liars knew there would be no Brexit dividend & that there is absolutely no prospect of greater funding for the NHS entirely due to Brexit.  
Our NHS has been trashed by government after government. They refuse to fund it properly while burdening it with uncontrolled mass immigration. We need to control our borders after Brexit, but let's give our health service the cash it needs NOW!  
If we have to have another GE, I’d like a 2nd ref on Brexit on the ballot paper at same time please. Thanks so very. 
Don’t vote Leave it will kill your local industryVotes LeavePlease help Brexit is killing our local industry 
I’m in favour of giving everyone in the country a brexit exemption.  
Punchy. @NHSEngland chief exec Simon Stevens, 2 wks b4 Budget, stands under Vote Leave poster + demands Brexit boost  
“The public should be offered an exit from Brexit.” @vincecable @LibDems 
Brexit exemption sought to avoid damage to Grimsby seafood trade.Maybe they should have thought about the consequences when they (mostly) voted for #Brexit#StopBrexit 
Brexit-torn Britain stumbles "from one crisis to the next"  
These 5 definitions of #Brexit went viral. It’s easy to see why.  
Liam Fox is right. We should be free from EU regulations after Brexit, and trade freely with the world. 
Well-paid jobs paying high rates of tax going from London to Paris. Thank you #Brexit#StopBrexit 
3/3 it’s now between those who support a Brexit based on needs of economy v hard Brexit no trade deal ideologists (a shrinking minority) 
The Brexit bots are back in force.  A shedload haven’t tweeted for a year. Invest the time in reporting them and their follow lists. 
We want our Brexit cash boost - NHS boss  
Steve Baker asked Labour to prove “whose side they are on” after demands for publication of sensitive Brexit papers  
Brextremist Priti Patel was as truthful in high office as the Leave campaign was in the referendum. The £350m question is why isn't Boris Johnson sacked too? 
Labour and the EU are right on this. Labour are Wrong on Brexit. #ParadisePapers #FinalSay #Remain #Labour 
FREE TO DOWNLOAD: @BJSociology Special Issue on post-Brexit and Trump politics - a fantastic collection of papers edited by @nigelbdodd, @mlamont6 and @MikeSav47032563. How should we - as citizens and scholars - respond to these events? >>  
Democrat who called @realDonaldTrump 'a narcissistic maniac' & said the election for gov. of Virginia was a referendum on Trump has won. 
NEWS! David Davis nominated for Nobel Prize for Physics following discovery of ‘Schrödinger’s Brexit assessment’  
The Government must stop this farce and release the Brexit studies in full - the fab @mollymep 
We calculate that the EU's 'regulatory enthusiasm' has cost the UK economy 6% of GDP - cutting red tape is a key benefit of Brexit  
BREXIT WAGE RISE - Pay packets boosted- Less market saturation- Starting salaries see 2nd highest rise since 2015 
Done up like a kipper: Grimsby now seeking Brexit exemption despite voting overwhelmingly to LEAVE the EU  #Grimsby 
@TomballISD voters approved Bond 2017 – a $275 million bond referendum! Thank you for your support! #DestinationExcellence 
Unless we transfer or replicate function of up to 50 regulatory bodies that we will leave after Brexit we risk losing vital rights & protections as they become unenforceable. Will mean huge costs and reorganisation, and gov haven't got a clue: 
The state of the Tory government:-Brexit negotiation shambles-Non release of Brexit papers-Johnson, Patel & Green need sacking-Universal Credit shambles-No response to Paradise Papers-No response to sex scandals-Dire economy-Wage crisisEnough is enough.#NoConfidence 
Brexit is the filthiest con-trick in the history of the UK. Leave said what they needed to say to get the votes; now none of it is offered. 
David Davis picked a good week to reveal he lied about doing 58 sectoral Brexit impact reports, that's for sure. 
ZAHAWI: Labour Remoaners trying to take out Boris/Patel to bring down government and stop Brexit.  
2014: Andrea Leadsom's brother-in-law - a Guersey based banker gave £816k to the Tories and £1m to other right-wing causes Tory Tax Haven #Brexit#StopBrexit 
.@GKBhambra demonstrates that Trump and Brexit represent bourgeois reactionary whiteness, not working-class populism  
All the Brexit promises have collapsed - we're now left with lines like 'should be able to cope' and 'might get by'. The only way for UK to flourish is to #StopBrexit #r4today 
Having unauthorised meetings with foreign officials you say? #WednesdayWisdom #PritiPatel #Brexit  
Post BREXIT food & wine will become much cheaper.Why? Because we are leaving a tariff protected customs union.Get it yet BBC?  
Johnson & Patel were appointed due to their support for #Brexit and not on suitability for the job. It shows.  
Brexit: No one ever promised “£350m a week” to the NHS. The Leave campaign said we should save that amount to spend on our own priorities, like for example the NHS. 
Patel's replacement should be someone who 1.won't embarrass everyone 2.hasn't groped anyone. Their take on Brexit comes a distant third at this stage. 
Danish govt #Brexit report on fishing is - conveniently - in English. 45% of their annual catch by volume is from UK waters   
There's no way to view tonight as anything but a referendum on Trumpismand in some places--#Philly, #VAGov. #NJGov, a rout.If we maintain momentum, 2018 will get us the House and our womanspeaker back. #Election2017  
***So*** many reasons to share this pic of Priti and Boris in front of the Brexit bus of NHS lies this morning #r4today 
Just a reminder that @David_Cameron held the EU referendum to bring harmony and stability to the Conservative party. Going well.  
This is good, necessary counterpoint to claims that Brexit/Trump were mostly/mainly driven by "left behind"/"white working class"  
This week:Scottish Government  Apologies to gay men  Landmark child poverty legislationBritish Government  More Brexit shambles  Tax avoidance scandal  Rogue cabinet Remind me again who isn't doing the day job, @RuthDavidsonMSP? 
PM must stop the Brexit clock. Withdraw Article 50 letter and take stock of the situation. Otherwise this will end badly.  
Percentage DROP in number of EU nurses coming to UK since #Brexit:96%Actually, that needs repeating:96%!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! 
UK happiness and well-being rises after Brexit  
Sweeties, you voted leave. With 70%  Brexit exemption sought for Grimsby seafood trade  
NI facing unwanted direct rule after negotiations fail. Don’t assume people always reach mutually beneficial arrangements Mrs May. #Brexit 
Today our Chief Exec Simon Stevens will call on Government to live up to #Brexit campaign promises for NHS funding 
Could Labour please start to reflect reality that Brexit government strategy is being driven by the hard right? People we exist to OPPOSE 
As the facts about Russian involvement in Brexit emerge (thanks to FBI and a few UK journos such as @J_amesp & @carolecadwalla) there's danger in thinking only Remainers were shafted. They weren't. Both sides were lied to, for reasons that were not in the interests of either. 
As #Brexit slowly judders into reality, civil servants are leaving in droves  
The superb Parisian building where 300 Bank of America traders will be relocated from London (bank planning up to 1,000) #Brexit  
As the PAYE public’s outrage at the #ParadisePapers grows, the government votes against an EU crackdown on tax dodgers. The Brexit Gov are out of touch. #finalSay #Remain 
The Brexit vote has caused a significant rise in prices, especially food  
Britain's prime minister, Theresa May, faces more trouble —and this time it's neither Brexit nor sleaze  
Brexit: No one ever promised “£350m a week” to the NHS. The Leave campaign said we should save that amount to spend on our own priorities, like for example the NHS. 
If Remainers were capable of subtley engineering Boris and Priti's travails they'd surely have smashed the referendum  
We are in the midst of a concerted effort to systematically target and remove Brexiteers from government by Remainers and a pro-EU London-based broadcast media. Looks like the long-term plan is to replace May with Corbyn and reverse Brexit. 
Remember that bus? The NHS should get the money promised during the #Brexit vote, head of NHS England to say  
If Grimsby get it, can I have an exemption from Brexit too please? 
Or, another Brexit slogan bites the dust. With Fallon, Johnson & Patel as our international face,  #GlobalBritain isn't working a treat. 
My piece in today's @TheScotsman on how Brexit can - and must - be delivered in a way that fully respects devolution  
Wednesday morning #FakeNewsMedia agenda. 1. Smear Prince Charles 2. Get Priti Patel sacked. 3. Undermine Boris. 4. Push the EU negotiating position on Brexit. 
“We want our Brexit cash boost - NHS boss” - totally agree with the NHS’ Simon Stevens /1  
Keep retweeting this. A lot of people need to be educated about the architects of this booby-trapped building called Brexit. And fast.  
The gross failures in transparency, accountability, integrity & competence in the government's Brexit approach have seeped into wider govt affairs. Patel & Johnson can't remain in office. 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Spanish Court summons for Catalan teachers after class debate on Catalan referendum #1O# 
The real cheats & scammers.Not Benefit fraud = £1.2bnTAX EVASION = £120bnIt's the same liars who sold you "Brexit" so they could keep evading tax, the EU is bringing in harsh new anti tax avoidance laws in 2019 that would have stopped them dodging 
Excoriating (but unsurprising) summary by former FCO head of waning Brit foreign policy/influence since Brexit vote.  
Simon Stevens will say trust in democratic politics won't be strengthened if public told higher NHS funding not possible because of Brexit 
“Abandon ship  Tories are melting!” Theresa May Toxic Tory Govt in “Meltdown” Priti Patel gone rogue Brexit Hoax!  
Simon Stevens will say public expects referendum pledge for £350 mill extra per week for NHS to be honoured - speech  at NHS Providers conf 
If you read one thing today, please let it be this.Brexit is about tax avoidance.Everything else is a side show.#ParadisePapers #PanamaPapers #Remain #ExitBrexit #StopBrexit 
Mind you, maybe all 58 sectoral analyses could fit into a 280 character tweet. #Brexit 
Unfucknbelievable Tory Brexit Minister David Davis admits the Brexit Impact Study (excruciating detail) was a ‘Hoax’pic.twitter.com/QoWtWIE13G 
GOP lawmaker: Republicans losing in Virginia is a 'referendum' on Trump's presidency  
My wives in 280 characters- wed Cath of Aragon- 0 male heirs- Brexit, annul- wed Anne Boleyn- 0 male heirs- behead- wed Jane S- male heir!- Jane dies ugh!- wed Anne of Cleves- she ugly- annul- wed K Howard- K shags servant- behead- wed Cath Parr- I die of boredom 
Acceptable? Cartoons of Remainers assaulting Brexiteers? Jamie Foster on the Nasty, Divisive New European @1jamiefoster #neweuropean #brexit #csm 
1. Investigator says Rajoy took kickbacks2. Catalan govt organized a referendumWho is in jail/exile with assets frozen?#Spain 
NUMBER ONE ISSUE ACROSS STATES? Access to healthcare. In Maine, a referendum on expanding Medicaid under the Affordable Care Act, against the governor’s wishes who vetoed it 5 times has become the law. Voter overwhelmingly approved a ballot to expand Medicaid. 
This wasn’t fake newsThere was no voter fraudIt was a referendum on TrumpAnd it was an old-fashioned shellacking 
Did I just hear @BBCr4today use the word "Remoaner"? England is happier, "Remoaners" are starting to relax about Brexit? Rubbish! #StopBrexit #Remain Never "relax" about Brexit. #ExitBrexit 
NHS boss: £350m Brexit promise must be honoured  
May’s Toxic Tory Govt in “Meltdown” Priti Patel gone rogue, David Davis Brexit Hoax!! Bozo Funeral Phil and Liam the chlorinated chicken Fox  
House of Commons Speaker Bercow to consider contempt allegations over UK Govt Brexit impact assessments non-release  
We want our Brexit cash boost - NHS boss  
Liberals are going to try to cast this as a referendum on Trump. It isn’t. It’s a referendum on politics as usual, just like 2016, but this time we gave people an alternative and they SHOWED UP for it 
Maine Voters Expand Medicaid Coverage In Referendum  #mepolitics 
VA GOP Rep @Scotttaylorva: @EdWGillespie Loss 'Referendum on #Trump Administration, Divisive Rhetoric' 
Voters approve $253 million bond referendum, tax ratification election; #buiLTstrong17 
Don't forget about Maine voting by referendum to expand access to Medicaid under the Affordable Care Act 
In Virginia and New Jersey and elswhere Democrats win in a referendum on Trump#TheResistance #MAGA #Trump #FoxNews #Resist #ImpeachTrump 
I knocked doors in Virginia for 3 months. This was ABSOLUTELY a referendum on trump's presidency. Trump and Gillespie are NOT VIRGINIA. trump and @GOP BEWARE! 
GOP lawmaker: Republicans losing in Virginia is a 'referendum' on Trump's presidency  
Anybody with a brain cell knows who the real traitors are in the #brexitshambles The same people who covet tax avoiders and operate austerity UK. 
Trump lost Va to a candidate with high negatives. Northam had lower negatives. Seems logical D's would benefit making it a referendum on Trump. 
Tonight wasnt just a win by @TheDemocrats. Tonight saw huge wins by women, Latinos, African-Americans, and members of the LGBT community. Our massive wins are a referendum on the hate & discrimination pushed by Trump & his fans. Remember: love trumps hate, Dems! #StrongerTogether 
With all precincts reporting, we are excited to announce the Hopkins referendum has passed! Thank you for your support in building for the future, advancing the innovation, and continuing the excellence! #HopkinsPride 
#ElectionDay was a referendum on Trump, no matter what he claims. He went all-in with Gillespie and got his ass handed to him. 
DNC Chair Tom Perez: Tonight's election a "referendum"   
Ed Gillespie ran on Trump’s divisive issues. Trump endorsed, tweeted in favor of & made robo calls for Gillespie in Virginia. Trump immediate is trying to not be blamed for this loss, but this was a referendum against Trump & Trumpism.  
You know what this trend reminds me of? Brexit.  
If Ed Gillespie is a NeverTrumper & he didn't embrace Trump's America First Agenda, his loss is a referendum on Trump's success. 
A GOP rep called tonight a referendum on Trump. They're freaking out.  
Don't let Orange Hitler or his disgraced adviser Rummy McNazi tell you this wasn't a referendum on the Trump agenda. It was. And they got their asses kicked. 
I believe they're calling this largest victory for a Dem in VA governor's race ever. Or in modern times. And don't let Trumpians say this isn't a referendum. Over weekend, Bannon said this absolutely is a referendum on Trump. 
A huge story: the tectonic shift to the politics of Medicaid (1st time voters expand it thru referendum) & criminal justice (Krasner's transformative run in Philly). 
Just in: Maine becomes first state to expand Medicaid by referendum 
BREAKING: Maine voters expand Medicaid in statewide referendum seen as bellwether for support for the Affordable Care Act. 
GOP congressman from Virginia calls tonight's election "a referendum on the administration"  
w/42% counted in Maine referendum on Medicaid expansion, yes is leading no by 57%-43% 
In addition to NJ and VA, a referendum in favor of expanding Medicaid — opposed by GOP Gov Paul LePage — is up big tonight in Maine. 
Rep. SCOTT TAYLOR, Va. Beach Republican, calls election a repudiation of the White House: "I do believe that this is a referendum on this administration"Taylor faults Trump's "divisive rhetoric," calls on POTUS to engage in "self-reflection" 
Republican U.S. Rep. Scott Taylor of Virginia Beach: "“I don’t know how you get around that this was a referendum on the president...The divisive rhetoric from the top contributed to a very high turnout." 
Before the race was even called, Gillespie aides were privately telling CNN this election was "a referendum on Donald Trump"  
No, Today's Virginia Election is NOT a Referendum on Trump Virginia Has Elected A Democrat At Every Position State Wide For 7 Years 
winning VA Gov and House of Delegates, NJ Gov and Maine Medicaid referendum would have very large governance implications for Democrats and their priorities 
Pundits will probably overinterpret campaign approaches. In fact, it was just a good night for Dems, a harsh referendum on Trump  
“A referendum on Donald Trump and his presidency...”  
Our country & it’s sorry excuse for a government are in a squalid mess because of Brexit. 
The results out of Virginia should be a lesson for many of our Dem challengers. It's a Trump referendum and he got his ass kicked. 
Republican Party-Tonite is a referendum on Trump. If you let this bigoted #PutinPuppet stay in office we will take care of biz in Nov 2018! 
People in New Jersey hate @ChrisChristie. That’s why Democrats took the state back.Trump lost VA and it leans Democrat, that’s why Northam won.Not a referendum on Trump! Not even close! 
Big night for Democrats! Northam wins Virginia and Murphy wins New Jersey. This is a referendum on Trump. #ElectionNight2017 #BlueWave 
IT IS A REFERENDUM AGAINST TRUMP! Way to GO, Virginia! 
The Falls Church City Public Schools extends its sincerest appreciation to our community for overwhelmingly supporting the referendum approved this evening to fund the upcoming George Mason High School Campus Project.  
Congratulations are in order for Ralph Northam! After a long battle for the Virginia governorship, the Democrat has defeated Republican challenger Ed Gillespie in what in a race that is considered a national referendum on Trump. 
Devastating video from @CNN. This quote from a senior Republican adviser is... wow. "Total Dem sweep. Crushing numbers. It. Is. Over. This is a referendum on Donald Trump and his presidency."  
CNN: Gilespie advisor calling it a sweep for Dems, a referendum on Donald Trump. 
"Almost all of the predictions of woe that we were given during the [#Brexit] campaign have turned out to be nonsense." @danieljhannan 
Dems are having a great night!  I believe Northam's strength in VA was a referendum on @realDonaldTrump. The Resistance is alive and well! 
This election is turning into yet another referendum on takes and the takes are losing. 
Beware Confident National Lesson-Taking from the VA race, though both sides have framed it as a referendum on the effectiveness of Trumpism. 
Brexiters are pushing the line that people are going after Johnson and Patel because they were leading figures for #Brexit. Have heard this across three news programmes tonight.Here's an alternative exlanation: Brexit campaign was led by liars and LIARS EVENTUALLY GET CAUGHT. 
New figures show that we're HAPPIER after our #Brexit #vote - and that's including all the whinging #Remoaners!   #BBC #SKY #NEWS #UK #EU #RT #TORY #LABOUR #UKIP 
Reminder: Priti Patel said the "British are the worst idlers in the world"#StopBrexit #Brexit  /1  
.Bloody Banks & Bankers, eh?Brexit "may force them to quit UK & start moving THOUSANDS of jobs overseas in near future". 
.@nadhimzahawisome says anger at Priti Patel is due to "Labour Remoaners" thinking U-turn on Brexit is possible without Brexiteers in govt  
Meanwhile on a parallel earth, Ed Miliband is Prime Minister, Brexit never happened, and Twitter reduces its character limit to 12. 
Wall Street banks share Brexit fears and warn UK jobs could move overseas – report  
People have knocked conspiracy theorists for years. It’s now plain to see. Britain is divided between the tax avoiding, Brexit loving rich people and the rest of us. The rich will do what’s necessary to hold on to their wealth. Brexit is their tool. 
Congrats @theresa_may today getting Tube carriage of strangers talking about shambles of govt and how #Brexit must be stopped. Astonishing 
Brexit can be stopped. Brexit must be stopped. Brexit will be stopped. 
Brexiteer MPs seek to suggest multiple government woes all the result of “Remoaners” seeking to sabotage Brexit. Not a good look 
Wednesday's FT: "Wall St banks warn Trump team over rising fears of Brexit chaos" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @MsHelicat) 
(2) But! - once the lunacy of Brexit is stopped, we can clean the Augean stables of our political order, & get our democracy back on track. 
(1) We’re in an unbelievable situation. Utterly dysfunctional government, useless opposition, Brexit lunacy: a very bad time in our history. 
EU nurses leaving NHS - Brexit or the language test? Errrr... Brexit. Here's why.  
#Brexit provides an opportunity for a deeper Anglo-American alliance—watch Daniel Hannan's full speech today:  
This weak and incompetent government are letting down Britain every day and will fail to deliver a good Brexit deal.Stand aside, call an election and let Labour get on with the job.  
€ 220,000,000 is the cost of the Spanish policial forces occupying Catalonia to avoid the referendum https://t.co/mfR88OVhx0?amp=1  
Should the sneaky plans of Remoaners work & Brexit is scuppered.Democracy dies, chaos ensues, UK will burn.This is not rocket science. 
I see @Anna_Soubry refers to the "wishes of her constituents" in WM today.Not so worried, when trying to scupper #Brexit.54.6% voted for Brexit in Broxtowe.Hypocrite. 
2011 riots, rise of UKIP, rise of food banks, pay in free fall, productivity flat, Brexit vote promised, rise of SNP. Whatever you say!   
Virginia's governor race is traditionally seen as a referendum on a president's first year in office  #vagov 
for the sake of Daily Mail readers and Brexit voters. This is the issue, not immigrants or bendy bananas. You've been had by the Brexit and English elite.  
And David Davies for misleading Parliament re #brexit impact studies 
Davis is like a child trying to lie its way out of stealing the chocolate, but with it smeared all over its face. Show us the #Brexit papers 
Brexit breakthrough: Liam Fox reveals 40 non-EU countries will make trade transition EASY  
Former WTO boss insists 'no deal' Brexit would NOT be HELL in snub to Brexit doom-mongers  
Tick Tock!Brexit: EU warns UK it has less than a month to make concessions  
Alex Salmond: UK Government silent over Catalonia for fear of Spanish reprisals at Brexit talks... @TheCommonSpace 
Brexit could force Wall Street to move thousands of jobs from London, big US banks told the Trump administration  
Good. But I have one that wld even make me love her, actually: walk out and announce Brexit is not going ahead because it would destroy UK.  
Wednesday's FT: Wall St banks warn Trump team over rising fears of Brexit chaos #tomorrowspaperstoday 
If you post tweets of more than 140 characters I'll assume you voted for Brexit. 
UN expert stresses that Catalans absolutely have the right to express themselves in a referendum #EU #Catalonia #eudk 
Today has shown more than ever there's a moral vacuum at the heart of Brexit. That's why I'm certain the British public now want rid of it. 
Is this true @davidallengreen the Brexit Impact Study was a Govt Hoax?!???  
That laid the foundations for Brexit  
"Why didn't you tell me all of this before?"The latest take on Brexit negotiations by @SKZCartoons 
don't trust Theresa the Appeaser to get a strong Brexit deal. it emerged she's willing to hand over £53bn of our money to Brussels,  
Britain Happier Despite Brexit  
Brits HAPPIER after Brexit vote: Well-being figures 'positive after deciding to leave EU'  
Today’s #TradeBill from @LiamFox seeks emergency powers to introduce trade deals by fiat - without any reference to Parliament! #Brexit 
Silver Creek if West Clark doesn't pass the referendum....  
Reasons for #Brexit:Something many Brexit leaders fervently desire:A US trade deal which privatises huge chunks of the #NHS.#StopBrexit 
Sorry Remainers, @Nigel_Farage has some more good Brexit news…  
Why hasn’t Labour tabled a Vote of No Confidence?  Could it be that Corbyn wants Brexit but also wants to blame May for it? #No Confidence 
It is fine for UK to Brexit EU and Catalonia to exit Spain but wrong for Coast to consider leaving Kenya. I miss Moi's tirade on wazungus. 
8 teachers charged with hatred crimes for discussions in class on Catalan Referendum  
Minister admits it will take up to 'three weeks' to publish secret Brexit studies  CLAIMS IT UNPATRIOTIC TO PUBLISH 
The real reason for Brexit. Rich people feathering their nests in cosy tax havens. Brexit to stop EU putting a stop to it.  
NEWS! Government claims Brexit Impact Studies are unavailable to public as they were ‘eaten by dog’  
Brexit is what would happen if your friend from school who was nice but never really got anywhere with work had a go at running Brexit.  
No competent Govt would select its Brexit position without quantitative impact assessments. This is no competent Govt, it is now a rogue one  
Could any of my followers who support the government on Brexit explain to me why this doesn’t suggest some sort of problem or deceit?  
This is why Farage wants Britain out of the EU, so we don't adopt the EU Anti-Tax Avoidance Directive. It's literally the reason for Brexit. 
And to use the appalling European Arrest Warrant to arrest political opponents in another EU state. #Brexit #Catalonia 
MILLIBAND,HEAD OF AN INTERNATIONAL SOROS FUNDED MIGRANT CHARITY - Earning aprox £500,000+ pa Calls BREXIT a Humiliation of Britain..  
Labour folks, this is a bitter pill but the Govt would collapse within hours of Corbyn being replaced with say Chuka Ummuna. #Brexit 
REVEALED: Hypocritical Labour rents its HQ from offshore firm statement shows  via @Your Brexit 
."Brexit weakens our hand on both sides of the Atlantic" - says former head of Foreign Office, Sir Simon Fraser . 
From Boris to Brexit.From PM to Priti.From #58Studies to query none.This government's contempt for truth, transparency & integrity. 
Trust us, says @DExEUgov, who can't get their story straight. Or do thorough Brexit #impactassessments.Irresponsible & incompetent? 
Brexit: EU warns UK it has 'less than a month' to make concessions  
"Australia’s priority is to trade with the EU" – Australian Foreign Minister on opportunities and impact of #Brexit  
SNP has reported the government to the Speaker for contempt of parliament for not passing Brexit assessments to @CommonsEUexit 
BBC's news tonight:- Trump is bad, (again)Brexit is bad, (again) Torys are bad (again). Why on earth are we paying for this 2nd rate sh1t. 
Heartbreaking. This is the reality of Brexit. The human cost of the stupid power games played by sociopaths out of their own greed.  
The rise in life satisfaction since the Brexit vote proves “Project Fear has been shown to be complete and utter balderdash,” argues @isaby 
May's "government" have abstained on the Universal Credit vote, the Brexit impact papers vote, cancelled their cabinet briefing, and (reportedly) tomorrow's PMQs. Has anyone told them they won the election and are meant to be governing? #NotFitForPurpose 
Taoiseach must ensure publication of every internal report on Brexit that has been produced by government and agencies #dail 
What's there to respect? A gerrymandered vote delivered though industrial scale lying & illegalities was contemptuous of the electorate. 
Brexit Britain’s slapdash approach to foreign policy - @FT View on Boris, Priti and a rudderless government  
#Brexit-ers want to replace the EU's regulatory partnership in which we have a large say, with regulatory rule from Washington.#StopBrexit 
The USA claims the EU is protectionist because the EU is big enough to refuse the imposition of US regulatory standards.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Despite terror attacks and Brexit uncertainly, Brits are the happiest they've been since 2011  
We hold elections to decide what type of country we want to be. So why can’t we vote on the final Brexit deal, which will define the UK? 
UK life satisfaction up post-Brexit  
So the studies don’t even exist. Let that sink in: The gov haven’t studied the impact of Brexit on different sectors of the economy. Wow!  
Voters don't trust Theresa the Appeaser to get a strong Brexit deal. She's too busy caving in to mad EU demands! 
Did narcissism and an unrealistic belief in national greatness lead to the successes of Donald Trump and Brexit?  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Voter confidence in UK handling of Brexit ebbs away - ORB poll.  
Either the government does have Brexit impact assessments. In which case publish. Or doesn’t. In which case mindblowingly incompetent 
Update on our case to force Government to hand over the secret Brexit studies.  
Poll: What will Brexit mean for the UK economy in the long run?  
The civil servants are undermining the effectiveness of Brexit, as we speak. Yet no-one in the UK government has the spine to fire the civil servants who are working against the interest of the British people as confirmed by a convincing majority at the EU Referendum in 2016. 
I am writing to the Speaker that the Gov't has held the House in contempt on the Brexit papers vote and am raising a Point of Order at 7. 
Brexit is good news for China, India and other EU countries but bad news for the Britain. EU companies plan to dump UK suppliers #StopBrexit 
The smirking, disdainful performance of Steve Baker when asked reasonable questions is typical of this #Brexit gov.  
'Cancelling' Brexit wouldn't stop it, but it would unleash political hell says @MrTCHarris 
Public turn against Brexit in latest poll for Telegraph. No one voted for the Brexit we're getting.  
Patel has shown that you can do anything in May's govt and get away with it - as long as you're a Brexit cheerleader  
Virginia's governor race is traditionally seen as a referendum on a president's first year in office  #vagov 
EU citizens with criminal records could be BARRED from staying after Brexit  
Brexit...do you ever get the impression that our WM government is just, well, making it all up as they go along? 
The thing is - Boris WANTS to be sacked. Then he gets to walk away from the Brexit shitshow he created & claim he'd have made it a success.. 
No current framework for flights between UK-EU post-Brexit. Gov. say it’ll all be fine, but have done nothing to clarify future arrangement. 
I don't remember state governor races being a referendum on President Obama.  Hmm... 
The Minister’s response was appalling.  Pathetic and authoritarian to question the patriotism of those who want info re Brexit.  
Labour haven’t the answer on Brexit, any more than the Tories have. The only answer to Brexit is to destroy it, before it destroys us. 
A clean Brexit will allow us to take back control of our own laws, unlike a bad EU transitional deal  
WATCH: @mtpennycook's Urgent Question about the publication of the Brexit impact papers.RT to share.  
Tony Benn correctly identified the nature of the EU in 1996.#Brexit  
Tony Benn on what he thought of Heath and Parliament's activities in 1972 taking us into the EEC......#Brexit  
Voters in New Jersey and Virginia to choosing new governors. It could be an early referendum on Trump.  
This is the worst thing about Brexit Britain. Satire has become reality so there's nothing to replace it 
Brexit allows for the UK to form much closer ties with important countries around the world, says IDS on the @daily_politics 
.@Varneyco: "If the Democrats win, the media will say 'it's a referendum on President Trump.' If Republicans win, the news will be buried."  
Important; 2013 is when Russian interest in UKIP and #Brexit Tories became a fully fledged recruitment campaign  
‘Some misunderstanding’: @DavidDavisMP now says #Brexit reports don’t exist. Read and share @Jon_Danzig’s report:  
Leavers have yet to grasp that trying to do a good job at implementing #Brexit is like trying to fly by flapping your hands.#StopBrexit 
Christie said he voted for @KimGuadagnoNJ, and that he doesn't think 2017 is a referendum on his tenure  
Most Leavers have yet to grasp that the govt's poor performance is what happens when you try to carry out a project based on lies.#Brexit  
Brexit fails to dent UK as a top place to do business   
If the Brexit impact assessments "don't exist", the next question is why not? Surely we need them in order to plan  
Key Brexit Bill published today - the Trade Bill - text here -  
Any other day, we'd all be saying David Davis should be sacked for lying about having done 58 sectoral Brexit impact reports. 
Brexit refreshes the statistics other news cannot reach  
Theresa May’s Brexit approval ratings just hit an all-time low  
BBC News - 'UK wellbeing rises after Brexit vote'  Well no surprise there, despite Corbyns perpetual doom mongering. 
The prosecutor's office has apparently summoned councillors, mayors, local police officers and officials of the referendum held on 1 Oct.  
It's not only the EU nurses leaving. There have been tons of warnings about why Brexit is bad for our NHS from many British medical bodies:  
UK govt ignores #taxhavens THEN launches #TradeBill just hours after public consultation ends. Democracy, anyone? #ParadisePapers #Brexit  
BBC: Home of Despite Brexit - Guido Fawkes  
Minister accused of "cover up" for refusing to publish #Brexit impact studies now  
Seafood industry wants special status after Brexit - mirroring the benefits it receives now under EU membership   
Do you approve or disapprove the way this Government is handling #Brexit? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
Why is it that ever since Trump was elected...any local election anywhere is a so-called "referendum" on his presidency? #ElectionDay 
All 4 of our @CommonsHealth expert witnesses say current staffing crisis in NHS and social care is unprecedented. #Brexit making it worse. 
So Govt has gone from not wanting to publish #brexit assessments to now worrying they aren't informative enough  
Anti-Brexit MPs including @patmcfaddenmp @RhonddaBryant react with fury as Tory minister questions their loyalty 
Boris won't correct record on inaccurate statement, no time to meet Nazanin's family, but does have time to write 4,000 word Brexit article 
Stephen Dorrell: “As facts about Brexit become known, it’s clear the public are becoming uneasy about leaving the EU  
New Jersey gubernatorial election seen as referendum on Chris Christie—and on the strength of the Democratic Party.  
Brexit impact studies are not what you think, David Davis warns Labour  
READ | New figures show that we're HAPPIER after our Brexit vote - and that's including all the whinging Remoaners! 
OVERSIGHT: Government warn Brexit impact studies will take 3 weeks to 'edit for clarity' before being released. We have a preview:  
The rise of "AltRightLit" - Hopkins, Hitler and The Big Bores of Brexit - by me. 
..being too scared to tell voters that the Brexit they want doesn't exist, which ultimately matters more than all the other stuff. 
Essentially, Davis admits he misled Parliament deliberately. No Brexit "Risk Assessments" have been carried out. That is gross negligence. 
The Brexiteers are sleep walking into the Brexit nightmare full of optimism while the facts tell us their optimism is misplaced. #StopBrexit 
Listening to a panel on who wins post-Brexit. A German professor said: “it’s like Man United v Bayern Munich.Only one winner.” Solksjaer!  
Vote in your local election today. There's probably a referendum on your local ballot that would actually affect your life. 
New Jersey gubernatorial election seen as referendum on Chris Christie—and on the strength of the Democratic Party.  
Brexit is apparently both our salvation and the gateway to untold prosperity, yet also so fragile that it collapses under any scrutiny.  
New UK government paper gives details of policy of "settled status" for EU27 citizens post Brexit:  
- and nothing has changed since Benn said this.   Theresa May is just another EU puppet, who is busy betraying Brexit for her EU masters. 
DExEU officials to suffer three week long essay crisis #brexit #impactassessments 
Global Britain? Forget about it. Brexit will knock our trade with rest of world, not just EU. My Times column.  
Northam was cautious not to make VA a "Trump referendum," but Ds going all out as GOTV rolls  
Heisenberg's Brexit: Everything's fine unless you measure it. 
Confidence in the PM to get a good deal in the Brexit negotiations has fallen to 26%. New low.via @ORB_Int 
For first time ORB Brexit tracker finds more thinking we are going to be worse off  
ORB (Govt #Brexit approval):APPROVE 34 (-2)DISAPPROVE 66 (+2)3rd-5th NovN~2,000  
As I've been saying for a while, Brexit doesn't mean UK free to make own rules, means it is free to choose. or. 
Brexit Minister asks Labour 'whose side' they are on as Labour Party demand publication of Brexit papers  
Me on UK and post-Brexit regulation: there's no third way between the regulatory behemoths of the EU and the US.  
Big news. Salt has signed the marvellous @JasonCowleyNS — ‘Reaching for Utopia: Blair, Brexit and our Age of Upheaval’ will be published on 1 Sep 2018 and launched over the party conference season.  
Commons Q on #BrexitStudies throws light onto the unaccountability, deceitfulness and sheer incompetence of #Brexit. Let’s stop this farce! 
ORB tracker in approval of Brexit negotiations has government at new low  
Friends! *Very* saddening news!But never forget this vital point:People being happier since Brexit vote is *despite* Cliff-Edge Brexit.  
Our exclusive interview with the CEO of Cambridge Analytica: On Trump, Hilary and Brexit  by @mikebutcher 
In another time or place, this would be highly comical. Or in a book... or film.  But no - it's the reality of Brexit Britain.  
Government says it expects the majority of European Union citizens already resident in the UK will be given new settled status after Brexit 
Fran: Finished with your Brexit impact assessments? David Davis: Yes. I've turned them into a rather smart casual jacket.  
Brexit has not seriously affected view of UK as a global player as it was already seen as a geopolitical irrelevance. 
WATCH: Great to see @CarolineLucas reference our research about Gov keeping 29m people in the dark by not releasing Brexit impact reports  
The UK is not seen as a pocket-superpower just a super-city. However Brexit not expected to really affect London’s role in world economy. 
1/ Govt has published a technical paper about the new 'streamlined system' it will put in place so EU nationals can claim UK residency after Brexit  
Government position- we've assessed brexit don't worry- you can't see it though- also it doesn't exist- we've assed everything though dw  
Of course the #Brexit impact studies will undermine the government's negotiating position. They will show it to be lying & incompetent. 
If no Brexit impact studies, govt is reckless. If not publishing, govt is covering up. If now trying to edit/ redact, govt is mendacious. 
HAPPY: UK’s life satisfaction up following Brexit vote. Smile!   
Min. Baker hides behind need to 'pull together' 58 #Brexit sectoral reports as a reason for 3 week delay in release. Coverup and smokescreen 
Hardline Brexit MPs’ behaviour is scandalous. Systematically trashing our country with no mandate. 
I ask the Govnt to publish Brexit impact studies and Minister says "whose side are you on". I'm on the side of parliamentary sovereignty. 
PETITION: We must stop the betrayal of Brexit, says Mike Hookem  
With claim today that the 57 #Brexit impact assessments now mysteriously don’t exist, Minister turns farce into a new art form-contemptible 
On 30 March 2019, the #UK will become the #world's fourth largest Non-#EU #economy after the #US, #China and #Japan! #BBC #SKY #NEWS #BREXIT  
Govnt are clearly in contempt of Parliament over failure to release Brexit studies. Re-purpose the Tower for David Davis & his Ministers 
It's official - government will take 3 weeks to doctor the Brexit assessments and serve up censored version  
Brexit fanatic Steve Baker says Labour asking for Brexit impact papers means public asks "whose side are they on?"The side of sanity  
RETWEET if you Love BREXIT and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
So why did Brexit Ministers say the Cabinet had seen summaries of them? And why can't they at least present the summaries? 
The Gov's hypocrisy over Brexit impact assessment reports is shameful. Pls RT if you believe Gov must release the Brexit impact reports:  
"This farce [about the Brexit papers] has dragged on for far too long. Ministers just need to get on with it" @mtpennycook RT if you agree 
A week after publishing a list of Brexit impact assessment they had carried out, the Minister now claims no such assessments exist.  
Minister Steve Baker tells Commons that the Brexit analyses will be published within 3 weeks - says are not 58 separate impact assessments 
This is the reality for our 3million. Shame on those who don’t walk a mile in their shoes and understand why Brexit must be stopped.  
New poll in today's Telegraph shows majority of voters now realise Brexit will make them and the country poorer #ToryDisaster 
Spanish police who brutally attempted to stop Catalan independence referendum to be feted by Order of Knights #Spain 
Lord Bridges told Parliament that the sectoral reports DID cover the "impact" of Brexit and looked at each in a "manageable format".  
It's a shameful state of affairs when simply asking for information about the effect of Brexit gets you labeled a traitor. 
Brexit Minister Steve Baker says Labour asking for Brexit impact papers means public will now ask 'whose side are they on?' 
That’s Steve Baker only MP to have taken money from CRC, shadowy group who gave DUP £425k for #brexit. Refuses to say who they are  
What a total, absolute farce Govnt now say Brexit reports don't exist. We are at war with Eastasia. We have always been at war with Eastasia 
"Whose side are they on?" asks Brexit fanatic Steve Baker. Jesus wept. Scrutiny is now treason. 
Asking around, am told the real problem is not that the analyses are damaging but that they are shoddy.  Brexit white paper redux./7 
So what's worse, that the govt produced 58 reports showing Brexit is bad but hid them, or that they didn't produce them at all? 
Confidence in getting the right #Brexit deal reaches all time low. More uncertainty for @The3Million and @BritishInEurope.#500daysinlimbo 
Accumulating evidence that Russia intervened in Brexit referendum to aid the “Leave” side  
I am also in the two thirds of people who disapprove of the way Government is handling Brexit.  
“There is absolutely no case whatsoever for us joining the EEA, it is completely contradictory to the mandate we received in the Referendum”  
PRIORITIES: Theresa May launches cross-party talks on sexual assault at Westminster. Mail readers only care about Brexit.  
The UK's life satisfaction ratings have improved since the Brexit vote, official stats show' | via @telegraph 
This is a sneak preview of the Tories new #Brexit advertisement!Does it make you more Confident?  
David Milband express a view held by many voters that Brexit is an humiliation. We deserve a second say on the EU question. #StopBrexit 
Hard Brexit need not make us worse off | Letters  
Will be in the House of Commons at 12:30 - Govnt responding to Urgent Q on when they will publish Brexit impact studies. Contempt of P'ment? 
Exclusive poll shows public has lost faith in @theresa_may handling of #Brexit negotiations  #BBC #SKY #TORY #UK #EU 
The US Commerce Secretary is absolutely right: Britain should not be dictated to by the EU on Brexit. 
What a sharp but damning summary. Brexit is the devil to which this Gvmt has sold its vision, its reason, its soul...  and our futures.  
British people got happier in the year following the Brexit referendum  
Brexit with no deal risks chaos in drug supply, report warns  
Great discussions here in Norway about Brexit over last two days including with @USverdrup & his excellent @nupinytt team. Sweden next stop. 
Probably the biggest reason we must #Brexit#No2USoE 
Admit it!  Brexit is a scam and a terrible mistake.STOP BREXIT NOW!  
Brexit: making the English (slightly) happier  
Government to say that the Brexit impact assessment papers (not that they call them that) will be published within weeks, unredacted. 
MAY BREXIT CONFIDENCE LOW- Record 66% disapprove of negotiations - Just 26% back PM to get right deal  
This statement strongly suggests that Theresa May & her husband have money in an offshore trust. #Panorama #ParadisePapers #Brexit  
Trade Bill gives the Government power to strike up independent trade deals for a ‘no deal’ Brexit  
Bloody German cockroaches, coming over here, taking British cockroaches’ jobs!British cockroaches for British filth! Brexit now! pic.twitter.com/rikklq3UgR 
Because to me Brexit is easy to understand. They want to retain membership of the EU at the same time being free of its obligations. 
Brexit disaster is racing towards us & nobody is taking responsibility. The rest of the world is shocked at our stupidity. #BrexitShambles 
From 'doom' if we #brexit to 'boom' if we didn't. Carney is no more than a Remoaner mouthpiece - NOT to be trusted.  
Just read this thread. UK is fucked. What a massive mess that Brexit vote was...  
Increasingly out of step with public opinion on Brexit, Corbyn is sounding more and more like May mark II.We need to #exitfrombrexit 
A new Brexit negotiating approach for the UK: combining Single Market with modifications to free movement. New paper  
Brexit in a nutshell: Leave voters were assured they would keep everything they enjoy at the moment, plus additional benefits. That's all. 
Is David Davis trying to weasel his way out of releasing the #Brexit impact assessments? 
UK was the fasted growing country in the G7 before #Brexit, now it is slowest with a sick economy. Retail figures show very hard times ahead 
Sadly, they seem to get worse the more we get proved right about Brexit. Which sort of makes sense, I suppose.  
Do you believe that this Government will deliver a full Brexit as mandated in 2016? 
Bluff, bluster, BS, delay, deceit, delusion, duplicity, democratic deficit, dire consequences; drop #Brexit!  
Exclusive poll shows public have lost faith in Theresa May’s handling of Brexit negotiations #Premium  
Too many at Westminster are intent on subverting the will of the people by derailing Brexit. They exist on all sides, enemies of our liberty 
Britain's government is coming under pressure to release 58 secret papers on Brexit  
BBC News - US Commerce Secretary Ross backs post-Brexit UK-US trade deal-"the EU practices extreme protectionism"  
Paris and Frankfurt are trying to grab lucrative legal work from London because of Brexit  
This Octavia Butler quote is an instruction manual for #Brexit Britain.  
No deal Brexit would leave millions of EU citizens in Britain and UK citizens in EU in legal limbo  
In normal times, Boris Johnson would never have had the job in the first place #brexitcoup 
British politics in complete disarray as the clock continues to tick on a Brexit negotiation that is going terribly.  
Have you worked out why the Brexit negotiations are going so badly?  
International rep of the UK has been SHREDDEDTarnished byBumbling FSIncompetent #Brexit teamGovt mired in sleazeANDAn Impotent PM. 
Nouy on Brexit: some 50 banks have visited the ECB to discuss their relocation plans, improving their understanding of the situation 
Graphic showing why there's always been something fishy about The Common Fisheries Policy #EU #Brexit  
So Corbyn called Hamas & Hezbollah his friends but refused to share a stage with Blair & other labour leaders during EU referendum campaign 
Brexit is infantilism based on delusions of lost greatness @InFactsOrg  
That makes him the perfect representation of the UK in the days of brexit. We ARE an international laughing stock now. 
The Government is given until the end of today to publish secret Brexit studies  
When people’s lives are devastated by Brexit at least Jeremy can say he refused to share a stage with Blair. Top man!  
Terry is right. The leaders of Brexit are pulling a tax dodge, while workers are all PAYE. #ParadisePapers 
"Don't let EU dictate Brexit," warns US. "Let us do it, instead."  
I'm sure there must be thousands of those in Nursing profession who are against Brexit? Please do join #StopBrexit @theRCN @Midwivesmag  
So our  future post-#Brexit- is : To get even closer to  Trump, Bibi, and the House of Saud?!#NoConfidence 
Leavers called for UK to 'take back control' - not learning about impact of Brexit is 'ceding control'. Release reports now the #StopBrexit 
Brexit’s leaders are compromised by tax dodging, Russia and Sex scandals. #HouseofCards #ParadisePapers #ParasitePapers 
Brokenshire making things worse, not better....#Brexit  
'We are ready' NO DEAL Brexit plans unveiled to make Britain free trade powerhouse  
Untenable. As ridiculous as it seems we need a GE, at the very least a change of leader. #NoConfidence #Brexit clock is ticking. 
Today is the day @DavidMundellIDCT where is it?Brexit:Speaker gives government until Tuesday to publish assessments  
So basically UK Brexit department admits here that its Brexit impact assessments are a bunch of random links and old reports  
Because they’ve been compelled to lie through their teeth about Brexit they can’t be properly held to account for lying about anything else. 
#Kurdistan: The leaders of KDP party convene to discuss post-referendum reality and issues facing the region. #KurdistanBlockade 
Yes admission Brexit would mean a Koch or Koch style takeover of UK politics and economy w/ lax US style regulations inc re workers rights  
Brexit is a choice : if UK wants close trade ties with EU it will have to accept EU standards.  
Goverment must publish #Brexit impact studies today or risk being in contempt of Parliament   
#paradisepapers brexit was sold to electorate by tax avoiders who want to keep their tax havens.  #stopbrexit Are you a #remainernow? 
The referendum result created a Government charged with delivering a farrago of impossible nonsense. All the current chaos stems from this. 
Suck it up, Grimsby. You wanted brexit so live with the consequences. Or maybe, just maybe, start fighting to save your country? 
Grimsby drops the rest of us in the brexit shit and then demands special exemptions from brexit for ... Grimsby.  
I am on the Brexit Select committee, I do take this very seriously, (so does Hilary - no doubt). I will not let go, trust me  
So this is the plan. Get rid of May, install Remainer technocrat Amber Rudd, (and eventually scupper Brexit).   
Reminder that #JoCox, anMP was killed over Brexit. STOP GIVING THIS VIOLENT NEO-NAZI UNCHECKED AIR TIME @LBC @BBC 
If you're not shocked after  #LiamFox interview, you don't understand what's at stake#NoConfidence#Brexit#r4today 
Yet another industry realising Brexit is a clusterfuck & lobbying govt to deal with the problems by granting it special status & exemptions.  
Great bantz from Mr Brexit  
Scotland, you know that second independence referendum you’ve been thinking about? I think now might be a good time. 
Tax Havens ☞ EU Anti Tax Avoidance Directives ☞ Rupert Murdoch ☞ Panic ☞ Brexit Ref ☞ Media Lies ☞ Brexit Result ☞ Theresa May ☞ No Deal 
Looks like chlorinated chicken (and generally lower consumer protection standards) are on their way if we #brexit: 
Unfortunately most #Remain MPs won’t speak up until they see public opinion shift decidedly. Pathetic I know, but our task is clear. #Brexit 
Brexit impact studies  
If the Impact Assessments made Brexit look great then they would have already been published, this feels wrong, it feels like a sham.  
Only 6 days left until the UK parliament debates indyref2. Urge your MP to attend and back the majority against another divisive referendum.  
Speaker gives government until Tuesday to publish Brexit assessments  
Classy as ever from Nadine. Never one to put an innocent woman being banged up for longer before a Brexit ally  
Brexit- the policy of tearing up our existing trade deals in order to negotiate less advantageous deal with existing markets. #r4today 
The Speaker has given Tories until Tuesday for the Brexit Impact reports - will they be published? or will it be an excuse? #BrexitShambles 
It’s not ‘Brexit uncertainty’ jeopardising public finances, it’s just ‘Brexit’. No Brexit, no jeopardy, no damage.  
A ‘no deal’ Brexit would do serious damage to an already overstretched #NHS, we warn today in a new briefing  
#bbcnews Liam Fox trying to hide how difficult post #Brexit #trade deals would be, even to just keep status quo, let alone improve... 
"Forget The #Brexit Doom, The FTSE Is At A Record High"  Wow, the Remainers really saw that coming. 
In 'Clean Brexit' @DrGerardLyons & I provide 25-point plan for Article 50 talksHere's No.6 - on citizens' rights 
Chairmen of both Irish & Northern Irish Bar warn Brexit & Good Friday Agreement are 'incompatible'  @irishlegalnews 
This is what so many of our supporters fear. Having to return with a non UK spouse post-Brexit may tear families apart...  
Drives me crazy how often I see the sentiment that Brexit would be going so much better if only the 'remoaners' would get behind it. 
Boris Johnson screws up in the detail (Zaghari-Ratcliffe) and he screws up in the big picture (Brexit) - and everything in between. 
Daily Mail Group: Registered in Bermuda. #ParadisePapers Just to avoid paying tax in Britain! So why does the Mail support #Brexit again?  
Prediction: the UK Brexit impact reports will actually just be the EU ones, but with the word "catastrophe" replaced with "sovereignty" 
Telegraph front page still pushing the post-Brexit 'quick deal' with the US. Quick deals, of the type the UK would need, are a myth. 
Iraqi Kurdish Leader Says Region Will Re-evaluate Relationship With U.S. After Referendum : NPR  
So how lucky are we that Brexit is such a good idea? The impact reports will show nothing but benefits. Surely? Or else why Brexit at all?  
No. It's not the PUBLICATION of the Brexit impact reports that'll cause problems. It's Brexit itself that's caused the problems!  
The people that engineered #Brexit use private schools, private healthcare and don't pay their fair share of UK tax. 
British people told: 'You *will* eat chlorinated chicken' by US businessman rich on tax haven deals with Putin cronies.Isn't Brexit grand?  
Where does #Demonetisation figure if religion/caste is what electorate vote for. Poll Verdict is not a referendum on economic decisions.  
Is this yank telling Brexit  that we must accept foreign born trade rules? Nevah!  must accept ours! #MABA #MakeAmericaBritishAgain 
Would you vote Labour at the next general election, if they continue to support brexit? Please RT. 
Wouldn’t you know it? Brexit’s propaganda machine is registered in Bermuda. #FinalSay #StopBrexit #ParadisePapers 
Real reason for Brexit#Remain #exitfrombrexit #ParadisePaper #ParadiseLeaks #StopBrexit 
Brexit BOOM: Tech chief insists start-ups will THRIVE once UK is free from Brussels  
Oh FFS. Not every choice a woman makes about what she wears (or doesn't) needs to be a fucking referendum.  
Dublin calls for five-year Brexit transition period  
Congress Party @INCIndia has called every election this year a referendum on demonetisation, yet has lost the elections. 
THE EU AND HOW MANY PEOPLE VOTED?Our EU membership is the greatest fraud ever perpetrated by British politicians.Full Brexit ASAP  
Brexit in four easy steps: Labour MP to launch bid to stop Remainers wrecking EU exit Bill  
This is without a doubt the dumbest thing I've seen. A referendum on the federal gov't's constitution power? #cdnpoli #abpoli  
So taxpayers can fund millions for both referendum & an unwinable legal challenge on the Fed Ctax so you can pointlessly grandstand. #ableg 
How Corbyn scuppered a key REMAIN initiative during referendum campaign because he wouldn't stand alongside Blair  
Dude who did nothing about equalization program while in fed govt promises to have provincial referendum on federal program he doesn't understand #AbLeg #cdnpoli 
No Mal we are not having a Referendum for  your corrupt officials to stay in the Parliament Election both Houses Now#auspol #qldpil 
Britain would be 'booming' if it weren't for Brexit, says Bank of England Governor Mark Carney - The Independent  
Brexit uncertainty is jeopardising public finances, watchdog warns  
Because of ageing, a crisis of capitalism and Brexit, Britain will never run a budget surplus again in my lifetime. Remember this tweet.  
Beware the Tory 'cargo cult' that’s steering #Brexit  Perceptive and entertaining at the same time 
Ross wants Brexit to take US interests into account and to forget 50% of UK trade occurs with its next-door neighbor  
This campaign persuaded thousands of Asians in the catering industry to vote for #Brexit. Now they know they were lied to. They hate her. 
Britain could do something so much better than #Brexit. It could eradicate its sordid empire of tax havens. #StopBrexit #Panorama 
Just seen this Shane Richie interview quote. It's like a Brexit version of Blur vs Oasis.  
Republicans keep saying the election was a referendum on the Supreme Court. Hillary Clinton won 3 million more votes than Trump. 
"Don't let EU dictate Brexit, that's our job." warns US. 
The EU puts Britain chances of ending up committing economic suicide by jumping off the Brexit cliff edge at over 50%. We must #StopBrexit 
He’s not serious, and he knows a referendum is irrelevant. It’s like having a refendum to turn off the sun  
Well, @jessphillips, please start with tax-dodgers who bankrolled Brexit in order to turn the UK into a tax haven. Thanks.#ParadisePapers 
*Brexit Explained*  
*Brexit Explained*  
Don't let the EU dictate Brexit if you want a speedy US trade deal, Trump adviser warns UK 
Trump congratulated Erdogan over referendum, now Saudis over purge. He's sending a pretty pro-power grab message 
#Brexit US Secretary of State 4 Commerce Wilbur Ross says Britain will be their biggest trading partner in major boost 4 Brexit 
Elitist, liars and trolls engineering no deal Brexit. They’ll blame EU. Jobs, NHS, living costs will suffer. We must find way to #StopBrexit 
The stupid f......ers voted for #Brexit. Now they've screwed themselves they want an exemption. You couldn't make it up. #StopBrexit 
Why such coyness about the Brexit impact reports? Answer: either they don’t exist, or they make very dismal reading. Disastrous either way. 
Holy mother of Christ. If you’re a Brexit voter and you still don’t see how badly you’ve been had, I can’t help you. You are beyond reach.  
The super-rich are screwing the rest of us. And what do we do about it ... #Brexit which will make Britain more vulnerable to their whims. 
BREAKING: Government Brexit impact assessments have been leaked.  
Northern Ireland won't stay in EU market, customs after Brexit: UK  
Brexit is lunacy. I’m a lifelong Tory voter who’ll never vote conservative again if brexit goes ahead. 
BREAKING BBC BREXIT NEWS: Doom, Gloom, Disaster, Doom, Gloom, Disaster, Doom, Gloom, Disaster, Doom, Gloom, Disaster, Doom, Gloom, Disaster. 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Jason Kenney promises referendum on equalization payments if feds continue to push carbon tax  
Both Johnson & Patel should resign, especially Johnson. But they won’t. We’re stuck with this clown parade trying to rush us through Brexit. 
Time again for this, the best Brexit tweet.  
It's the detail of the leaked Brexit Impact Report where things really start to look more positive than previously forecast.  
The owners of the 'patriotic' #Brexit press are tax-dodging billionaires #panorama #ParadisePapers #StopBrexit 
DAILY TELEGRAPH FRONT PAGE: 'Don't let EU dictate Brexit, warns US' #skypapers 
Don't let the EU dictate Brexit, US warns Britain #premium 
Have been working on other things, but here's an update on Brexit progress since the European Council:/ends 
“EU has started an investigation into the UK tax regs” So there we have it - the reason Brexit is supported by the mega-rich #paradisepapers 
Tory peer calls on Government to use TORPEDO BOATS to protect UK waters after Brexit  
'We are ready' NO DEAL Brexit plans unveiled to make Britain free trade powerhouse  
Seriously, BBC, do you have to subliminally plug your old children's programmes in your articles on Brexit?  
In 2011 Rupert Murdoch's News Corp operated 136 subsidiaries in tax havens #paradisepapersMurdoch backs #Brexit  
Shame on you Owen. Nautical references dog whisper notions of past imperial power & subliminally bolster Brexit nativist thought. #50lashes. 
Most of UK's fruit & veg is from other EU nations, “so #Brexit impact may be dramatic”  
"The EU has just started an investigation into the UKs tax rules" Brexit explained in 12 words. #Panorama #ParadisePapers 
‘Britain is the hub of the tax avoidance empire’. Well said #panorama #paradisepapers. Most pro #brexit MPs want this to deepen, even turn whole UK into offshore 
EU clamps down on tax dodgingBritain leaves EU (after fatcat funded Brexit ads)Wot if if really is that simple? #panorama #paradisepapers 
Oh, and Brexit!  
I'll keep on plugging away. #EEA #EFTA is only sensible and realistic option for a Brexit that works and reunites the country  
There it is, Corbyn doesn’t want to give us a chance to vote on the #Brexit deal. #Remain @UKLabour supporters take note. 
And that was five months in. On Brexit, she came with nothing, triggered A50 on nothing, fought election on nothing, has nothing now. 
."If Vladimir Putin's spies lent a hand to elect Donald Trump, they seem to have used Brexit as a trial run.". pic.twitter.com/EnefNNvyoN 
More than 62 million voted Trump, more than 17 million Brexit & more than 10 million Le Pen. You can't boil that down to "one type" of voter 
5) please let that sink in, no country has ever done anything like what we're doing with #Brexit.And sane countries wouldn't try 
Someone's leaked an extract of the Brexit Impact Studies...  
12 days ago May had read the summaries of Brexit impact docs but not 'every single one' of them. Today they don't exist.The cat ate them?  
RETWEET if you voted for Brexit and would like to pay nothing and leave with no deal and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Brexit is proper Sharknado innit. It’s fuckin useless.           Fuckin useless 
Speaker gives government until Tuesday to publish Brexit assessments  
Virginia's governor race is traditionally seen as a referendum on a president's first year in office  
ItalianMP @Capezzone: UK will triumph after Brexit. Ur going2steal investment. Perhaps then Brussels will understand  
An important Brexit thread by @jonlis1. Can someone make sure @Number10gov & @DExEUgov take careful note? 
A cross Party motion of No Confidence in this Unstable Dogmatic Govt should be tabled before this Brexit Mess ruins the Country irrevocably. 
Trump's top secretary hopes US will be Britain's NUMBER ONE trading partner after Brexit  
Its always the same. A referendum for indigenous recognition is put off for a referendum for privileged white people #auspol 
Prop P is a Referendum on St. Louis Metro Police #VoteNoOnPropP #Nov7 
Basically PM doesn't matter, even to her Cabinet. She's a placeholder whilst they argue w each other. Meanwhile UK faces #Brexit cliff edge  
I wonder if Welsh Brexit voters ever realised they chose a future that entails licking England's boots until the end of time. 
When we leave the EU, the EEA agreement will cease to apply - explains Brexit minister @SteveBakerHW 
Govt. promised a ‘meaningful vote’ on Brexit. That must be in time for parliament to send Davis back to the negotiating table. 
The result of the EU referendum was advisory, non-binding, based ENTIRELY on lies and is leading us to ruin. I'm PROUD not to respect it.  
Post Brexit this could be where some of our beef comes from. Horrendous.  
Banks are putting Brexit contingency plans into action and there's a space race in Frankfurt  
“Forget the Brexit doom, the FTSE is at a record high”  
An #EEA based Brexit is now the only viable option if we wish to reunited our deeply divided country. My summing up from today debate:  
Britain 'would be booming' if it wasn't for Brexit, Mark Carney says  via @yahooNewsUK 
Former Brexit minister @DavidJonesMP explains why leaving the EU means automatically leaving the EEA 
After 6,188 days feeling at home in the UK for the last #500DaysInLimbo since referendum I have felt like a foreigner for the first time.  
it's almost like people think the referendum gave a mandate for the things they agree with but no mandate for things they don't like 
Mark, if I really did have more influence & reach than UK Govt, it's safe to say we would have taken a different approach to Brexit so far  
Important thread. The full scale of where we are in the Brexit crisis/disaster.  
Geez too many pollies are lazy. So many calling for referendum or to change rules so they don't have to bother doing due diligence. 
"You Don't Hear About Tax Avoidance Because The Avoiders Own The Newspapers" LBC  #ParadisePapers #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Davis ignores opposition demands on Brexit impact studies. Asks for time to edit the paperwork !!!  
Davis says he needs more time to compile the 58 Brexit Papers. Read this. Seems clear he knows where they are  
#brexitshambles in detail @theSNP @DundeeSNP #BrexitReality #Brexit  
#ExcusesForDavidDavis"I never wanted to be a Brexit minister you know, I wanted to be a lumberjack" **Breaks into song** 
In name of ‘taking back sovereignty’ Uk is now in a situation where cabinet ministers are basically unsackable #brexit  
Northern Ireland won't stay in EU market, customs after Brexit: UK  
Farage has warned of unrest if Brexit doesn't happen. What about the unrest if it does happen?  
A really stark choice between higher standards/EU and lower standards/Trump as the UK's main post-Brexit trading options here  
Speaker gives government until Tuesday to publish Brexit assessments  
Mark Carney says Britain would be 'booming' if it weren't for Brexit  
#paradisepapers Tories have slowed the fight against tax havens. The link between brexit & tax avoidance is clear. #stopbrexit 
Sexual harassment, tax avoidance, Brexit ... funny how time eventually proves that everyone you thought was asshole in Britain is an asshole 
A no deal Brexit would mean leaving key EU agencies. But Ministers have no idea how much that would cost.   
What does the fact Ministers can meet heads of state behind the PM's back with impunity do for her credibility in Brexit negotiations. 
#500DaysInLimbo has also meant 500 days of irresponsible rubbish like this. Hey @jeremycorbyn Brexit is the defining challenge of our time.  
David Davis ordered to explain timescale for releasing Brexit impact documents by the end of tomorrow   
500 days of hearing "You shouldn't worry too much. I'm sure you'll be fine." #500daysinlimbo #brexit  
Does any A50 revocation letter have to be on Downing Street headed notepaper ? Asking for a friend. #Brexit 
It would be wrong to say Brexit is bad for everyone. If you own office space in Frankfurt it's fucking brilliant. 
If you have EU friends or colleagues living in limbo in #Brexit UK, do look at today's  #500DaysInLimbo hashtag. 
“Oh one more thing before the weekend, Prime Minister. No it’s not sex this time. Or Brexit. Or Boris... Do you want to sit down?”  
Speaker gives government until Tuesday to publish Brexit assessments  
."Speaker of House of Commons, has set govt a deadline of Tuesday evening to publish the Brexit assessments". 
Fair point; except Brexit's going to unleash political hell, too. Plus economic hell. I reckon cancelling it's the less worse option.  
WATCH | U.S Secretary of Commerce @WilburRoss calls for trade barriers between UK & US to come down after Brexit and slams protectionist EU.  
Theresa May's husband is a senior executive in a company that profits from tax-avoiding companies. #ParadisePapers #StopBrexit #Brexit  
The owner of the hard #Brexit pushing 'patriotic' Daily Mail takes his profits via a Bermuda based trust. #StopBrexit #ParadisePapers 
Wolfgang Münchau: Pro-Europeans are wasting their energy on undoing Brexit. They need to pursue the Norway option  
Almost two-thirds of EU businesses "are planning to pull back from their British suppliers"  
So far, @Heresy_Corner has listed 94 theories as to why #Brexit happened. This, though, is obviously the key one:  
Brexit up to date—read this staggering thread by @jonlis1 about the mystifying incompetence of the British government 
Plaid Cymru seeks publication of Brexit economic impact study  
A reminder for MPs ahead of the informal debate on a second Scottish referendum one week today.  
Totally absurd. "Court summons for Catalan teachers after class debate on referendum." via @Elnacionalcaten 
Time to revisit my conspiracy theory: UKGOV hasn't done detailed Brexit impact assessments, now terrified their lack of prep will be exposed  
Step one: pour stiff drinkStep two: read thread #brexit  
I'm writing something about the curious nature of "Brexit patriots" - the likes of Ashcroft and Banks who live in Belize ...... 
Mega-rich Brexiters sold Brexit as "patriotic" all while they funneled their money offshore #ParadisePapers 
This is pure propaganda, Sir Jeremy. If we sever key trade links with the EU as a result of #Brexit, it will take over a decade to recover.  
Brexit Is ‘the Humiliation of Britain’, Says Soros-Backed Migrant Charity Boss David Miliband  
BFE is delighted to accept @eddiemarsan on board! Please RT and LIKE. Celebs who speak up against Brexit deserve our support! #StopBrexit 
At a rural Devon wedding on Saturday every farmer present came up to me to say we must stop #Brexit. Where is @NFUPolitical leadership? 
"What about our rights, Theresa?" bitter rundown of 500 days in limbo on #citizensrights since referendum  
Jeremy Corbyn: No-Deal Brexit would be a nightmare scenario.Protecting jobs and living standards have to come first.#CBI2017 
THREAD. But here’s the killer point - we are heading towards a Hard Brexit cliff edge.  
Friends! Undeniable!After all, if it wasn't for Brexit, Britain wouldn't have had an Emergency Budget, a huge recession, and World War 3.  
Jeremy is an ally of hard Brexit and there is little else to say on this.  
Sadly the latest 'news' on the #Brexit process is pretty much what we've all been expecting, and it's not good.  
Speaker John Bercow says tho he's received assurances from David Davis, govt must say by end of tmrw when it will publish Brexit assessments 
Important thread on the state of Brexit negotiations viewed from the EU27 and Commission side.  
Brexit can boost our trade and the rest of the world’s says @ShankerASingham 
Since 10 pm on 23 June 2016 the Parliament of the United Kingdom has been acting unconstitutionally in re Brexit. Article 50 Challenge. 
UK businesses are flourishing despite Brexit uncertainty  via @telebusiness 
Labour are creating the perfect storm.Ramp up the rhetoric about high earners/rich not paying their share when they pay the majority. If they wallop the rich with hiked taxes they will leave the country and the political establishment will be able to fall back and blame Brexit. 
The sovereign right in reference to the decision to Leave the EU was given to the people in form of a referendum & authorised by parliament. 
Engaging @GuildhallLondon discussion with investors and stakeholders on #Malta as an ideal post #Brexit co-location jurisdiction -JM  
Thanks to a translator’s error, Brexit negotiators have agreed to blue pisspots. 
Read this. Read ALL of this. Brexit will be more ruinous than anyone is admitting and we can STOP IT AT ANY TIME.  
Another Brexit liar.Paradise Papers: Lord Ashcroft stayed non-dom despite pledges  
“It is not the case that 58 sectoral impact assessment exist”“time to collate” aka they’re not finished anyway#Brexit shambles  
Still in disbelief about Brexit result over year on. Shows what happens when people did not (do not) understand what they were voting for. 
More Brexit woe for Remoaners! The UK is now the third-best place for companies to invest. On the whole ruddy planet  
Constructive engagement with SF #Brexit coordination team 2 discuss tactics & plans we had a very busy time ahead - good we’re all up for it  
David Davis says it will take an unspecified amount of time to release Brexit impact papers "in a way that is accessible and informative".  
Make no mistake, Brexit is US & THEM. We are the many, who will suffer. They are the few who will prosper. #StopBrexit #ParadisePapers #FBPE 
“is govt reluctant to publish reports because of what contain/ because they do not exist?”#Brexit .@thatginamiller 
MAY SET TO AGREE £53 BILLION BREXIT BILL  
Brexit uncertainty dominates UK’s digital conversation. #cio #cdo -  pic.twitter.com/TUcp6fweNN 
Theresa May last month: "oh, if only people could stop being obsessed with the Brexit mess just for a while..."[monkey paw finger curls] 
This makes for a desperate read. Brexit is a fucking disaster.  
This is an insanely informative piece about UKIP, Farage, Arron Banks and their ties to Russia. Hope the folks @Byline_Media get due credit when the Brexit/Kremlin/Trump web finally gets full exposure #PutinsPuppet 
'Zero chance' that Brexit makes Britain better off - says Nobel laureate economist Paul Krugman.Bloody experts eh? 
An important thread on Brexit, by the estimable @jonlis1 Informative and scary. 
Brexit Boom: Report Says UK World’s Third Most Attractive Place for Investment!          #fo2eu 
Brexit Secretary David Davis's reply on Brexit sectoral analyses to Hilary Benn of the @CommonsEUexit Committee 
Lord Wigley just asked if we can reverse Brexit - This is the government reply  
'Brexit war cabinet' now dominated by Brexiteer MPs  
15/ Which brings us to the centrality of the misunderstanding. Brexit is a political, but far more importantly, a legal process. 
Clarification: Seizure was in the run up to the October 1 referendum and the preferred alternative address is   according to @CridaDemocracia 
10/ EU fears May, when rebuffed in Dec through her instransigence, will retreat to comforting insanity of Redwood/Mogg Brexit utopia. BAD. 
This may be the best and last chance we get to stop a dangerous and damaging #Brexit, so contact your MP today!  
Seriously, it’s worthwhile reading this lamentable history of UKIP and Farage: we’ve been played with #Brexit  
Three things killed KRG: the arrogance & ignorance of the KRG leadership, independent oil exports & economic independence & the referendum. 
This is simply a lie. You cannot build an economy for the many whilst advocating a hard Brexit. Stop lying to us.  
Connected the bits together yet? #Brexit is about rich getting richer. There's no unicorns. Just more poverty #ParadisePapers #StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/KZpKX8VVBV 
so you believe that the UK has considerable leverage over the EU because of the 'Brexit-bill'? Think again.  
Colin here tells an EU citizen to move away if they don't like Brexit Britain. I hate Brexit but I will stay for now. Get over it Colin  
.@ChukaUmunna – Fall in new car sales shows darkening Brexit reality  
International ways to win arguments: : Alternative Facts: Brexit the argument: "kalau ic kuning atu, cakap melayu k?? Jan macam2" 
#brexit isn't about getting our country back it's about making it more of a tax haven than it already is. 
It's Labour that has common ground with businesses on putting needs of the economy front & centre stage in our Brexit negotiations. #CBI2017 
BBC stress that Mrs Brown's Boys isn't illegal, it's just really really shit 'comedy' designed to give Brexit voters a shot of nostalgia  
Papadopoulos’ plea sheds new light on #Russia’sactive measures to throw the #Brexit vote.SOUNDS FAMILIAR 
Businesses and Labour have common ground on the need for Brexit transitional arrangements to be agreed immediately. #CBI2017 
Brexit Boom: Report Says UK World's Third Most Attractive Place for Investment  
Wrong! Britain will prosper after Brexit, even in a 'No Deal' scenario. 
We need to talk about Nigel... Flamboyant politician, Brexit bad boy. Kremlin Asset.Via @Byline_Media 
Businesses see the Tories stuck in chaos and confusion over Brexit. The situation is more uncertain and more precarious than ever. #CBI2017 
If you're angry about the tax avoidance exposed in #ParadisePapers, don't expect UK to act, but the EU is. #Brexit will let UK off the hook!  
Labour offers common ground with businesses on Brexit, investment, training and an industrial strategy. #CBI2017 
It must be true @MailOnline says #Brexit vote fiddled by Putin. Can't respect will of the Kremlin. No mandate  ot is time to stop Brexit  
The UK is a member of 39 EU agencies. Ministers have no idea how much it'll cost to replace them after Brexit.  
It's no coincidence that tax-dodging billionaire press barons have been so determined to foist #Brexit on Britain!  
A Liberal frontbencher wants the government to consider a referendum to allow dual nationals to run for parliament.  
Corbyn should apologize for dog whistling anti immigration during the Brexit vote and helping to pass Brexit which he now pretends to oppose  
EU faces Brexit TIME BOMB: Britain's departure to coincide with epic Brussels budget war  
They should face Spain and Brexit.  
EU outlawed the democratic right of people to leave & now has political prisoners.Each day #EU becomes more like old Soviet Russia.#Brexit  
For many businesses, tricky choice between Corbyn’s higher taxes, nationalisation and more state interference versus risk of no-deal Brexit with May. They hate both  
#DavidMiliband: #Brexit is a "humiliation".  No, David. Humiliation is losing a leadership contest to this guy ! #BBC #SKY #LABOUR #NEWS 
Brexit is all about control. The ability of the #BrexitElite to control their fortunes & avoid EU tax laws. #ParadisePapers #StopBrexit RT  
.@Nigel_Farage expresses sympathy for City over Brexit... but thinks banks should get over it and move on  
ICYMI This is what the singlemarket &customs union actually are – and what will happen with #Brexit if we leave them 
The UK economy remains strong ahead of Brexit. Mark Carney should stop trying to engage in Project Fear.  
Let's see what the European media say about #brexit 500 days on from vote leave. 'From #brexit to sexit' Oh God.  
CARNEY: “Britain’s doing well but we’d do better without Brexit.”MAIL READERS: “Go home you traitorous immigrant.”The debate continues.  
The British Parliament is looking into Russian meddling in the Brexit vote, and finding some weird stuff  
I’m at breaking point. Good journalism reveals that many of the same people who foisted #Brexit on the UK don’t pay fair share taxes. ½ 
Brokenshire should be the new name for post-Brexit UK.  
Brexit: So if a quarter were duped & a further unknown percentage were just putting a finger up at Gov't, where is *the will of the people*?  
Britain 'would be booming' if it wasn't for Brexit, Mark Carney says - we agree with this expert!  
Brexit is about the redistribution of wealth. To the very richest in our society. And also to the very richest in Russian society. 
“Common ground with business on Brexit.Common ground on skills & infrastructure investment.”Says @jeremycorbyn at#CBI2017 
Too many are trying to dilute and delay Brexit, warns @KateHoeyMP on the @MarrShow 
The man who said #Brexit would be great for UK is now advising people to invest in EU as UK weakens  
Corbyn mentioned the phrase “common ground” 4 times now. Basically thinks Govt Brexit approach has created much space to win over biz/ CBI 
Labour don't respect the result of the EU Referendum. Deputy Leader Tom Watson wants to stay in the single market permanently #cbi17 
Arron Banks, bankroller of Brexit, faces investigation over his donations  
We plan for a smooth & orderly Brexit, Labour's policy is so confused they've changed their mind 101 times  #cbc17 
Corbyn says ‘chaos and confusion’ is growing at heart of govt and ‘time is running out’ on Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn addresses Britain’s business leaders on Brexit and the economy  
The choice is higher inflation hitting public servants and those receiving benefits. Or higher interest rates hitting mortgagors. #Brexit  
“need to get more certainty/clarity on transition or we’ll need start implementing hard brexit contingency and that won’t be good” #cbi2017 
BT CEO Patterson tells Cbi conf if transition Brexit deal isn't agreed by Jan, businesses like his will start activating "hard Brexit" plans 
overall car sales are down so it is a car story mate down to disastrous Brexit good try  
Non-Dom Lord Rothermere  takes his profits from the Daily Mail via a trust registered in Bermuda #ParadisePapers#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Germany's factory orders unexpectedly rise for a second month as the economy powers ahead  
Paradise Papers: Theresa May refuses to promise register of offshore trusts #ParadisePapers #BrexitRussia #Brexit 
#Brexit Reality.Rich already got their money out of The Country,  they are content to see the rest well & truly knackered.#ParadisePapers 
EU businesses plan to scale back orders from UK suppliers. It's not too late to stop Brexit!  
"Britain would be booming if it wasn't for Brexit" @acgrayling @JolyonMaugham @ThatTimWalker @thatginamiller @jonsnowC4 @bbcnickrobinson 
Contrary to #LeaveLies the evidence is that immigration pushes up productivity #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Guy at work “I voted Brexit so we don’t have to pay for that Eurovision every year”Me...  
Great @jeremycorbyn, but outside the SM & CU Britain would have to become more like a tax haven to attract investment. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
7 sites to help you keep on top of #Brexit and the negotiations:  
Paradise Papers: Lord Ashcroft hides from trust question - BBC News. One of BREXIT’s keys funders on the run.  
#JammuMartyrsDayReferendum is the only peaceful way to resolve Kashmir.  
Anyone else sick of BBC's "when Brexit happens...? " Has the BBC joined the Brexit press or is it just too feeble to report disastrous news? 
David Miliband: Brexit is a "humiliation".No, David. Humiliation is losing a leadership contest to this guy   
It's why the Mail wants Brexit as the 2019 EU tax avoidance directive will force companies to pay tax in countries where income is earned. 
Join the dots and follow the money: The billionaires behind Brexit who hide their dosh & want to continue doing so ..  
Shame you voted against giving 16-18 yr olds a say in their future and are hell bent on a kamikaze Brexit that threatens their prosperity. 
'All they ever do is run the UK down' Tory SLAMS Labour attempts to release Brexit papers  
Brexit is about the future and not being shackled to a declining EU market  
How about a referendum for Indigenous voice before foreign nationals in parliament #qanda 
The UK should take a ‘keep the best – improve the rest’ approach to its post-Brexit #envi policy says RSPB Scotland’s @stranyannie at #EEB17 
Brexit is an important political event, not an important economic event. 
Straight after PM leaves CBI stage... OECD Chief Gurria says Brexit vote has hit growth, sending from fastest growing to slowest major econ 
#LBC James O’ Brien is there a worse presenter on the radio  than him.!!! Non stop crying  about Brexit every day. Anyone listening no.  
Guaranteeing the best possible access to the European Market by leaving the Single Market. This is nonsense! #Brexit  
NEW: Triple threat of automation, Brexit & demographic change will exacerbate geographical inequality in UK  
Figures released by BDO reveal UK mid-sized businesses have grown turnover by 11% since the June 2016 EU referendum from £122bn to £135bn. 
I’m told by a reliable source that Canon plan to move their London office to Europe with loss of 2,000 jobs after Brexit.#Brexit 
The opponents of Brexit who are still out to stop or dilute it seem to see Brexit as some big economic event. It is difficult to see why. 
Britain ‘would be booming’ if it wasn’t for Brexit, Mark Carney says. Brexit bad for jobs and growth. #StopBrexit. 
Via @eljueves (and no doubt they'll be charged for it) "Spain's justice system organises a referendum to become independent from Government"  
#Day500 UK Business asks for #brexit certainty. May says at #CBI2017 she will give it to them. She doesn't. 
Britain's economy would be "booming" if not for Brexit, the Governor of the Bank of England has said  
Brokenshire should bin Brexit – Martina Anderson MEP  via @M_AndersonSF 
Going to post this here and wait for people to say this has nothing to do with Brexit. 
500 days since the EU Referendum.500 days of the Grayling bedwetter soiling himself thrice daily because of democracy.Glorious. 
"Problem of Brexit is the problem with the #Tory Party" @BloombergTVChart- "How #Brexit can be reversed."#CBI2017 
Brexit is the most cataclysmic act of wanton self-destruction by a major power in modern history. It can & must be stopped.#exitfrombrexit 
Theresa May is telling Britain’s business leaders why a Brexit transition period is needed. Watch live   
This speech from CBI boss is a proper telling off for govt lack of Brexit unity -‘we need spirit and we need it now’ 
#Brexit Nick Clegg, Anna Soubry, Ken Clarke , Alastair Campbell and Chuka Umunna.!! Shut up trying derail Brexit. We voted we’re leaving.   
CBI president lays into govt’s soap opera approach to Brexit 
Once again Farage threatens violence if Brexit is not delivered  
UK-EU supply chains begin to break amid Brexit trade fears  
Failure to release Brexit impact assessments before Parl'mnt goes on recess tomorrow would be contempt of Parliament  
ex #Kurdistan president Massoud Barzani to @NPR - we expected border closures and economic measures after independence referendum - never expected military attack from #Iraq. 
1 like = 1 explanation for Brexit 
Anti-Brexit spin. Not “frozen out”, but voted Leave. No reason for us to be at this meeting whatsoever.  
'Democracy cannot be allowed to die on June 23 2016..a democratic duty to continue to interrogate what was done..hard Brexit or no Brexit'  
Brexit is a "humiliation", says David Miliband as he calls for second referendum | LabourList  
I've said it before & i'll say it AGAIN.  Brexit is about the UK NOT being part of the EU's new Tax Avoidance Legislation, follow the money! 
Nigel Farage would 'pick up a rifle' if #Brexit is not delivered -Why wasn’t he ever charged with inciting violence?  
Every single thing that Remainers warned about is happening. Only those who refuse to see the disaster can still support Brexit. 
#Kurdish leader Massoud Barzani tells @NPR in first interview since referendum no regrets on vote despite consequences.  
Same people who've made you poorer, cut services BUT they get richer are pushing Brexit. Still OK about that or are you a #remainernow? PRT 
#Kurdish leader Massoud Barzani tells @NPR in first interview since referendum that relations with US badly harmed after #Iraqi takeover. 
This shambolic government must come clean on what Brexit means for Wales, writes @LeanneWood 
Still working on a detailed post on those undisclosed 58 Brexit reports.Anybody with info or expertise or informed views, do DM me. 
Friends! Scary!And Brexit will hit especially hard those broadcasting jobs whose main purpose is to explain how disastrous Brexit will be.  
It’s really rather concerning that some people are conflating cleaning up politics and #Brexit. And wrong. 
Your reminder that Farage says things like this knowing full well a white nationalist Brexit supporter shot an MP dead 18 months ago.  
Most businesses tell me that whatever worries they might have re Brexit, they “are insignificant when compared with Corbyn’s policies”  
Brexit is already a worry, given Gibraltar’s dependence on financial services, online gambling and tourism  
Today marks the day 3m EU nationals in UK & 1.2m @BritishInEurope used as Brexit #BargainingChip for 500 days. Time for #peopleB4politics 
Are you joking? I’m proud to have voted Brexit! I had to wait 25 years to do it!  
Senior member of Cameron’s inner-circle confirming the centrality of UKIP in forcing the referendum. Well done all ‘Kippers.  
Another plug for this, which has proved popular: on Brexit, & the ignoring by both sides of places that voted for it  
Sexual harassment, tax avoidance, Brexit, all part of the same picture. It’s about power, about establishment, about the same elite. 
Brexit Lol you just don’t want people with money spending it everywhere else except England  but it’s ok for MP’s to pull strings abroad 
This is a shattering indictment of the madness that is Brexit: Opinion | No One Knows What Britain Is Anymore  
UK-EU supply chains begin to break amid Brexit trade fears via @FT 
This is exactly what I predicted on the day after the referendum. Not collapse, just slow, inexorable decline  
Fact >> if a referendum is held today on secession, not even the kalenjins would want to be part of central Republic @Nkaate @amerix 
May's refusal to have a Cabinet discussion on final Brexit deal is disgracefully irresponsible  
Corporate Britain: Profits and exports are both growing at the fastest pace since 2015 – well before the Brexit vote – and capital investment spending is also at a two-year high.  
Brexit voters will be “reassured” that elite tax dodgers among Royals & Rich will totally escape new tax avoidance rules being brt in by EU 
Brexit will harm Wales. No more no less.  
UK-EU supply chains begin to break amid Brexit trade fears  by @ChrisGiles_ 
An excellent suggestion from Hugh. If you regret voting for #Brexit, write to your MP  
.@LeanneWood calls on Welsh Government to publish Brexit assessment study  
Billionaires and media barons buy Brexit just as the EU cracks down on tax avoidance. Not coincidence. Leavers you’ve been played! 
Free movement after Brexit: what policy options for possible controls within FoM principle? New paper by @jdportes  
Robert Peston, ex-BBC Economics Editor, joins a growing crowd of ex-Remainers who admit Brexit voters were right all along.  
Britain to lose billions of pounds after almost two-thirds of EU businesses say they will use more firms inside single market after #Brexit  
Both still talking Brexit though......  
These were Faith Bandler’s gloves, one of our devoted 1967 referendum activists. ‘A Change is Gonna Come’  #NMAchange 
#OnThisDay 1999 a referendum asked Australians to consider changing Constitution to make Aus a republic. If asked today, how would you vote? 
EU firms warn of deserting UK suppliers after Brexit  
Most EU firms plan retreat from UK suppliers #brexit•UK strategic incompetence pays off ...  
The New York Times on Brexit Britain's identity crisis. Damning stuff!  
Montreal election results: Two-way race became a referendum on Coderre’s personality  
There R no 'Remoaners' only fellow cits who R awake to the damage #Brexit's doing to the UK & who seek a democ #FinalSay & option to #Remain 
To @UKLabour supporters who are worried by #BrexitTo @UKLabour supporters worried by the hard left takeover of your partySupport @LibDems 
12) more on Brexit/Russia too from @carolecadwalla  /15 
If our democracy was undermined with interference in the advisory referendum, then it should be rerun or annulled  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
I intend to fight Brexit until its dead. In the unlikely event that it actually happens then the fight is to rejoin EU or wither away   
Why would you trust Mr. Carney about disastrous Brexit when you can listen to Johnson, Farage and Fox?  
In a country that voted for Brexit, we're still surprised it can make decisions like voting Aston out of #Strictly 
Perhaps one of the simplest explanations of #Brexit  (HT @AFNotBricktop) 
The relentless push for Brexit in the face of dire warnings begins to make sense. EU laws on tax avoidance in 2019. #paradisepapers 
My article for @bellacaledonia on how Brexit has already done seemingly irreparable damage to standards in public life & the UK constitution  
Brexit has already done possibly irreparable damage to standards in public life and the constitution. Utterly grim.  
4) Bob Mercer --backer of far-right/Trump/Brexit/Bannon/Breitbart-- owes $7bil in taxes. Conservative hero indeed/6 
Britain's May to tell business leaders a Brexit transition period 'crucial' to success  
When Mr Farage tried to incite civil unrest to save Brexit, it is now all too obvious this was his last ditch attempt to save his own skin. 
Please god when we get our country back after Brexit can we get rid of the biased BBC, the so called experts & bring back common sense. 
.Stopping Brexit is even MORE crucial to UK businessesWhat're the chances she'll be honest enough to admit THAT?. 
In the era of Donald Trump and Brexit, democracy has been "made to fail."  
#ParadisePapers link Queen, Tory donor and Trump and Brexit campaign funder to million-dollar offshore investments  
#paradisepapers it’s no coincidence that tax avoiders want brexit before EU clampdowns #stopbrexit 
And here's the link to my 'bollocks to Brexit' hoodie, as promised:  
Is it a coincidence that tax-dodging billionaire press barons have been so determined to foist #Brexit on Britain!#StopBrexit 
#Brexit must be scrapped and the country must address the real crisis of our times - mass tax-dodging by the super-rich.#StopBrexit 
I’m even more worried about this than brexit itself. There will be a huge backlash, and it may lead to prolonged political instability. 
Leaving Euratom as result of #Brexit "We are facing disruption to absolutely everything," Tom Greatrex, CEO, Nuclear Industries Association 
Leave.EU founder Arron Banks finally sets out his vision for what the purpose of Brexit actually was.  
RETWEET if you Love BREXIT and the UK and want the EU to be completely destroyed and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Irritating useless idiots like you was a Brexit achievement  
In the end we all know that this is where we’re headed. The Brexit Elite had their chance and they fluffed their lines. #FinalSay 
And also profiting from it. Millions made by hedge fund on night of referendum after Nigel Farage conceded defeat (knowing they'd won)..  
Few of provincial Britain's problems will be solved by Brexit. It remains an elite project fought over by two camps.  
There is, as I wrote before the Referendum, a quite staggering correlation between tax dodging and funding Brexit.  
Just had a text off a mate... “Aston surprised me more than Brexit”  #Strictly 
Exit bill fantasy claims went well then. What’s the word for a national synchronised #facepalm?...henceforth known as a “Brexit Gold Award”  
V good @johnharris1969 on enduring failure of anti-Brexit politics to undertsand and address leave voters' needs    
In case you didn't know... May has hijacked our democracy. An advisory referendum did not give her the right to drag us out of the EU. 
Britain 'would be booming' if it wasn't for Brexit, Mark Carney says  
Brexit was dead as soon as Banks, Farage et al, colluded with enemies of GB to put their finger on the balance of democracy. #HouseofCards 
To me, left-wing, ideological Brexiters are worse than right-wing Brexiters. To think Brexit will help the poor is intellectually idiotic.  
Remoaners: The UK doesn't have anyone to negotiate Brexit.*Govt hires staff*Remoaners: Why have they spent £ on hiring staff for Brexit?  
Before the #paradisepapers Trump, Russia, Brexit and why leaks aren’t the only answer...Via @Byline_Media 
Government 'willing to pay' Brussels demands for £53 BILLION Brexit bill to kickstart trade talk.Government can pay, but NOT using British taxpayers money!Suggest monthly payments to Brussels from salaries of 'willing' Government employees!#Brexit #EU 
Fraser let's try & change the subject from absolutely disastrous Brexit non-negotiations to a collapsing Tory govt to turn on the media...  
In a democracy you do NOT send military police to beat voters even in an unauthorised referendum. You do NOT imprison political opponents. 
Home CRISIS for MERKELGerman chancellor desperately trying to negotiate with 3 party groups to form new coalition government.Failure will result in new elections that could see further gains for resurgent Alternative for Germany (AfD) party.#Brexit #EU 
Another thread on Legatum’s ‘paper’. Worth reading. #brexit ministries *really* don’t want to tell us about Legatum meetings. I know coz I’ve spent 4months FOI’ing them  
After Brexit, Blue Planet 3 will feature Douglas Carswell  snorkelling in the sea at Frinton with a polaroid. 
‘It’s bull****!’ Swedish MEP says EU scaremongering over cost of Brexit to frighten others 
With mounting evidence of Russian infiltration in the Referendum, its in our National & Strategic interest to #StopBrexit 
Brexiteer Kate Hoey SLAMS Remainer Anna Soubry for Brexit-thwarting attempts in Parliament  
A QUARTER of people who voted Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign  via @LondonEconomic 
Vote Leave suggested Britain paid £350 million a week to the EU. It appears to be half that  
2nd time of tweeting because it's a great read. Beware the Tory cult that’s steering Brexit  via @FT 
Bank of England can’t rescue UK from bad Brexit deal, and might have to put up interest rates, even as growth slows  
ANGER as Jeremy Corbyn attends event held by Muslim group accused of ‘hosting hate preachers’  via @Your Brexit 
Tory whips office has now lost two members just as Brexit legislation returns to parliament.  
Severe national nursing shortage. And #Brexit has already caused 96% reduction in nurses coming from EU.  
Brexit has been led by patriotic tax dodging millionaires.... sorry, "men of the people". #ParadisePapers 
Ministers 'could be in contempt of parliament over Brexit papers' .   
Brexit's biggest backer seems unruffled by Russia allegations. He signed off a statement with “Nostrovia”  
Brexit supporters so believe in Britain... Lord Ashcroft used offshore trust to shelter wealth while Tory peer  
Tuesday is a referendum on corruption in #NYC. Do you want another 4 years of scandals & de Blasio's legal bills? 
Molly, are we any closer to understanding why people like this wanted Brexit?If only we could find a reason . . . ? #ParadisePapers 
Queens tax evasion immoral but legal.. referendum moral, but illegal. It's almost like UK/Spain are just rich people imposing their morals 
One of the many Brexit scandals is that a handful of tax-dodging press barons have far more power over Britain than Brussels.#StopBrexit 
BREAKING: Munich has voted in a referendum today to retire the local coal plant! Who's next? #EndCoal #KeepItInTheGround 
Idaho organizers are working toward a 2018 referendum to expand Medicaid. Check out this @lukemayville op-ed: 
Bank of England chief SHOCKS Remainers with praise for Brexit's 'global opportunities'  
Accounts of Russian interference in the Brexit Referendum grow each day. Full investigation needed #StopBrexit 
Maybe @LordAshcroft should stop lecturing people on Brexit and instead pay what he morally owes the country. #paradisepapers 
It couldn't be any clearer - Brexit is only in the interests of the sort of people exposed in #ParadisePapers.#StopBrexit @PeoplesMomentum 
One of the more interesting pieces in the “Despite Brexit” genre  
Ministers 'could be in contempt of parliament over Brexit papers'  
2017 poses so many questions for us. Will Trump start WW3? Will Brexit actually happen? Will Lukaku ever do anything against a decent team? 
Good grief. No wonder Brexit ministers talk rubbish if they use our money to get people to write this nonsense for them.  
You can vote in a referendum in Ireland if you are:✓ An Irish citizen✓ 18 years old✓ Your name is on the Register of Electors#GetRegd 
I started to read the Legatum paper on trade and Brexit. Got to this par already quite grumpyStopped reading. Better now  
RETWEET if you Love BREXIT and the UK and want the EU to be completely destroyed and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
This, not the delusions of our own press, is the reality of Brexit. No One Knows What Britain Is Anymore  
5 Points 2 and 5 assume that non-EU countries will leap into the Brexit talks to battle on the UK's behalf. Unicorns with foreign accents. 
Rightly/ wrongly, true/ false...the UK was  perceived as the  coolest in the room. Since #Brexit...not so much. That's all.@lawyers4britain 
Brexit is set to damage the British broadcasting industry and led to thousands of job losses. Brexit isn't worth it. #StopBrexit 
Here's my take on this new Legatum Institute paper on UK trade after Brexit 1/x  
Rudd is correct. Govt is mostly ready to collapse because it is hung, infected with #Brexit & abstaining en masse  
Brexit? Of course Putin was involved, but who are his henchmen? There are lots, traitors all. We need to wise up - FAST! #RuskiBrexit 
The Times reports Brexit negotiators agree 'divorce bill'. Still no solution for Ireland though @GuyVerhofstadt 
We aren’t leaving. Brexit’s off.  
With Brexit, Britain seems to be embracing an introverted irrelevance  by @StevenErlanger 
Also a direct link between the NHS' current woes and Brexit... and that's before Brexit sets up US-UK deal to sell it off.  
.@UKLabour what’s the point? You support Brexit too. ... What will you do when papers show Brexit is catastrophic?  
Bank of England chief SHOCKS Remainers with praise for Brexit's 'global opportunities'  
'Victory for Leavers' Theresa May's 'Brexit war cabinet' now dominated by Brexiteer MPs  
If a bus is headed over a cliff, and I point this out to the driver - am I "making the crash happen"? Or trying to PREVENT it? #brexit 
WHAT? WHAT is Mark Carney doing to make a bad Brexit deal & low growth happen? Be specific.  
Big breaking story in UK: Russsia rigged #Brexit too! #resist #Resistance#TrumpRussia #impeach45 #RussianCollusion 
Brexit: 'Zero chance' leaving EU will make Britons better off, Nobel laureate economist Paul Krugman says  
NEW: Ministers 'could be in contempt of parliament over Brexit papers' - with quote from @Keir_Starmer 
Leave voters is it time for a rethink.  Brexit will destroy the NHS. 
Oh the irony @johnredwood said #Brexit great for UK now advises invest in EU as UK weakens. "European Central Bank better for growth."  
Thought leaving EU would help NHS? Think again. EU staff leaving, Brexit costing millions which cld've gone 2 NHS  
“the #Brexit referendum has stalled Britain’s growth at a time when global conditions mean it should be booming”  
Ministers 'could be in contempt of parliament over Brexit papers'  
When the history of this era is written, it should highlight the role that Rupert Murdoch played in Brexit's victory & Trump's victory.  
There's the thing. #Brexit headbangers hate facts. They hate Mark Carney @bankofengland because he explains things using facts. #StopBrexit 
Remember £350m/week 4 NHS? @BenPBradshaw shows 9,000 nurses could be hired w/ cash spent on Brexit civil servants   
The British are investigating their own Russian political attacks on the Brexit vote.  
Even the Daily Mail is reporting the unfortunate truth: #Brexit is a massive mistake. Time to #StopBrexit or suffer @Conservatives @UKLabour 
Better still to declare Brexit a titanic disaster, ditch it along with brexit tories & spend 53 billion on UK, NHS, infrastructure & people 
POLL ALERT: Ignore the hype. Brexit might be going badly, that doesn't mean people are changing their minds. By me:  
A devastating  assessment of the political psychology of #Brexit Britain in the New York Times #StopBrexit 
Unleashed - relevant to Harvey Weinstein, political correctness, Brexit, rise and fall of Communism, more. 
Britain would be booming if it had not voted for Brexit, Bank governor Mark Carney claims  
A full-blown identity crisis. A “hollowed-out country,” “ill at ease with itself,” “deeply provincial,” #Brexit 
Brexit will confirm, not reverse, the trend of British economic decline. Just as EU economy is rebounding very strongly.  
After a year of blaming hate crimes on Brexit, these numpties now publish cartoons that glorify physical violence against Leavers.  
#MarkCarney is a pro #EU #bureaucrat, doing everything in his power to undermine #Brexit! #DEPORT this FOOL! #BBC #SKY #BankofEngland #TORY 
Latest from me: on Brexit, and the failure to even start to "rebalance" Britain  
."Brexit: Lake District's tourism industry with 'gaping hole' as uncertainty looms over future of EU workers". 
.Brexit & Populism....."Parts of South Wales are amongst the most economically deprived regions of the UK. " 
The country considered most global fractured by backlash against very model that made it strong.#Brexit is so sad  
Thks to Nana & Rosa for outlining the neg impact of #Brexit on micro-businesses across the UK. @DavidDavisMP needs to listen #etsyadvocacy 
This is a very sad and telling piece by Lord Wallace. The cynicism of the hard right Tories knows no bounds Brexit  
Here's the thing: Remainers' contention is NOT that the EU is perfect. It's that Brexit will make an imperfect situation MUCH WORSE. 
Both Labour and the Tories are failing us. They both know Brexit will be a disaster but are choosing to ignore fact & instead rely on dreams  
Are you sitting comfortably? Popcorn ready? Then let us begin to hear the positive spin on £53bn cost of our Brexit suicide. #60billioneuros 
Given the new revelations about Russian influence in #Brexit by @carolecadwalla and @Byline_Media time to re-up this list (and add Mifsud) 
Mark Carney says 'Brexit effect' has stopped economy from 'booming'  
The Tories are erasing memories of allied participation in WW2 to create a #Brexit myth of Britain standing alone  
Mark Carney admitted #Brexit would herald a wave of new global opportunities, in remarks that will annoy Remainers. 
A point that has to made over & over again:#Brexit is a textbook case of a badly-governed country #StopBrexit 
Rees-Mogg Will 'Flee The Country' If the Conservatives Abandon Brexit A fair weather patriot is no patriot!#Brexit 
At what point does Tim Sherwood hand over the King of Brexit crown to Mark Noble? 
It actually should make uncomfortable reading for every Labour MP whose allowing Corbyn to drag us towards an unopposed Tory Brexit.  
Nearly 9000 nurses could be hired with cash spent on Brexit civil servants  
Brexiteer Kate Hoey SLAMS Remainer Anna Soubry for Brexit thwarting attempts in Parliament 
William Keegan: 'The case for reversing the referendum decision becomes more and more obvious as the problems mount'  
Meet Jack, who waited for hours in a queue to buy the new £1000 iPhone X, just so he could tweet about how ‘Tory austerity’ and ‘Brexit’ are ruining his future  
Imagine framing sexual misconduct allegations as an attempt to derail Brexit Gutter stuff  
500 days on, I know so many @Conservatives who voted Remain and now say they would vote Leave if there was a second EU referendum! #Brexit 
My feeling is that if you want to unsettle die-hard Leavers you need to criticise their patriotism, not their economics.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Nearly 9000 nurses could be hired with cash being spent on Brexit civil servants  
Today is 500 days since the Referendum to Leave the EU. Congratulations to @BrexitCentral for your informative coverage since then. 
William Keegan again calls for Brexit to be stopped. But politicians are not willing to go public & call for a stop.  
The real reason for those driving brexit@BHforEU @EUflagmafia @acgrayling @mikegalsworthy @albawhitewolf @BrexitBin @RemainerAction 
Twat pours £millions into #Brexit then has hissy fit as low-paid EU fruit pickers don’t want to work in a country full of xenophobic pricks.  
Highly talented workers chose countries not the other way around. #Brexit tells many that Britain is a place to avoid. #StopBrexit 
May is filling her Brexit war cabinet with crazy fundamentalists hell bent on destroying all that's good in Britain. Fight to #StopBrexit 
So much for extra money for the NHS.  9000 nurses could be hired with money being spent on Brexit.    
Funny to see @Arron_banks casting around against non-existent funding for @TheNewEuropean while avoiding glasnost re his own Brexit dosh  
It was right to wait for our referendum. It gave Scotland a chance to see the depraved Tories in clearer light. They have no respect for us.  
The Kremlin sent men with a radioactive poison to London to kill a dissident. It helped Trump to power. Its role in Brexit must be known 
Russia, Brexit and the Foreign office: how Russia pulls the strings in UK.  
The Brexidiot marketing campaign isn’t going that well internationally. “It’s very sad, but Brexit is a controlled suicide,”  
Brexit doesn't make Britain incomprehensible. It + its problems reflect the historical forces and predicaments that make Britain what it is. 
13 Basque towns are having referendum today on whether the Basque people should decide their political future freely and legally  
Dear @BBCNewsPlease can you report of potential Brexit job losses in ALL sectors, not just finance and your own. 
Frank Field will try to save the “Brexit Bill” from by replacing it with just four simple clauses later this month  
The Daily Mail has created an eleventh commandment: thou shalt not speak against Brexit.  
David Davis as DESPERATE DAVIS a character from the #brexit comic library  
No free movement or money for you kids... it's straight to the fields to pick food for a pittance in Soviet Brexit Britain.  
What is democracy if it does not give people the right to change their minds? #Brexit is a mistake - let's #StopBrexit together! 
500 days since the referendumManufacturingExportsGrowthFTSEEmploymentOh, and no migrant camp in Kent or Scottish indieref. 
500 glorious days since the EU ref and we’re still not “crawling around on the scorched Earth of the Brexit apocalypse,” says @darrengrimes_ 
Spanish court cites 8 teachers on 'hate crime' charges for discussing #Catalan referendum in class  
Good thread on shonky new report from Legatum, the UAE funded ‘think tank’ that - mysteriously - has the ear of all the #brexit departments  
I've opposed Brexit in the past, but continue to review that opinion in light of EU silence on Spain, etc. 
Important. Carney says bad Brexit deal would cut growth potential of economy - so Bank of England could be forced to raise interest rates in Brexit-induced slowdown  
Brexit, the ministers, the professor and the spy: how Russia pulls strings in UK  
Disappointing that an experienced reporter would produce such a one-sided, pessimistic view of Brexit. Why not a single positive voice?  
How others see us: The New York Times “Will the Harvey Weinstein Effect Derail #Brexit?" 
I’ve been listening to the stories of EU nationals who’ve made their homes here saying they no longer feel welcome. #Brexit shames us all. 
If you think timing of this allegation vs Brexit minister Steve Baker is coincidence, I have a bridge to sell you 
Significant that 2 "Tory" MPs calling loudest for Green to depart are both anti-May & anti-Brexit.Aim: Govt/Brexit destabilisation.#bbcsp 
Keep telling the truth about #brexit bc as O. Wilde said ‘A little sincerity is a dangerous thing, a great deal of it is absolutely fatal’ 
Intelligence services ‘wary of sharing information with Boris Johnson because they don’t trust him’ 
‘It’s bull****!’ Swedish MEP says EU scaremongering over cost of Brexit to frighten others  
Just 30.8% of UK registered voters elected Labour when it won a much-heralded 'landslide victory' in 1997. The turnout was 71.30%.Don't recall anyone complaining about lack of legitimacy at the time.The turnout at Britain's EU Referendum in 2016, incidentally, was 72.21%. 
You: Brexit is for the working class, to push up their wages!Also you: jokes, actually it's for labour camps!  
The New York Times is not the rest of the world. The “Gray Lady” has been relentlessly negative about Brexit since day one  
Businesses are losing patience with the Conservatives. Paul Drechsler of the CBI will today call for an end to the Brexit 'soap opera'.  
Brexit “will create opportunities, of course, with the rest of the world,” says the @bankofengland’s Mark Carney 
Some Leavers are growing ever more terrified about the realities of Brexit...  
This is very good news for all of us who want vision injected into the Brexit process  
The Russian ties, including to suspected spy Sergey Nalobin, of Vote Leave head Matthew Elliot #StopBrexit #Brexit  
So many guys accusing me of having made up my Brexit-shouter-in-Starbucks story. Guys. My made-up stories are much, much better than that. 
Brexit 'threat to UK broadcasting jobs', trade body warns  
Mark Carney says the combination of a bad Brexit deal and low growth might mean @bankofengland can’t cut interest rates  
Help wanted!! Intruccions missing!!  Does anyone have a clue how to put #Brexit together!!   
'Fundamentally WASTEFUL' Jacob Rees-Mogg blasts Cameron and Osborne's foreign aid farce 
Governor @bankofengland Mark Carney explains how the "Brexit effect" has limited the strength of economic growth.  
Today's @cbitweets data: 10% of firms w/ Brexit contingency plans have triggered them25% will by Jan 1stAnother 25% by March 2018 
May doesn’t get that by focusing 24/7 on dismantling the country in the name of Brexit she is doing Russia’s bidding  
Britain's EU contribution was half the amount claimed by Brexit campaign, new figures show  
CBI: 'Time to stop Brexit soap opera'  
My take @LouvreAbuDhabi: what it means for cultural diplomacy, Western weighting & Brexit Britain's place in world  
The people behind Brexit have their reasons:  
Brexit in four easy steps: Labour MP to launch bid to stop Remainers wrecking EU exit Bill  
DISGRACEFUL: Polish migrant 'racially abused' by colleagues at Scots job centre after Brexit vote / #Brexit  
It is hugely to the credit of Andrea Leadsom that Michael Fallon believed she would stand in the way of a soft Brexit deal. Well done her. 
Inside Putin’s troll factory & the role it played in #Brexit  
BOOMING: UK raises more technology investment than any other country in the world. All this 'despite Brexit'. 
More great work by @carolecadwalla on the Russia Trump #Brexit nexus  
Does this invalidate the referendum result?  
THE INCONVENIENT TRUTH:“It’s bull****!” Swedish MEP says EU scaremongering over cost of Brexit to frighten others  
I thought Brexit was supposed to give British youth a strong, independent future, not turn them into serfs.  
500 days since we voted Leave and Brexit doom-mongers have egg on their face as the economy continues to strengthen  
‘The people of Britain have spoken?’ Not on Brexit they haven’t  
Further evidence that Brexit is damaging UK as 9k nurses could be hired w cash being spent on Brexit civil servants  
The greatest degree of certainty we can provide for business in Britain can only be achieved by reversing Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Anti-BBC Bias Demo. I trust this will receive FULL coverage on all BBC TV & Radio channels that has ever unfairly trashed Tories and Brexit.  
Chris Grayling thinks farmers can just grow a little more & we'll be able to eat post-Brexit. 70% of our food comes from EU... #Marr  
“At least Americans can get rid of Trump in four years’ time, whereas the damage from Brexit will be long-lasting.”  
Not sure why a Hard Brexit campaigner is allowed to present BBC political programmes? #Marr 
On the overseas view of #Brexit Britain: “Everywhere I go, people are asking me, ‘What’s wrong with your country?’ ”  
Gove drafted into Brexit war cabinet. Need Jacob Rees-Mogg, Digby- Jones, Dyson. JCBamford etc 
How the outside world sees Brexit Britain - well-written, insightful but depressing piece here:  
Why Brexit makes me terrified that my disabled daughter’s care system may collapse - my MoS piece on its real impact  
After Brexit, the UK will lose access to 759 international trade deals negotiated by the EU. #Brexit  
500 days since EU referendum: Time for struggling UK govt to take consensual approach on Brexit – @StephenGethins: 
Videos of the Spanish Radicals Violence lived in some Cities of Spain by the Catalan Referendum #CDDR #CDDRmat  
It’s time 2 support @conservatives and Theresa May to get real Brexit #ImWithMayGet campaign app:  Code WBG5N 
‘The case for reversing the referendum decision becomes more and more obvious as the problems mount’ @williamkeegan #Brexit  
Brexit, the ministers, the professor and the spy: how Russia pulls strings in UK  
Brexit in four easy steps: Labour Brexiteer MP  Frank Field  to launch bid to stop Remainers wrecking EU exit Bill  
Italian MP heaps praise on Britain and insists Brexit is a ‘blessed opportunity'  
You need to get out more Gisela; you're incredibly naive to believe misplaced passion is an excuse for ignorance. 
Just a handy reminder for setting the clocks back #brexit#trump#clocksgoback 
Shining a light into the complex web of relations between the #Brexit Tories and Russia. #StopBrexit 
The head of Vote #Leave had close Russian ties including to a suspected Russian spy #StopBrexit #Brexit 
And Brexit isn't complete yet folks. Its going to get a lot worse for the working class(aka the poor)  
‘Brexit, a controlled suicide’ just about sums it up. 
My point: we are consumed by the day-to-day drama of Trump & Brexit. But the broader dynamic viz. RUS adventurism is still worse. /x 
RUS assists Brexit, helps elect Trump, encourages low-level violence & authoritarianism in SEE. These are not isolated events. 
Brexit has been a completely pointless and unnecessary diversion, creating angst, unhappiness and instability.  
Remarkable read on the Brexit-Trump axis & part of growing lit on Russia’s influential position in British politics.  
British companies want end to Brexit "soap opera'' in bid for certainty  
.Brexit will do irreversible harm to English football tooFortunately for Brexiters - they don't like football . 
WHOAPapadopoulos' prof/agent Mifsud told a colleague he'd be “meeting Boris Johnson for dinner re Brexit"1/ 
And the #Brexit campaigns & UK Foreign Minister Boris Johnson all have deep Russian ties, links to same London professor as Papadopolous 2/2 
60% of UK firms are ready to trigger contingency #Brexit plans and move staff and/or cut recruitment within months  
From the outgoing London Bureau chief of the @NYTimes.#Brexit as  #revenge. 
‘Europhobe F*ck… SLAP’: Pro-EU Paper ‘Glorifies Violence’ Against Brexit Voters  via @BreitbartNews 
56% of skilled EU27 workers stated they were likely to leave before the outcome of the #Brexit negotiations is known  
If the Brexit impact study compilation isn’t titled “Pride and Prejudice” when it’s published I will be very confused. 
.1st photo of Foreign Sec since story breaks of HIS involvement in Brexit-Trump-Putin scandal & FBI investigationHe declined to comment.  
Imagine booing McClean for not wearing a poppy?!? Brexit weirdos 
Sad but all too true. Especially sad as Brexit a self inflicted act of folly & irresponsibility, the ultimate political own goal. 
Let's be honest: No-one wants Soft BrexitRemainers want to remain. Leavers want cake-and-eat or Hard BrexitLet's call the whole thing off 
Another excellent article by @IanDunt: Chaos in government: Could Brexit fall apart? #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Hang on! It's mostly the pensioners that want Brexit. They can pick the fruit/veg 4 their pension. They knew what they were voting 4! 
Seems the mythical £350m a week won't be going on the NHS. The Tories are too busy spending it to pay for Brexit. #StopBrexit 
quite clear that BOE been overly optimistic about the disastrous impact of Brexit hence why mGBP fell sharply yesterday you are a joke mate  
"NHS at breaking point &Brexit making things worsePeople are asking:is THIS what we voted for when we voted Leave?” 
How Boris fits into bigger picture..Brexit, the ministers, the professor & the spy: how Russia pulls strings in UK  
Brexit Brain Drain: Professionals Wave Goodbye, Head to Europe 
The EU Ref injected new life and vivacity into our tired, sad, depressed democracy. We now have a bright, exciting future~Fantastic! #Brexit  
So there maybe some Russian meddling with brexit That would surprise me Not 
Catalonia is fast becoming the SNP's elephant in the room re the EU/Brexit. Is distance emerging between indy grassroots and powers that be?  
Give me a nudge and wake me up if Brexit ever becomes beneficial.Personally I've got bored of waiting.  
ramifications huge..US & UK pol integrity maybe compromised by hostile foreign meddling..producing Trump & Brexit  
.@thomasbrake: 'time to launch formal inquiry..ISC needs to be reconstituted re possible RU meddling in Brexit Ref'  
‘People need to know if Russian roubles played any part in securing the small majority for Brexit on 23 June 2016.’  
Fun fact:Between 2010-14 alone Russia - the KGB included - laundered £80 billion across the West.We won’t catch them in Brexit on cash. 
The euro-area economy is doing so well that even Brexit can't drag it down  
Spanish court cites 8 teachers on 'hate crime' charges for discussing Catalan Referendum in class #SpanishDemocracy 
I'm a panel member at UEL Students' Union on Monday, arguing on behalf of "getting on with Brexit" and OH MY GOD I'm suddenly quite nervous. 
*Brexit Explained*  
By the time brexit happens will there be any MPs leftHarassment Expenses In fightingJust tip of iceberg Rudderless ship Great Britain 
Britain should exit the European Arrest Warrant system. The police and courts are deeply politicised and corrupt in much of the EU. #Brexit 
Britain's EU contribution was half the amount claimed by Brexit campaign, new figures show  
Brexit/Trump were votes FOR something, not against. Blaming those on Russia, big data & bus poster comforting but reveals intellectual hole  
17 months after the vote for Brexit, 12 months after Trump, I've not seen a single decent idea from liberals on how to get back in the game 
If a deal with the EU "does not measure up" then Brexit should be halted, Nick Clegg says  
'Europhobic?' I voted for Brexit and have been to 20 different European countries and counting. The EU is not Europe. 
Why on earth is it in the UK interest in negotiating Brexit to publish the Government 's Brexit impact assessments?... 
Brexit, the ministers, the professor & the spy: how Russia pulls strings in UK.   
And GOOD NIGHT Boris Johnson Off you pop & write your memoirs "Putin, Trump, Brexit & ME"- that's a good title. 
Brexit, the ministers, the professor and the spy: how Russia pulls strings in UK  
Brexit is "wounded and vulnerable ... It can be stopped." Great article from @IanDunt #FBPE  via @politics_co_uk 
Now a brief update on Brexit negotiations. #Meep 
Electoral Commission is being sued for allowing Brexit overspending by Vote Leave  
If Russia had an effect or influence on the Brexit referendum we need to stop everything and rescind our Art 50 notification. 
Brexit minister Steve Baker reported for ‘taking cash from DUP’:  
Gov says will take 3yrs to find a way to ban pensions Cold-calling yet believes it can renegotiate trade deals&pass Brexit Bill in 18mths  
The ultra right links between UK and USA need a lot more attention than they're getting. Brexit is only the 1st step in their strategy.  
To Do List: 1. Stop Brexit 
We who Vote #Conservative not as a matter of habit but of belief! Must be aware of those in the #ConservativeParty who are #BREXIT saboteurs  
We have a duty to #BRITAIN to defend #BREXIT, Those #Conservatives #MP's who refuse to recognize the #EURef Result are ENEMIES & TRAITORS! 
Electoral Commission investigates whether Russia tried to influence the Brexit referendum  
Really? I appreciate you have a different view on Brexit but there’s nothing subtle, clever or interesting about those cartoons. 
."[The UK government's] enthusiasm for Brexit is exceeded ONLY by their lack of ANY clue as to how to achieve it”. 
"They’re frightened of Spanish reaction in Brexit talks. It demonstrates the weakness of the British body politic”. 
This is just one of many factories that are closing due to Brexit and we haven't even left yet. Please wake up!  
Alex Salmond: UK Government silent over Catalonia for fear of Spanish reprisals at Brexit talks  
Khalistan Referendum 2020' banners put up during 549th birthday anniversary of Baba Guru Nanak #GuruNanakJayanti 
RT if you agree that diehard Brexit supporters want to harm the UK  
Swivel-eyed Brexiteers!! here telling me I don't know about working in the EU. Been doing it for 40 years ! Non EU can wait years for a visa, usually give up unless really rich. EU citizens treated same as locals. So yes, doors firmly closed to young Brits post Brexit #bbcaq 
Banners in Erbil , to be honest US stand was very clear prior to the referendum, read the statements prior and you can tell what will happen  
Today's reminder. We have not decided to leave the EU. May doesn't have the authority to misuse an advisory referendum to drag us out! 
Eh up comrade @arronbanks isn’t it time we had a bit of glasnost about where all your Brexit dosh came from? Cops surely taking a look? 
Mercer is in big trouble. He's key to Brexit. Brexit is a scam. #stopbrexit 
Great day handing out leaflets and helping with the stall for @LeedsEurope. @HarryJSmall #remain #brexit #EU #bollockstobrexit 
Italian MP Daniele Capezzoli - "#Brexit is a wonderful opportunity. “You, the United Kingdom, are going to triumph."  
The Face of Brexit  
550 groups held Assembly to persuade Catalan politicians to hold their Indy referendum. Not party-led or top down. anna_arque at #Build2Indy 
“The scariest chart in the world when it comes to #Brexit negotiations” The Daily Express right for once.... 
Foreign investment£Credit ratingGDPOutputInflationInterest RatesHate CrimeBut yeah, nothing to do with Brexit ...  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
#MarkCarney is just doing what he has been paid to do and that is undermine #BREXIT at every stage! #DEPORT #BBC #SKY #BankofEngland #EU #UK 
‘@TheNewEuropean are glorifying violence against Brexit voters. It is them who are divisive.  
Heartbreakingly accurate picture of England today.  Beautiful and sad from @billybragg. #Brexit 
BREAKING: EXCLUSIVE: Trump-Russia Mr. Fixit at Recent Meeting with Boris over Brexit  
I was talking to a pro-Merkel anti-Brexit anti-Trump Socialist German at the club yesterday. He asked me about guns and Trump; I told him: 
'Glorifying Violence': British newspaper publishes 'fantastic' cartoons depicting assault against Brexit supporters  
Ensure that Parliament has a vote on the Brexit Deal. Contact your MP & ask them to amend the bill:  #ExitFromBrexit 
A leadership challenge would only serve to imperil Brexit. The Conservative Party must get behind Theresa.  
Found this encapsulates all the lies about Brexit. Torys did all this but blamed EU.  
Brexit not happening. Time for political landscape to change #StopBrexit #FBPE 
498 days since the #brexit referendum and we have now narrowed down the leave vote to either a deal, a no deal, or a no deal deal. Not bad. 
EU's €10bln Post-Brexit Deficit Is 'Time Bomb' Waiting to Go Off – LSE Fellow  
What did I say about agricultural labour camps being right around the Brexit corner...?  
The Guardian view on languages and the British: Brexit and an Anglosphere prison  
TRY!Would you believe it? Trump..Brexit..#Baabaas 10-0 up after @StevenLuatua intercept #rugby #rugbyunited #BARvNZL 
I love all of this “in the national interest” crap. Brexit is not in th national interest! 
Brexit Brain Drain: Professionals Wave Goodbye, Head to Europe -  
After nine hours of talks #France has agreed to allow a independence referendum to be held in #NewCaledonia in 2018 
Food is rotting in our fields because of a shortage of seasonal workers exacerbated by #Brexit. Share our report:  
“The two persons leading the Catalan organisation were put in prison for asking to vote in a legal referendum”  
EXC: EU: the UK living in 'fantasy land' over hopes for a 'basic' #Brexit deal - my latest. (Free this w/e).   
Brexit minister Steve Baker MP accused of accepting a donation from a mysterious group that bankrolled Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Oh dear Surely these cartoons are encouraging violence against anyone who voted Brexit. I thought Remainers were morally superior to Leavers 
UK is not leaving the EU for the purpose of doing a deal with the EU. The merits of Brexit do not depend on May & Davis' negotiating skills. 
Expect more revelations in at least one Sunday newspaper tomorrow about the scale of Russian trolling during EU Referendum. 
So 2017. Brexit-backing beermat fact-checked by a broadcaster:  
Royal Navy shipbuilding contracts open to foreign yards thanks to EU rules. Didn't we vote for #Brexit a while back?  
ICYMI I asked police to investigate Bristol connection to Brexit funding allegations and ecplore whether EU vote was illegal 
Redwood: ”When we leave the EU we will have a country to be proud of”Umunna: ”I was proud of this country before referendum”#bbcaq 
 “#KennethClarke #MP the Ultimate #British #TRAITOR!”  #Conservatives #TORY #ConservativeParty #BBC #SKY #BREXIT 
The Anti-Brexit Resistance is keeping very quiet about the Euro-nightmare that awaited us if it changed our minds. 
I wonder how many unemployed people, who voted for Brexit unicorns, will be pleased with Arron’s fruit picking suggestion?  
Britain is living in "fantasy land" over hopes for a "basic" Brexit, senior EU officials and diplomats say 
Word of #Russia financing Brexit campaigns is fast becoming torrentHard evidence could delegitimise #EUreferendum 
Brexit minister Baker accused of taking money from impermissible donor linked to DUP #darkmoney #stopbrexit ‘taking 
You want a sector by sector assessment of the impact of a no-deal Brexit? @POLITICOEurope obliges 
A vote for a past we remember but never hadA vote for a future we dream of but will never haveBrexit. A nightmare we must wake up from. 
#TORY MP's @NickyMorgan01 @AnnaSoubry & #DominicGrieve who are plotting to destroy your #BREXIT! #BBC #SKY #ConservativeParty #CONSERVATIVES 
"If leaders are tired of having a strong and independent judiciary, they should call a referendum and abolish it..." 
Funny to hear 2016 Brexit vote described as explosion of anger about economic unfairness etc. If so, why was Cameron given majority in 2015? 
Today I am learning a whole new line in acronyms whilst researching a speech on Brexit (& finding I agree with @PeteNorth303 in some areas!) 
Brexit Impact assessments will expose the disaster we're careering towards.Why weren't they commissioned before?Why so long now? #StopBrexit 
#RETWEET those who support #BREXIT #BRITAIN: #PeterShore exposed #EU #ProjectFear!  #UK #NEWS #BBC #SKY #TORY #LABOUR 
This is madness. There are no upsides to #Brexit.  
What's it like being a student who voted for Brexit? The BBC found out  
Anti-Brexit campaign needs clear leadership for the masses of support to have real affect. Brexit can be reversed with right people leading  
Hammond is said to be aiming to reform VAT. But it’s a cumbersome administrative nightmare. With Brexit, we can dump it for a better model. 
France plans New Caledonia self-rule referendum in 2018 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
The shady dealings of Arron Banks, the man who bought Brexit: many questions #BrexitDarkMoney #HoldThemToAccount  
Passionate Remainer seeks similar for some Brexit bashing and eventual murder of Brexit. #FollowBackProEU #FBPE *Debate-free thread 
Here’s why this Nobel Prize winner reckons British science is screwed because of Brexit  via @ShortList 
Inadvertently hilarious video of 3 Brexit supporters who have mistaken the fact they have no mates with an attack on freedom of speech  
"Brexit isn't racist" but...  
So could we please see (unredacted) the Brexit impact reports & could you answer @BenPBradshaw's questions on Russia? 
European Movement groups across the UK are talking to local residents about the devastating impact Brexit is having on the NHS #Rally4Europe 
This is the perfect explanation of the Brexit mentality.  
Mr Corbyn three-line-whipped his MPs to vote for Brexit and therefore Labour has shared ownership with the Tories of this pile of excrement.  
Thatcher "You may have to fight a battle more than once to win it".#Brexit is under attack.Hold firm, it's the death throes of Remoanerdom 
#Brexit Can the Conservative party kick Ken Clarke traitor out of the party.!!! Trying stop Brexit  clown. Nick Clegg & Chuka Umunna.   
With every passing day the self inflicted #Brexit  wounds bleed a little more Even our friends now look on in astonishment 
As study finds that 'No deal' Brexit could add £930 a year to the shopping bills of the UK's poorer families, the Conservatives reply saying "It won't if they visit any of the many food banks that have opened up under our leadership..." 
Biggest Brexit LOSERS: The Common Agricultural Policy alone accounts for 40 per cent of the EU's bloated budget.  
Farage, Telegraph & BBC peddling notions of UK universities repressing Brexit discussion. Hardly...  
If Labour is democratic, then given that all but 10 of its MPs are Remain, like it’s tactical vote at the GE, it should be for Stop Brexit.  
Britain's EU contribution was half the amount claimed by Brexit campaign, new figures show  
Every day the Govt clings on to the Brexit studies is another day it holds us in contempt. The game is up, release them in full or be damned  
Players in the EU referendum 'stitch up' perhaps regretting their boastfulness as the spotlight seeks out their 'questionable activities'  
Really important political development yday: Govt blocked Votes at 16 Bill, pushing young even further into Labour & anti-Brexit camps. 
RT if you have no confidence in this Govt**But have little or no confidence Labour will be any better while it backs Brexit 
The EU needs to call on Spain to hold a legal referendum in Catalonia  
The great thing about Scots having had a legal, democratic referendum is that it allowed us to move on from constant constitutional debate. 
SWEDEN: 'Country should follow Brexit and leave the EU to preserve national sovereignty' - Swedish MEP says. 
Finally. After two months of battling, the 58 secret studies on Brexit will be released. But how and to whom?...  
I didn't really know poppy fascism was such a thing. But wow, it is. And, ironically, they all seem to vote Brexit. 
There is a time for crying, and it wasn’t Brexit morning - @Telegraph 
Sterling lost 10% in value & depreciation is pushing up prices. Hard Brexit will take food & drink even higher. Oops  
#SikhUprising has begun in India. They are fighting for their basic rights. They must be granted. Referendum 2020 has to be a reality 
A very different story has a different outcome: France agrees to self-rule referendum in New Caledonia @lavanguardia 
May has retreated because UK is already running short of workers.  Crops rotting and businesses facing ruin. Real Brexit damage yet to come.  
Brexit minister Steve Baker reported for ‘taking cash from DUP’: another indication that we need a thorough FBI-style investigation into the funding of Brexit campaign and its leadership 
Biggest Brexit LOSERS: Shock charts show which EU states will suffer most from budget hole  
Call for EU sanctions to push Spain into legal referendum in Catalonia  
Good to see DUP dark money, Arron Banks and Brexit in Vanity Fair, with a namecheck for @AdamRamsay and I  
Those of us who wanted #Brexit WERE wrong in saying we give £350 million each week to the #EUSorryIt's £363m p.w. 
I wrote this sketch on Brexit fall-out in February. Read it, think about the world as it is then read the next tweet  
Last 48 hrs further demonstrate why Brexit should be halted. A Govt so far below the level of events. Like end of French 4th Republic. 
Brexiters want to take back control of laws from the EU, but I've yet to hear of an actual law that they want to take back.#Brexit 
Thanks, I'll go for the 'no deal' #Brexit version then. More #ProjectFear cobblers. 
No Brexit deal / WTO trade rates:40% fresh food tariffs£4.5bn cost to British exporters £930 a year on extra shopping billsIt's madness.  
One thing only stops me voting Labour.Corbyn wants Brexit.If the rest of Labour wants my vote, they need to fix that problem quickly.  
Foreign aid: Brexit Britain should 'stop funding EU foreign aid at the EARLIEST moment'  
Why can’t just one of the authors of Brexit impact reports have the guts to come forward and say what’s been said? 
'EU is holding us back from trade!' Peer says Brexit will liberate UK from trade shackles  
The real reason why Government doesn't want to release the secret Brexit studies.  
There are multiple serious allegations of unlawful manipulation of Brexit vote for Leave.@BBC please cover these properly & prominently. 
Britain relies on imports and Brexit is a total mess for the country's retailers  
The #Brexit impact studies must be released in full  
Preserve the rights of EU Citizens after Brexit. Contact your MP & ask them to amend the bill:  #exitfrombrexit 
Oh don’t you worry: as Parliament is dismantling itself through Brexit legislation, this soon won’t matter.  
Never forget. This man created #Brexit chaos because of an internal Tory party feud. He then knighted all his mates  
Brexit minister reported for taking cash from DUP backer  
Drip, drip, drip.....the reality of #Brexit becomes clearer daily. #StopBrexit @GMB @TheSun @MetroUK @LBC @GMBUnion 
If a deal with the EU "does not measure up" then Brexit should be halted, Nick Clegg says  
Listening to @BBCFarmingToday - Brexit is unbelievably threatening to farmers. Madness. 
Guy, it would be daft to leave when all indications are that leave will soon be in the minority.Brexit is not in my name.  
Best way to respond to tossers like that is to cancel Brexit, and remind them every day that we did it because of idiots like him. #Karma 
'EU is holding us back from trade!' Peer says Brexit will liberate UK from trade shackles  
Uk Government saying nothing to condemn Spains outrageous behaviour against Catalan politiciansIn case they block the #Brexit deal  
That's £17.88 per week or £2.55 per day that households will pay extra for Brexit.  
The Brexit Impact Study comes from Govt ‘pen’ so they can’t deny what’s in it... @JolyonMaugham 
#Brexit would destroy everything we are used to and take for granted: jobs, #NHS , #education , social services... let’s #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Labour is trying to play Brexit for Party political ends @JolyonMaugham 
Seems Andrea Leadsom knifed Sir Michael Fallon to protect her job after he suggested sacking her to get Cabinet agreement on Brexit.  
On Kashmir Issue Kejriwal Ji Wants Referendum To Happen? Referendum In Hands Of Such Ppl Who Don't Go To School But R Given Stones To Pelt!  
For our new followers here's a quick guide into the ideology behind us :Free Market CapitalismLibertarian ConservatismPro Gun Pro Liberty & FreedomPro FamilyPro Trump Pro Brexit Civic NationalismAnti FeministAnti IslamAnti Marxist/CommunistAnti EUAnti Globalist 
.@racopeman, @DenisCoderre: you can call out @Val_Plante re 1995 referendum OR get @GillesDuceppe endorsement. But not both. #polmtl #logic 
The media's finally catching on to the fact that Brexit is a cult.  
Good decision. A council has just BANNED white poppies from their Remembrance Sunday service  via @Your Brexit 
I hate Brexit but fuck me, I now officially detest the EU more. 
The tide is turningAll by bollocks to brexit stickers taken todayNeed more@RemainerAction @BrexitBin @acgrayling @No10Vigil 
Folks have asked me my opinion on the NY Con Convention referendum  - I find this persuasive.... @WorkingFamilies 
Our negotiating partners see the fabulous opportunities created by Brexit.They are rolling out the red carpet for leading UK businesses. 
More people have voted in Australia's same-sex marriage vote than Brexit  
Have some sympathy for Preston’s argument but he completely misses a core motivation of Brexit - English nationalism  
Couldn’t agree more. Brexit isn’t Left vs right but about ideologies vs pragmatism.  
How many of them campaigned for Brexit, for right wings in EU, for rejecting the Association Agreement between EU and Ukraine?  
I promise not to say 'we won, you lost, get over it' when Brexit is halted.#StopBrexit #FollowBackProEU #FBPE 
A British lawmaker has asked Twitter about possible Russian meddling in the Brexit referendum  
Respecting the advisory referendum would have meant noting the nearly equal division, the defective electoral franchise etc.. 
A no-deal WTO #Brexit could add £930 a year to UK shopping bills, hitting the poor hardest #StopBrexit 
Oh dear.  I hate to tell you this Simon but I am poorer now then I was before the Referendum, a lot poorer. Undemocratic was the whole referendum when a Maltese is allowed a vote but a Brit isn’t because he lives in Spain.  
A piece about the BBC return of Alan Partridge. All I’d say is it won’t be about Brexit in any way whatsoever.  
Shame on @UKLabour for not standing up to Brexit. This failure will negatively impact and severely limit future of 16-year-olds (& others).  
The threat we face is wider than Brexit. It is the onset of an Age of Unreason, on top of Climate Change & wholesale destruction of species. 
When are those Brexit reports coming out?  
Saturday's Guardian"Cost of Brexit: £930 a year on shopping bills"#tomorrowspaperstoday#bbcpapers(via @hendopolis) 
.Brexit Means B̶r̶e̶x̶i̶t̶ People WILL Die In Northern IrelandW̲I̲L̲L̲ ̲D̲i̲e̲Let THAT Sink In. 
No, you are counting non defined votes in No side.and obviating that 80% want to vote in referendum #CDDR 
The Guardian front page, Saturday 04.11.17 | Cost of Brexit: £930 a year on shopping bills  
Saturday's Daily Telegraph"Fallon schemed to have 'dud' Leadsom sacked over Brexit"#tomorrowspaperstoday#bbcpapers(via @hendopolis) 
 @rwainwright67 @Europol HELP CATALONIASpanish police Tw account marks with cross our legitime Gov. in jail just to allow #Referendum  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Dover won't need an MP to replace Charlie Elphicke when it becomes just a giant lorry park post-Brexit. 
Guy photographed on camera-phone, reported to police, escorted outside. Still ranting; "Brexit means Brexit." Mrs May, you must be so proud. 
TELEGRAPH: Fallon schemed to have ‘dud’ Leadsom sacked over Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
OK I see Spring election - weak Labour Lib Dem coalition Gov - 2nd referendum - #Brexit rejected - whole political class doomed - then what? 
Fuck me - all this to distract from the Brexit Impact reports - they must be absolutely terrible! 
Wanker in Starbuck's, Charing Cross Road, abusing staff, repeating: "Fuck off to Poland, we got Brexit now." Have never felt less British. 
Hilary Benn will make sure we get these #Brexit impact reports into the public domain, where they belong. #FBPE #Reverse #NoBrexit 
Michael Fallon 'knifed' by Andrea Leadsom after he schemed to have her sacked to secure Brexit deal 
.Shame Labour blocked a meaningful vote on Brexit during its conferenceShameShame Shame on you#LabourBrexitForTheFewNotTheMany 
Monday 11 December: The last two remaining unsuspended MPs say “fuck this” and cup each other’s balls so they don’t have to sort out Brexit. 
Another Brexit triumph: Migrant labour shortage leaves fruit rotting on UK farms  
Supporting pacifically a referendum breaks coexistence; imprisoning polititians from the opposition does not  
Then 7 weeks later, my 16 year old couldn't vote in a referendum whose result destroys opportunities he wanted to keep. 2/2 
#bbcaqBrexit is bonkers...not that you will hear it on the BBC!  
Cost of No Deal #Brexit:£930 on shopping bills-That wasn't on the side of the busTomorrow's Guardian  
Top lawyer has commenced legal action & the outcome for Brexit could be explosive  via @thecanarysays 
‘This is the biggest negotiation ever!' Tory MP lashes Labour for trying to DESTROY Brexit  
Sec gen of OECD at LSE: ‘no upside for the UK in Brexit,’ Tory Jenkin reported LSE for partisan research. Snowflake on campus. 
Preserve the rights of EU Citizens after Brexit. Contact your MP & ask them to amend the bill:  #exitfrombrexit 
They say the Brexit vote was a sign the government was out of touch with ordinary people. I suggest that people were also out of touch. 
Brussels furious as UK 'admits next round of Brexit talks will be stock-taking exercise' 
Tory "told me y'day that they're now minded to throw in their lot with the dozen or so Tory rebels on Brexit bill". 
Govt has no majority in Commons for Brexit legislation – and let’s not even talk about horrors that await in Lords  
So in effect he says "Brexit is the right thing to do" even if its outcome may further harm and alienate voters from democratic norms  
Brexit support declining. Large and growing majority want to prioritise Single Market over immigration control: 49% to 37%. #StopBrexit. 
New Caledonia to hold a referendum as the South Pacific islands seek independence from France  
The Government does not have the right to hide Brexit impact reports - @Open_Britain's Barney Pell Scholes blogs  
Thrilled to hear today about a big corporate advisory firm losing business because their Brexit analysis has been so rubbish. 
This #Brexit nonsense has dragged on long enough and wasted massive resources. High time to abandon the whole daft project. #StopTheMadness 
Spanish ultra nationalist party VOX qualifies Catalan elections as de facto referendum. Won't run there. First good news of the week.  
Hand over the Brexit studies as Parlmt demanded @DavidDavisMP. This is Brexit Island, where we get poorer by the day, not Fantasy Island.  
Nick Clegg is hosting a 5-star 'Exit from Brexit' dinner for wealthy Remainers with tables booked for £2,000 each  
my column today on Russia, Trump & Brexit  
The Brexit department currently has no one in charge of #Brexit modelling, strategic analysis and planning but don't worry it'll be fine...  
Beware the Tory cult that’s steering Brexit, a British empire delusion. 
Wetherspoon pubs print 'no deal' Brexit manifesto on beermats  WELL DONE TIM MARTIN. PROPER BUSINESS PERSON. 
The Brexit impact studies must be released in full | Gina Miller  
Boom!A top lawyer has just commenced legal action and the outcome for Brexit could be explosive 
Oh cry me a fucking river. Tell that to the thousands of immigrants/minorities who've actually faced threats and abuse since the referendum  
If Labour really want to do something for 16/17 year olds try stopping Brexit rather than supporting it. That will help them. 
Both Tories & Labour should retire their leaderships, replace them with sensible people, then retire Brexit. Very, very soon. This weekend? 
French territory New Caledonia to hold referendum on self rule in 2018  
Plaudits to Conservative MP @DamianCollins for investigating possible unlawful Russian interference in the Brexit vote.  
Reform of our political, Parliamentary & government system is way overdue. Brexit has exposed the shabbiness & dishonesty of it.  
Shame on Britain for inventing the #posttruth age. All signs are it will backfire, with terrible injustices and a disastrous #Brexit.  
."Brexit: a policy which will tear the Conservative party apart" 
No report, No back up plan, No regard for Scotland @DavidMundellDCT.Mundell says there’s no Scottish Brexit report  
Thread: The gerrymandered #Brexit referendum: #StopBrexit 
Brexit Britain open for BUSINESS as Belarus welcomes STRONGER trade ties with UK  
I get why Catalan ministers are emprisoned. They’ve fulfilled their electoral promises (i.e. #referendum). The #EU are not used to that.  
There are multiple serious allegations of unlawful manipulation of Brexit vote for Leave@BBC please cover these properly & prominently 
'No deal' Brexit could add £930 a year to UK shopping bills, say experts  
Delighted that my edited book on Languages after Brexit has just appeared. 24 essays full of ideas and insights, with clear and concise arguments, based on authoritative evidence. Hope it gives momentum to call for national strategy for languages in the UK 
Guy Fawkes tried to blow up parliament.Theresa May is trying to bypass it.Let's throw Brexit on the bonfire this #BonfireNight2017 
If you find that you can't support Brexit, that you do not recognise the democratic will of the British people, and STILL want to live inside the EU, can you kindly hop on a plane or ferry and go to live there. Thank you. 
Really good letter from Bristol Vice Chancellor Hugh Brady on Brexit-related academic freedom  
Priti Patel says British workers are the "worst idlers in the world". #Brexit is intended to force them to work like Asians. #StopBrexit 
Volkswagen is exploring applying for a UK banking licence so it can continue offering loans in the UK after Brexit  
Foreign aid: Brexit Britain should 'stop funding EU foreign aid at the EARLIEST moment'  @patel4witham @theresa_may 
Excellent, brief and insightful @chunkymark interview with @JolyonMaugham on the relationship of chlorinated chicken to Brexit. Please view.  
Remoaners:'There was never any hanky-panky in Westminster before the Brexit vote.The EU keeps our morals intact!'  
"No-one asks who owns mainstream media" @DrMarcusP​​ as US senator claims Russian hackers in Scotland want another independence referendum.  
The Brexit impact studies must be released in full | Gina Miller  
EXC Brussels furious as next round of Brexit talks will only be 'talks about talks': my latest with @JamesCrisp6  
WATCH: Remain voter Robert Peston admits Brexit voters were ON THE RIGHT SIDE OF HISTORY  via @Your Brexit 
Speaker says he expects Govt to respect vote & publish impact assessments of Brexit on 50 key industries @BBC please hold govt to its duty 
FTSE 100 closes at record high (Despite Brexit of course)!   
We haven't seen nearly enough cross party action against Brexit. Can't remember high level Remainers holding a cross party press conference 
Meanwhile, somewhere in the White House, a very confused Donald Trump asks his Sec of State - how the hell can France plan to hold a Scottish referendum? #IndyRef 
Me for @theipaper on Brexit latest - what we learned this week   
Just 32% of Brits believe Theresa May is doing a good job handling Brexit, according to Ipsos-MORI polling.  
Pesto's Brexit Conversion:  
Recently published #Brexit #cartoon for the Tribune Oct 2017 
Any Brexit agreement needs to be better than No Deal - many versions of a deal would be worse, warns @johnredwood 
We're looking for a Postdoc to work on Brexit. Details here:  @UCC @GovUCC @CACSSS1 
Hard to believe its true but it is. Fruit is rotting in fields as farms face #European worker shortage. #Brexit  
Ensure that Parliament has a vote on the Brexit Deal. Contact your MP & ask them to amend the bill:  #ExitFromBrexit 
Labour's Brexit strategy: shepherd the Govt. towards 'No Deal', watch the economy nosedive and cash in at the next election. 
We must get to the truth about Russia and Brexit & Electoral Commission must have support of intelligence agencies  
"As a textbook case of a badly-governed country, Brexit is exemplary," writes Ian Davidson. 
Or been scaled back because of the above? By far and away the best political inerviewer - tough on all parties. 
Parliament passes a motion calling on Britain's government to release Brexit impact studies  
Your MP does his job shocker!!! says @dailyexpressuk #Brexit @Open_Britain 
"Brexit put paid to" £150m tyre factory in Carlisle (which voted 60% Leave 40% Remain).  
50% of all retailers surveyed say the impact of #Brexit has them concerned about their fiscal future  
More importantly she’s bungling Brexit. No taking control. No vision on infrastructure, energy, immigration, trade, social justice. #WorstPM 
In other news today. £150m investment pulled in Carlisle (pop.~100,000). Cause stated as Brexit @JolyonMaugham 
Let’s get #VotesAt16 and then have a 2nd ref on #Brexit and overturn it. The young are the future and they want to remain in the #EU. 
Tory and Labour Remoaners ‘trying to bring down government and reverse Brexit’  
ME & EU – the political postcard project launched in response to Brexit – is now available in book form  
"Now Tony, let’s try this again. If Leave won 52% of the national vote and Remain won 48%, who won the EU Referendum?"  
#Brexit is a bit like someone sticking two fingers up at a window and then discovering it's a mirror. 
Just another 'despite Brexit' bit of news. 
“Russian links of Brexit” investigation: wonder why some British elites wish to discredit referendum results and the will of the people?  
Brexit: City of London office leasing at a ten-year low - Brexit's impact continues to be negative  
2 Thirds of those Traitorous MPs Don’t agree with the way the people voted So are prepared to overturn the referendum result to keep us in 
Provide for a referendum on the final Brexit Deal. Contact your MP & ask them to amend the bill:  #ExitFromBrexit 
PM says Brexit deal over EU citizens is “within touching distance” but warns certain male colleagues not to get any ideas. 
Thread: Did Russian trolls intervene in #Brexit and #Indyref debates? We don’t know, but need to ask. 
Hard Brexit ham sandwich. My favourite, nothing fancy. #NationalSandwichDay 
TREACHERY: Tory & Labour Remoaners 'working together to bring down government and reverse Brexit' - @NadineDorries. 
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: Germany's EU bill to soar as Merkel counts cost of life without UK  
How Putin could yet save Britain from Brexit | Mark Galeotti  
Italian MP heaps praise on Britain and insists Brexit is a ‘blessed opportunity'  
Northern Ireland is in a desperate race against the clock regarding #BrexitHow much more time are we going to see wasted?  
This was in 2015. A year before the UK's EU Referendum. Useful for @ElectoralCommUK & @CommonsCMS investigations into Russian meddling here. 
It's things like this that mislead people into thinking that after Brexit the UK can just make up the losses by signing an FTA with the US.  
And they all typically voted Brexit, voting against the thing that’s arguably kept the peace in Europe during the last half-century. 
A proper Brexit.  
Given what we know and all saw on referendum day, this is distressing, but not unexpected, news. Spain/EU/UK disgrace! #ViscaCatalunyaIliure 
BREXIT POLITICIANS: I know you're TERRIFIED of going down in history for owning up to a terrible mistake and making a humiliating climbdown… 
'The right thing to do' Peston says Brexit voters were 'on the right side of history'  
yes to16 yr olds voting but could the right stop turning them against immigrants & Corbyn stop reciting poetry & tell them he's pro Brexit 
Why can't the Bank of England admit it was wrong to cut interest rates after the referendum, asks @RossjournoClark 
My Tory colleagues have actively whitewashed Remembrance Sunday to fuel their dreams of a hard Brexit 
Have just read the newish Nick Clegg book on how to stop Brexit. Had high hopes for it. But it was utter rubbish. 
 Thank you @Keir_Starmer & @CatSmithMP for joining our Brexit Café & putting young people at the heart of the Brexit debate   
Brexit recap  
Great session with young people on UK's future & Brexit. Need to listen hard: they have to live with outcome for longer than the rest of us!  
In a hugely revealing interview, Robert Peston admits to @IainDale Brexit voters were “on the right side of history”  
Polling from @Open_Britain and @euromove shows voters are becoming worried about the impact of #Brexit on the NHS  
UK car production fell 4.1% in September with a  14% drop in domestic demand for British-made vehicles #Brexit 
'It's a farce!' Lord Lawson lashes Labour MPs for trying to force Brexit papers release  
Me: Yes. His promises are worthless if we can't afford them. #brexit renders them useless 
#honestpoll Has @jeremycorbyn "s stance on #brexit dimmed your view of him? Please #retweet to increase sample size. Comments welcome. 
EU national constituents are worried about #citizensrights post #Brexit. Your MP will listen, just ask for a meeting.  
Beautiful message: @vanessa68734549We Boomers -still strong.But: #Brexit does not belong to us.#LetTheYoungDecide 
#KennethClarke is plotting to defeat #BREXIT! #ConservativeParty must now deselect this #political #TURD or face the wrath of #Tory #Voters! 
My take on why the #Tories are terrified of releasing the #Brexit impact papers : via @leftfootfwd 
The Mail is terrified MPs will eventually find their voice to declare: “We won’t be bullied on Brexit”.  
Britain's former Deputy PM Nick Clegg calls for Brexit to be stopped  
Brexit will cut food prices and make UK a farming leader while EU regresses into protectionism, says @ChathamHouse 
A brilliant article on the psychology of a Brexiter.Brexit means British empire delusion. 
World-leading research @UniofNewcastle & other unis depends on ppl coming to the UK. I asked Govt to ensure that continues post-Brexit:  
 Factcheck: The Tories don't want you to know the true impact of Brexit but here's what we know.  
The Tory Right don't care about controlling migration. They're using immigration hysteria to stay in power and gain a tax haven. #Brexit 
I’m really enjoying @captainward’s Any Stupid Questions podcast. Here’s the Brexit episode.  
Nobel Prize winner reckons British science is screwed because of Brexit.  
John Redwood MP rightly criticises the Bank of England for its gloominess over Brexit.  
#KennethClarke #MP the Ultimate #British #TRAITOR! Plotting with #Labour & the #Libdems to defeat #BREXIT!  #TORY 
83% tell ICM that the Government's Brexit impact assessments SHOULD BE published. 9% say they shouldn't  
France plans New Caledonia self-rule referendum in 2018  
83% of ‘the people’ think we should all see the Brexit impact studies. Not just a parliament committee. And no black pens please! #50SecretStudies #BrexitPapers 
Thought for the day: Brexit is absolutely stark raving lunacy. Thank you. 
I couldn't vote in either the EU referendum or the #GE2017 (by one month). I fully support #VotesAt16 - it's only sensible. Long overdue! 
Another example of 'despite Brexit'.  
They need to change the Constitution to do that, they need to work to change the Constitution before the referendum. 
I suggest people look at the evidence instead of trotting out alleged Brexit effects for bad news, and saying despite Brexit for good news. 
If Brexit is such an all pervasive influence why not get the credit for strong jobs growth, rise in housebldg & strong mfg in the last year? 
.@MargotLJParker  Foreign aid: Brexit Britain should 'stop funding EU foreign aid at the EARLIEST moment'  
That is what happen to you if you whant to vote a referendum in catalonia.Scottish people have a good look in UK  
Scotland may be one of the areas to be hit worst by #Brexit - yet no Scotland-only report exists, says Mundell. 
What is the betting that when they publish the Brexit studies all the juicy are be censored out? You can't trust Brexit Tories. #StopBrexit 
Car manufacturing always been under threat from any brexit as are UK component manufacturers. 000’s jobs in&directly affected #stopbrexit 
#FISHING: The #EU has crippled us, let's get on with #Brexit and take back control of our waters - @fishingforleave  
Vaira Vīķe-Freiberga @VairaVF, two time Latvian president - 'A referendum is an expression of people’s choice and people’s opinion.'  
You Won’t Believe What The Brexit Bus Looks Like Now  
.@MollyMEP on the failure of Left #Lexit to grasp the econ damage of #Brexit which will turn their dreams of a better future for UK to dust.  
"No modern,mature democracy  has ever had elders dictate the future to the young." #NickClegg-@BloombergTV#Brexit 
I wrote a letter to my MP Claire Perry about changing my mind on Brexit now I know the facts. I encourage other to do the same #remainernow 
The totalitarian nature of Spanish law is becoming very apparent - no referendum, no political parties - all "legal"  
@GildernewColm has organised packed day of Brexit meetings in South Tyrone #Business #V&C #PublicMeeting: concerns growing, ppl very worried 
Great piece from the new Labour Leader in the European Parliament @RCorbettMEP about the Brexit negotiations!  
Frankfurt District Court setting up English speaking-chamber for commercial matters to win business post-Brexit:  
OH! "A network of Twitter bots comprising 13,493 accounts tweeted for Leave on the E.U. referendum, only to vanish the day after the vote" 
MUST READ: If Wales crashes out of the EU with no deal, Welsh farmers face tariffs of almost 50% on meat.#Brexit 
Find this attitude quite prevalent in Brexit circles. It's odd, but often lionise foreign labour ("hard workers") & dismiss British workers.  
What is this nonsense about the young being hit by brexit. All that is happening is that these pèople are being given a say in their country 
Leavers Declare EU-Linked Electoral Commission ‘Unfit to Regulate Our Democracy in the Age of Brexit’  
To Brexiters who say to Remainers, "you lost, get over it" - you lost an EU referendum in 1975, and then spent 41 years moaning about it. 
Simply the finest piece of writing on the anthropology of #Brexit you will read today. @IanDunt  
Head of France's biggest business lobby says beating Germany to jobs/investment leaving Britain top of his country's Brexit agenda - calls it 'sporting competition'.  
David Davis says he will consider plans for Brits to keep opt-in EU citizenship after Brexit  
Odd that ex-pats living abroad could vote on #brexit but tax paying 16 yr olds and EU nationals couldn't. Seems... unfair. 
Spot on from the Times’ Ed Lucas We need the truth about Russia and Brexit 
Labour's success on the Secret Brexit Studies is commendable. And also proves Brexit is happening because Labour is content that it should. 
.@michaelgove sets out what farming funding should cover post-#Brexit  
Live TODAY at 2:15pm debate with @IanDunt on EU nationals' #citizensrights post #brexit. Tune in here here: 
"16 year olds aren't responsible enough to vote", says government who are irresponsibly voting to ruin the country's future through Brexit. 
shes finally dug the grave all we need now is for someone to push her in - shes building a cabinet of remoaners to stop brexit  
David Davis says he will consider plans for Brits to keep opt-in EU citizenship after Brexit  
‘Sooner he’s gone the better’ Farage blasts Brexit naysayer Carney over interest rate rise  
Amber Rudd's past links to to Bahamas offshore tax haven Tory Tax Haven #Brexit#StopBrexit 
Watch @michaelgove acknowledge the environmental #governancegap created by #Brexit  
I bet these Brexit supporters couldn't give one coherent reason why they voted for Brexshit... pic.twitter.com/6f0TjVUjLQ 
NEW REMAINIACS: This week with instantly-dated chat on impact papers and the spectre of Russian money in the referendum  
The   “ #brexitshambles means #brexit is dead”    argument is made more and more frequently...  
Caller tries to tell James O’Brien why Brexit will be great for British workers… it really doesn’t go well  
Dutch centre-right PM Rutte says Brexit incredibly wrong decision, causing economic, monetary and constitutional crisis. All parties in Europe now dropping idea of quitting EU as they see what happening chez nous 
In 'Clean Brexit', @DrGerardLyons & I provide 25-point plan for Article 50 talksNo.4 - why Soft Brexit won't work  
So publish the brexit impact reports in full and both sides will know @WilliamJHague simple. But they're going to be terrible aren't they? 
#Brexit will not only result in the loss of businesses from Britain. Our workers will also seek a better future elsewhere. End Brexit now!  
Never stop speaking out about the lunacy of Brexit. That is what those who are hijacking our country’s future want: silence from the sane.  
Brexit will have long term detrimental impact on economy.  
6. This is why you get these ridiculous warnings of civil unrest if Brexit were not to go ahead, for any reason.It works. 
1. Quick explainer. What those fake Twitter accounts promoting Brexit are for.They’re not here to persuade you. They’re here to fool HIM   
Some of the #misinformation and #ignorance at the heart of the #Brexit vote …  
Democratically elected politicians fulfilling campaign promises by organizing referendum. Apparently in Spain that means 50 years in jail  
The EU Ref was a “massive wake up call to everybody” and #Brexit “was the right thing to do,” argues @Peston 
Friends! Our BBC *never* uses the term "Despite Brexit"! That's just another Leaver LIE!And in any case, it's fully justified in using it.  
Unless public opinion changes there is no point in having a 2nd referendum @JolyonMaugham 
No post #Brexit #bordercontrols at #Ireland - #NorthernIreland border,  only if you have...... 
.Brexit & Good Friday Agreement are about to collideAND so are Irish & UK GovtsBy the rarely wrong @noelwhelan. 
The media is undermining the country.. there is no argument for Brexit @JolyonMaugham 
This man used our NHS cynically to get people to vote for #Brexit. He then voted to give our NHS…NO EXTRA MONEY  
Use your Friday morning commute to stop a hard Brexit. Contact your MP & ask them to amend the bill:  #ExitFromBrexit 
Nailed it#Brexit#BrexitReports 
David Davis told to release studies on economic damage from Brexit within weeks  
Brilliant article on the fanatical #Brexiters, using a highly novel, but apt, analogy. #Brexit #cargocult 
Almost two-thirds of UK exports of services now go outside the EU.  Let's be positive about #Brexit Britain.  
The Government doesn’t know what it wants from Brexit so how can it possibly negotiate? @JolyonMaugham 
.Are the Tories about to rebel against May, Johnson, sex & sleaze AND Brexit?. 
The Brexit vote has caused a significant rise in prices, especially food  
Who'd a thunk it?! Most TIRESOME Remoaner OTTO ENGLISH @Otto_English is an ardent BREXITEER called Dale #brexit #csm 
And that's exactly what Robert Mercer wants, why he backed Breitbart, Brexit, and interferes in elections everywhere.  
Brexit and the ‘Age of Easy Answers’ - delays, disparities, divisions, darkness, dishonesty and desperation.  via @FT 
Q: How will Christmas dinner be different after Brexit?A: No Brussels 
This conflates abuse (unacceptable) with people not liking your views (tough).Brexit deserves no special protection.  
Monthly costs creeping up thanks to the shithouse referendum, whilst income isn’t. But it’s ok we won’t have as many foreign folk around  
I fully understand why the Brexit camp are furious that I will not stop speaking out on disaster of EU exit but I will not be silenced. 
Foreign aid: Brexit Britain should 'stop funding EU foreign aid at the EARLIEST moment'  @theresa_may 
Head of judiciary said Brexit parliamentary delays will rule out vital disability hate crime law change for years...  
As forecast: #Brexit costs everyone more! Thanks @michaelgove @BorisJohnson @Nigel_Farage @Conservatives @LeaveEUOfficial 
Bank of England warns Brexit will have 'major implications' on UK economy as interest rates rise  
Let’s have a Brexit free day please, bored out my head with it.!!!!!  Put gold on radio  great music all day no Brexit there. Or go to pub.  
3 ways that Britain could reverse Brexit  
#ThisWeek UK government under pressure to publish Brexit papers  
Crime writer Ian Rankin predicts rise of 'kind & gentle' books after seismic events such as Brexit, Trump election  
Soft, hard or no Brexit.  #ChinaDailyCartoon 
Brexit bunch: We have a duty to our coloniesAlso Brexit bunch: boo foreign aid, India and Pakistan are sponging off the taxpayer 
They never acknowledged the Crimean Referendum.So? CryMeARiver…to bad to not have the Russian Army protecting you, eh…?  
Knock-out blow must surely be just around the corner for Brexit government.  
I'm a catalan living in UK for 7 years. I've always supported remain, but EU has proved that brexit was the right choice after all. 
Spain is not a democracy. Would never hold any referendum like Scotland or Quebec. Your democracy is old and well stablished, ours is a joke 
Phew, I think Brexit is pretty much over with now, isn't it? The dummies, loonies and crooks are the only ones who haven't got it yet. 
who knew so many #Tory #bampots in KILLIE want to smack their kids,not pay for public services & love #brexit but the #bbcqt found them alL 
Music can help heal the wounds of Brexit. Hear my new song 'Full English Brexit' here  
Beware the Tory cult that’s steering Brexit  via @FT 
They prefer to beat people, to jail people and to sack a Parliament before let Catalan people, unionists or indy, Vote in a Referendum.  
Referendum is not a necessary condition for the declaration of independence. There are previous examples. 
Why Brexit? It's the English, stupid. openDemocracy  
Coming soon to  - Bollocks to Brexit BEER MATS. Keep an eye out. 50% of profits to remain causes #Weatherspoons 
.@DanielJHannon says he is glad the UK handled the Scottish referendum better than Spain are handling events in Catalonia #bbcqt 
.@kezdugdale says the only way to get over the impasse in Catalonia is to hold a legitimate referendum, which must be respected #bbcqt 
Leavers, you've had 18 months and you have failed in every respect due to your lack of a plan. Give up and get over it. Brexit's dead. 
It is a FACT that Brexit is having a negative effect on the British economy and our standards of living. Time to #StopBrexit #BrexitFact 
37.42% of eligible electors supported Brexit.38.47% of eligible electors supported Catalan independence. #bbcqt 
In damning indictment of state of discourse, last (joke) tweet on Brexit and Southern Hemisphere annoyed both brexiters and flat earthers. 
1. Brexit won, Trump's still president2. Trump cancels Diversity Visa program#Happiest5WordSentence#staymad 
#BBCQT Owen Jones, anti-brexit extraordinaire talking about respecting peoples votes on independence in Spain. Hypocritical is understatemen 
Two-Faced Owen Jones says he respects democracy. Really we had a democratic vote yet he won't except brexit.#bbcqt 
'Stop denying people the right to determine their own future.' Well said Owen. Like #Brexit voters perhaps? 
Remember @DanielJHannan saying UK’s non-EU trade was growing faster than with EU ?Well the UK's @ONS disagree!Another Hannan #brexit lie!  
Oh dear Nigel Farage your antisemitic Nazi roots are showing. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
I investigated immigration under Blair so I know this is all too horribly true. Blame him for Brexit.  
#ThingsQuestionTimeWontAskHow on earth can such a broken, divided and tarnished party get the UK though Brexit? #bbcqt 
Appalling response by David Mundell to @MairiGougeon MSP when asked why brexit assessment analysis isn't released  
Wow - Brexit wouldn’t be legal under the Government’s trade union strike laws. 37% who voted for it wouldn’t meet 40% threshold. #StopBrexit 
You know this was predicted before the Brexit vote, right? 80% of NHS hospital heads said Brexit would hit staffing. 
Remember when the UK had 'Control' of the fastest growing G7 country right up until the EU referendum?  
Mark Carney at Bank of England REVERSES the interest rate cut he made last yearInterest rates are now the SAME as they were before UK voted to Leave the #EUSo what was that all about?#Brexit 
What the Brexit impact papers may – or may not – reveal  
Brexit of the right by the right for the right. Couldn’t give a toss could they?   
Brexit promises 'undeliverable' and one could postulate that the impact assessments would indicate the same.  
They’re not 'turning their backs on UK'. Brexit made them reconsider options. You reap what you sow.   
"London to become even bigger tax haven after Brexit" Conference. Great for millionaires rubbish for rest of us.  
"Hard evidence of active, covert Russian interference would delegitimise the original vote" #Brexit #NoConfidence 
Promises made to the British people over Brexit are "undeliverable", Ireland's foreign minister has told Sky News  
.The @FT has been 'out' from the startNot as Anti-BrexitBut as Pro-Reality@davidallengreen = case in point. 
BBC: Home of Despite Brexit  
WATCH: @Peston says Brexit voters are "on the right side of history". Watch this hugely revealing interview.  
Brexit is already hurting Britain and its people and it's only going to get worse. The only sensible way to stop the pain is to #StopBrexit 
‘Sooner he’s gone the better’ Farage blasts Brexit naysayer Carney over interest rate rise  
Irish minister Michael Creed urges UK to hold second Brexit referendum  
I'm watching support for the EU crumble on Scottish Twitter. It's not a Brexit crumble it's an 'all we believed in' crumble. 
Carney’s small interest rate rise is coupled with his usual deprecation of Brexit having a "noticeable impact on UK's economic outlook”  
Food is“rotting in the fields” of East Anglia due to a shortfall of seasonal farm workers #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Electoral Commission is investigating if Russia meddled in Brexit referendum as it did in the Trump campaign. Could this derail Brexit? 
Tory Minister Priti Patel called for May to slash public spending & regulations after Brexit Tory Tax Haven #Brexit 
What Brexit woe? Majority of UK shoppers still BUYING BRITISH after vote  
#NoConfidenceEverybody knows May is dead and buried... it is the hardcore Brexit brigade running the show... #StopBrexit #ToriesOut RT 
PM with no authority.Party riddled with scandal the PM covered up.Don't turn up to vote.Brexit a mess.New elections. Now.#NoConfidence 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again This account is shadow banned follow new account @followgainUK  
45% of people polled agree that Brexit has caused them to be more concerned about the state of the NHS.  
Apparently we can afford to hire 8000 Brexit civil servants but can't afford police, nurses & teachers  
Trying to think of the benefits of Brexit to UK science research for a mock debate... I'm really, really struggling. 
Irish foreign minister says Brexit promises 'undeliverable'  
3 ways that Britain could reverse Brexit  
Chair of Brexit Select Committee @hilarybennmp wrote to @DavidDavisMP regarding the release of Brexit impact assessments this morning  
'Nothing to fear' Brexit Britain can walk away without EU deal warns Fox  
Several pharma cos tell me at meeting 2 weeks ago Euro Commission said prepare for no-deal Brexit, get on with transferring activity 
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: What happens to £20 TRILLION held in British banks if EU laws fail?  
This is a very good thread on one thing we can say for certain - the biggest #brexit backers are the disaster capitalists  
Let's keep the Petition to Investigate covert foreign interference in the EU referendum rolling! #StopBrexit #Brexit 
BoE Governor Mark Carney admitted on @Channel4News that interest rate rise isn't reall about inflation. It's about a cushion for bad #brexit 
David Davis says he will look at a way to allow UK nationals to retain EU citizenship after #Brexit #StopBrexit 
BBC: Home of Despite Brexit via @GuidoFawkes 
Scotland does NOT have to suffer the disaster of a Tory BrexitThere is a logical way forward for Scotland  "INDEPENDENCE"YOU YES YET?  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again This account is shadow banned follow new account @followgainUK  
'There is growing likelihood we will see solid evidence of Russian financial support for Brexit camp.'  
#Brexit & Trump are how a cynical part of the super-rich divert anger about inequality from themselves onto the vulnerable.#StopBrexit 
One decent Opposition leader could end this sham of a Gov and Brexit and put us all out of our misery. 
The Brexidiots couldn't avoid the Brexit Impact Assessments being published & won't prevent Brexshit being stopped. 
Motoring giant BMW gives vote of confidence to Britain, confirms UK-based operations will remain crucial after Brexit.  
Are you serious? Are you going to allow  having politicians in prison because of their ideas? Wonder why the #Brexit. 
Martin Wolf: If the UK wants a smooth Brexit, it will have to pay more. Much more.  
Britain's old central bankWas led by a sort of a yankHiked rates one timePound didn't climbHe said we had Brexit to thank 
Everton ahead of the curve getting out of Europe early #Brexit 
At last! Future leader of @UKLabour takes a clear unambiguous stance on Brexit!   
Now might be a good time to let some facts get in the way of Brexit  
The Telegraph editorial this morning states that Brexit requires ‘a government of all the talents.’ I may stay in the Southern Hemisphere. 
Part 2 - questions to David Mundell: “So you don’t agree that people should understand how this (Brexit) is going to impact on their lives?”  
No @DavidDavisMP @andrealeadsom, reqmt is for Brexit studies to be released in full. Anything less is contemptible. 
Part 1 (of two) of my closing questions to David Mundell MP on the need to tell our citizens exactly HOW Brexit will impact on our lives.  
The Williamson appointment makes it even less likely that TMay will stay until Brexit  via @MSmithsonPB 
The man whose big data co Cambridge Analytica helped Trump and Brexit, "steps down". Meantime, the kitchen heats up. 
Mercer is worried where Bob Mueller may be heading.  And he is at the center of the bullseye. Financed Brexit work w/Putin disinfo campaign. 
Redacted copy of the 58 Brexit Risk Assessments leaked #Brexit  
The BoE base rate has risen to 0.5%. You know, the exact same rate it was for SEVEN years between 2009 & 2016 (BEFORE Brexit)! Loser.  
The Right has such an easy job these daysIf you oppose Brexit, you don't believe in the UK.If you oppose Trump... 
.Well done @IrishTimes - well deservedAND a big thank you for continuously exposing the truth about Brexit. 
The authoritarian Spanish State jails democratically elected Catalan government for organizing a referendum. #WhereIsSpanishDemocracy 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again This account is shadow banned follow new account @followgainUK  
Brexit cancelled, Bowie miraculously returns  #happiest5wordsentence 
Brexit  - just a bad dream #Happiest5WordSentence 
Hobolt: #Brexit has created a new identity, people identify as #Leavers & #Remainers #LSEBrexit 
A pity the Daily Express owner & editor and readers can't be given the experience of seeking political asylum#StopBrexit #Brexit  
At last we are witnessing the beginning of the end of Brexit, time then to accept the best option from the negotiations: i.e. EU membership.  
Siri, show me an obvious metaphor for Brexit  
What IS it with PM May ?APPOINTSBoJo - FSDavis - #BrexitFox disgraced former DS- #BrexitGove- TransportNOWWilliamson as DS#BadJudge 
Putin's largely media controlled "managed democracy" must be a very attractive model to the Trumps & Murdochs#StopBrexit #Brexit. /1 
Stopping #Brexit is a race against time. Labour MPs are in pole position  
If MPs privately oppose #Brexit, they should show some public leadership and make the case against it  
I think, to be fair @MaisonDeau, that the title Hard Brexit Mogg4pm shows a *touch* of knobby nature.  
."It felt like the end of days. Not just a government losing its grip on Brexit, but losing its grip on power.". 
The fight for the Brexit Impact studies to be released is still on! We need the release now, not in 3 months! Sign:  
The Government of Catalonia, in prison for organising a referendum!Democracy? No, Spain.#ShameOnEurope#HelpCatalonia 
Vote Labour and Corbyn for hard #Brexit! SADLY many will just because it's Labour and Corbyn. FFS dump Partisan Policy and man up to values!  
BBC 6pm News opens with interest rate saying 1st rate rise in decade.  Doesn't yet mention it puts rates back to level before referendum 
They are finally waking up to the fact Brexit is Bonkers  
There is no post-truth politics. There is only shouting, anger, hate, fury and ultimately violence & oppression. /1 #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Resist Brexit crew made soft Brexit near impossible - because they attacked Labour as much as Tories. You're v bad at politics @acgrayling ! 
Anyone still delusional about Corbyn and Brexit..watch this.  He is supporting hard Brexit.out of SM and CU.  
89% drop in EU nurses coming to UK since Sept '16. The figures keep coming. #Brexit 
Did you think the anti-Russian conspiracy theories couldn't possibly get any loopier? They just did. Now Putin is to blame for Brexit too! 
In brexit Britain, your local plumber can perform your c section. Let's go back 2 barbers performing ampuations. No experts required!  
So AFTER #Brexit, those who are British could claim EU citizenship? Bonkers, seriously bonkers,  
How Putin could yet save Britain from Brexit | Mark Galeotti  
Labour's done good work on the secret brexit studies. But let's remember it was @MollyMEP who started it all (). 
The redacted Brexit impact report in full: ██████ ██ ███ catastrofuck █ ██████ █ will of the ███████ people ██ ██████ █ ███ █Mad Max times. 
Dont be so utterly disingenuous and desperate to suggest the rise has been caused by #Brexit. Its been a long time coming  
Meanwhile Brexit.  
In Spain THIS IS TOTALLY LEGAL, but referendum isn't. This is SSpain. THIS IS EUROPE!! @eucopresident @Pontifex_it @POTUS @UNHumanRights 
And Finland celebrates its breakout from Russia exactly 100 years ago, with no referendum, in december 2017 
#HumanRightsIf @EU_Commission don't call a #Referendum in #Catalonia #Europe will have a big problem! Do you have seen what people propose? 
Government prepares new tactic to hide Brexit impact papers from public.  
Brexit is nuts. Using an enantiomeric excess of 3.6% as a reason to invoke a UK constitutional crisis is daft. #stopbrexit @mikegalsworthy. 
Just leaving Euston bound for North Warwickshire CLP Brexit event with @adamjfarrell & party members: a seat we need to win back sharpish! 
I didn't take allegations of a Kremlin role in Brexit campaign funding seriously until Mark Galeotti took a closer lookCc @davidallengreen 
Shortly we will learn that the whole EU referendum process was corrupt. But nothing will happen but it's how UK does business. #çorruption 
Yes. And it will be you and the other Brexit cheerleaders fault. We won’t forget. 
Hope Mueller gets Robert Mercer for tax evasion ala Manafort, and investigation will spill over to Cambridge and Russian/Brexit ties. 
Mercer is not just at risk in the U.S. via Cambridge Analytica, @Amy_Siskind.In the U.K., he is being investigated for his role in Brexit.  
If there had been a ‘yes’ vote in 2014 and, say, councillors in the Borders won an illegal referendum to stay in UK, what would Nicola do?  
How #Putin could yet save Britain from #Brexit | @MarkGaleottiI seek silver linings in #Russia's meddling 
The rise in interest rates indicates that we are heading for a Brexit-induced economic meltdown  
Brexit will be their funeral #TheToriesInFiveWords 
Basically: We’re going to trash this country, but Remainers can travel visa-free.A cynical tactic to get us to support Tory Brexit lunacy.  
It's tragic that rUK has no alternative to Brexit-lover blue, other than Brexit-lover red, but Scotland does - and we can "get out of jail" 
“Shock” Brexit warning from the Express, who have worked out banks are off. To laugh or cry?  
Brexit committee prepared to take on board suggested redactions for DExEU, then come to its own decision on them. 
Benn letter to Davis quite interesting. Suggests DExEU not allowed to redact impact assessments ahead of sending them to Brexit committee.,  
18 months before it's due to happen, Brexit has already changed Europe. My column:  
Corbyn isn't playing the "long game" on Brexit. He's running out the clock so it can't be reversed. 
“I think if it’s a No deal, Brexit is over” @JolyonMaugham 
The EU has done its own impact assessment on Brexit.Here's its summary.(source  ) 
“Chlorinated Chicken is the root of the Brexit project” @JolyonMaugham 
Govt must love the BBC. Savers see early benefits from base rate rise  Headline ought to be Brexit hitting economy 
Another vote of confidence in Britain: BMW director Dr Ian Robertson said he was confident about a good Brexit deal 
Brexit Committee chair @hilarybennmp writes to @DavidDavisMP to hand over the impact assessments, and then decide on the publication 
This is what astute working class Brexit voters have known all along. Control the supply of labour and its price will tend to rise.  
Beer tax in the UK is part of the conspiracy to close our pubs, where radical ideas breed, like BREXIT.  
Allowing for holidays, weekends and a 3 month ratification period, we have just 276 days left to stop Brexit. 
The (tiny) interest rate increase today has been a long time coming. It is NOT consequence of a Brexit vote. It's disingenuous to say it is  
 The catalan government in jail for the crime of asking people what they want in a referèndum. Is it normal?#WhereIsSpanishDemocracy  
David Davis says avoiding a hard border with Ireland is a priority for Brexit UK - so why was Scotland threatened with one during #indyref? 
Furious row ERUPTS between Labour MP and Brexiteer over party's 'undermining' of Brexit  
Bank of England interest rates rise comes amid signs of economic weakness and Brexit uncertainty. Bad news for those who rely on borrowing 
In a 2nd Brexit ref would you vote to 
Look at this graph and let it sink in... We were gaining EU nurses before to plug gaps- now we're losing them. Dangerous turnaround. #Brexit  
FISHING: The EU has crippled us, let's get on with Brexit and take back control of our waters - @fishingforleave 
 @AlfredBosch a @DeutscheWelle: 'We offered Rajoy to talk about an agreed referendum, many times. The answer: No'  
Allow me to summarise for the hard of independent thought. Brexit is already wrecking our country and it will only get a lot fucking worse!  
Aug 16: Interest rate cut from 0.5% to 0.25%. "Record low because of Brexit!"Nov 17: Back to 0.5%. "Interest rate rises because of Brexit!" 
.@acgraylingI support Corbyn &Remain This toddler tantrum tweet is v unhelpful for all, like me, who want to stop Brexit & deeply crass  
People are increasingly calling for an end to Brexit. Now is the time for everyone to rally together to achieve this! 
Missed my interview at @VictoriaLIVE talking about #Brexit impact into EU Nurses? Watch replay here (from 1h 51min):  
3 simple questions for Leavers.#Brexit  
Shock warning: Brexit Britain will SUFFER when EU SNATCH financial services 
After Brexit, we can be FREE from EU protectionism, EU budgets, EU regulation and uncontrolled migration. 
Strong message from @simoncoveney in today's @Telegraph #brexit  
Motoring giant BMW gives vote of confidence to Britain, confirms UK-based operations will remain crucial after Brexit.  
‘Let’s have a clean, hard Brexit to rejuvenate Britain’s fishing industry’  
How Putin could yet save Britain from Brexit | Mark Galeotti  
The triumph of sectarian pettiness - me in @spectator on why so few worry about what Brexit could do to Ireland  
.@ChukaUmunna – Interest rate rise shows Brexit is already damaging our economy  
Nicely illustrates the distinction between vague slogans and detailed technical realities: a microcosm of the entire Brexit situation  
You did a fine job on the 58 reports, Keir. Now could you please do something about Corbyn's support for Brexit?  
Bloody hell, this Brexit government is a shambles of biblical proportions #Brexodus 
I want pharma to be better at transparency and ethics. I don't want them driven off altogether. Brexit will be a mess for medicines.  
BREXIT: The BOE just added a stark Brexit warning - Brexit is having a noticeable impact on economy / #Brexit  
Ipsos MORI poll on for 13 foreign Chambers of Commerce finds 82% of foreign businesses "not confident” of positive Brexit outcome. 
Remourners need to get over Brexit  
When is a leader of a major party going to show leadership and say let’s just cancel Brexit? 
These are just some of the consequences of Brexit, it is becoming clear that Brexit in the terms it was sold is impossible to deliver. 4/5 
MEP & Brexit campaigner Daniel Hannan wants to rid us of the NHS. Find out what other batshit policies he wants to tout on #bbcqt pic.twitter.com/OHUYfwF4bn 
We already had a say Mr Corbyn. We would really appreciate it if you would give effect to the wishes of the people most affected by Brexit.  
What!? “Will be published at a future date”?Really, how many meetings has Legatum had with Dept of Trade? What are they hiding?#Brexit  
Lower investment in the economy and weaker productivity have been exacerbated by Brexit uncertainty and its effect on supply chains. 2/5 
Mark Carney blamed Brexit for lowering the rates, now he's blaming Brexit for the rate returning to what it was..very odd #interestrates 
Thread: Bank of England Governor Mark Carney paints a bleak picture for the economy going ahead, and sites Brexit as one of its causes. 1/5 
Britain investigates #Brexit campaign funding, as speculation mounts that Russia may have meddled in the vote  
Brexit looks more fragile than ever as govt becomes increasingly chaotic  
Just when you thought Brexit couldn't get any crazier, we have this charlatan trying to influence it with #BeerMatPropaganda. #StopBrexit 
From today's @FinancialTimes #Brexit #AaronBanks 
Caller tries to tell @mrjamesob Brexit will be great for British workers... but it doesn’t go well  
Big victory for Labour and @Keir_Starmer as Tories forced to release secret Brexit impact papers   
I asked @DavidDavisMP about workers rights after Brexit. I'm a little bit concerned about his new Minister, you see:  pic.twitter.com/udN4ybPmjz 
Govt accepts Labour's Brexit motion is binding & prepares to hand over documents. Ancient procedure; modern remedy. 
That’s a better definition of the first #Brexit referendum. The task now is to get us out of this mess and end ‘divisive’ Brexit.  
.@BBCNews LYING about why nurses are leaving #NHS, they claim it's because of #Brexit, ACTUALLY silent on requirement to understand English. 
Minister @simoncoveney met this morning with SoS @DavidDavisMP for a useful discussion on #Brexit.  
BMW executive says car maker's British-based operations will remain crucial after Brexit  
I thought the argument was that interest rates went down because the Referendum result made economy weaker? Can't have it both ways  
Tomorrow is crucial for UK young citizens as #VotesAt16 is debated. Our research shows that 16/17s must be better involved in politics #PMB9 
In other words, Brexit is taking UK monetary policy part way back to the limited bad choices and trdeoffs of the 1970s. 3/4 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again This account is shadow banned follow new account @followgainUK  
#Brexit or #Remain university should be where young people can express & explore ideas. Sadly this is not the case. 
Butter price in Aldi almost doubled since #Brexit referendum- who needs redacted impact reports to confirm the Eurosceptics have screwed us? 
Fascinating research by @CityREDI. UK regions much more exposed to Brexit than EU regions #BrexitTrade @UKandEU 
The Brexit squeeze is real and it's happening now. These are people's mortgages (including mine) taking a beating! 
The government “has had to be dragged, kicking and screaming” to publish Brexit impact papers - @mtpennycook #bbcdp 
This #Brexit thing is a bit shit, isn't it?  #ThursdayThoughts pic.twitter.com/NaHfjiDHfa 
Can’t tell you how happy I am that the latest BBC Breaking News is not about terrorism, sex or Brexit but the mysteries of the pyramids. 
#Brexit effect:Pound collapses Investment falls Growth slumpInflation riseInterest rates rise 
Why has the pound fallen? Well, there's still concern about Britain's economy and Brexit  
Only credible alternative to Brexit is entire island of Ireland remaining in the EU - @moneillsf tells @M_AndersonSF Brexit event  
“Brexit impact papers to be released in victory for Labour”  
Which is why, after hard Brexit, the Tories will be reminded how the 1990s ended for them  
Mark Carney: "The decision to leave the European Union is already having a noticeable impact." Marked slowdown in the economy #Brexit 
Pound is 1% lower against dollar after Bank of England's first rate increase in 10 years  
The real reason why the government is reluctant to publish its Brexit impact reports:  
These are not normal times for Britain's economy, Mark Carney says after rate increase  
U.K. watchdog opens inquiry into possible Russia-Brexit links  
Hmm seems the Bank of England thinks it may be Brexit-related…   
Remarkable Labour victory! Govt releasing Brexit papers.Let's have more "humble addresses" so govt obeys parl votes. 
Thread on the financing of #Brexit - one which I find wholly credible.  
The Bank of England blames Brexit, for above-target inflation, below-trend growth and the necessity to raise interest rates  
Does this mean the government doesn't have to deliver Brexit because it also does "not exist in the form requested"?  
Hang on, weren’t we told that #brexit would HELP the #NHS ? 
It is clear that Brexit moves us in the opposite direction from the Good Friday Agreement - Les Allamby tells @M_AndersonSF Brexit event  
Since #brexit the Tory Party has been playing a Game of Thrones where no ones comes out a winner & Britain is destroyed. #juliansmith 
Key paragraph from Bank of England statement: Brexit will reduce UK's economic growth potential, and is already having a noticeable impact. 
Friends! Disaster!Interest rates went down after the Leave vote, due to Brexit! And now they've gone back up again, also due to Brexit.  
Newly appointed Deputy Chief Whip Esther McVey voted Leave at the EU Referendum.  
As it raises interest rates for first time, @bankofengland has some strong words to say about #brexit  
Extraordinary that Scotland Office has no specific analysis of #Brexit impact on Scotland. They must now publish the 58 sectoral analysis 
Bank of England raises interest rates by 0.25% to 0.5%. The first rate rise in a decade, reversing post-referendum rate cut 
There's no jackpot around the corner.  Here’s why Brexit feels to @mrjamesob like being “married to an addict” 
British parliament says government must publish trove of secret #Brexit papers  via @WJames_Reuters 
If #Brexit impact assessments are factually accurate how can the Govt possibly continue to withhold them from the public? @RichardNewby3 
Exposed! The @ElectoralCommUK is not fit to regulate our democracy in the age of Brexit. Its independence requires immediate investigation!  
The Bank of England is widely expected to raise interest rates. But is Britain’s Brexit economy ready for a hike?  
David Davis to start talks on handover of Brexit impact documents  
This chaos in government shows how fragile Brexit is  
'Brexit b***h!' Students SHAMED for being ‘PROUD’ Brexiteers on university campuses  
Also that full unredacted versions are released to Brexit Select Committee. That's what yesterday's binding motion means. Get on with it.  
Older ppl were much more likely to vote Brexit. Perhaps they thought they were safe from the negative consequences.  
is there any way we can sack all the politicians and just get Sam Allardyce in to see us through Brexit 
More than 65% voted Leave at the EU Referendum in South Staffordshire, the parliamentary constituency of former Chief Whip and new Defence Secretary @GavinWilliamson. 
Exclusive - Following Government losing vote they start to publish the 58 Brexit impact reports. Here the first one they have still not read pic.twitter.com/rrViJb9sdE 
#BREXIT: #LiamFox says #Britain won't pay #EU divorce bill until it knows what it gets in return. Common sense  #BBC 
Remember being told EU trade deals we have with 65 countries wld be unaffected by Brexit? Fox finally accepts it's "not quite that simple".  
Britain’s election watchdog has begun an inquiry into whether Russia interfered in the Brexit referendum campaign  
Another senior Tory suggests to me the PM may have done a deal with Williamson - to handle the "toxic" Brexit talks, then hand over to him. 
Clarke, Adonis and Clegg are trying to damage, deny & delay Brexit... with some assistance from the EU.  
Britain investigates #Brexit campaign funding, as speculation mounts that Russia may have meddled in the vote  
In 'Clean Brexit', @DrGerardLyons & I provide 25 bullet points on UK's Article 50 negotiationHere's No.3 … 
A month after its independence referendum, Iraqi Kurdistan is seeing its economic future threatened  
Defence Sec is bigger better, and right now easier job than Chief Whip of minority government trying to get 8 bills thru before Brexit day 
Delighted to see  @M_AndersonSF  MEP is still working tirelessly to maintain our human rights post brexit  
NB the balance on the key Cabinet Brexit subcommittee remains 6-4 Remain 
Pitch for a Guardian op-ed next year: how the Defenestration of Prague (1618) ultimately led to Brexit. 
BREAKING: Tory MP @NadineDorries tells me @talkRADIO Tory & Labour Remainers are "working to bring down the Govt... and derail Brexit".  
From the archive, a year ago today. @GaryGibbonBlog published Breaking Point, his Brexit diary: note this entry for 14 July 2016  
One of our most popular stories @FT: Young Poles leave UK to return home as economy booms #Brexit  via @FT 
The Brexit threat is not yet over, and Britain's economy is not overheating. Interest rates should remain low  
Brexit-supporting students getting abuse on campus. what a surprise #HateNotHope 
Govt departments totally confused about how much brexit negs will cost them -just asked SoS to clarify. Shocked he didn’t , I say shocked!  
We extensively had this debate ahead of the 2010 referendum. We do not need it again. It is a waste of time and not progressive.  
Farage: Lord Adonis is guilty of treachery for wanting to reverse Brexit  
Brexit will offer us many opportunities to substitute home production for EU exports, esp in food if they opt for the WTO model w/ tariffs. 
Defence is trump card in #Brexit negotiations. @theresa_may must choose another heavyweight to run @DefenceHQ to maintain status it deserves 
Official forecasters & clever moaners warned of a housing collapse after the Brexit vote-instead there's an increase in new housebuilding, 
Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW assures us that the Government are preparing for all potential Brexit outcomes  
Instead of banging on about Brexit Nigel Farage, why not recommend to your followers they get the flu jab. Most of them must be over 65 yrs.  
Barbara Kruger: 'Nobody should be surprised at Trump, Brexit or white grievance'  
Big step taken yesterday, but we still have work to do to to get the information to those who need it! #Brexit  
Don't waste our money on Remoaner views! Redwood lashes out at gloomy Brexit forecasts  
17 months on from the referendum. Effects of leaving 3 million people uncertain over their #citizensrights will be felt by the public. #NHS 
Those who care for our sick and elderly should feel welcomed in the UK.Our NHS is more important than #brexit.  
I will be live today at 10:50 on @vicderbyshire programme talking about the impact of Brexit on EU Nurses. How exciting is that!!  
David Davis is answering questions on Brexit in Parliament   
.@NicolaSturgeon: "There's no doubt that Brexit, coupled with austerity, makes job of properly funding our public services more difficult." 
THERESA MAY. Find and replace 'Complete Disaster' with 'Fantastic Opportunity' before releasing the Brexit impact studies. @TwopTwips 
“The Great British Haggis”?! Is this marketing-data led? They’re capitalists - I presume so. Heightened consciousness of “British” post-Brexit? Also an heightened customer aversion to Saltire? Something’s afoot.  
The Prime Minister appears to have lost parliamentary control of the Brexit process  via @LondonEconomic 
Here’s how the next defence minister can bring policy back in line with the PM’s message of ‘Brexit Means Brexit’:  
FARAGE: Lord Adonis is guilty of treachery for meeting Michel Barnier in Brussels and trying to stop Brexit. 
European nurses and midwives leaving UK in droves since Brexit vote  
I'm talking about the Brexit impact studies on LBC imminently 
Fallon did not resign because of the sex scandal.He resigned as distraction as the Tories knew they would lose a binding vote later on in the day to hand over the 58 unedited brexit impact reports. 
What's taken the Electoral Commission so long? Even if they find nothing we need to know the full facts about who funded Brexit. #StopBrexit 
People claiming Brexit happened because of some overseas power - you’re right. It’s called the EU. It put off British voters over many years 
This seems likely to me. Brexit is more of an opportunity for America's disaster capitalists than Putin's Kremlin.  
Dear Brexit Voter,I do hope you are busy training to be a nurse 
Only a small proportion of Leave voters believe Brexit will have any bad impact - and this hasn't budged in a year  
Another UK Brexit export success looms for Liam Fox as NZ seeks to import skilled UK construction workers.  
3 ways that Britain could reverse Brexit  
Why does the UK government stick to a delusional Brexit policy? Because it's unable to face hard choices. My latest  
ICYMI: car industry asks PM for ‘urgent clarity’ on Brexit as investment in sector falls 75% amid uncertainty (£)  
2nd November, 1947 : In a Broadcast over All India Radio, Nehru promised Referendum to #Kashmir. 
Hmmmm "working as a consultant at an unnamed private intelligence agency serving government and corporate clients." 
Labour tries to force Government to publish Brexit studies | Queen "not happy" at being dragged into row  
Caused by unnecessary Whitehall plans to comply with EU after Brexit.Next defence minister can change this.@batsub1 
LBC: ‘mandatory lessons on consent for MPs’. Can that include the Referendum result so they consent to do what the majority voted for? 
British parliament says government must publish trove of secret #Brexit papers  via @WJames_Reuters 
A British watchdog is investigating whether one of the financial backers of the Brexit campaign breached rules 
Simon Kuper: 'The sect now steering Brexit — the Europhobe wing of the Tory party — is turning into a cargo cult'  
The BBC is increasingly becoming the Brexit Broadcasting Corporation. Last night's failure to cover the vote in Parliament was dereliction.  
Gove’s #farm and #fish plan would torpedo govt plans for a #brexit transition period @InFactsOrg 
1 UK already in breach of EU air pollution law: 2 EU law sets minimum standards, so we could use Brexit unicorns now  
Britain investigates #Brexit campaign funding, as speculation mounts that Russia may have meddled in the vote  
'One of the alarming aspects of the British Brexit debate is the way that it keeps going around in circles' 
When is direct rule not direct rule? When Northern Ireland needs a government but the PM needs the Irish Government for a Brexit deal.  
A short thread, using a single example to highlight absurdity of UK government's broader policy of non-disclosure of Brexit impact reports.  
EU nurses turning their backs on UK is serious for the NHS & shows what the world thinks of post-Brexit Britain too  
A perfect storm for Govt & Brexit. Which senior Tory will be first to break ranks & say UK needs to rethink?#exitfrombrexit 
Seems that we can add right-wing American groups to the list of people that influenced the Brexit vote. #StopBrexit 
New York Times on the Economic Cost of Brexit - how long can government pretend this isn’t happening?  
."Particular sect now steering Brexit — the Europhobe wing of Conservative party — is turning into a cargo cult". 
Here’s the list of the 58 industry sectors where DEXEU completed Brexit impact studies. With commons vote to publish we want answers NOW!  
Labour won a vote to demand access to secret Brexit documents, but the government won’t necessarily comply  
Russia, the sex lives of the people around her and now the demand to reveal the top secret Brexit reports: this is Mrs May’s perfect storm. 
Inflation rising. Child poverty rising. Interest rates rising. Investment falling. NHS failing. Growth slumped. Brexit is in serious trouble  
"A Bit Of A Bind"THAT "HIDE THE #BREXIT REPORTS" LOGIC IN FULL  
. "A  probe has been launched over claims Russia used Twitter & Facebook to meddle in UK’s Brexit referendum". 
86% of the entire UK trade is via EU or EU negotiated global market treaties. #Brexit means losing access to all of these trade agreements.  
Really worrying dramatic fall in EU nurses in #NHS due to #Brexit. Exacerbating NHS & social care staffing crisis  
The BBC keeps attributing the decline in EU nurses here to Brexit. No mention of the introduction of English language tests last year. 
'Nothing to fear' Brexit Britain can walk away without EU deal warns Fox  
DEAR SCUM. Sam White in pin-pricking form as usual @SamWhiteTky #csm #Brexit #Universities 
We’re in a mess over Brexit because government is treating something complex as if it were simple.  
The reality of #Brexit for Scottish agriculture .  If implemented this would devastate our countryside.  
Confirms what @scotgov , @theSNP & @Farming4Yes have been warning farmers of: Tories’ drive for Brexit is biggest threat to Scottish farming  
Fallon resignation. Loads of press coverage.'Impact of Brexit' reports we paid for but haven't been allowed to see.Minimal#cleverbuggers 
Tories in crisis as Fallon quits & Labour pile on Brexit pressure  Everything starting to fall apart. #exitfrombrexit 
Honourable alcoholic sexpest Fallon Resigns Govt defeated over Brexit carnage study Liam Fox pleads “don’t be afraid of chlorinated chicken”  
Tickets now available for next #Leeds for Europe public meeting featuring @mikegalsworthy @LindaMcAvanMEP #Brexit  
Tories threatening to redact #Brexit impact reports to hide the damaging details. #BananaRepublicans 
A motion has passed in parliament requiring Tories to release Brexit Impact Reports. Should be binding. We need to know #StopBrexit #r4today 
We in Ireland will do everything to help Britain get a great Brexit deal that won't harm cross-border peace   
"The Brexit Bill will be most fully debated and scrutinised by people in the Lords whom no one voted for."  
Including museums, galleries & libraries in list of 58 sectors analysed for #Brexit impact gives clear picture of how wide damage will go. 
Farage, "this is an act of treachery" well, you'd know all about that wouldn't you @Nigel_Farage ? 
For Britain, the worst of Brexit talks is yet to come @anandMenon1 @politico 
A little story about how three people lost their job because of Brexit, and were replaced by a (probably imported) machine  
Brexit: Number of EU and UK nurses leaving NHS since referendum surges - The Independent  
Jacob Rees-Mogg puts Anna Soubry in her place during tetchy Brexit exchange in the Commons  
Yes, this could be the moment of truth for Labour. They must support Stop Brexit but will need a big campaign to convert leavers in North.  
New Zealand launches biggest ever drive to attract Brexit Britain's builders  
Johnson, “Telling jokes is often an effective way of getting your diplomatic point across” - Being one helps nobody. 
And a post Brexit Britain will be equally hateful as Leave voters discover life after the lies. #stopbrexit 
Simon Kuper: Beware the Tory cult that’s steering Brexit  
Baghdad is up to its old tricks—and the US is allowing it. It is attempting a land grab in response to Kurdish Referendum. Time to stop it!  
“Whilst some firms are understandably nervous about Brexit, we’ve seen nothing but growth since the vote" — Charles Higgins, director, Worcester Presses, a manufacturer of mechanical and hydraulic presses.  pic.twitter.com/5PjxtFLh0Y 
They could get 30 years in jail for organizing a referendum. Read it five times out loud if you think Spain is a democracy.  
If anyone tells you that EU accounts have never been audited, remind them that they are parroting Brexit leave lies. 
Facing high and rising #inflation , look for the @BankOfEngland to hike interest rates today despite a soft economy and #Brexit uncertainty. 
Promote Brexit Supporters - Drain the Swamp of Remainers.  
A University Lecturer Displayed A Very Offensive Image About Brexit, And People Are Disgusted  
They claim releasing documents is harmful to negotiation, without full disclosure how can we know whether Brexit is harmful to our country? 
The day of the Brexit vote Twitter emailed RT advising them to spend at least a million dollars on "the US elections project." 
U.K. parliament pushes May to release Brexit impact studies  
Britain's future remains confusing and uncertain. Here's the truth about 10 big Brexit myths  
A reminder that noted anti-Semite Nigel Farage (“Mr. Brexit”) is @realDonaldTrump’s closest friend & ally in Europe. 
Brexit: why are these lying bastards lying to us? - those planes ain't going to fly  ...  #Brexit. pic.twitter.com/A1Mq3n3aMi 
Has a rogue piece got through Daily Express editors or has the rag stopped its production of Brexit bull excrement?  
Now that we spent 5 weeks tracking Ceyhan's exports since the referendum was held, we'll continue until we see pace return again. #OOTT 
Getting ready for Brexit is already costing the British government more than half a billion pounds  via @bpolitics 
Crisis point: May's government risks being in contempt of Parliament over refusal to release Brexit papers  
#ArronBanksacknowledged "long lunch" w/Russian ambassador to the UK-insisting: "allegations Brexit funded by Russians 'complete bollocks'” 
Half a century to the day since Winnie Ewing's historic victory, Scotland has an SNP government under @NicolaSturgeon and #ScotRef in the bank ready to use at some point over the course of the next 15 months before Brexit is ratified. #IndyRef2 
Britain sells over three times more to the United States than we do to Germany - our biggest trading partner in the EU. #Brexit  
Theme: "Bougainville women support a weapons free Bougainville for a peaceful Referendum"  
Wouldn’t it be ironic if arch brexiter @JuliaHB1 knees destroyed Brexit.. #Newsnight 
MPs pass motion ordering Theresa May to release secret Brexit studies  
'Nothing to fear' Brexit Britain can walk away without EU deal warns Fox  
Didn't Farage and rees mogg say they'd leave the UK if brexit failed? Do you think they're looking for their suitcases about now? 
Govt loses vote on Brexit impact papers  
Why business is beginning to panic about Brexit 
Parliament votes: Govt must reveal what it knows about the impact of #brexit based on research we all paid for.  
Jet-set Boris's 'flying buttress' Brexit plan brought to ground | John Crace  
I know we turned the clock back with Brexit but this is ridiculous 
They just don't have enough time to do it before the deluge of Brexit descends! 
Tories just lost a key Brexit vote but might ignore it and everyone's confused  
No .. this one IS binding, It was just the referendum that wasn't 
Brexiteers! Pigs of the Britain need you!Pig industry faces labour Brexit crisis. 
The Referendum was supposed to be non binding...yet they struggle to release the info that could make or break it...who is running the show? 
Brexit: an absence of excellence #Brexit  
Hey BBC- thought you might wish to report Real Estate boom in Frankfurt thanks to Brexit? Not? oh well  via @faznet 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again This account is shadow banned follow new account @followgainUK  
The median income here on Anglesey is a little over £23k, barely enough to sponsor a spouse from EU post #brexit #toriesdividefamiles 
#Brexit impact reports vote is the story Tories want to shade out.Fallon’s resignation a perfectly timed distraction?   
Listen: "..what happening in Europe: Brexit, Catalonia, and we are now coming up with heavens know what else."  
Oops- BBC, I guess you forgot to report: Brexit to cost 75,000 finance jobs (NOT worst case scenario)  via @faznet 
I'd argue the govt now has a duty to do so: Britain can stop Brexit 'whenever it likes', Labour peer claims  
Crisis point: May’s government risks being in contempt of Parliament over refusal to release Brexit papers  
The Tories need to have a good clear out, it would get them off the brexit hook too and let them regenerate  
“Granddad, why didn’t Brexit happen?”“Well, a woman called Julia, who loved Brexit, felt she had to tell the world about a creepy man...” 
What did all the clever people predict about the GE 2017, the U.S. elections, & EU referendum. They all disagreed with me and were wrong 
Farmers receive referendum relief through Ag2School tax credit.  
512 days until Article 50 deadline #Article50 #Brexit ⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣷⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀ 
They have ignored us for too long. Reject Parliament's plans for a kind brexit and demand a crazy brexit! 
Brexit is 12312 hours away. #brexit 
Shout out to all the Brits who recently followed loads of Irish accounts in an effort to better judge Brexit. The Late Late Toy Show is tomorrow evening. Your feeds are going to be indecipherable. 
I am one of those who believe that the way the government is implementing the #Brexit process so grievously violates democratic practice that it should be regarded as criminal, and the Law should be amended to enable the prosecution and jailing of the perpetrators.#StopBrexit 
Ate my first Tayto sandwich today at the age of 51. Loved it. Thanks, Brexit! 
What seems quite clear from this episode of #bbcqt is that support for #UKIP is dead and support for #Brexit is dying. 
All the years I  spent nurturing my Arsenal timeline, now I am inundated with Trump  and Brexit bollocks. Can we keep Twitter relevant? 
#bbcqt There are no remainers that want best Brexit deal...if you want that you are not a remainer...you are now part of the collaboration. 
Hunger. Homelessness. Food banks struggling with Christmas demand. A president and “ally” promoting extremism. Brexit bill of billions. Instability in Ireland.... and what did the opposition parties choose to discuss? A bump on a road. Remember that next time you vote people. 
Greast to hear a voice against #fracking actually got heard on #BBCQT. Must be the first time this series, though Brexit/immigration drum gets banged repeatedly every week. 
Conservatives? Brexiteers? No Sir, this is @bbcqt - ANTI-BREXIT, PRO-REMAIN, ANTI-TORY, ANTI TRUMP, ANTI CENTRE-RIGHT SOAPBOX.@bbcqt is biased to REMAIN & THE LEFT  
...except he wasn't Mike. Had Tsipras taken @yanisvaroufakis's advice and not succumbed to the 'waterboarding' inflicted by the troika, Greece could have halted the outrageous austerity inflicted by the EU and Britain would probably not have voted for Brexit.#bbcqt 
Can’t decide whether Brexit or the Corbyn/McDonnell lunancy is the bigger threat to UK’s prosperity. Rather worryingly we could get both. 
Just look how we're screwed by Corporations with tax and then ask yourself do you really have confidence that @fiannafailparty or @FineGael will deliver the best possible #brexit deal?Y'all deluded people, this is going just one way. #Tonighttv3 
Another great result tonight for the @LibDems Tackling local issues and opposing #Brexit  
Can anyone please tell me why the UKIP leader is on #bbcqt tonight? they have ZERO MPs, their MEPs will all be gone when we #Brexit so why? What's the point of UKIP anymore? They're losing councillors faster than West Ham are dropping points #bbcqt 
From Brexit to Trump to Veritas, #RobertMercer is a major architect of the rise of new fascism. He hates attention. Give him some. 
MEPs stunned as they are told UK 'CASH COW' will stop paying for EU states after Brexit  
#Brexit has significantly compromised the UK's position in the world. Not being able to stand up to Trump's racism & having to go begging for arms deals to Saudis are evidence of this. #bbcqt 
If I'd known that the £350m per week to the NHS was a lie and we'd get saddled with a £50bn Brexit bill in the middle of austerity I'd never have voted leave, but I've made my peace with my conscience and now believe Brexit is sheer economic madness, #bbcqt. 
Watching #bbcqt just for @yanisvaroufakis. But even he can't get me past this English arrogance about #Brexit. This country is going to crash & burn. 
Yes, David Dimbleby, every week you discuss Brexit on #bbcqt. And many of the same points are made every week. 
"We were told it would be quick and painless" << who said that? That's a REMOANer myth. We were told throughout the referendum campaign that it would be hard, but we decided it was worth it. #BBCTW 
Thanks to Chris Buckler for the BBC national 6 and 10 O’Clock News coverage. Only business will make Brexit work.  The current heated debate about a border on Ireland or between Northern Ireland and GB is not necessary and certainly not helpful. 1/2  
It’s funny how every week there are people who say ‘we all know what we voted for, there was no confusion’ vis à vis brexit -yet they all have a different idea of what brexit meant  #bbcqt 
Lol via the brilliant @PeterStefanovi2#bbcqt This was @DavidDavisMP on @MarrShow 3 September telling the public a £50bn Brexit divorce bill is "rubbish, nonsense and completely wrong!"  
On #Brexit, 'the solidarity of our EU partners has been remarkable'. Foreign Minister @simoncoveney on 'the Europe we want'.   
Two thirds of Labour voters and three quarters of young people voted against Brexit. This is the answer to your question @OwenJones84 The question Labour must answer: why isn’t it further ahead in the polls? | Owen Jones 
'This is what Remainers do!' LIVID Brexiteer @thecarolemalone SHUTS DOWN Treacherous Remainer @RachelSJohnson in feisty Brexit debate   
Bravo, my arse. She got is into this mess in the first place. As the Tories bungled every aspect of Brexit, alienating the best business partners we could possibly have, she ingratiated herself to the US, holding hands with that creep - then discovering he was a racist bully  
The saddest element about Northern Ireland and #Brexit, for me, is that a lot of us in the Republic have a genuine interest in Northern Ireland, and it's not exclusively ideological. Most British people just couldn't care less about the North. 
.@SamGyimah says there are two types of Remainers - those who still want to fight the referendum and those who want to concentrate on getting the best deal for the UK from the EU #bbcqt 
Major structural weakness of Stormont suspension in Brexit: NI interests being debated/articulated by London and Dublin instead of local government.  
Hard post-Brexit customs border: "Have you anything to declare, madam?"My mum: *speeds through barrier towards Newry, hundreds of bags of Dairy Milk and Tayto flying out of boot* 
Greek hotel wifi, free train passes: Where our £50BN Brexit bill could go will outrage you  
Stories of Partition: occupied six Dairy Milk never had this, so it was always a massive thing that the Republic had fancy chocolate. We used to take about 40 bars home after going on holidays down south. And that is why we should stop Brexit  
We wrote about our experiences factchecking the EU referendum, and that membership fee claim  #bbcqt 
I’m going to do a Christmas BMJ study correlating Brexit supporters and predicted difficult intubations. #BBCQT 
"I wish we'd never had the flamin' thing!" Lesley; my spirit animal  #brexit #bbcqt 
Pollsters Ipsos Mori found that about half of people who’d heard the £350 million claim during the referendum believed it was true  
Woman in audience: "I think a lot of us on both sides voted on the basis of insufficient information."True, but it was much worse than that.As we're seeing, #Brexit was sold on outright lies. The £350m for the NHS was just one of many.We need another referendum.#bbcqt 
Nigel Dodds is accusing people of being in denial around #Brexit. Irony dies again in Northern Ireland. Wilfull or reckless? @bbctheview 
.@yanisvaroufakis says the amount of money involved in the EU 'divorce payment' sounds a lot but is 'puny' - and says the real concern is the process of negotiating Britain's departure from the EU... which he calls a 'dog's Brexit' #bbcqt 
If Scarborough audience is indicative of the feelings of the country towards Brexit, we can assume that its wheels are finally falling off #bbcqt 
May's aides worried any brexit customs concessions to N Ireland wd be demanded by Scotland too...indeed  via @FT 
#bbcqt We were told #brexit would save money (which would all go to the #NHS ). In fact it’s a far more costly exercise than just the #BrexitBill : 
So inland revenue may need 5,000 extra staff to cope with brexit But cannot get tax back from companies on their doorstepSo who’s paying for themUs Tory brexit dearer by the hour Just as well we have top notch negotiators Oh it’s David DaviesBollex 
European Court ruling 'shows Brexit will be a disaster for workers' rights'  
NHS boss Simon Stevens said that the health service should get the cash boost it was promised during the EU referendum #bbcqt  
On #bbcqt @ChukaUmunna refuses to say he wants to stop Brexit. If he doesn't then why is he hosting Exit from Brexit events?  
.@ChukaUmunna says many who voted for Brexit thought they were getting a 'shiny new Audi' and have ended up getting something quite different #bbcqt 
If people knew Brexit divorce bill was £50bn, more would have voted leave as that's the outrageous amount we would pay if we stayed.#bbcqt 
Sir Keir Starmer said that the government could be in contempt of Parliament if it withholds Brexit data from MPs #bbcqt  
Quote of the day from interviewing #Ireland Senator @FrankFeighan about #Brexit's effect on his country "We feel the United Kingdom has accidentally shot itself in our foot." 
The next question asks whether the EU vote would have been different had voters known about the Brexit divorce bill #bbcqt 
Northern Ireland, UKEU Referendum | #Brexit•470,707 (55.8%)- #Remain•349,442 (44.2%)- #Leave•1,260,955 (62.7%)- Turnout•741,000~ Irish born citizens in UK & NI residents owning an Irish passport potentially could have voted in ref equivalent to 2.2%.(via @TheDetailTV) 
Question time so predictable, panellists demonstrating just how out of touch they are with millions of people here in the UK, they have learned nothing from Brexit. Another handpicked audience. They & MSM no longer speak for ordinary people President Trump did yesterday. #bbcqt 
Letter (actually Tweet) from wonderful, wonderful Copenhagen! A young waitress said to me tonight that she & her friends were so saddened about Brexit as they feel they are losing so much too. She asked me to thank all those fighting to #StopBrexit, so let’s do this! #Bresistance 
The god-awful Nicholas Watt on Newsnight dismisses an Irish position on Brexit as "blarney".  Asshole. 
In one of those odd quirks of the independence referendum Richard Leonard and his GMB union got outspent by the Orange Lodge in their desire to keep David Cameron as PM of Scotland. But only just.  
So the idea that the UK would compensate for Brexit with closer US relations hasn't aged well, has it? 
Article 50 can be revoked..EU have made that offer.But it will not be the same membership. It will be a membership of a more modern Europe.No matter we have lost a lot of privileges.Still better than #Brexit.  
Ireland demands 'significantly more clarity' from UK over Brexit border  
The Irish Government and European Union can "stick their border where the sun doesn't shine"! To quote a certain IRA bomber. #Brexit 
Crikey, this Irish Times podcast is brutal on the UK political elite. Brexit section from 22 minutes in: 'Britain's Pesky Irish Problem' 
So, up to 3 minute peak rush hour delay on #QueensferryCrossing. Think that's bad, wait till you see the border crossing delays caused by the Brit Gov Brexit fuckup. 
DUP sends Brexit WARNING to Theresa May - Government could COLLAPSE over Irish border deal  
“It’s time for a real referendum on Europe... so I can write a book about how to subvert its result.” #notliberal #notdemocrat 
(1) This is a sweet story and you can tell it to yourself, but the thing is: you don’t get to cherry-pick which aspect of a referendum you vote for. You vote for the package and the EUref package was demonstrably xenophobic and hate-filled. 4/  
The reformist socialist agenda is nothing more than microwave giveaways to the middle class north London fan base, with real progressive policies for justice and equality (e.g. reversing austerity, stopping Brexit) overlooked. /6 
Now there's a travel ban we agree with!!! 
The Republic of Ireland should see the Brexit negotiations as an opportunity not a threat, says @OwenPaterson 
Brexit May be about to turn Britain into a third world economy.But, heh, cheer up!Cheese fights heart disease!  
Releasing the Brexit Impact Assessments would have been the platinum plated opportunity to dispel the fears of Remainers like me, who were convinced Brexit would severely damage our economy. Mr Davis' @DavidDavisMP failure to do so has convinced me I was right all along. 
Theresa May. Recoup some of the £50bn Brexit charges by simply putting the Channel Tunnel on ebay. @TwopTwips 
Who will be the first MP to come out and say: *We can & must stop Brexit because it will do untold harm to the UK economy & geopolitics, the ref was advisory & the vote based on lies & hostile interference*?@DavidLammy @NickyMorgan01 @ChukaUmunna @thomasbrake @EdwardJDavey 
.@jeremycorbyn so glad to see you’re focusing on the important things ... an election that, at this point, exists only in your dreams ... while the country is basically on fire thanks to Brexit - which you too support.  
The party propping up Theresa May's government has threatened to pull their support over Brexit Irish border talks  
I could never understand fishermen supporting #brexit Sure some EU rules are daft but plenty of fish landed at Plymouth goes to the continent (most Cuttlefish and Sardines/Pilchards) . Leaving the EU could wreck that trade. Seems odd to vote yourself out of work.  
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar must be prepared to use Brexit veto to defend Ireland's national interests – Sinn Féin deputy leader TD @MaryLouMcDonald 
If we all woke up tomorrow morning and found #Brexit had been abandoned can there be any doubt most people would just shrug and get on with their lives? Stirling would recover as would inward investment and business confidence. Let’s make it happen! 
Here is something we #remain campaigners can all do. We are all over the UK - indeed the world! Most of us have at least one local newspaper. Do you follow yours? If not, do it. Watch for local stories about #brexit - grass roots stuff. Business closures, local jobs unfilled, 1/n 
Here is a problem with the DUP wanting 'no special arrangements for Northern Ireland': until Brexit they've been demanding nothing but that for decades (thread) 
A deception is being perpetrated regarding #Brexit, says campaigner, Gina Miller. Please read and share her guest article, ‘Think of Brexit as a matryoshka’. Link:  
John Longworth - Britain should use the #BrexitBilll money for boosting the economy, investing in infrastructure and housing, instead of paying off the EU. Britain should walk away and adopt WTO rules so it can reap the benefits of Brexit.  
Correction: If you're not a bigot, Farage, racist, Johnson, fascist, Gove, troll, Corbyn, bot, May, Fox, Redwood or xenophobe, you know the Brexit you voted for isn't going to be delivered. Time for a clean slate, join us to overthrow Brexit.  
What's your fave Martin Wolf tune? Mine is Cool Rage at the Intellectual Vacuity and Dishonesty of Legatum Pamphlet on Brexit  
Jayda Fransen couldn't vote in the EU Referendum because she didn't know how to spell "X". #JaydaFransenFacts 
Crystal Palace sacked an exciting Dutchman & replaced him with a washed-up,old cabbageWest Ham sacked a Croat & appointed a Mad ScotsmanEverton sacked a Dutchman & appointed an Englishman best known for accepting bribes & drinking pints of wineBrexit really is in full force 
Today we presented our @Appg_Brexit report to top EU negotiators in the Commission, Council of Europe, Task Force 50 and MEPs on the Brexit Steering Group. The engagement and enthusiasm about our work was #TheWorldIsWatching #YouthBrexitReport  
Nigel Farage - "I would just say - don’t bank on the #Brexit divorce bill. I think there is going to be a huge public reaction to this extraordinary sum of money.“Celebrate for today Commissioner but I promise you - it’s not in the bag."  
Thank you for calling the Channel 4 #Brexit helpline:To blame Ireland press 1,For imperialist attitudes press 1,To speak to Boris Johnson press 1, twice. 
Labour: "Brexit will be a disaster. It will decimate financial services. And that's our job". 
Project Fear in TATTERS: Bank boss says firms are READY for Brexit – 'We aren't panicking'  
.@MichelleDewbs thinks the UK is being "forced into a corner" to reveal to the EU its Brexit bill before anything is discussed about future relationships #ThePledge 
'Absolutely DISGUSTING!' Furious Britons VENT ANGER over extortionate Brexit bill  
Pro-Remain Lab MPs who fear-monger that #Brexit will produce an exodus of talent have almost all fallen completely silent about what Corbyn would mean for Britain #WhereAreTheScoresOfPrincipledLabourMPsWhoOnceTriedToOustCorbyn?  
Yes, stay away @realDonaldTrump. We're Labour people, we believe in livingtogether freely, in a spirit of solidarity, tolerance and respect.Your sort of nasty, divisive, morally corrupt politics brought Brexit. We will defeat it.  
Astonishing brass neck from the party that has put government on hold for years while it pursues an agenda that the Scottish people explicitly rejected in a referendum  
If only British broadcasting journalists had this ability to interview Brexit supporting liars.  
A reminder that he's defending a British group whose supporter murdered a sitting MP last year for her anti-Brexit stance  
Jacob Rees-Mogg furious as Brexit bill could be £2.6BN A YEAR for DECADES   
None of it makes any sense. Everything about brexit is mad. 
According to Tory economics, blaming the great recession on Labour and borrowing £550 billion, more than every Labour administration put together, this will be passed off as a great deal...and worse, loads will believe it!!!! 
Feck. News Letter's Ben Lowry tells Channel 4 that almost 50% in the North were in favour of Brexit. You couldn't make it up!Well, he just did!56 = 50. Must be using an RHI calculator. 
Do you think David Davis @DavidDavisMP is failing to release the Brexit Impact Assessments because they will reveal how devastated the British economy will be across the entire spectrum? 
So obvious it's hardly worth saying, but UK-Trump row shows geo-political tragedy of Brexit. Three global power blocs: US, China, EU. UK adrift, having abandoned its unique nodal role for a (mythologised memory of a) fantasy 
The UK cannot play a role in the EU's Political and Security Committee because it will not be a member of the EU. It's as simple as that. Brexit means Brexit. 
The EU has done its #Brexit research, which is open access & freely available. Meanwhile the People - and the Parliament - of Britain are being kept in the dark.   
Once again, Brexit means Brexit for things Govt likes as well as things it doesn't. Brexit means choices - and eventually we'll have to make them  
An MP has warned @theresa_may not to rely on DUP votes if Brexit treats Northern Ireland differently from the rest of the UK  
As an Andrew myself and with a Scottish father, this is grand news Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn. Now, until you stand up against Brexit, the next @UKLabour government won't be in your lifetime. You cannot buy votes with a bank holiday, standing against Brexit is your only hope.  
EU and Britain agree settlement post Brexit: senior EU official  
Watching @Channel4News report on the Northern Ireland border. It currently works perfectly, people and goods flowing without hindrance. #Brexit threatens everything including peace. A horrendous situation, we have to end Brexit! 
Thanks to Manfred Weber and our friends in @EPP for their support in crucial Brexit talks: 'No progress' in Brexit if no assurances over border via @RTENewsNow 
Chuka Lying About Boris and Brexit Bill  
Meanwhile, the EU has commissioned impact studies on brexit AND published them online  Transparent and open #FBPE 
Don't waste £44 billion negotiating an 'arrangement' that's worse than the one we already have: EU membership.Time for us all, the electorate, to make an 'informed' decision, based on reality.Q. Invest in our future within a new EU....or Brexit? 
DUP threaten to bring down Tory government if they agree special deal for North on Brexit. Timely. Let's find out do turkeys vote for Christmas. 
The WTO option could yet be better value than a costly negotiated Brexit, says @JLongworthLML 
What Wall Of Worry? US Equity Investors Are The Most Levered-Long Since Brexit  
Team BrexitWe will be running two teams, one team will play Saturday whilst the other Sunday, two best of 4s each day (: Wanted to let other people/teams have more chance to participate in this event!  
Hmmmm, I don't think the xenophobes, bigots, fascists and racists who voted for Brexit got the memo Mr Johnson @BorisJohnson , they want nothing less than a closed, intolerant and hate filled society. Brexit is giving oxygen to their 'cause'.  
#WhyBritsDontWantTrump because we already have the racist shitshow that is #Brexit to deal with. One racist shitshow at a time please. 
BBC Newsline devotes programme to Brexit but never explain any Brexit border will be at behest of EU's Lisbon Treaty, which ROI must police. 
Appears to be a quiet news day today, yet even so there seems to be little reportage on the Brexit Impact Assessments. Where are they Mr Davis @DavidDavisMP? You didn't for a second think that you were getting off the hook did you? Publish them, that's what you are required to do 
"The £44bn is just the start of May's truly awful #Brexit deal"#CostofBrexit 
The Tory #Brexit shambles is never ending !In TORY hands - the UK's future is determined by what plays well in the TORY party !NOT the national interest. 
Dear Leavers, As a proud native of Northern Ireland let me be very clear ... my fellow Unionists in NI value being part of UK more than they value leaving EU and will bring down the UK Gov if that union is threatened by a #Brexit deal. Be assured of that.  
Tonight @ 7pm we are live from Dublin with @mattfrei - discussing Brexit, the border and the future of relations between Ireland and the UK. 
Brexit is totally unpatriotic. There is not a shred of decency or patriotism in it. Brexit is only sustained by lies and deceit. Whatever reason you voted for Brexit has been proven to either be a bare faced lie or just completely undeliverable. #revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
For people (especially in GB) who have just realised there will be a land border between NI & the EU... @StephenFarryMLA has *actually* been looking into the effects of Brexit on NI - & has developed *actual* workable proposals. Worth a follow on twitter if you're not already. 
Are you glad net migration has dropped more than 100,000 (nearly 1/3) since #Brexit? - Net migration falls by more than 100,000 after Brexit vote RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
Spotted at a sixth form college in  on a project board about British values. The young are for remain. Brexit is already doomed to failure..  
Brexit will liberate Britain from the clumsy EU! Top economist savages meddling Brussels  
You said nobody was threatening our place in the Single Market.They are.You said EU trade agreements would roll over to us.They won't.You said countries would be happy to trade on same terms as in those deals.They've said not.You've got #Brexit wrong every time#StopBrexit  
So only 50 MPs want # Brexit, the rest oppose it, so how come it got voted through. The only answer can be that they are all a bunch of spineless wretches who put clinging on to their jobs ahead of doing the right thing. The UK may as well be governed by brainless sheep  
EU Brexit divorce deal is likely to be near €55bn (£48.5bn). We pay roughly £165 million a week to the EU (Not £350m!).£48.5bn ÷ £165m = 293.9So the divorce settlement is costing us the same as at least 293 weeks of EU membership. That's 5 years and 8 months and 1 week! 
So sad to see EU migrants feel unwelcome here because of Brexit, little England anti-immigrant sentiment and falling £. Who is going to do these jobs? It is really not good news that immigration is falling because UK is now a less attractive place to live  
#bbcnewssix Net immigration is down and yet India says there won't be a trade deal unless more immigrants are accepted by the UK, so might as well cancel Brexit altogether. And since Brexit has already served its purpose of reducing migration, what's the point of going on? 
Labour showing how much they really care about about students and Europe post-Brexit by showing up to the debate. Oh... #LabourFail 
Anyone ever noticed the overlap between Brexit and Trump?And that @Nigel_Farage is in @realDonaldTrump's pocket?And that both like to tweet racist shit to undermine sovereign democratic allies?And that both are heavily linked to Putin?It's almost as if it means something. 
CONSPIRACY THEORY:May was in deep trouble over a £50bn Brexit #DivorceBill, redacted #BrexitImpactReports, & a negotiator who had been shown to be a buffoon...What to do?Ring-ring, ring-ring.."Hello Donald, could you do me a favour & be racist on Twitter?"@LBC @skynews 
Labour, didn’t you guys make a big deal about students and Europe post Brexit? Nice to see you turned up to the debate...  
An interesting figure emerged on one of @acgrayling's excellent posts; there are at most fifty MPs who want #Brexit to happen. So there are over 550 who are opposed to it.Now do you see why Empress Treeza is making sure the @HouseofCommons doesn't get a vote on it?#StopBrexit 
AGE UK:Older people are being subject to more abuse since the Brexit vote.  
What a shameless crew in the UK cabinet. They bring us Brexit, crash the £, lose some of the most valuable members of our workforce stampeding back to Europe, (or not coming at all), and tell us it's a triumph of migrant control! 
We're still waiting for those #EU flag pillowcases to be delivered... Should have arrived Tuesday.  Is this #Brexit sabotage?   
On train out of Paddington to @WitneyLabourCLP - looking forward to members' event to talk about Brexit & Britain. 
Treasury publishes the first Brexit bills for all those who voted to leave the EU.  
Trump is America's Brexit. Angry, anxious White Americans voted for self immolation in order to feel great again. Amazing how self destruction takes backseat to racism again and again. 
The EU 27 have been perfectly happy with the UK as fellow member nation. Antogonism and acrimony are entirely of #brexit eers` making. 
We need a breakthrough on the Irish border – #NorthernIreland’s businesses depend on it #Brexit  
Twitter defended Paul Scholes , Ryan Giggs and Dele Ali more than it did Eric Cantona & Dennis Bergkamp - Brexit is working 
There is a line. On one side of it is the EU, prosperity, human rights, freedom of expression, tolerance.On the other is Brexit, Trump, Britain First, the neo-Nazis and the KKK.You are on one side or the other. 
The message from Noel Gallagher is a clear one. He doesn’t care. He doesn’t care about Brexit, the Tories, the NHS, Trump ... he doesn’t care about any of it because he’s a multi-millionaire and it doesn’t impact him. None of it. You should all (quote): “ get over yourselves”. 
Couldn't have put it betterUK's post-Brexit trade policy is 'barking mad,' say SNP  
Those who voted to leave the EU will feel vindicated today: Immigration to UK has dropped by more than 100K during year since the Brexit vote. No. of people migrating from EU countries at lowest level since 2013  
Christopher Maher: even if we lived within & with peace & harmony with the EU we should be dealing with Donald Trump..Me: Funny thought we were living in the EU in peace & harmony B4 the stupid #Brexit Ref poisoned the atmosphere & turned friends into competitors.#StopBrexit. 
Leaving the EU was always going to put the UK's Europol membership at risk. The head of Europol said as much before the referendum. More leadership and influence flushed away for no reason. 
It seems now that the Tories, having rapidly abandoned all thought of compromise, are now willing to sacrifice the integrity of the United Kingdom in order to get Hannan's "buccaneering, offshore, low-tax" #Brexit Britain. #BrexitTaxHaven #StopBrexit 
BREAKING: @LegatumInst , a think-tank with links to key #brexit ministers, is being probed by the Charity Commission  @PeterKGeoghegan for @ferretscot 
For the avoidance of doubt, this is Unionism trashing the economy (and rights, citizenship etc) of the whole of the UK for the sake of a flag and a border. #brexit 
Farage would really love the consequences of not settling our account - a catastrophic no-deal #Brexit that would inflict hardship on most Britons while offering rich pickings for his super-rich capitalist friends in Britain and the USA.#BrexitBetraysBritain #StopBrexit 
What's the EU done for us? Given workers rights that will be in severe danger with #Brexit  
Nothing democratic about stacking the deck in B.C.’s democracy referendum. #bcpoli 
Cracking (and worrying) story from my colleague @DMcCaffreySKY : a foreign government is being told to ignore our Foreign Secretary by errrr...our Foreign Office.  #Brexit https://t.co/hlmFn5cdbH?amp=1 
BREAKING NEWS:Dutch government cancels referendum opportunity, while majority of DUTCH voters is PRO-referendum. Also a referendum about above decision is forbidden. Dutch government = 100% dictatorship 
Rose Turtle and the concerned People of Castlemaine and District - #GlobalFlagRaising for December First .....they are demanding Human Rights for those Refugees on Manus and an Independence Referendum for the Melanesian People of #WestPapua - brutally Occupied by Indonesia. 
#tRuthLess Davidson does not want to talk about:-. Homelessness.Poverty.Food banks.Rape clause. Child Abuse.Austerity.WASPI.Brexit outcome.WM  Cuts.DUP Bribe.Political Party FundingWhen She can spend all her time at FMQ  Asking about the Snagging list for a Bridge  
UK newspapers still speak of hard vs. soft Brexit, knowing there is nothing soft about a soft Brexit. Why so subservient to a misleading framework? Your job is to report the truth, not to respect ‘the will of the people’. Leave the latter to elected politicians. Be journalists. 
Brexit is the opportunity to cut mass immigration, writes @LilleyPeter. 'For decades it has been cheaper to hire EU workers than to train British ones, with disastrous effects for our economy' 1/7 
Brexit Britain is displaying its old, dangerous delusions about Ireland  
Legatum think tank with links to key #brexit ministers under investigation by Charity Commission  
The Irish need to understand that Brexit is essentially selfishness on steroids. So self centered that Irish issues never entered their heads. Now Ireland is in the way and they will get very nasty.  
Difficult to see how Theresa May’s Great Brexit betrayal can be “The will of the people” when 71% oppose giving £40bn+ to Brussels.  
Welcome todays @EU_Competition state-aid ruling allowing Brexit restructuring aid for Irish SMEs. Very positive step & good work @EnterInnov in delivering. Broader temporary state aid framework will be needed in the event of 'Hard Brexit' but contingency planning firmly underway  
NEW: Boris Johnson is being actively undermined by officials within his own department over #Brexit negotiations, with FCO telling Ireland not to listen to the Foreign Secretary. My story here:  
Confirmed today that a Tory hard Brexit will mean leaving Europol, leaving the UK unable to lead on fighting crime across Europe, diminishing our safety and security at home and our influence abroad: 
It’s not “against its will”. It is its will. Brexit means Brexit.  
I remember asking a civil servant in May 2016 what planning they'd done on the Irish border in the event of a Brexit vote, him laughing in my face and saying "NONE, because it ISN'T GOING TO HAPPEN"  
.@Theresa_May looks even more weak & wobbly for not cancelling the #Trump visit. If Brexit means we have to suck up to racists because we have closed the door on the EU then cancel #Brexit. The British people are better than this. #WhyBritsDontWantTrump 
The Democratic Unionist Party’s Brexit spokesman rubbished Labour’s Keir Starmer for being too well-prepared and knowledgeable -  
IDS let it slip that, ‘the divorce bill has to be paid, so London’s financial service businesses (millionaires) will be unaffected by Brexit & can have free trade. (NB sweetheart deals with Nissan, Grimsby) WHAT ABOUT OTHER UK FIRMS & THE REST OF US, IDS??  
Hhm, thanks for the advice man who advised terrible PM on her terrible election campaign and terrible Brexit plan, we'll definitely take your comments on board  
So the British government might collapse unless it pursues the hardest possible (and therefore pro-hard border) Brexit possible? Oh good  
Sammy Wilson is bluffing. The "We'll bring down the govt" threat over a Brexit deal loses its bite when the alternative is a Corbyn-led Labour government. 
Maintaining principle of animal sentience in Scotland after Brexit has taken a step forward, says @markruskell.  
#Brexit is one big toxic machine churning out immigrant hate, economic decline, Farage's subtle anti Semitic "Soros memes" sowing discord with our European neighbors & now today we have reignited the "Irish troubles". There will be more misery to this before we reach an end 
Admission:Not every bad thing is caused by Brexit.But:I can't think of anything good that's caused by Brexit. 
If you hear a Remoaner banging on about the "calamity" of Hard Brexit show them this. You do not fucking mess around with an Englishman's chips. Granite Brexit needed!  
My full story from DUP Brexit crunch meeting with Conservatives this morning... more to come...  
Doesn't this mean that we can't progress to stage 2 of Brexit talks without the government losing its majority...?  
So no pressure or anything, Leo Varadkar - if you can get this right you sort the border issue *AND* you down May’s government.#Brexit  
DUP warns Government Brexit border issue could 'destablise' confidence deal  
Can you beat us on this Brexit Bus game? We can do it in about 70 seconds - how about you?  
This graphic is still my favourite explanation of the Irish Border problem thrown up by Brexit. Which is still the problem that is most likely to threaten both this Government & Brexit.  
If you're wondering, here is data on how the Northern Ireland Brexit vote broke down according to British/Irish identification. A nice, healthy, sectarian split, which the DUP is reflecting.  
It’s Brexit that is destabilising the Irish peace process , which was brought about with a great deal of assistance by the EU and by both NI and Eire being in a single market and customs union 
Brexit was not democratic.. It was an opinion poll based on absolute tosh. I want no part in a UK that is arrogant and xenophobic. As for Farage the man is a third rate nazi 
"The Republic of Ireland should see the Brexit negotiations as an opportunity not a threat," writes our board member @OwenPaterson 
Pete Wishart: “We need a proper debate about the true cost of #Brexit and we need to hear if there's any price that would make this government think again.”  
Had  British public known how EU would hold us ransom, had BBC reported EU as bullies they are over the years, how many more would have voted Brexit  
The PM is desperate to show that we have some importance within the context of #Brexit, but our influence in the world is actually being undermined by our relationship with Trump, says @jon_bartley #SkyDebate 
Great to see the @coopukfood @Steve_Murrells @CatherineBenne8 commitment to the future of British sheep farming which will be so important as we head towards brexit. Need to see all retailers follow this lead and back our farmers  
On the Brexit bill, I'm willing to wait until we see the final figure (rather than media speculation) and – crucially – until we know what is being offered in return, writes @matthew_elliott 
Sky Sources: DUP met Government this morning said signing any Brexit commitment for NI to stay in Single Market, Customs Union or regulatory equivalent “would be deeply destabilising to the confidence and supply agreement” - more on @skynews now 
Britain has shifted from "go whistle" to "what's your sort code" over the Brexit divorce bill, says SNP Westminster leader @PeteWishart  
This didn't take long... #BrexitBBC News - Sammy Wilson warns Brexit talks may jeopardise DUP-Tory deal  
What's next? There's some exciting stuff I can't talk about yet, but for now:1. A weekly column in the @TheNewEuropean from next week2. I'll be working with the great @UE team for a few months on their Brexit reporting3. And I'm a commissioner on this  
I feel sorry for the UK ambassador. “Yes of course we want the visit to happen Mr President Sir, it’s just the Queen is really busy this side of 2020, you know, what with the wedding, and er Brexit and... er... Corgis” 
Options for protecting EU nationals' rights in the UK after Brexit -- new working paper from @cambridgelaw May be of interest @StevePeers @conorgearty @davidallengreen @GeorgePeretzQC @WomaninHavana @pmdfoster @alexebarker @mattholehouse @The3Million 
DUP MP warns that Brexit talks could jeopardise his party's deal to support the Conservative government  
.@Theresa_MayPerhaps you don't understand Trump bc Trump is a doer.He has the guts to follow through.How is Brexit going? 
Some very good points in this piece by @mrianleslie on how to change minds:DON’T tell Leave voters they got it wrongDON’T tell Leave voters they were lied toDO weaponise bad newsDO shine a light on the clown showDO make a sovereignty case for Brexit 
.@BBCr4today have got coverage badly wrong over 2 years on -TrumpCorbynBrexitReasons include: -Not wanting to upset the govtNot wanting to upset press barons Stupid understanding of "balance"A shared middle-class, middle-aged, Middle England worldview @BBCR4Feedback 
First full-year immigration figures since the Brexit vote were published today. They show fewer EU citizens migrating to the UK, while more are emigrating. We can't say exactly how much of this is because of Brexit. Get the full picture here:  
When will the elected officials grow a spine & #stopbrexitWe are pandering to facists, racists & the ignorant. #brexit   
We asked the audience why isn’t Labour further ahead in the polls?Haven't dealt with antisemitismHaven't dealt with racism towards black ToriesLack of clarity with the single market and brexitMomentum's threat to purge Labour moderatesEconomic illiterates in shadow cabinet  
Warning to the Government on Brexit from the party that’s keeping them in power,  the DUP.  
David, I've documented 65,000 job losses so far caused by #Brexit. See  for full details. This is just the beginning. No British job is safe. #StopBrexit 
NI is powerless. Stormont is dissolved. Despite voting to REMAIN both sides of the community are being held to ransom by DUP/Tories. Arlene Foster - who SHOULDN'T EVEN HAVE A JOB after RHI scandal - is determined to set NI on fire b/c Brexit is synonymous with anti-Irishness. 
Many Right wing #Brexit proponents want a low-tax, low-regulation, low-welfare economy. So why don't they be honest & put that in a General Election manifesto rather than sneaking it in under pretence of concern about immigration & sovereignty!#StopBrexit #BrexitBetraysBritain 
The notion of a "jobs-first Brexit" is, of course, mere fiction. But @The_TUC research shows @UKLabour isn't even pursuing the logic of that fiction. 
'What are our Brexit priorities?' asks @The_TUC. It sets five tests and argues for staying in the Single Market and Customs Union.  
.@PaulWilliamsMP – Government wasting billions on extreme Brexit whilst NHS goes underfunded  
.@StevePeers is - justifiably- wrathful about Trump.And about Brexit, which conditions the UK govt's futile subservience to him.UK-Trump like "the relationship between a helpless lamppost and a passing dog"."... grab us by the country".Oh wow. 
As predicted. As I’ve said since before the referendum; doesn’t matter what you think of the EU, UK has zero leverage, and #Brexit is economic suicide.  
Congrats .@theresa_may, you're finally on your way to hitting your absurd net migration target (esp since revelation that overstaying students overcounted). All it took was crashing the £, driving the economy towards a #Brexit cliff & demonising foreigners 
The UK will need a new form of research collaboration with the EU after Brexit, research commissioner @Moedas has said:  
Your cut out and keep guide to the 7 options being touted for our relationship with the EU after Brexit. We reckon it's a rather clear choice  
Taoiseach must be prepared to use Brexit veto to defend Ireland's national interests – @MaryLouMcDonald  
It's not yet six months since we were confidently told by The Guardian's leading columnist that the rise of the DUP would thwart a hard Brexit...  
Oops ...European Court ruling 'shows how Brexit will be a disaster for workers' rights'  
#WhyBritsDontWantTrumpThe UK is already a laughing stock because of Brexit. We could save a bit of dignity if we told this far-right supporting president to sod off 
When in a hole stop digging!Theresa May and her government seem incapable of getting anything right over #brexit  
. @DUPleader says re Brexit "there can be no arrangements agreed that compromise the integrity of the UK single market and place barriers, real or perceived, to the free movement of goods, services and capital between NI & the rest of the UK" 
.@StevePeers on gloriously disdainful form covering Trump & Brexit  
Gina Miller (@thatginamiller) is also a superb writer. See this eloquent description of the layers of influence driving the current Brexit direction.Far from anything to do with "the people", we've been hijacked by a cabal of tycoons + their think-tanks. 
. @theresa_may it is futile hypocrisy to criticise Trump while continuing with a hard #Brexit which Trump and his clique have interfered in UK politics to bring about.If your words are to have any meaning you must #StopBrexit. 
Fuck Oasis. They're musical Brexit. 
Tory Brexiter MPs are likely to vote against a huge #Brexit Bill #GetBritainOut 
Construction manager admits Brexit will mean British workers being offered more money  
If you were even going to consider for a nanosecond handing your fate over to the DUP, you only have to consider the mindset of Ian Paisley and his call for the British govt to make life hard for the South over Brexit and "shake their cage".  
Mark Carney has long opposed the EU's bonus cap, and now says the UK could scrap some Brussels regulations after Brexit  
"Net Migration Falls" is the #BBC headline of choice rather than 230k more arrive in UK.We need skilled migration! This is another 230k to feed home, #NHS , transport, school on our over stretched infrastructure.#UKIP #Labour #Brexit #Conservatives 
#Brexit  showdown Monday. This is money for nothing. @kathrynjohnston #Brexit ireland #BrexitReality #NorthernIreland  by @Socialnews_IT 
Why is British public so ignorant on Brexit? Ah yes, those ignorant Brits who don't want 27 other countries running their country. If only the Brits were clever eh ! via @IrishTimesOpEd 
LATEST: The #CORRUPT #EU #auditors have had their #offices raided by #anticorruptionunit! EU sums that don't add up! Will they find the massive #FRAUD and #EMBEZZLEMENT within the #EU accounts..? #THEFT of #NATIONS! @theresa_may #Conservatives #LABOUR #UKIP #BBC #SKY #BREXIT #UK 
Answer:#Labour: needs to stop gaming #Brexit.It's over.#StepUpToThePlate-#StopTheMadness 
Record fall in net migration to UK in year after Brexit vote  
If nobody wants a hard border, why is the Northern Ireland #Brexit issue so fraught? @BBCChrisMorris explains 
They're the same people that sit in Westminster. Same people who failed to consider/didn't care about the very real problems Brexit would create for NI. Same people who broke the Good Friday Agreement to save their own skin. Same people who funded loyalist paramilitary groups. 
BFE: Britain for Europe are delighted to announce next year's National Demonstration against ALL forms of Brexit! We will be marching on Parliament Square on June 23rd 2018 and you can express your intention to join us here:  #StopBrexit 
SCOTTISH TORY LOGIC:• Queensferry crossing - set back people's lives by a few minutes = unforgivable• Hard brexit - set back people's lives by decades = totally acceptable#FMQs 
"Morgan Stanley warns Corbyn is more economically dangerous than hard Brexit – despite helping cause the recession themselves" | @mattzarb 
Theresa May has perhaps learnt her lesson & our Foreign Office too. Don't go straight to a probable fascist President in America, offering high praise to the hilt. He just used you. No special relationship, at all. #Brexit 
In Dail @MaryLouMcDonald says there's an effort to push through cobbled together deal on Brexit with very real danger best interests of Irish citizens will be sacrificed to allow Britain & EU to move on 
As we’ve fallen out with the EU over Brexit and the US over Trump, I think it’s wise to let Australia win the Ashes. We need all the friends we can get. #ThursdayThoughts 
One thing that this whole Brexit mess has taught me is that being able to say "We told you so" actually isn't that satisfying. 
"Can I get you anything?" "Yes, I'll have the utterly delusional view of Brexit, with a side order of Royal sycophancy, please." "Excellent choice."  
Brexit provides the UK with an opportunity to grow its financial services industry.  
At the first possible opportunity there must be a comprehensive inquiry as to why the @BBC has failed in its duty to inform and why it has served as a willing mouthpiece for the extreme-right. #StopBrexit #Brexit @BBCNews 
An analysis of @ShippersUnbound's excellent books illustrates just how British politics has changed since the #Brexit referendum. Noticeable increase in both the FPP Score (up 68%) and CPP score (up 190%).  
Morgan Stanley warns Corbyn is more dangerous than Brexit – the bank has warned that a Labour government led by Jeremy Corbyn would see spending priorities 'shift in favour of low-income households and the public sector'.   
Net migration fell by more than 100,000 in the year since Brexit. Good. immigration was too high putting pressure on the NHS, schools & housing, which the left refuse to concede 
Our MPs will soon be voting on whether to ensure Parliament has a meaningful vote on the final Brexit deal.Support our campaign to uphold the principle of representative democracy and bring proper scrutiny to the Brexit process at  
"I am not in favour of a transition period, I am in favour of getting out tomorrow..."  Iain Duncan Smith on date of #Brexit #bbcdp 
》Many still pretend that modern Nazis don't exist.》They also refuse to admit that racism played a part in Leave's victory.》But Trump's retweet of a British neo-Nazi video proves them wrong on both counts.》White Supremists exist. And in the UK they ALL voted for Brexit. 
2016 was a shit year. 2017 has been so much worse. Because for both Brexit and Trump we have seen the normalisation of things that would have seemed unthinkable even at the end of 2016. We have to fight harder against this still. This must stop.  
#NigelFarage: "We want a clean break, not a relationship that can go on for decades" @Nigel_Farage tells @afneil  "Not worth nearly £50bn. #Nodeal is better than a bad deal, and this is a very deal indeed" @theresa_may..?  #BBC #SKY #UK #BREXIT #NEWS #EU 
Don't you have your own issues to deal with? #Brexit #MAGA 
Congratulations to my colleague @simoncoveney on his appointment as Tánaiste and @HHumphreysFG as Minister for Business. A good strong Brexit team. And well deserved promotion & recognition for @josephamadigan - welcome! Tough week but good job Taoiseach @campaignforleo 
Theresa May is critical of Trump, and yet continues to push forward with a hard #Brexit which will mean UK-US trade negotiations dominated by Trump. Her words are empty rhetoric in flat contradiction to her actions.#StopBrexit #BrexitBetraysBritain 
The Trump and Brexit phenomena are the same: the revolt of the masses against the elite, says James Delingpole  
Also delighted to appoint @HHumphreysFG as Minister for Business Enterprise & Innovation, first time in 7 years it's held by someone from outside Dublin. Important role for Brexit and regional jobs. 
Britain is a huge tax haven with its overseas territories. This new report shows how the EU can make the ending of # tax avoidance a condition in # Brexit negotiations: ... 
Bankers' bonus cap faces the axe after Brexit: Range of EU rules could be relaxed to boost the City  
The bigger picture? Oh the fact that we have to suck up to most morally bankrupt US president in living memory because the Conservatives are screwing up all possibilities of a non destructive Brexit?  
My #brexit #DivorceBill #cartoon for today's @heraldscotland. 
Britain nears deal with EU in Irish border Brexit talks - The Times  
Dear @BBC you think the Irish borders a problem in the brexit negotiations ?Just wait till Scotland kicks off....not enough hours in the day to try beat us down !#StAndrewsDay 
.@ManfredWeber: Brexit means [the UK] leaving the European Union.  That means for us...we are defending from now on the 440 million EU citizens, and [not] British interests.  That is very clear and that has to be understood in London as well. 
Great forward planning on behalf of @_Britain4Europe Voices for Europe is very happy to support this initiative. #Brexit#FBPE#ThinkAgain 
The EPP's @ManfredWeber says in Brexit negotiations the Irish issue is of equal importance to money + citizens rights. No "sufficient progress" on one means no sufficient progress on all three [more follows] 
Almost 10% of builders working in Britain come from the EU - and Brexit is causing concern  
Slapdown by DefSec to comments made by EU #Brexit chief Negotiator Barnier yesterday. @GavinWilliamson says UK remains committed to European Security "and to suggest otherwise is a gross misrepresentation of great work" of UK armed forces 
No10's perfidious albion antics? No10 needs DUP votes, not a restored Stormont? Anti-GFA DUP campaigned for Brexit to alter NI status quo/halt Irish GFA 'equally legitimate/parity' rights, as manifested by all-island integration? SF know all this & won't be bounced by No10 or FG?  
A construction manager admits that controlling #migration from the #EU means #higherwages for . Mass #immigration is an attack on #British #workers. The sooner it comes to an end, the better! #BREXIT!   #BBC #SKY #NEWS #UK #EU 
Net immigration to the UK fell by more than 100,000 people in the first full year after the Brexit vote  
Dear Great Britain. @LizCarolan and I don't really care if you don't know exactly where the border is, but there are a few things you really should know about Ireland. #brexit #ireland #Border 
This is THE question. Where IS a leader? It doesn't matter what party they belong to, all we need from the gutless ragbag of politicians at Westminster, is for one decent, honest soul to stand up and lead the sheep..and shout STOP BREXIT very, very loudly! #StopBrexit @acgrayling 
Poignant for @FitzgeraldFrncs to have stepped down days before (today) the European Commission approved a €10m #Brexit support scheme for Irish #SME's that she successfully prevailed on @vestager 
#Brexit is now so serious, we’re getting interventions from the other realm.  
Theresa May’s extreme Brexit has alienated our European allies and now she has lost her last major friend on the world stage, leaving Britain isolated and alone. The solution is clear: an exit from Brexit and a divorce from Trump 
Dancing to the EU's tune? #Brexit supporters say May is selling the UK short over divorce bill  via @GuyReuters @AndyMacaskill 
MEPs Stunned !UK 'CASH COW' will STOP paying for #EU states after #Brexit"After UK contribution dries up surely this place should now START to look at really cutting back because you're not going to have the [UK] CASH COW anymore"So glad we're Leaving 
Amazing. We have sponsorship. We're doing a newsletter.PLAY THIS BRILLIANT BREXIT BUS GAME NOW!We finished it in 80 seconds - can you beat us?(thought up by ex-b3tan / usvsth3m chap @mattround - hashtag sponsored) 
The extremist rhetoric of #Brexit promoted by your party @BorisJohnson & the right wing press has given legitimacy & encouragement to the likes of Britain First. Talk of "The will of the people", 'saboteurs', silencing the Remoaners, is the stuff of fascism.#StopBrexit 
Unbelievable. Now May prepares to betray all the people who voted to BREXIT in N.Ireland.  
Kathy Sheridan: English politicians and media have recently not only exposed their contempt but also their ignorance about Ireland and our shared history.  #Brexit  
Theresa May has 3 choices: Reverse Brexit, resign or go down as one of the most disastrous PM’s in UK political history. 
Time to use our Brexit mandate and begin to implement a new immigration system that puts an end to mass migration of over 200,000 every year.  
Migration to UK plunges in year after Brexit vote, driven by EU citizens  
The old men in this would support going to war about the Brexit bill if someone pulled their strings.  
Would the government’s reported €50bn 'Divorce Bill' change your opinion on Brexit?That was the question we put to people in the town of Romford, Essex, where nearly 70 per cent voted for Brexit last year.  
Interesting (but not surprising) that your 5 Brexit priorities don't include: N Ireland; the peace process; security cooperation; EU/UK nationals. And good luck striking trade agreements with ANYONE, let alone EU, after flouncing out & refusing to meet our financial obligations  
If you read anything in coming days on Northern Ireland, GFA and Brexit, make it this thread and related material from @hayward_katy @DPhinnemore 
Checkpoints and customs... Have a look at how the Irish border looked decades ago.For more info, read our #Brexit special report -  
Could @NickTimothy possibly be more offensive and patronizing towards Ireland? Irish and UK diplomats working very hard on delivering solutions to Brexit probs. These ethnic-chauvinist attacks are just contemptible.  
The UK's position is so weak due to Brexit Theresa May can't withdraw the offer she made to Donald Trump of a state visit to the UK. 
On the left, what DexEU say about a data protection partnership with the EU. On the right, what Tory MEP & Brexit champion @DanielJHannan wrote about data protection & the EU. I do not trust Brexist UK to protect my data. 
No Deal ticks 4 of the 5 boxes of what we want from Brexit. We get control of our borders, laws & money. No special divorce bill & we can negotiate trade agreements around the world. It doesn't deliver a free trade agreement w/ the EU tho after Brexit they may decide it want one. 
Brexit fearmongers are wrong. Banks will come to the UK, not leave - EFT's David Paton  
Ride the Brexit Bus over the value of the British pound since the EU referendum. 
Free Public Lecture by Danny Dorling: Brexit - The result of rising inequality, not rising immigration. 1pm Tuesday Dec 5th 2017, Edward Herbert Building, University of Loughborough. To book:  
It's simply because @UKLabour support brexit @OwenJones84, even the thoughly bent YouGov polls show #remain is now comfortably ahead of leave, @bbclaurak @BBCNews won't report that though#FBPE #stop #ExitFromBrexit 
I attended the Urgent Question on the Brexit discussions yesterday. The Government made clear that they still believe No Deal is better than a bad deal. They confirmed to me that they continue to plan for a No Deal exit. They need to do this as No Deal is still a possible outcome 
The Conservative government’s majority is wafer thin. If the progressive parties did work together to give the public a say on the final deal, we could, even at this late hour, still stop Brexit. 
How David Cameron's astonishing diplomatic ineptitude started Britain on the path to Brexit. My latest.  
Nigel Lawson just told @PatKennyNT that the British are still aggrieved that Ireland stayed neutral during #WW2. An actual argument used during a debate on #Brexit  
Who will help care for my daughter with disabilities after Brexit?  This piece seems very pertinent today seeing the latest disastrous migration figures 
On #StAndrewsDay I would like to thank all those folks who have chosen to call #Scotland home. I am sorry that many of you face uncertainty due to #Brexit It makes me ashamed that we are still tied to the UK & powerless to protect your right to feel safe at home.  
.@sturdyAlex on Brexit: "I have to believe that the country I fell in love with still exists somewhere out there"   
Ian Paisley Jr., MP for North Tantrum #brexit #TodaySOR 
Avoiding civilized rules on tax was always part of the #Brexit agenda. New report from @GreensEP says it's time for EU to take back control from Brexiteers & force UK to clean up its act on dodgy tax practices.  
Brexiters, including the Cabinet are frothing over this remark by @MichelBarnier. It strikes me as entirely measured, reasonable & accurate. Britain has failed to show solidarity and Putin clearly regards #Brexit as weakening European security. #StopBrexit #BrexitBetraysBritain 
At last @BBCNews is beginning to wake up to the dire consequences - social, economic, cultural - of a hard border between Ireland & Northern Ireland - why @BBCNews did you not air these issues, as many of us asked you to - BEFORE the referendum @SebDance @Manuel_TSSA @RCorbettMEP 
You mean the Trump who called himself ‘Mr Brexit’? 
We now have a full year of migration statistics since the EU referendum. What's changed since the Brexit vote?  
MADNESS: 'There is no logic to May giving Brussels a bumper Brexit divorce bill', says ex-Greek Finance Minister Yanis Varoufakis.  
Brexit will give us back the countryside, says @Roger_Scruton 
Tomorrow @eucopresident Tusk meets Taoiseach @campaignforleo in Dublin at 16h to discuss #Brexit and how to avoid a hard border on the island of Ireland. Press point afterwards.Updated agenda:  
As soon as the public turns, the politicians will return to where they were before the referendum; pro-remain.  Lewis Carroll indeed.  
So Trump hits out at May....well there goes #Brexit Will be Fine Plan A...America First....America First...America First....HINT.Let's just STAY in the EU...life's simpler & better there...#StopBrexit 
WALES: Turnover soars at Welshpool-based Invertek Drives as sales more than double despite "uncertainty relating to Brexit". Further growth is expected in 2018 with the manufacturer set to open a new facility.  pic.twitter.com/ZwYkUye1Of 
“Is likely to be“?! Even I know people who have already left or decided not to move to the UK because of Brexit. And I’m 5000 miles away.  
I quite like Meghan Markle, not least because she's half black, half Jewish and opposed to Brexit. But I am curious about the process by which she is to acquire British citizenship before next May. I can't find this accelerated naturalisation process on the Home Office website. 
Net migration drops sharply after Brexit vote  
“Even #Conservative MPs don't seem to really want #Brexit “ 
BREAKING: Net migration for year ending June '17  is +230,000. Long term migration still high and this number again highlights the greater need for Britain to have a brand new immigration system, starting on Brexit day one. 
You really need to listen to this snippet of Ann Coulter on #r4today explaining how a brown person is always a migrant regardless of birth or nationality and only people called "Hans" are truly Dutch. "That's what Brexit was all about; it's what Trump was all about."  
Here are my thoughts on how the UK Government is handling #Brexit. This may surprise you!  
BREAKING: Net migration has fallen to 230,000 in the year ending June 2017 - the largest annual decrease recorded. Three quarters of the fall is down to changes in EU migration in the 12 months since the Brexit vote. 
Scottish politicians to ask European court of justice if UK can stop Brexit  
Catalonia's Justice Minister @CarlesMundo is being held in a Madrid jail for holding a referendum. Here is the letter he wrote last week, in English 
The Senate of the Spain "democracy" votes the opening of an investigation commision on Spanish police brutality during #Catalonia's independence referendum on #1oct. Results:☛NO=200☛YES=45☛ABS=1Still wondering why Catalonia wants to be OUT of this authoritarian state? 
JUST OUT: our new report argues that the fight against tax havens, tax evasion and tax avoidance must be at the centre of #Brexit negotiations. Read it here:  
One of the side-effects of Brexit is money from the European Investment Fund is frozen, hurting sectors like medical tech #gianthealthcareevent 
Brexit, which was supposed to free money for health care, will cost British taxpayers tens of billions  
Leavers like to pretend that #Brexit is patriotic. We know that it is not. This tag helps make that point quickly #BrexitBetraysBritain. So if patriotism matters to you then join the fight to #StopBrexit! 
It would be a monumental, historic mistake to trust Britain on its Brexit border promises. It murdered innocent Irish citizens and still refuses to release the files on their deaths. Whitehall has no conscience, dignity or integrity. Get a written guarantee or #UseTheVetoLeo 
Brexit divorce gives Northern Ireland to UK in week and EU at weekends  
'The aim is to spread division & discord – which is why Russian Twitter accounts kept tweeting about Brexit long after the result was in. It explains why accounts run from a Kremlin-linked operation tried to stir up anti-Islamic feeling during Westminster Bridge terror attack'  
Britain reportedly agreed to a Brexit divorce check of around $47 billion to $53 billion  
Given that UK has had to give in on every item in Brexit talks so far, likely next step is that Northern Ireland stays in EU customs union 
Cancel the shitshow that is Brexit while you're at it  
One misfortune of Brexit is that the UK Eurosceptic critique of EU will be lost.  A brake on the excesses of the institutions, the non-transparent law- and rule-making,  and "ever-closer union".  EU insiders did not like it, but it was a healthy check and balance. 
This Brexit Government now has a BUNKER mentality. They can't see the damaged they are doing, Fox swanning off to Australia at public expense for what ? We have the best trading partner on our doorstep. 
UK failed to show solidarity with a Europe reeling from terror attacks when it voted for Brexit, Michel Barnier suggests. Do you agree?  
Trying not to crash Brexit is now a computer game...   
.@theresa_may is all mouth about President Trump, but silent to the EU, which is why UK taxpayer's are to pay up £50bn+ for #Brexit. Two faced hypocrite. #BBCNews #BBCNewsChannel #SkyNews #VictoriaLive 
"COLLECTIVE CABINET IRRESPONSIBILITY" #Brexit Facts4EU looks at the collective insanity inflicting the upper echelons of govt. Read:  Sanity seems confined to the backbenches. 
The WTO option could yet be better value than a costly negotiated Brexit, says @JLongworthLML 
Truth is Brexit has put the UK in a super-weak position. Trump knows this. Which is why he can say what he wants and screw us economically. 
The sad reality of self-destruction-by-Brexit  
The Republic of Ireland should see the Brexit negotiations as an opportunity not a threat  Read my article in @BrexitCentral 
Oliver Cromwell wiped out 41% of the Irish population, but he was voted in the top 10 ‘Greatest Britons’ in a BBC poll. Thus, the British perceptions of Ireland being exposed by Brexit shouldn’t really be a surprise.  
WATCH: As the price & complexity of Brexit becomes clear with the £50bn divorce bill, people are right to keep an open mind. Please RT:  
Loose translation of PM's message: "If you don't want a hard border, share power at Stormont and we'll devolve power to align regulations." It's called killing two birds with one stone. #Brexit 
Scots launch legal moves over feasibility of stopping Brexit  
Ministers @simoncoveney and @HMcEntee hosting #Brexit Stakeholders Forum in @dfatirl this morning. 
Brexit: it’s like moving out of a lovely house to another house, and the total preparation has been picking the moving date. We’ve not even see the neighbourhood, never mind the house. Oh and the house has been picked by someone who hates everything about the current place.  
If we untether our economy from the Single Market it is placed into this man’s hands. It’s why he wants Brexit and a key reason I do not  
Brexiteers furious as Britain set to pay EU £2.59BILLION-a-year for decades after Brexit.  
Don’t know whether to laugh or cry.  But the brexit we voted for looks NOTHING LIKE the brexit we’re getting.  
Because #NIrl has a member state at the table paying attention to it & costs & consequences of #Brexit- Scotland is represented by #HMG 
Ann Coulter on the wireless. She pronounces ‘Brexit’ with three syllables. 
Trump’s lies, Farage's lies, Johnson's lies, Gove's lies, Tory lies, UKIP lies, in fact everyone's lies are not the problem. It’s the millions who swallow them who really matter.  
Confused by net numbers for Brexit bill? Is it €40bn or €50-60bn? This brilliant graphic explains the UK-EU gap. Great work from @digitalcampbell and @theboysmithy  
Trump recognises realpolitik: Brexit has made us a silly, diminished little nation and he can tell us to piss off whenever he feels like it - and God only knows how rude he must be to Mrs May in private. 
Your fortnightly reminder that @PrivateEyeNews is pretty good at what it does. Cutting key Brexit departmental budgets to make a success of Brexit? Erm...  
‘Brexit is the FAULT of Brussels!’ German MEP LASHES EU with epic tirade at Eurocrats   
Don’t be fooled into thinking that the UK banking sector is safe in the face of Brexit  
Exclusive: EU Parliament vows to keep Britain following old&new EU rules after #Brexit acc to draft on transition. Exact opposite of Boris Johnson‘s red lines @welt 
Around £45 billion would appear to be the price Johnson and Gove et al are willing to pay for a deluded vision of an imperial Britain post-Brexit. 
Chuka Umunna accepted a donation from Center for American Progress funded by George Soros and his Open Society for Accommodation and flights in May 2016 to Washington for gathering of American policy makers on business, foreign policy and EU referendum.  
'The UK is being savaged': readers on the Brexit divorce bill  If you think the bill expensive, we've barely scratched the surface, ching-ching. There's no buying a better deal than the 1 we have already. #stopbrexit 
#bbcqt Chuka the bottler Umunna on again ! On everywhere TV Radio trying to stop Brexit. One FLASH Labour MP. Anyone listening to the dweeb.  
Today, I am avoiding twittering about Trump, Brexit and Politics in general.Just good causes and good news for 24hrs.#GoodTwitter 
Brexit should be propelling us forwards, but EU appeasers in government insist on anchoring us to backwards Brussels for decades, paying premium prices for pointless EU projects. When will the betrayal and the madness end?  
Astonishing that this passes for credible analysis of the Brexit border challenge - and on BBC too. (The funny thing is that he's so chuffed with himself at the end.)  
We could supply you with some nice ‘Manchester for Europe’ or ‘Bollox to Brexit’ stickers @EUflagmafia would love to decorate it  
This from @MichelBarnier strikes wrong note. UK and France are the only serious military powers in Europe: I can see no advantage to #EU security in minimising UK’s ability to contribute post- #Brexit. Competition makes some sense in trade relationship, none in security field.  
Britain could do with some progressive, evidence led, inclusive politics inspired by enlightenment values with competent politicians who put the national interest above dogmatic beliefs. If that was mainstream #Brexit would never have taken hold. 
UK is paying tens of billions of pounds in #Brexit to get a worse trade deal than the one they already have. And some English people still think us Paddies are thick. #IronyIsDead 
I’m so glad we can rely on the #SpecialRelationship to bolster us post-Brexit.But perhaps we shouldn’t extended a State visit to a serial-sex pest, an unabashed liar & a xenophobe?Perhaps we shouldn’t align with a sponsor of racist hate groups & “some good people” Nazis?  
BIAFRA: INDEPENDENCE REFERENDUM WILL MAKE A STRONGER CASE FOR BIAFRA  
Trump’s racist America or Brexit’s hateful Britain.  I wish we only had ONE of these dumpster fires to deal with, so I could bring my multi-racial family home to a country I felt loved & protected. 
Whatever I thought of #Brexit, at least the UK had a plan B in the US; a compatible market big enough and close enough to alleviate some of the economic pain and act as strategic protector. Then Trump happened. If you don't consider that a game-changer, you're as nuts as he is. 
New @realDonaldTrump insult to @theresa_may. She must end humiliating dependence of #Brexit Britain on goodwill of evil racist. Cancel visit 
The man the #Brexit fanatics rely on to give Britain a good trade deal. Leaving the European family of nations to be in the clutches of this vile man is beyond reckless.  
No surprise there: post-Brexit UK will be in same situation as other non-EU European members of NATO such as Norway, Montenegro or Turkey  
Britain will be kicked out of EU police against Europol against its will after Brexit, EU confirms  
This is the trading partner the Brexiters want us to rely on after #Brexit. Strewth   
So Brexit means Bankers. It's almost like it wasn't about ordinary people after all.  
Weeks ago David Davis called the idea of a £50bn Brexit divorce bill nonsense... turns out he meant it was to be much more. #BrexitShambles #r4today 
Brexit: UK offer on financial settlement ("divorce bill") will *not* be conditional on a trade deal. What happens when the penny drops?  
WeakFeableMaggie could have been talking about the supine surrender of the Tory Gov over #BrexitIf Mrs T had been in charge we would have been OUT by now & the EU would be paying us annually for a free trade dealWhat we need now is some of Maggie's backbone & straight talking  
Brexit has been costing the UK economy £300m every week since the Leave vote  
In 10 years time, when my daughter will ask me what I've done during brexit, I will be telling her proudly that I've tried to fight it. I'm doing as much as I can, which might not be a lot, but I'm on the right side of history. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
May has pledged to put a million disabled people to work. Must be really panicking about who will gather in the crops post #Brexit 
#Brexit Task Force in the Commission has done forensic work on the issues concerning Ireland supported by the #Irish system. UK has under-estimated this. 
There aren't many commentators in the City of London who are enthusiastically pro #Brexit, but trust #BBCR4Today to find one: #DavidBuik. He thinks the plummeting pound is a good thing for City jobs, but at the same time blames the exchange rate on Remoaners! 
Remind yourself every day that the dolt, like Brexit, is not a bad thing to befall good people, but rather the inevitable end product of a dumbed-down, anti-intellectual, spiteful, covetous, neglectful culture.  
Dear Middle Classes,It’s probable the American stock market is headed for a crash, along with the British economic system due to Brexit. This will directly affect the value of everything you own and the contagion will directly impact everyone except the top 1%.Use your voice. 
Biggest divorce settlement ever: U.K. will pay billions for Brexit  pic.twitter.com/ckdOjhanye 
One hour bus journey. Man behind me talking loudly for entire trip. Topics covered so far include: Brexit, Israel Palestine, Myanmar crisis and African economies. His neighbour has said maybe 3 words.  
Just when you think maybe @theresa_may might have an ounce of common sense in the best interests of UK & Brexit, no, she picks a public fight, to stand up for Muzzies of course, with Trump. Stupid bitch. 
U.K. and EU work against the clock to find a compromise on the Irish border as Brexit deadline nears  
.@theresa_may those videos don’t lie. Listen sister u have issues in the UK...how’s that #Brexit enactment going that your British citizens passed or ru 2 busy taking tea w/Merkle?  
The UK remains top for tech startups after Brexit  
As a long-time pro-Brexit advocate, Donald could have a diplomatic leverage to make a strong trade agreement with post-Brexit Britain. Instead he started a totally unnecessary war with a special ally.  
We’ve got a great idea for something kind @NicolaSturgeon could do for the whole country.Deliver us from #BrexitDeclare #ScotRefHappy St. Andrews Day folks 
Sorry David on this you are wrong. Barnier is right to shine a light on how Brexit is a step backwards for the EU’s fight against terror. It’s his job and his duty to do so regardless of how upset this might make those responsible. 
I've been trying to put my thoughts and feelings about life in post-Brexit Britain down on paper for a while, but I'm not as good with words as this fellow immigrant. Anyway, this is probably more or less what I would have said...  
“Right to be upset”? Barnier is merely restating the truth. The Brexit vote was welcomed in jihadist media. The EU is right to be upset at this self-indulgent destructive distraction from the serious business of Europe’s security.  
Mike Smyth: NDP and Greens stack the deck in referendum vote  
Fascinating precinct map of NYC on a referendum that would empower judges to strip pensions of public officials/workers convicted of corruption.  Measure failed/weak in Hispanic/Black areas, weak with Staten Island whites.  Very popular in upper-income Manhattan.  
The UK government may not like it but it is an established fact that ISIS welcomed the Brexit vote. If ISIS themselves think Brexit weakens their enemies, don’t criticise Barnier for pointing it out.  
Here are some examples of @FXdestination's tweets using the #Brexit hashtag - note the other themes included: globalist conspiracies, George Soros, anti-muslim sentiments, white people being endangered by immigrants, and voter fraud.  
Redacted version reads: ‘Honda UK will be fine with Hard Brexit’  
Brexit Explained  
.@MikeSmythNews refers to the @BCGreens & @bcndp electoral reform referendum as a "Joke" & "the political version of a Three Card Monte game". They are stacking the deck to change our democracy in their favour." 
Respected reporters see the wrong here. Too bad the #BCNDP #Greens don’t. #bcpoli “Oh, I get it. But a referendum where 25 per cent of the people can change that entire democratic system for 100% of the population is just fine. What a joke.”    
Have you noticed they can't defend Brexit without lying?  
Jim Allister and people of his ilk, are exactly why our children earn their degrees and run as fast as they can to other countries to find peace and success, damning the North from ever finding its own path. #Stormont #Brexit #NolanLIVE #BenefitsState 
How will Christmas dinner be different after #Brexit?No Brussels!This is my Christmas cracker joke for 2017. I will bore everyone I meet with it over the festive period. Ho-Ho-Ho!  
Britiain's concession on Brexit payment isn't its first capitulation and probably won't be its last  
Brexit: Britain to dismantle border controls - the consequence of no border controls on the Northern Irish border ... . 
Cheer up. Brexit *hasn’t actually happened* yet. Many good things to come   
Michel Barnier raises UK hackles with speech about Isis and Brexit  
What rural folk need now ain't Trump or Brexit or protectionist agricultural policies. What they need is a REM KOOLHAAS INTERVENTION. 
The bigger picture for UK diplomacy: A successful Brexit is dependent on a special relationship with the US. That's no longer guaranteed.  
Tight-lipped May fails to halt speculation over 50-bln-euro #Brexit deal  
Also focus on delivering Brexit without betraying the British people who voted for it.Your outrage over Trump's retweets can wait.  
Owen now says Brexit is the "will of the people." If Corbyn changed his mind tomorrow would Owen still insist it's the will of the people? what do you think?  
That post-Brexit deal with the US is going to be   
first we had donald trump being elected for president, then brexit and now red flavor not winning song of the year award. oh let’s all pray for the world  
Best be leaving now. #Brexit 
My 10 predictions for the Brexit talks - in a @CER_EU insight. I expect a deal on an FTA but it won't be great for the UK. 
What happened to Brexit @theresa_may? The people demanded a change and you have done nothing! 
Welp. That’s Brexit Plan B fucked. 
On the bright side, England is already going down because of Brexit so alienating it as an ally is less costly than before.  
On Monday, as part of the St Andrews-tide visit to London, it was good to include a visit to 10 Downing Street and to spend over an hour with the Prime Minister. Important and challenging conversations about human trafficking, food-banks, universal credit, Brexit and the Rohingya  
what amazes me about @OwenJones84 article isn't that he doesn't agree with me, I never expected him to, it's that as a respected political commentator asking that question, he doesn't even touch on Labour's Brexit strategy. 
The EU is fatally divided over Brexit – and that is our greatest opportunity    via @telegraphnews 
I think if there's one thing the past two years of politics has taught me it is this: a reckoning is coming: when fantasy meets reality. Brexit and Trump have brought about a fictitious unreality that will eventually collide with harsh realities. 1/ 
The truth about Brexit's affect on the UK economy  
Scotland remembers NickHe was the guy that broke the Civil Service Code By interfering in the first Scottish Independence ReferendumHistory shall record his mendacity  
These would be the increases in your supermarket shopping following a no deal Brexit  
Brexit Explained  
My colleague @RoryPalmer has set up a petition to keep Britain in #Erasmus even if we #Brexit:   
Brexit Explained  
*the last line is a bad translation that makes the sentence much harder and accusing than the said words in French. He is not saying that  is letting Europe down again but that at that point in time  chose to be inward looking (Brexit). And he finds that a pity. 
On @Channel4News. £50bn net #Brexit divorce payment. Why? Stay in #EU, save the money and spend it on #NHS 
.@theresa_may and @Conservatives still playing dumb? How long can you carry on with the lie that Brexit must go ahead? Find the balls to admit Brexit means failure and poverty and put the country back on track by halting Brexit.Honesty will be appreciated, rewarded eventually.  
£50bn to leave the EU. What an unforgivable waste of money.This bill will stand as a “whopping great symbol” of the false prospectus on which Brexit was sold. #StopBrexit. 
Odd Brexit Facts: 1. English areas that voted Leave do *NOT* have the greatest concentrations of non-UK born people. The largest contingent live in London which voted Remain. 2. Successive UK governments see free movement as a problem; Scotland sees it as an opportunity. 
Brussels: Brexit bill doesn’t ‘buy’ a trade deal.Whats the Point keep throwing money at EU! Time to walk away Now!  
In absentia, the elusive Brexit impact assessments confirm that Brexit is a crock of toxic shit across all sectors. That doesn't mean you are off the hook though Mr Davis @DavidDavisMP, you are still required to release them in full you   of  
I have now read it twice in French. To me it carries more sadness and regret about brexit than anything else.Language is very diplomatic and reflects what I think is the consensus in the EU.  
The Guardian front page, Thursday 30.11.17: Tory MPs warn of revolt over final Brexit bill 
This poll now looks pretty conclusive and the question was completely open and non-biased. The tide has turned, given the reality of Brexit. Let’s push for a vote on #FinalSay and, if you feel strongly, come to Parliament on 11/12 to show how you feel. 
Piers Morgan blows up as Nigel Farage drops chilling warning over Brexit divorce bill   
Betrayed by feeble and weak remoan Tory politicians....this is not BREXIT that the 17.4 voted for, this is like trying to cancel that gym membership that you’ve decided to stop - yeah sure but you still have to pay  
Thank you for coming out and saying what needed to be said.It’s very sad though that Britain First & their kind lay the groundworks for Brexit and utterly bizarre that the @Conservatives are carrying it on by pushing through Brexit which was “won” on exactly this kind of hate! 
Tories accuse government of 'betraying' British people with reports of a £49 billion 'Brexit divorce bill', @romillyweeks reports 
3 billion pounds being spent on Brexit+40 billion pound divorce bill could have both been avoided by Brexit being voted down!  
Nick Watt on #newsnight says UK gov will use carrot and stick w/Ireland. Stick is Dublin isn’t standing up for unionists because it’s anti-#brexit. Hmmm that’ll go down well.... 
Brexit has been costing the UK economy £300m every week since the Leave vote  
Tomorrow on @ThePledge I will be debating the so called 'divorce bill' from the #EU #Brexit 
If Brexit was to go ahead, how many of the Quitteratti do you think will stand down before the next election? They won't want to pick up and carry the shit. They will have got what they wanted and will fuck off somewhere else. 
Excl: Britain will keep paying at least £2.6bn a year to the EU for decades after Brexit, it emerges; 
The disgusting far-right group Trump retweeted is – you may want to sit down for this – Pro Putin. They deleted a slew of Pro-Putin posts from its website including a video: "Putin backs our Brexit"HT @TheRynheart #Maddow 
EU rule capping bankers' bonuses 'could be scrapped after Brexit'  
I hope you realise that probably the majority of UK citizens do not want Brexit.  We have been let down by our two main political parties. We are in the hands of racists & greedy, deceitful politicians. 
Please respond and RT for larger sample:- "Should the angry, poor and disillusioned of Britain take part in a national strike and national protest against this failing Conservative government, its policies and Brexit?" 
Thursday's Guardian: "Tory MPs warn of revolt over final Brexit bill" #tomorrowspaperstoday #BBCpapers (via @BBCHelenaLee) 
If you were a 'soft Tory' voter who might have fallen for the '2nd referendum' nonsense please have a look at their performance in Parliament. It is absolutely shocking. 
Chopper's Brexit Podcast is out tomorrow morning, a day earlier than normal. We are 30 editions old and to mark the occasion I had a beer wish Mr Brexit himself @Nigel_Farage @brexitbroadcast 
Pure comic gold - "What Britain looks like after Brexit" by Daniel Hannan, June 2016 (archive version as he's deleted the original).  Larf, I nearly ... 
First the Remainers said we couldn't leave the restaurant without paying our share of the bill, now we've offered to pay our fair share they codemn the cost #MakeUpYourMinds #Brexit 
Today in Spain, some representatives have tried to create a commission to investigate the violence on October the 1st, during the Catalan referendum. The outcome has been the following:  
i really don't understand the fuss or even the surprise. This is how many in Europe view Brexit. Cameron decided to blackmail the EU (give me these concessions or I'll back Leave) and then it went terribly wrong. For the Brits, that is.  
Revealed: the five Brexit “commitments” Ireland is demanding from the UK before sufficient progress is granted. May has a week to deliver.  
‘Outrageous Slur’: EU Boss Accused of Insulting Military by Saying UK Ducks Terror Fight with Brexit Vote   
Please note:The £57bn Brexit bill we've finally agreed to settle does NOT include to £20bn that May agreed to pay for a (possible) transition.Have fun telling it to the Brexiteers!#StopBrexit 
What’s the problem with us recognising that Brexit is a problem and starting again with a view to improve what we’ve already got, rather than throwing it all away?  
Pay for FISH! EU to demand ‘fish for airlines’ trade deal in Brexit row! Stop wasting time, just walk away No Deal!  
Ireland Brexit deal in sight - draft versions of text being circulated  
Liberal Democrat leader @vincecable and Conservative MP @KwasiKwarteng, who’s parliamentary private secretary to the Chancellor, discuss Brexit 
I'd assume this was a joke but I've seen previous tweets...Wars are not "opportunities". They are painful, destructive, costly and take a long time to recover from. People really suffer. I suspect it's a better analogy for Brexit than intended.  
It seems despite his origins @DanielHannan is conveniently ignorant of the history of Latin American countries dominated and ruined by corrupt cliques of the grotesquely rich.#StopBrexit #Brexit #BrexitBetraysBritain  
Or it could be because Labour is also supporting a Hard Brexit... just saying   
UK free to scrap excessive EU red tape after Brexit, says Carney 
The EU is fatally divided over Brexit – and that is our greatest opportunity 
There's a new slogan for Brexit  
."Former NI police chief has warned the Govt’s bungling of the controversy over Irish border after Brexit will “play into the hands” of terrorists.". 
Hurrah for Brexit!Hurrah for bankers earning more, while jeopardising our economy!Hurrah for multinationals paying less tax!Hurrah for turning UK into a tax haven!Hurrah for austerity on steroids!Hurrah for..... Oh, bollocks.  
Question: Why doesn't #Labour have a massive polling lead? Answer: Because of their shameful enabling of #Brexit. 
"So Arlene Foster parrots the British government position about the big bad Irish government interfering. Play to the gallery, the thickos, the bigots." #Brexit #premium 
Yes, it was an open & tolerant country, then you & your pals started a dirty divisive #Brexit campaign & put us all in the sewer. 
Diane Abbott has been challenged to explain her position on Brexit after another day of confusion in the Labour camp over the party’s policy on giving the people a say on the final deal. 
Scottish politicians to ask European court of justice if UK can stop Brexit  
So why did you work with hate preachers like Farage on brexit? #liar 
More skyscrapers are being built in Frankfurt to accommodate Brexit bankers  pic.twitter.com/A4qbdtNgXV 
Tory MP said: “Supporting Brexit will destroy UK. Opposing Brexit will destroy Tories.”Time the Tories put our country…BEFORE THEMSELVES 
Did have, Boris, did have.  Then UKIP and their fellow travelers gave us Brexit, and we became the pariah of Europe. You moved the Overton Window to the Right and let in the likes of Britain First. 
So...How is it a surprise Britain will be leaving Europol then?I ask because it was bastard-well obvious. (Brexit means Brexit, don’t you know.) 
Dave Brown on the Brexit agreement – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Jo Cox MP was murdered by a far right fanatic shouting "Britain First".The French honour her: name a street after her. The US president retweets racist hatred from Britain First. Are you sure Brexit is a good idea?Because the world is changing, for the worse, very fast.  
Brexiters, Your heroes are in hiding. They’re not owning this Brexit debacle. All the things they told you about ‘taking back control’ were just a smokescreen for their own nefarious plans to screw you, and us, over. Get angry. But not at us, them. 
In years to come, people will ask Labour voters how we got into this mess and they'll say it was a Tory Govt. But they'll reply 'your party supported Brexit. To the hilt.' 
Brexit must not mean an end to research collaboration with Europe, @wellcometrust 's @EdWhiting1 on our joint Future Partnerships Project #TogetherScienceCan  
I got a ticking off from an English woman today for no good fucking reason, but I kept my cal and held my tongue because there were a lot of children around. Still, I'm going to take great pleasure out of watching Brexit turn her entire country into a fucking ashpile for decades. 
#Brexit will cause █████, ███████ and a lot of ██████.  To mitigate this, the plan is to █████ ███████, ███████ by means of █████ ███, and to prevent the ████ from ██████ ███.  This is the will of ████ ███████. 
Vince, what on earth has happened to Parliament? Brexit is a serious political misjudgment, it’s brought into disrepute most aspects of our democratic processes, and undermines our future stability and global reputation.  
FT View: Brexit is not actually a negotiation; it is a process of minimising harm.  
Brexiters, Surely you must see by now that Brexit isn’t going to deliver the unicorns you were promised?We’ve all been there. There’s no shame in admitting that you ordered a dream, but got served a nightmare.  
Barnier Weaponises ISIS to Bash Brexit  
See @Channel4News in Clarke’s Bar in Drogheda City tonight chatting about #brexit. Pity they relied on the cliché of trad music. I have never in 25 years heard trad music played in Clarke’s.   Not to mention the cliché of interviewing Irish folk in a pub. expect better from C4  
Diane Abbott writes she would push for second referendum on Brexit deal. Too late to deny her true intent @telegraph 
David Davis boasted of his Brexit impact analysis papers. Now he wishes they didn’t exist  
Peston's comment & those of others reflects the incredible egocentricity and selfishness of how Brexit has been approached here "they need us more than we need them"; "we pay them more" etc etc.  This is not solidarity, which is supposed to be a core principle of EU membership. 
Another Brexit legal challenge, led by @JolyonMaugham and friends.I'm supporting. via @CrowdJustice 
I was a proud supporter of Brexit, and campaigned for it. I have no regrets for voting for Brexit and would do so again. 
I can not understand for the life of me why Remainiacs find this fact so difficult to understand!#Brexit #WeAreLeaving 
It's "astonishing" that Britain accepted the structure of Brexit talks, @yanisvaroufakis says  
This whole #Brexit thing is just totally insane. Somebody please tell me it’s only a nightmare.#StopTheMadness 
Would the government’s reported €50bn 'Divorce Bill' change your opinion on Brexit?That was the question we put to people in the town of Romford, Essex, where nearly 70 per cent voted for Brexit last year.  
I have been hoping our alleged opposition would condemn Brexit Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn. It is abhorrent, dangerous and a clear and present threat to our society. #revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit for the many, not the few who for some bizarre reason still want Brexit.  
EU Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier says the UK voted to leave the European Union six months after a French "appeal for solidarity... against the terror of Daesh". 
Let's get out of this stupidity of Brexit. The UKG has zero credibility anywhere in the world. They make the idiot Trump seem sensible. Scotland is far too good for this Union. Time to split, go our own way, cheerio, sayonara, aide, adios.#ScotRef 2018.  
Disgraceful comments when ~1500 UK Services personnel are in Syria & Iraq & the RAF has contributed significantly to ISIS' degradation, apart from his patronising & ignorant comments on Brexit.Though no more than we've come to expect from this puffed-up Eurocrat panjandrum  
1. Can't argue with this logic. In which case the government should come clean, and unite the country in a sensible consultation and debate about the problem of brexit.  
Can there be a better reason?#Brexit Secrets!  
.@conormurphysf “You won’t see the cost of Brexit written up on a bus going round London.”  
Brexit will be fantastic for the bosses.But, in the time-honoured phrase, what about the workers?  
A very good read from @andrew_lilico on the Brexit divorce deal *so far*...  
Tory MP Kwasi Kwarteng says that people who voted for Leave knew it would be a difficult process...ooo brexit revisionism already...Liam Fox etc told us it would be a walk in the park #c4news 
I'm at Ards and North Down Borough Council, a DUP Cllr has just described Brexit as 'the best opportunity since the Second World War' 
Appalled that Matt Frei, of Channel 4 News, would fall for the caricature of the "drinking Irish" by conducting an interview with three people in a diddly-i pub in Drogheda about their fears about a "hard border" after Brexit. Really Matt, I expected more of you. 
‘Failing UK politicians use Russian ‘Brexit meddling’ to distract people from terribly run things’  
If it's £50bn, that's 2.7 years worth of £350m a week  to the NHS #brexit 
Oh look UKIP dude on to tell us how great Brexit is going to be... yeah for the super rich pal not the average punter out there  
Remainers living in marginals where Labour are 2nd must tell @uklabour no votes unless back Remain. @jeremycorbyn needs to learn brexit is an election loser. He needs those seats make him pay for them properly by #stopbrexit 
A report & photos from our Day of Action in #Leeds last Saturday are now available to view on our website, along with lots more new content! #Brexit  
Conservatives have gone from "go whistle" to 20B to 50B. Never was there a mention of this during the referendum campaign. Are leave voters feeling just a little bit betrayed yet? 
#GuardianLive @thatginamiller “free and open vote is the only way U.K. can go forward.” “Brexit could be an attack on our democracy” 
First thing the British public needs told about Brexit & a hard border is that the ‘Southern Irish’ don’t want it & the ‘Northern Irish’ also don’t want it. And they won’t accept it even if troops are sent in to impose it. This needs to be explained to every British citizen. 
It's your chance to take control of the Brexit bus. Can you avoid making as much of a mess as David Davis?  
Why are #stopbrexit folk still backing @UKLabour ? I don't get it.@jeremycorbyn is as anti EU as you can get, Starmer who was pro EU has today ruled out a further referendum (see my tweet below.)Genuine question. Shouldn't stop #brexit folk be a libdem now?   
In a scrum today, Education Minister David Eggen said a referendum on one publicly funded school system in Alberta is “not going to happen.” #abed #ableg 
As with Johnson remaining in office & Davis still being in charge of negotiations he clearly doesn't understand, Theresa May is prevented from responding properly to Donald Trump's racist incitement by Brexit induced weakness.It's not just her weakness, though, it's all of ours. 
@mrjamesob Was told today by my sources who actually work in the whisky industry that shifts are being cut on production to stop a potential whisky lake once Brexit hits, so it's already hurting pockets of ordinary folk. 
Indeed & Brexit is the tool not just to separate us from the EU, but to divide & weaken us, enabling replacement of liberal democracy with a trans-Atlantic veiled plutocracy, where we still get to vote, but only right wing candidates can win.  
What else could the '£50bn' Brexit bill pay for?  
Face it: Brexit means choosing – not having our cake and eating it | Jonathan Lis  
Theresa May slaps down Michel Barnier after he accused Britain of walking away from fight against Islamic State because of Brexit  
After 12 yrs of Gujarat Rule + 3yrs of Modi Govt in centre : Modi still seeks votes based on Drama and Blaming CongAfter only 49 days of Delhi Govt: @ArvindKejriwal resigned and asked for votes as a referendum of his 49day Govt.#AAPGovernanceVsModiJumla 
'Morgan Stanley warns Corbyn is more economically dangerous than hard Brexit – despite helping cause the recession themselves' | @mattzarb 
Well, Westminster might not want to allow you to see any of its analyses of the impacts of Brexit...but Brussels has undertaken the same work and here is its report on the impact on Scotland.  
Guys. This is important. Follow @UKremainEU This guy is a true brexit warrior  
EU insist on “written commitments” on frictionless Irish border in Brexit deal.  
Today’s ouch - former Treasury boss on Brexit negotiation  
British government furious after Barnier implies Brexit Britain ducking ISIS fight  
Trump is in line with what appears to be coordinated transatlantic right-wing press & far-right  social-media attempt to whip up anti-Muslim fear & hate as a means of creating a frightened population likely to favour authoritarian nationalist politics.#StopBrexit #Brexit /1 
UK-Middle East trade@Digbylj says @theresa_may visit to #MiddleEast shows value of what #Brexit vote allows UK to do as trading nation  
Wow. Article 50 being challenged? #Article50 #Brexit  
26 MEPs from several European parties request freedom for Catalan political prisoners, to rollback article 155 intervention, UE mediation and an agreed referendum. Thanks Platform for Dialogue between EU and Catalonia!  
Some whinge that #bollockstobrexit stickers are offensive. Well, not the teeniest bit offensive compared with Brexit itself and this increasingly contemptuous, mendacious kleptocratic govt. #StopBrexitNow 
For some reason lots of people are sharing this David Davis interview from a few months back   #Brexit #DavidDavis #EU 
Press release confirms it: 4 Scots politicians & top legal team seeking European ruling, via Edinburgh, on whether Brexit can be revoked. Crowdfunding legal cost:  
The UK is reportedly set to pay a £50 billion Brexit bill. But what else could that sum pay for?  
We're going to court to clarify that the UK Government has the power to unilaterally halt #Brexit by revoking Article.50.  
Emily Thornberry: "What does it say about the government's priorities that last weeks budget could only find £350 million to cope with the NHS winter crisis. But was able to find 11 times that amount to spend on a NO-Deal Brexit."#PMQs @EmilyThornberry 
Trump retweets the propaganda of a fascist gang who inspired the terrorist murder of an MP. Theresa May holds Trump's hand and wants a hard #Brexit which will give Trump vastly greater influence over Britain.#BrexitBetraysBritain #StopBrexit 
I think @montie's call for "no deal" is the most absurd Brexit take I've read for a while. One of his plans for his great "no deal" is to *deregulate the pharmaceutical industry*. Just think, for 15 seconds, about what that actually means. 
.@Open_Britain What kind of negotiating stance is it, where the UK agrees to pay billions of pounds to the EU so we can negotiate a worse deal than the one we have now? The Brexiteers didn’t tell the Voters that during the referendum.  
WATCH: @ChrisLeslieMP on @bbc5live on why a £50bn divorce bill gives us every reason to keep an open mind on Brexit. Please RT:  
European Court ruling 'shows Brexit will be a disaster for workers' rights'  
The Tories are staggering the Brexit settlement payments for decades into the future, sneakily ensuring that the majority of the Brexit bill is loaded onto the shoulders of those who didn't even want Brexit. 
Twitter twit Donald Trump’s racist bile, the Brexit bill and why Emily Thornberry won #PMQs in our lively latest #ayestotheleft podcast 
It’s important to read this. @thatginamiller is right. Brexit is a  matryoshka - and what’s inside is pretty hideous  
Govt. misleading public, presenting large Brexit bill as legal necessity - 'meeting the obligations we've built up, no more or less than that.' Yet they also say it is conditional on us getting a good deal. It cannot be both. 
Brexit turning out okay for some of the metropolitan liberal elite  
Fresh legal challenge on Brexit, to be taken to the Scottish courts.  
Theresa May denies deal has been struck on £50bn Brexit bill  
This speech by Barnier, the EU’s lead Brexit negotiator, shows a deep misunderstanding, arguably, of the economics and emotions that led to Brexit. And his sotto voce accusation of perfidy and betrayal cannot help the talks  
Diane Abbott breaks with Labour policy & backs a second EU referendum  
MUST-WATCH: As the price & complexity of Brexit becomes clear with the £50bn divorce bill, people are right to keep an open mind. Please RT:  
The bit that really bloody sticks is that for the last 7 years we’ve seen schools suffer, libraries close, community centres disappear, councils cut any investment in anything and yet so far 10bn for DUP, 50bn for Brexit and that’s just the start .... I thought we were broke? 
FT editorial tonight: Boris Johnson promised EU could go whistle; Pascal Lamy was more on the money: Brexit is not a negotiation; it is a process of minimising harm  
Rich posh versions of Britain First, in yellow trousers, fraudulently drove the Brexit vote - with narratives of hate and division. Just a reminder, Brexit CAN be stopped  
They were also campaigning for Brexit.  
Dear @MichelBarnier When negotiating with our crazed Tory government, please always remember that the vast majority of decent Brits want nothing to do with #Brexit.It’s a coup. And ugly. Very ugly. 
Barnier is a shocking disgrace. The EU has brought upon itself much of the terror onslaught. Britain is & post Brexit will continue to be the most important state in countering terror in Europe.  
Trade Union leader@Manuel_TSSA gives a passionate speech to @EuroLabour arguing that Best #brexit deal is to #Remain rather than acquiescence in the chaotic Tory #BrexitShambles . 
The government should scrap #HS2 to cover the cost of the Brexit Bill and any further contributions to Brussels  
First glimpse of redacted Brexit impact studies revealed.  
PAYB Pay As You Brexit, a sound plan for all Brexiters to fund their beloved Brexit out of their own taxes. I like it!#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
i blame brexit  
Just back from Brussels meetings - not a question of Ireland using its veto; rather Irish ‘issue’ is an EU Priority.  If progress to Phase 2 doesn’t happen in December, won’t be because of Ireland. Was struck by strength of unity and support for IE #brexit @drivetimerte 
And yet you continue to support Brexit, Jeremy, even though it's the brainchild of exactly those types of racists, nationalists and xenophobes who support Trump  
Another Brexit bill - HM Revenue and Customs will need an extra £200m a year.   
Brexit has been costing the UK economy £300m every week since the Leave vote  
Rattled? @ScotTories cannot deliver details of the impact of Brexit on our country so as deflection they come up with idea of slating Scotgov who ARE delivering where UKgov fails. You are HIGHLIGHTING UKgov FAILURES yet again  
.@Nigel_Farage issues a stern warning to the government over the £50bn #Brexit divorce bill saying they are 'selling out' -  
Hands up if you'd rather the NHS got the £50 billion the Tories are spending on the Brexit settlement.So much for Brexit = £350 million a week for the NHS. 
So Tories think we can afford £50 billion for a Brexit settlement.This is the same party that cut support for disabled people by at least £28.3 billion because they said we cannot afford it 
I don't need to make the arguments for Brexit anymore. That argument was won in June 2016. 
Why no European city will knock the City of London off the top spot.  *Latest column* on finance & Brexit for @CapX 
He’s right, we didn’t. Time for a second referendum.  
Still waiting. #brexit  
Friends! So do I!Far-Right retweets by the hated Trump are - literally - the biggest threat to humanity since a tiny handful of 17,410,742 bigots viciously voted for Cliff-Edge Brexit!So, in the interests of free speech, all Far-Right tweets must henceforth be totally banned.  
Today Diane Abbott has said that she wants a second #Brexit referendum. Today @Keir_Starmer said that he cannot see the point in one.We have the @UKLabour party in chaos again & trying to be all things to all people again. #LabourFail #TheCorbynCon 
Could the ‘Two John Redwoods’ be the ‘signal in the noise’ that indicates a dangerous phase when Brexit will increasingly cease to make any sense at all?  
If you say so, Captain Haddock. But I did spend 18 years in this line of business. Also, many leading City business people back Brexit including Peter Hargreaves, @Arron_banks, @truemagic68. Far too many to name them all in one tweet. 
 @KirstySNP: "Nobody voted for this disastrous, disorganised #Brexit", now set to cost around £50 billion.  
I am not saying Russia swung the Brexit referendum, but Johnson dismissing allegations of interference out of hand, is unhelpful. He doesn’t know, and they have history. 
This is BIG. Means that, after Brexit, EU goods containing UK components may not qualify for tariff-free access when exported to EU’s FTA partners like Korea. Provides big incentive for EU companies to cut ties to UK suppliers. (But also threatens a cliff-edge for EU exporters.)  
Why in the world does .@CNBC have Trump-loving, right-wing bigot Rick Santelli commenting on Brexit? 
Retweet if you agree this is the best solution for a #Brexit border.  
Brexit Explained  
The EU:Feb: "We want £50b"Tories:Mar: "No"Apr: "No"May: "No"Jun: "No"Jul: "Go Whistle"Aug: "No"Sep: "No"Oct: "No"Nov: "Oh alright then"How to negotiate, Tory style. #Brexit 
David Davis > £50bn Brexit divorce bill is "rubbish, nonsense & completely wrong!"... Yeah it's more. Sack this Idiot...  
When families are being sanctioned and having benefits cut it's hard to listen to the news we are about to give away £50 billion as a Brexit settlement. 
So today all the same morons who complained about losing European capital of culture are now angry about losing #Europol which is under jurisdiction of ECJ which they refuse to countenance. It's almost as if the people who voted for  #Brexit know the least about it.  
It was "wrong" for President Trump to retweet videos posted by far-right group, Downing Street says.(But we won't cancel his visit, because, after Brexit, we'll be desperate for US business) 
BREXIT is an act of political vandalism. It is incompatible with the Good Friday Agreement. Vital that EU protects rights of all Irish citizens. The future prosperity of the North cannot be subject to DUP veto. @guyverhofstadt @MichelBarnier @M_AndersonSF 
That's embarrassing but very timely. How can we trust the Brexit bill sums when the EU auditors have been raided by an anti corruption unit? 
Better get London ready for his state visit then.. 
Could you draw Ireland's border with Northern Ireland? The border with Northern Ireland has become a major Brexit stumbling block.  
Given where we are now, do you still think we should continue with #Brexit #RecycleElectrons 
EU parliament's Brexit coordinator says UK must "ensure, by continued regulatory alignment between North and South, there is no hardening of the border on the island of Ireland" for negotiations to move on  
Merkel looks delighted to also have Brexit on her plate.  
Brexit is a ludicrous waste of money. You know where the money should go. Problem is that we don't live in a democracy. Why? Because politicians are delagates of their parties, not our representatives. Your interests come second to party interests & the interests of politicians.  
This week's edition of The New European - Brexit is (a total disgr) ace! In shops across the UK on Thursday or subscribe and receive it straight to your door:  
But UK telly told me last night that all that mattered was the money... #brexit  
Lots of rubbish being said on the Brexit bill - @GuidoFawkes picks up my concern earlier that this bill is a) payment for 'membership' during transition and b) things we would have had to pay for anyway as a member 
Good discussion with Chancellor Angela Merkel on state of play of #Brexit negotiations. EU stands united ahead of December European Council  
European parliament says Brexit talks have not made enough progress to justify advancing to trade - Politics live  
as ever someone who does not respect facts: Fact 1. the referendum was advisory Fact 2. the referendum was not binding Fact 3. the result showed a divided view not a descisive majority Fact 4. we live in a democracy and i have every right to fight to remain 
A reminder of the Battle of Cable Street in 1936 when over 100,000 people stood against Union Jack waving far-right extremists posing as patriots. #StopBrexit #Brexit #BrexitBetraysBritain 
European parliament Brexit group to Michel Barnier: not enough progress on citizens' rights. Negotiations stalled, even going backwards. 
Dear @Conservatives does anyone actually want brexit now.... apart from this guy ?  
life begins at 70 lol not racist just dont like em BRITAIN FIRST make are country great again BREXIT you lost get over it reMOANers beer 2 beautiful kids they are my world see em every fortnight sky sports news women my fav is Hayley #TeamHayley 
Earlier today I wrote a piece about the choices of Brexit. Really they form part of a profound choice for Britain. What kind of a country do we want to be? Well I've got an answer for Theresa May: not the one described in this article. Not ever.  
Friends! Don't even try it!This carefully planned, totally spontaneous, angry mass demonstration against Trump will make even Our Mass Demonstrations Against Brexit - in which, sometimes, literally dozens of people took part - seem like complete, utter failures by comparison.  
In the history of bad decisions, this one is right up there with... well, Brexit, really.  
Brexit divorce payment will only cover up to end 2020. So any transition beyond 21 months will need further billions for temporary single market access. And it won't benefit from current rebate so it could cost more than current membership for eg transitional access in 2021. 
Well done to @Alison_McGovern for refusing to be rudely interrupted while making an important point about the impact of #Brexit on the UK/Irish border  
20 new residential towers are being built in Frankfurt because of Brexit demand  
This is a wonderful piece and, as far as one can see, spot-on.The fall of Singapore has indeed come to the minds of some during Brexit.  
Shows where Branson’s loyalties lie - to his own pocket, not the nation’s or NHS patients, or taxpayers. Imagine a TTIP like deal post Brexit? 
Brexit has changed me.  I now swear like a trooper!  Conventional words like outrageous, disgusting, disaster or chaos, disappointed & angry are just far too mild, such is the depth of my feelings.  Words like fuckwittery & clusterfuck, somehow far more appropriate.  
for US folk, Brendan was married to the Jo Cox, the member of parliament who was murdered last year, a week before the Brexit vote, by a far-right extremist who shouted the slogan of the group led by the woman Trump retweeted this morning  
#BREAKING EU parliament says 'more progress needed' for #Brexit deal 
Yeah, a week in an NHS specialist hospital reaches you two things: 1) Brexit is a criminal disaster and 2) immigrant workers are fundamental to what makes the country work.  Thanks, experts.  Valued by me and mine. 
Not many people could get away with the sort of excuses and falsehoods in their jobs that David Davis has managed through this latest ballsup/trickery of the Brexit impact reports. Here's some cartoons I did for @TheNewEuropean (April and July)... will they ever be out of date? 
Theresa May is a puppet for the EU. She has already given up & surrendered on paying a brexit bill & that will just be the start. She will surrender on EU courts, surrender on immigration,surrender on fishing & everything else. BREXIT DOES NOT MEAN BREXIT with Theresa May leading 
Ignorant, inflammatory,  insensitive and irresponsible! Come on @theresa_may this *DEMANDS* a response in the strongest possible terms!  : Barnier Weaponises ISIS to Bash Brexit  via @GuidoFawkes 
How many Boris buses does a Brexit divorce bill buy you?  
Britain is paying £50billion+ to the EU to get a much worse deal than we have now. Put that on a bus.#Brexit 
Diane Abbott breaks with Labour policy, backs second EU referendum  
Brexit: lead MEPs call for more progress on citizens' rights and Ireland. Although progress has been made, significant problems remain, says steering group. Statement  
Barnier gave two speeches in Berlin this morning. In 1st he accused Britain of abandoning EU in fight against terror. In 2nd he accused UK Govt of lying to businesses about impact of Brexit. Incomprehensible timing. 
ICYMI: London is the TOP financial centre in the world. With a more competitive regulatory system post Brexit, free from the EU - we will go from strength to strength!  
IDS telling @kayburley the #BrexitBill is about honouring legal commitments. 'What we save over the years will massively outweigh the Brexit bill' > Rather different tune today from "go whistle" isn't it? 
Not at all surprising that Trump is retweeting Britain First.His mates Nigel Farage, Arron Banks and Breitbart editor Raheem Kassam push the same hateful ideology.These people have poisoned our political discourse & helped set the UK on its disastrous path towards #Brexit.  
Top class analysis from @davidallengreen @FT - Govt has held no consultations, hired no analysts/consultants, sought input from Brexit-affected companies. Therefore, there can be no 'commercially confidential' information to be hidden  
Oh and Britain First like every other far right hate group in Britain backs both Brexit and Donald Trump. You don't need to be a genius to work out why. 
I think Theresa May is deliberately making a very bad brexit deal so at the end she can demand a referendum to accept the bad deal or remain in the EU. It has been a setup from the beginning, we need no deal & to walk away 
"Bluster, wishful-magical thinking and obfuscation are not enough for Brexit to go well," @davidallengreen excellent as always 
"Designated special status for the North to remain within the EU can be delivered"@sinnfeinireland MEP @M_AndersonSF outlines legal report of how Northern Ireland could stay in EU post-#BrexitWATCH FULL:  
The unconvincing excuses for non-disclosure of the Brexit impact papers  - excellent argument from @DavidAllenGreen 
He was very outspoken during the EU referendum, he made sure to tell everyone what he voted because he knows he has a lot of young followers who would listen to him. Afterwards he also made sure to let everyone knows how he feels about the results.  
Corbyn rightly talks about falling wages, but fails to admit fall caused by Brexit. Why? Because he supports it. 
Stay Classy, Michel: Barnier Weaponises ISIS to Bash Brexit  
It's proper comedy that remainers think we'll be outraged by the Brexit bill. You know, cos we wos all taken in by a bus wot sed £350m for the NHS. 
Can’t help thinking that all those who voted for Corbyn in 2015 & 16 but chose to ignore his anti EU stance are as much to blame for this mess as those who voted Brexit. 
He makes sure to tell his followers to go out and vote on important days, like during the American election and Brexit.  
"EU’s Chief Negotiator makes speech implying Brexit Britain ducking out of fight against Islamic terrorism"EU's open door immigration policy is allowing all the Islamic terrorists to walk in to attack us.EU could close the door but they want the immigrant invasion to continue.  
Eritreans joyously celebrating z 1993 historic outcome of referendum conducted under z auspices of UN et al.Legal victory for SOVEREIGNTY after successfully liberating z country thru 30 yrs of armed struggle agnst Ethiopia,1991.#Peace4Eritreans&Ethiopians! 
Don't let Brexiters claim patriotism for themselves. They are not patriots. Either they can't be bothered to think about the consequences of #Brexit & so are betraying Britain through wilful ignorance, or they are knowingly harming the country. #BrexitBetraysBritain #StopBrexit 
The loss of Europol was not just foreseeable - it was inevitable.Meanwhile, government hides the full brexit reports in case more leavers change their minds.  
WATCH: @ChukaUmunna slams Leavers who didn't say a thing about big divorce bills - instead saying we'd have more money after Brexit. Pls RT:  
Isn't it about bl**dy time that @UKLabour came out and made it absolutely clear that Brexit must be stopped for the good of the nation?@Keir_Starmer@LBC @skynews 
Words of @DavidLammy: "Trump sharing Britain First. Let that sink in. The President of the United States is promoting a fascist, racist, extremist hate group whose leaders have been arrested and convicted"Photos: The #Brexit friends of Trump #BrexitBetraysBritain #StopBrexit 
Do you, like David Davis, find yourself with a lot of time on your hands? Try this fun game and see how long you can keep the Brexit Bus from crashing...  
British government furious after Barnier implies Brexit Britain ducking ISIS fight  
Sinn Féin MPs wrapped up a busy week of engagements by meeting with Irish ambassador in London today to discuss impact of Brexit on the north, and particularly on border communities.  
Tory MPs have warned May there will be an angry public backlash if she pays the EU £40bn#Brexit #GetBritainOut 
The unconvincing excuses for non-disclosure of the Brexit impact papersNew by me, at FT 
Brexit has lost UK economy £300 million per week since EU referendum result 
Go on Anna, nearly there....yes, say it, say it! STOP BREXIT! @Anna_Soubry 
When Brexit poverty hits home in Northern Ireland, when the first shot is fired, the DUP is going to get it in the neck, it's going to shoulder all the blame for agreeing to prop up the Tories @PaulGirvanMP @ianpaisleymp @sammywilsonmp @NigelDoddsDUP @DUPleader @BelTel 
Theresa May agreeing a brexit bill of up to €55 billion is 1 of the biggest betrayals a Prime Minister has ever committed against the UK. May & the cabinet should be put on trial for treason. Parliament is full of corrupt self interested EU puppets. From Churchill to this farce  
A hard Brexit would have a “catastrophic” impact on the meat industry, says new study. The “no deal” scenario would lead to a collapse in trade. A disaster for British famers and consumers alike.  
DISGRACE: EU’s Chief Negotiator makes speech implying Brexit Britain ducking out of fight against Islamic terrorism. UK officials said to be furious. They should be!  
Why I do not believe in democracy through referendum:  Thick & ignorant minds (Tom no offense) need to see banks deserting the UK to be convinced that the SM did truly exist! @Lab_Westbourne #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE  
Some good football men are back in jobs today. Sam Allardyce, Craig Shakespeare, Sammy Lee, Alan Pardew and John Carver. Not a Remain vote among them. Everton and West Brom will dish up tough wallops, Hard Brexit Britain getting its pride back. 
I’ve no doubt the 52% who voted Brexit don’t exist either. 
New #TNR #UK VID: North Korea Launches ICBM! Hard #Brexit on the way?! GREAT VIDEO by @IrateBear...  …#MAGA #NewRight #NewRightUK #NorthKorea 
2/ Sadly, at the time, the whole idea that 1000s of bots and foreign accounts were driving the whole brexit shambles and far right agenda was seen as "tin foil hat" and no-one took  a blind bit of notice. Not sure if the page with the analysis is still there. 
The UK's banks are ready for Brexit  
It’s another (REDACTED)ing brilliant issue of @theneweuropean, the paper which thinks Brexit is a load of (REDACTED). On sale 30/11/17  
NEW: Michel Barnier: The UK turned its back on Europe's fight against Daesh with Brexit vote 
Theresa May’s proposed offer for a Brexit “divorce bill” would represent Britain’s worst national humiliation since Suez. 
Labour demands vote for MPs on Brexit divorce bill  
New facts have come to light since the referendum, including no extra cash for the NHS, and today's £50bn divorce bill says @ChukaUmunna 
Face it: Brexit means choosing – not having our cake and eating it | Jonathan Lis  
Those raging about the Brexit bill seem to be either those that like raging at stuff, or Remainers (who’d have us pay more if we remained). 
Govt seems to be making good progress on Brexit negotiations.  Agreement to run down our payments in sight. No hard border w/ Ireland. Good 
Second referendum probably legally required @InFactsOrg  
These are just some of the services that the UK currently trades freely across the single market. Brexit puts all of them in danger.  
This is worth tweeting again.The mandate from the #EUref last year was wafer thin. Today, another such vote would surely fail to get any mandate to #Leave#Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE  
"I refuse to play the xenophobes' game. It’s pointless anyway. The people who want me to 'go home' won't stop if I get a certificate. A piece of paper won't make them suddenly welcome me."My piece on why I refuse to apply for a right to my life. #Brexit 
Labour hv seized on Brexit bill £44bn claims - just tabled new amendment to Withdrawal Bill requiring any OBR + NAO to asses final bill - and giving Parliament a vote on it. 
Because of a #Brexit that they all campaigned for. But it's not too late - as new facts emerge people have the right to keep an open mind  
BREXIT BETRAYAL: Appeaser Theresa Agrees to Hand Over €45-55bn to the EU, Cover-up Planned!          #fo2eu  
Labour has tabled amendment to EU Bill requiring any Brexit divorce bill to be assessed by NAO and OBR – and for parliament to get a vote on it. Vote on amendment next Wed if selected. 
Brexit divorce bill aside, OBR has already forecast that Brexit will cost the UK nearly £300m a week.  
The "Brexit" financial settlement will cost every single man, woman and child in Scotland approximately £1,008.00. I absolutely know that every member of my family has better things to spend such a large sum of money on.What about you?  
As Irish issue threatens to derail negotiations, truth that dare not speak its name now openly torments the govt: we can't have it all. If we insist on trying, we'll end up with nothing. Brexit means choices.Me in @guardian today:  
EU trade is linked to 134,000 jobs in Scotland and Brexit puts these jobs at risk. It's time the government came clean and released the full impact assessments on the damage Brexit will do! #StopBrexit @Labour4EU 
How will #Brexit affect the rights of Europeans? Discuss it with Danuta Hübner today at 4pm CET  
Paisley has gone full red faced over Alliance's new Brexit paper.I'm not gonna slag off his alternative solutions - not cus I'm above it, just cus he hasn't got any. Not one. 
The only Brexit is hard Brexit. 50-60bn is the down payment. The cost in jobs, growth and political clout will be many times higher. 
Are you in Liz Truss's constituency? She says that all of you want "get on with #brexit" is that right? perhaps if it is wrong - you could let her know.........#stopbrexit 
Chief Secretary @trussliz says to continuity Remain campaigner @ChrisLeslieMP that it’s time for him to “get with the programme” and stop “refighting the referendum”  
I have tweeted that despite Russian/Trump conspiracy to subvert 2016 election-there is no Constitutional remedy....but what about Brexit? It’s looking like Russians were hard at it there to. 
Whatever view on Brexit, Wales won't allow Westminster power grab. Good work by @steffanlewis. @fmwales needs to stand firm not give in to warm words from Wm Tory or Labour MPs. 'Welsh EU Continuity Bill prepared, says Carwyn Jones' 
These are my favourite bits from the prescient article by @DanielJHannan about what UK would look like after Brexit  
Brexit is showing how many 'proud Brits' still think Ireland's independence as a silly little mistake and need to be disciplined. England's 'near abroad' as Russia would say. This is why @yeswales is anti British state and Britishness.Gwynfor summed it up: 
Theresa May has finally achieved something. By agreeing to pay the EU €50 billion in a Brexit divorce settlement, she has managed to unite hard Brexiters and Remainers in their displeasure. 
Anyone who thinks brexit is a reason for independence needs to read this.Scottish jobs supported by EU trade: 134,000Scottish jobs supported by UK trade: 560,000 
Ten predictions for the #Brexit talks...from @CER_Grant 's Centre for European Reform 
The root of Brexit is the fact that in History GCSE/A-Level we are genuinely taught that England has never done anything wrong ever 
Lord Callanan the Brexit minister tells @afneil he can’t comment on Trump’s Britain First retweets without knowing the “full facts”.  What ‘full facts’ could he possibly need to know about a fascist organisation’s tweets? @daily_politics 
RedKip Councillor Tom Bewick is telling Brexit lies again. He says there's no Freedom of Movement for Services in the EU.  
The UK will lose all decision-making powers in EU foreign policy and can't remain a member of Europol after Brexit, Barnier says  
It's as if Everton asked the question, 'what would Brexit look like if it was a football team?'  
Wednesday Morning Briefing: North Korea's new missile test, Trump’s tax-cut overhaul and Britain's 'Brexit bill'  
#PMQs on BREXITFolks, never forget, when the government makes a statement on Britain...legally, that's a statement on england & WalesBritain=eng/walesGB=Scotland/eng/walesUK=Scotland/NI/eng/walesThat's how they keep us guessingScot's know better  
Brexit: UK should 'shake Dublin's cage' over Irish border  
Causes of Brexit identified by novelist Elizabeth Taylor, 1951. A Game of Hide and Seek, pg 141.  
Putting #Brexit in perspective. #Referendum2018 
Brexit caseworkers ‘will need to make 100 residency decisions a day’  
Are we getting to a point where UDI is being viewed as the only viable step by the Scottish Government?We all know we wont EVER get a Section 30 granted.We all know Brexit will destroy Scotlands export industry and economyThe Scottish Government must look after Scotland 
In short, "please understand, I voted Brexit knowing that one of the direct and predictable effects would be to destroy your rights, but that's not WHY."If you felt this strongly about my rights, you should have made their security a precondition to your vote. Did you?  
Ken Clarke MP questions @DamianGreen about the rumoured Brexit divorce bill of 50bn euros #PMQs  
Can't be said to be "against it's will" when #Brexit - and all that goes with it - is the express will of the UK government. Choices have consequences. 
But if #Brexit is the miracle you have promised, then what is there to fear? Your untruths being exposed perhaps? Let the public see how it REALLY affects them and give them a #FinalSay. #FinalSayForAll #StopBrexit 
#Brexit The guilty men: -CameronThe press-baronsJohnson Gove FarageDavisThe guilty woman: -May Their crime? Trashing the country by lack of care and/or lies and/or incompetence.Punishment? They will be damned by decent people and by history. 
But ... didn't Farage and Corbyn say that the Posted Workers directive was taking construction jobs away from Brits?☟Construction bodies warn of Brexit 'cliff edge' skills gap   
#Brexit negotiations brought fresh highs for world stocks, while bitcoin topped $10,000 in a frenzy for cryptocurrencies  
Ken Clarke 1st to raise Brexit Bill - asking for a welcome to the bill saying it’s been a ‘bargain’ to pay so far 
Brexit voters now complaining about the £50bn Brexit divorce bill: Writers wrote books on this. Economists wrote papers. The Bank of England wrote essays. The EU define how to leave in thousands of words. But instead, you believed 13 words on the side of a bus. #duh 
£50 billion Brexit Bill?! We voted to stop sending billions of pounds to Brussels!   
“Without missing a beat [Remainers] have switched to 'appauling, pathetic, look at this climb down!' this is an honouring of some commitments into which we’ve entered,” says @DanielJHannan on the so-called Brexit bill  
Britain is already £20bn worse off than it would have been since the Brexit vote - and that disparity from where UK should be is going to get much bigger. Investment plans have been put on ice, credit ratings dropped, GDP growth falling. This is bad, very bad. #StopBrexit 
Which party you vote in next general election? Thornberry Theresa May Cable Jeremy Corbyn Libdems Labour Conservative #PMQs Brexit #WednesdayWisdomBritain First Damien Green 
The £50bn isn't, of course, the cost of Brexit, it's simply the outstanding bill for membership. The true cost of Brexit has only just started and will be much, much higher 
Fine, but Brexit isn’t some act of god. You and your mate who’s still hiding in his posh shed bet a £2tn economy on a coin toss. This is the outcome.  
Yesterday, David Davis sent a junior minister to cover him on Brexit impact reports.Today, Theresa May has - after committing £50bn to Brexit, then immediately jumping on a plane - left someone else to look after #PMQsAnyone would think they are scared to face the music... 
And yet May will STILL STAY SILENT. We should be in uproar, yet with May it’s a case of putting up, shutting up and waiting for trump to screw us over after Brexit! Weakest PM, the most vile President, they’re welcome to each other! 
Hospitals in crisis.Schools in crisis.Brexit in crisis.Housing in crisis.Prisons in crisis.Social Care in crisis.Police in crisis.Economy in crisis.Cabinet Ministers in crisis.Theresa May in crisis.Welcome to the #ToryWinterCrisis#PMQs 
Good on @EmilyThornberry for focussing on the Government's appalling record on the #NHS. 10,000 EU nationals have quit the NHS since the #Brexit referendum. They're being driven out. #PMQs 
BLOCKERS: Diane Abbott has signalled support for a second referendum on any Brexit deal. Will Corbyn sack her or is this now Labour policy?  
Every now and then I try to compose a tweet expressing how I feel about Brexit. So many versions. The closest I get is "I hate everyone" which isn't helpful. 
“Launching the report in Westminster last night, @ChrisHazzardSF, the Sinn Féin MP for South Down, said that special status was the “only solution to the threats posed by Brexit in Ireland”.…”@M_AndersonSF @conorhdfm 
Hear, hear. All my sympathies to my many many decent @UKLabour friends. You know what caused this @GCHQ. You guys have to be even-handed. It’s not just bots for Brexit. Get @PutinRF agents out of our politics #Legatum #Corbyn 
.@sturdyAlex being unspeakably lovely, and accurate, on Brexit  
The Tories / @theresa_may magic up 50 BILLION POUNDS ( !!! ) for #Brexit while they fail & neglect their people & the services we pay our taxes for !! The #NHS // our support/benefit system4people who really need it etc etc people are dying because of this governments negligence! 
THREAD Russian Active Measures in the UK apply on the left as well as the right, just as they did in America. I urge @GCHQ to help the Labour Party too. #Brexit  
You see us as you want to see us - in the simplest terms, in the most convenient definitions. But what we found out is that each one of us is a brain, and an athlete, and a basket case, a princess, and a criminal. Does that answer your question? Sincerely yours, the Brexit Club.  
Keep it up...chipping away at the total deceit which lies behind a #Brexit now driven by irrational ideology & supported only by those putting party before country...#StopBrexit...stop the huge waste of time & treasure trying to achieve the impossible. We won't have any cake left 
Immigration after Brexit: on @BBCr4today, @Mark_J_Harper explains to me & John Humphries why UK would be better off without EU workers like primary school teachers & care workers:  [at 2.39] 
The actual size of the Brexit divorce bill amounts to a hell of a lot of those lying "£350 million a week for the NHS" buses.Let's cancel Brexit and fund our NHS instead.  
"Now is the time to get the show on the road" - Foreign Secretary @BorisJohnson hopes trade relationship talks with the EU can finally start #Brexit  
READ: The City and our financial sector won't just survive post Brexit, but thrive! The success of the City has never been because of our membership to the EU. More here >>>  
I've written a personal piece about how Britain feels to a European resident, post #Brexit. And why I will not be applying for British citizenship. For over a year, I've been told I must try to understand Brexiters' feelings. Will they understand mine?  
Unfortunate. Up there with Boris's declaration that Brexit will be "a titanic" success.  
Brexit has been costing the UK economy £300m every week since the Leave vote  
In which the foreign secretary compares Brexit to a shipwreck.  
[Brit news Éire correspondent]“Yes I’m reporting from Southern Ireland, far beyond the border with West Scotland. Leo Taoiseach, the leader of the irredentist Varadkar Party, has just invoked the ancient Gaelic custom known as ‘Tánaiste’ in an attempt to stall Brexit talks.” 
Remember when that David Davis bloke rubbished rumors of 50bn Brexit Bill?  
This caller backs Brexit because he hates the idea of a "Federal Europe". So surely he can tell @mrjamesob what that actually means...  
Michael Gove promised fishermen they would “dramatically increase the amount of fish we catch” after #Brexit. But fishing is just 0.05% of the UK's GDP. More likely, fish quotas will become bargaining chip for bigger industries: e.g "fish for airlines". 
The Brexit promises lie broken in the street amonst the dust and carrier bags. Welcome to Britain the new impoverished state in Europe but not part of Europe... To our shame. #BrexitShambles 
Classsic Boris Johnson on Brexit Bill - 'now is the time to get the ship off the rocks' 
Could it be that #Labour is starting to see the light on the ever-mounting #Brexit costs?Let's hope it starts to back the interests of the many against those of the few. @Mcr4EU @Labour4EU @BrexitBin @Scientists4EU @BremainInSpain #StopBrexit #FinalSay 
I in 66 citizens suffer from food poisoning in the UK each year. It's 1 in 6 in the US. And we want to import food from where as part of a trade deal? #Brexit 
Just told by Immigration Services Union it doesn't appear that any of extra £50million given to Home Office for #Brexit prep has been spent on border + immigration staff - and that supposed extra 300 recruited were in fact "backfill" for lack of existing capacity! @Open_Britain 
When will Remoaners like Diane Abbott realise - we had a Referendum and we voted BREXIT! 
One thing Brexit + the internet has revealed: when it comes to news about ourselves, Britain's much vaunted truth-to-power media are the most parochial, myopic, unreliable, hysterical, poorly-informed, partial bunch around. @rtenews @France24_en @dwnews 
@Keir_Starmer, the Vote on the Deal would be before March 2019 and the question would be 'do you want to leave the EU or stay in', providing an Exit from Brexit. 
'The UK is being savaged': readers on the Brexit divorce bill  
So Leavers have gone from Rees-Mogg's "not a brass farthing" to "we were always going to pay this amount guys" - quite a change of tune! Cost of Brexit getting clearer by the day   
One wonders if stoking the rhetoric of "saboteurs" will now catch up with Theresa May.Some very unhappy Leavers on Twitter today on the €50-100bn Brexit bill. 
A solution to the post-Brexit Irish/UK border depends on a choice between the definite and indefinite article. The EU customs union is incompatible with Brexit, a customs union isn’t. 
The NHS watching watching us blow 50 billion on Brexit whilst they don't get squat  
Think it's fair to say that Irish Twitter is absolutely smashing British Twitter in the Brexit war. 
How Brexit has already cost the UK economy £20bn in lost GDP (£300m for each week since the vote). My @TheIndyBusiness report on latest @cepr_org research:  
The government is LYING to voters continuously. #ToryTrickery #NastyParty #Brexit After which they enter door to multiple well paid jobs in Finance, Defence, Business, Consultancy, PR, Academia, Lords. 
Because, mostly, they didn't vote for Brexit. They voted for a lie. 
In 2016 top UK civil servant Ivan Rogers was sacked for telling UKgovt the #Brexit bill would be circa £50bn. One year of David Davis negotiations later, UK now agrees to pay EU circa £50bn to leave EU.  
Brexit is just a £50bn loot box containing a shitty new skin for your passport. 
1. Brexit has turned those that used to regard public spending as a 'waste' into passionate high spenders- 50 billion on Brexit fee and nearly £4 billon on paying bureaucrats to guide uk towards cliff's edge. 
BOOST: Construction manager admits 80% of workforce are foreign and that post-Brexit, with lower migration, British workers to be offered more money. This is why workers voted Leave!  
Did Russian meddling sway Britain's Brexit vote? Facebook says it will cooperate with a parliamentary inquiry.  
Combine economics with politics to solve Irish border issue, @yanisvaroufakis says  
#Brexit Scene: a post apocalyptic landscape, a father and daughter rummage through burned out trolleys, radiated baked beans & crumpled Union Jack buntingDaughter: how did the bad times start dad?Me:  
Opinion: It turns out that the only person frustrating the will of the people in the Brexit process is David Davis | Matthew Norman  
'Fairs are held monthly in the towns of Carlingford & Dundalk. A few years ago the people of the district also attended the fairs of Newry and Warrenpoint but with the coming into operation of prohibitive tariffs they were prevented from doing so' #Brexit  
SCOTLANDHere are some nice Brexit Divorce Bill figures for you and your family that you DID NOT VOTE FOR!!!Single person £952Family of 2 £1,904Family of 3 £2856Family of 4 £3,808Family of 5 £4,760Family of 6 £5,712This is JUST TO LEAVE folks... 
The referendum was advisory.But no one considered what the advice really meant.No one considered what accepting the advice would entail.Brexiteers, May, Corbyn and the MSM simply jumped on the Brexit badwagon and drove it towards the cliff without a plan.#StopBrexit 
It's "astonishing" that Britain accepted structure of Brexit talks, Greece's Yanis Varoufakis says  
Brexit and its impact on EU regions: live debate @EU_CoR on 30 Nov, 4:15 p.m. (CET)  @EU_Regional @BBSR @ESPON_Programme map by BBSR 
FIFTY BILLION BOUNDS you absolute fucking cretins. #StopBrexit, stop Brexit right fucking now. 
"£50bn Brexit"But, but......... we have NO money, right?#Austerity #Cuts #Broke #NationalDebt #WTF 
I wrote a piece for the New Statesman on Varadkar's mild protest on Brexit, and the creepy, anti-Irish weirdness it's instantaneously ignited among the British right.  
Reports that UK has offered up to £50bn for #Brexit divorce bill. No £350m for NHS, Boris Johnson promised. We left largest & most successful trading bloc in the world to get another trade agreement - Which by definition will be worse than what we already had.  
Someone's updated the side of that Brexit bus  #Brexit  
BREXIT REALITIES: All UK is leaving Customs Union & Single Market & Northern Ireland will remain part of UK Single Market. UK wants new customs & trade arrangement with the EU and not possible to design final border solution until detail of this known. Time to move to next phase! 
Brexit going well? Anyone? Any sensible functioning democracy would pull itself back from the brink - but with Melchett May in charge - we are doomed! #Wibble #ToriesOut #BrexitShambles 
#Brexit Bill doesn’t ‘buy’ a good trade deal .. The view - and my thoughts -from Brussels  
Construction manager admits Brexit will mean British workers being offered more money  
This is indeed very well worth reading. It confirms the mix of intellectual chaos and sheer quackery that defines the Brexit case.  
I'm a bit gobsmacked by this.I'm ranked second in the anti-Brexit social media power list. 
EU: 50bnUK: Whistle(Johnson)EU: 50UK: 20EU: 50UK: 30EU: 50UK: Sod off(Patel)EU: 50UK: Split the difference, 45?EU: 50UK: 49?EU: 60Telegraph: May wins stunning concession in Brexit talks! sh sh(keep quiet, might be 100Bn)sh shSun: Up yours, wossna 
SNP bid to hold David Davis in contempt over Brexit papers  
Reducing regional inequality is crucial if we are to address the underlying alienation that led to the Brexit vote, and build a stronger economy. 
REVEALED: Hard Brexit think tank the Legatum Institute met with @DefraGovUK 6 times since EU Referendum to discuss 'post-Brexit farm subsidies' & 'any future US-UK trade deal' - FOI response:  
Remainers Fibbing About Brexit Bill:  
Hey does anyone remember the referendum that asked DO YOU WANT TO SPEND FIFTY SEVEN FUCKING BILLION FUCKING POUNDS TO FUCKING PUNCH OURSELVES IN THE FUCKING COCK BECAUSE I DO NOT REMEMBER THAT FUCKING REFERENDUM 
Yet again Labour are more interested in frustrating the Brexit process than delivering the best Brexit deal for all parts of our United Kingdom   
If Britain failed to fulfil its financial obligations to the EU it would become an international pariah. Good for Putin and disaster capitalists and devastating for the British people. But the Putin-Trump loving traitor Farage couldn't care less about that.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Nigel Farage is right - Brexit voters will be disgusted by the Government's SELLOUT. 
I've got a solution to this £50bn Brexit issue...  
What would happen if the Queen demanded to see the Brexit impact reports? 
If @jeremycorbyn & @UKLabour now came out against #Brexit & offered a second referendum, what would you do? Vote & RT! 
So we're beginning to know the terms of Brexit, once fully revealed we'll get a revote right? Because that's what a sensible democracy would do, right?If you bought a house, then the survey said it's falling into the sea, would you proceed with the purchase shrugging "oh well"? 
Listening to @mrjamesob ‘s logically detailed analysis of Brexit. Always good radio  
Barnier has confirmed that UK will no longer be a member of Europol after #Brexit. Serious implications for security & criminal justice. 
#LBC Another day James O’ Brien on Brexit bashing again FFS shut up. Get it through your thick skull we’re leaving. Be better off long run. 
Brexit -As they say, the devil is in the detail.& there will be a lot of details! Why are we puting ourselves through this terrible ordeal? 
This country will be paying this off ...for years.It took the UK practically 60 years to pay off an amount like this  to the US. ( post war loan)#StopTheMadness  #£50bn Brexit#NHS 
We don’t have to go through with #Brexit. We can send back the dress. We can return the invitations. Everyone will understand. https://t.co/qp3gc9yo12?amp=1 
Brexiters said we'd get £350m a week for the NHS, instead we face a costly divorce settlement that will last decades. As true cost of leaving becomes clear, it's vital people are given a chance to exit from Brexit through a referendum on the deal 
Your daily reminder that Labour does not support a ref on the final Brexit deal.Why not?#StopBrexit 
Barnier repeats his comment that Britain will have to leave Europol after Brexit. The Commission has previously indicated this could be up for negotiation.  
How @guardian is reporting this is really doing my head in. (1) it’s not a “divorce bill” or Brexit bill — it’s meeting existing obligations (2) why use such language as “massively increased”? That’s just factually wrong.  
The spin on the Brexit ‘divorce’ bill. This is not as some Brexiters want to believe money for access to the EU.It is money we owe because we committed to projects as a 28 with some extra for pension liabilities on top.A trade deal is nothing to do with this. 
A story in four acts! #Brexit  
If we have learned nothing else for that video about Brexit, it’s that it would just easier for all concerned if Donegal and Sligo just became part of the UK. 
The source added that the sectoral reports did not analyse separately the different types of Brexit (high/Low divergence; no deal) - which they thought a mistake  
I've seen British fuck-ups at close quarters for years, but Brexit passeth all fucking understanding. 
Will be on @SkyNews circa 1330 to discuss Brexit bill. Lots to say! 
Come on @UKLabour, #Brexit will leave you without the resources to carry out your policies. What more information do you need? Time to oppose #Brexit! @CantLabour 
Yanis Varoufakis on Brexit Negotiations, Ireland, Greece  
Hopefully he will get one who knows the difference between devolved and reserved matters. Oh public and private and that Scotland has its own legal system and that Brexit is a disaster..... maybe one that tells him abstaining on welfare reforms is a no no.  
The vast majority of the British people oppose paying a huge Brexit bill. 71% reject a bill of over £40bn.Theresa May is stabbing this country in the back! 
Crikey! GMB descends into chaos as Piers Morgan and Susanna Reid go to war with Nigel Farage over Brexit divorce bill 'You lied'    
*Man does rad BMX jump over gate, screeches to a halt and pulls up helmet visor* "Yo kids, I'm Kenneth Clarke, wanna know some dope facts? Well, imagine if we didn't actually do Brexit and just spent the 50 billion on trainers, tunes and games? Sounds pretty skill, right?" 
#Construction is latest sector to want an exemption from #Brexit. Sector after sector issuing warnings...  
This. Over and over again.  Kathy Sheridan: Why is British public so ignorant on Brexit?  
To those who seem very worried about the drafting of my Twitter Brexit poll today, please rest assured, I have official confirmation it is NOT binding on the nation. 
When all the Brexit dust settles not only will our economy be weaker, but so too our democracy. Systematic mendacity and Government's contempt for parliamentary sovereignty will have become accepted norms. 
More evidence of attitudinal differences along #Brexit lines: Leavers far less likely to think it acceptable for a member of Royal Family to marry someone of different ethnicity or religion or who already has kids. Same sex unacceptable too. pic.twitter.com/ESJ4yhlw4n 
Imagine you ordered something online thinking it would save you money and then when it arrives it comes with an unexpected bill for 14 times what you expected to pay. Would you think about returning it? #Brexit 
Diane Abbott backs Lib Dem call for referendum on final Brexit deal in letter to constituent.  
Yet more biased Brexit documents from the EU!  This time the latest #AFCO committee document on the Irish border. 
Harry & Meghan, a Brexit deal and Korea’s nuclear launch overshadowed our stable tour yesterday, so here we go again  
This is a time for the 17.4 billion to unite on the £50bn Brexit Bill. Ukippers, Tory & Labour leavers must come together to protest this decision all the way. Write to your MP. Make your distaste at this agreement count at the ballot box. Vote @UKIP to make a difference. 
The Northern Ireland Affairs Committee in Westminster is hearing evidence this morning on the future of the border after Brexit [Thread]  
"£50bn Brexit" comes to £2871.74 per leave voter.  Come on, cough up.  You got what you wanted now time to put your money where your mouth is. 
'Stop being so gloomy' Britain's economy WILL prosper after Brexit - EFT's Patrick Minford  
I wonder if there's a majority in UK for a  #Brexit that costs over £50billion, so that we can eventually get a worse trade deal than we have now with worlds biggest trade bloc with less rights & influence than we currently have. Just how many would vote for that? 
Hi Theresa May, Please stop and think for just five seconds about how amazing it would be to splash out £50bn on the NHS instead of paying a £50bn Brexit bill.Are you sure you want to do this just to avoid a backlash from those who voted Leave? 
Some seem to be trying to jump on "Brexit Bill" to attack Leave. Worth remembering about half is UK contribution until end 2020 - ie transition. Rest is things we would pay anyway if we had stayed a member - pensions + EU projects we already agreed. Not a result of Brexit 
Your daily reminder that all the problems associated with Brexit disappear if we accept Freedom of Movement.So you see, it really is about racism after all.#StopBrexit 
ROMANCE: ROYAL ENGAGEMENT! Couple to marry at WINDSOR CASTLE! Meghan to become BRITISH Citizen! EXCLUSIVE snaps of Harry leaving gym! Kate is HAPPY for the couple!In other lnews, Theresa May agrees to £50bn Brexit bill. Whatever. Moving on… 
“YOU WANTED IT...   YOU PAY FOR IT”.Here’s a Go Fund Me page where Leavers can donate to pay for the “Brexit Bill” (aka what we owe) which is the result of their vote. Not many donations so far . . .   
I wonder if John Redwood knew about the full cost of Brexit - i.e. he was acting on inside information - when he recently advised his clients to pull their money out of the UK?  
This claim is disingenuous & misleading. Brexit has not brought us this bill in sense that UK contributions would have continued if we had stayed a member. UK would have had to pay for RAL and pensions in future contributions if country had voted remain.  
‘Leaked EU papers make clear that the only prize that Britain has bought with its €60-65bn is a stark choice between the low-access trade rights of Canada, or the low-sovereignty vassal state status of Efta members such as Norway’ @guardian #Brexit collapses 
British Remainers who have consistently taken the EU's side against the UK in Brexit negotiations are, at least in part, responsible for the British government's cave-in to the EU on finances. Lacking shame, they still moralise despite being complicit in ripping Britain off. 
The combination of the Brexit bill and the real risk of a charge of contempt of parliament means......oh sod it again, what is the point any more?  Here is a video of a panda falling head first into a bin: 
Diane Abbott says she will argue for referendum on final Brexit deal  
'Contempt of the House ' proceedings may be brought against a Government. They were ordered to deliver Brexit analysis papers by a binding vote of the House. They should do it without qualification, redaction or editing.  
The reason the UK government does not to disclose the 58 sector analyses cannot be because they are to be kept from EU.EU already knows, having negotiated trade deals on our behalf for 44 years.The only reason is to keep the analyses from the people affected by Brexit. 
It's not a done deal. Let's cancel #Brexit and fund our #NHS instead. And our schools and universities and housing and the arts and just anything else frankly.Go whistle yourself .@BorisJohnson . I think .@ChukaUmunna has been more honest #r4today 
June 2016: Vote Leave claim that we face £2.4bn bill if we remain in EU (lie)November 2017: UK government agrees to pay £50bn Brexit bill to leave EU (fact)"We knew what we were voting for." Oh, really?..... 
Overwhelming sentiment in Republic of Ireland just now: utter bewilderment with the UK. They really, really didn’t think British perceptions of their nation were this bad, and getting increasingly frustrated by what they’re hearing from Westminster over Brexit. 
FARAGE: Huge Brexit bill means Christmas has come early for the EU.  
I'd almost missed this Orwellian doublespeak moment. You couldn't make it up if you tried!Brexit Minister Robin Walker "We have not edited or redacted reports... we have collated information in a way that does not include some material" via @BIUK_Politics 
I see that £50bn Brexit is trending. Good stuff.Now perhaps a few more Brexit backers will start to realise that they have been sold a pup, a crock, a poisonous snake. Every promise Leave made to them is unravelling. 
Folks, can we all just agree that *honouring financial obligations* is not a negotiating tactic (or an act of generosity) it’s *a legal obligation*. If ‘brexit britain’ doesn’t stand its round how are future talks with anyone going to go? 
Argument was #Brexit impact assessments contained some information that’d weaken UK negotiating position, hence govt didn’t want to release.Reality is poor quality of IAs & *absence* of detail shows how much of a mess UK side is in. Also explains govt reticence to release! 
A £50bn Brexit is proof why we're right to leave the European Union. If you have have to pay a ransom to leave an organisation then you're not a member you're a hostage. #Brexit 
Today's #frontpage: 'Dublin will not take a leap in the dark' #Brexit  
No wonder they want to keep that Brexit 'analysis' to themselves.  
Strip away the layers and Brexit becomes ever more murky - really excellent from Gina Miller  
Those Brexit talks in full:Remainers: UK should pay what it owes.Government: We'll pay what we owe.Remainers: The government has been humiliated. 
Could DExEU explain this logic please?1. UK keeping Brexit impact studies secret2. EU publishing Brexit impact studies3. UK conceding every negotiating point to EU... yet we are told that  *publishing* impact studies places the publishing party at a disadvantage in negs?  
Remainers 2016: how dare you use £350m, that’s not the net figure.Remainers 2017: the brexit bill is £100bn! 
Now that the facts are emerging about #Brexit (massive £50b bill for worse trade deal, less money for #NHS, spiralling personal costs, etc) surely we should have a referendum on the final deal?RT to increase sample 
It's taken 17 months to agree the Brexit divorce bill. Now we have 16 months to sort out EU citizens rights, border protocols and the new trade deal. No biggie. 
In today's Brexit news: Ministerial approval for Brexit negotiating position raises the prospect of an imminent summit breakthrough | Downing Street denies Brexit bill figure is settled  
For those still confused about 'Brexit', @mrjamesob has just hit the nail on the head. 
Irish communities divided by terror are now whole. Brexit could tear us apart again | Joe McHugh  
And remember that on top of this Brexit payment to settle our obligations, we will in addition have to pay a normal annual Budget contribution for each year of transition, as the European Council has made clear. Which in 2016 was £13.1bn gross, approx £8.7bn net.  
6) although I voted Remain I think the way the anti Brexit movement has totally dismissed the largest democratic exercise in UK history & vilified Leave voters is a total disgrace btw. 
5) Brexit is about change & it was a legitimate decision. Canada would not join the USA for access to NAFTA. If the EU was just a free trade block we wouldn't be leaving. 
Boss of Ford Europe gives strongest hint yet that they will be moving out of Britain. And the others will follow... Oh how the benefits of Brexit mount up...amazing, isn't it? #StopBrexit 
#Brexit is demanding closer analysis from all of us. @thatginamiller doing some heavy lifting here  
Tell you what: Brexit has revealed the shocking standard of history and geography teaching in UK schools. 
There is an astonishing amount of contradictory logic to the Brexit narrative 
The inability of Brexiters to recognise that Brexit payments are for past commitments rather than a future deal is met with bafflement from policymakers and journalists in every other European country. It's at the point where the UK is not taken seriously anymore 
£50bn Brexit divorce bill? I guess Theresa May found a whole forest full of Magic Money Tree's this time #Brexit #DivorceBill #magicmoneytree 
This is kicking around the internet this morning after news of the £50bn Brexit bill...Let's cancel Brexit and fund our NHS instead.  
Money for nurses' pay DUP deal £50bn Brexit Whatever is necessary for the May govt to survive Ideology first, people second. 
Facebook and Twitter Promise to Aid Inquiry on Russian Brexit Meddling  
What I don't get is this.All over Twitter I see young people viciously opposing Brexit. And screaming about the prospect of this £50bn Brexit.They oppose all of this because of our 'financial and economic well-being in the future'.And then vote for Jeremy Corbyn.  
Sums up the Brexit madness  
There is a brilliant cartoon in today’s @thetimes on the ‘Brexit impact assessment’ cover-up. This cover-up is one of the most disgraceful episodes in a disgraceful period in our history, a period whose stench will linger very long in our nostrils whatever happens re Brexit. 
The department of health sees no issues with abortion pills being legalised after the referendum, and will review if abortions can be offered by GPs after a law change  
.@ChukaUmunna on @BBCr4today (when JH let him get a word in edgeways): 'Brexit in the terms it was sold to the British people is proving impossible to deliver' - not least the Gove/Johnson promise of £350m pw for the NHS 
Here's an idea:-#Brexit Divorce Bill = €55bnNumber of Brits that voted Leave = 17.4mLeavers Tax = €3158.97 or £2794.96 each. 
READ | The Remainer strategy is emerging: use the grotesque divorce bill to push for a second referendum. Needless to say, they don't call themselves patriots.  
So £50 billion for our Brexit divorce then. Boris is gonna need a bigger bus 
Nick Farage lays into the government for being "weak" and "selling out" after reports say the UK has agreed a Brexit divorce bill with the EU.  
"We've gone on Brexit by mistake."  
.@ChukaUmunna on #r4today, trying to hold the Brexiters to account for the lies which led to huge Brexit bill.John Humphrys shuts it down: "Well, we are where we are!"Yes, John, thanks to media like you not challenging the lies in the first place!  
Exc: The Times has spoken to someone who has seen and studied the secret Brexit sectoral reports - and say they have “totally inadequate” conclusions which “glosses over” problems  
Friends! I can't wait to vote for Our Brian! As Our PM, he will:1. Stop Cliff-Edge Brexit.2. End all immigration controls.3. Heavily tax the undeserving rich (i.e. rich people not called Brian).4. Spend 97% of GDP on Our Climate Change.What - literally - could go wrong?  
Please remember: The £50bn Brexit divorce bill isn't us 'paying for a deal'.We're simply paying our tab. 
Humphrey’s on @BBCr4today refusing to let @ChukaUmunna point out the leave campaign promised millions to the NHS. Central to the #Brexit bill story this morning. Unbelievable. 
From £10bn to £20bn now #£50bn Brexit shows the incompetence, naivety & weakness of #UK government led by one of the worst PM & cabinet in history @Number10gov #brexit #brexitshambles #WednesdayWisdom 
The position now should be that we will pay full Brexit bill upon agreement of a bespoke, wide-ranging free trade agreement. Otherwise, it is out on no deal with a 25bn Brexit payment to cover minimum liabilities. 
So, Brexit is a “divorce”. In other words, the UK thinks it’s a strong, capable woman who’ll flourish in her new independent life. But it’s actually a bitter, incompetent man who’ll drink himself to death in a bedsit. 
Biggest challenge for EU27 negotiators now - dispense the UK myth that sufficient progress was all about the moneyAnd insist that agreement on Northern Ireland and citizen's rights are equally necessaryWhile not giving the impression that the EU does not want a deal #brexit 
€50bn will be smallest part of 'final' #Brexit bill: billions more of losses via:- lost trade with EU (which UK will find it hard to make up elsewhere)- fall in real incomes (already happening)- lost investment (as it diverts to EU27)- lost tax revenue as economy slows  
Alternate Universe Scenario1. Referendum - slim majority in favour of leave.2. Government commissions Brexit Impact Studies3. Government publishes reports 4. 6-12 months of public debate about reports5. 2nd Referendum held. 
Back in reality, government has concluded that this is good value for money - compared to the alternative of a chaotic No Deal Brexit.  
‘They owe us money, we morally owe them money. Let’s call it quits. It’s time for us to simply walk away’ - Nigel Farage says the government is ‘selling out’ over the £50bn Brexit divorce bill. Let us know your thoughts  
Tbh I don't really care how much Brexit costs - still be worth every penny 
I keep replaying the Johnson “go whistle line” back in my head. That was in June. December brings a rather large Brexit bill after all....  
The insights this one quote gives into the psychology of Brexit! The insecurity, the hubris, the victim complex, the arrogance, the belligerence, the delusion, the sheer puerility of it all.  
20 new residential towers are being built in Frankfurt because of Brexit demand  
Why am I not surprised that the Daily Mail chose to put a photo of a teenage Meghan Markle on their front page instead of reporting that May and Davis have agreed a £50bn Brexit divorce payment... 
As £50bn Brexit bill is roughly £1,000 for every British voter. How wd last June have gone if that price tag was on the balllot paper? 
On my way to @talk radio to talk about possible agreement on the Brexit Bill. Looks like we've caved.so should we be paying what could amount to 55B Euros? 
Brexit:1) A coordinated exploitation of xenophobia2) A unicorn with a windmill on its back3) A derogatory term for awful negotiating acumen4) Slang: “A huge mistake” 
Whether complete fiction or based on a true incident this old exchange is a fine example of English arrogance, and a good metaphor for Brexit.  
Grayling first Brexit Cab minister out today - ‘the price is meeting our obligations’ - ‘I m not talking numbers’ but ‘we need to leave on good terms’ ...this may have been grinding on for so long that rebellion over bill is v muted 
About those #BrexitReports, @DavidDavisMP ... #Brexit #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Brexitshambles #EU #FBPE 
The price of a deluded imperial vision of Great Britain post-Brexit, £45 Billion as well as a loss of influence and trade. 
Britain is unwell and the Brexit drugs won't work  
We were always going to have to pay. If we had done it earlier we could have focused much more diplomatic effort on looking at the Brexit/Northern Ireland issue.  
Brexit for slow learners : ministers were told months ago that the Brexit divorce bill  would be 40 - 60 billion Euros  
This is the moment a Brexit voter told Nigel Farage he’d now vote Remain because “of the mess you’ve caused”.  
Dear Prime Minister May, Liz and one can help no further. One is now virtually out of warm, cuddly Royal announcements to distract the British Public from Brexit. Apart from two days next year for the new sprog and the wedding, you’re on your own now - unless one pegs it 
The economic consequences of Brexit  via @FT None of which is good news 
Any politician with any guts would say: “Brexit is a huge mistake. I cannot impoverish my children and grandchildren. We must think again.” 
Crash of pound shows we are at mercy of what the world thinks of UK. Irrelevant if people think Brexit is OK. Rest of world thinks it's shit 
Problem with parliamentary debate on #Brexit studies is that they all want to keep studies inside Westminster bubble. But we all need to know what the impact of Brexit will be. The #SecretStudies must be published! 
With every day that passes Govt’s approach to #Brexit looks more and more like ‘Emperor’s New Clothes’. People seeing right through it & Govt looking increasingly foolish.  
As predicted by '#remoaners', #brextremists were wrong about power balance twixt UK and #EU27.How long before #NHS gets promised £350M/wk if UK must pay £50bn #Brexit-bill?Either #Tories knew (and lied to us) or were grossly criminally incompetent.#R4Today #BBCbreakfast #lbc 
Strip away the layers and Brexit becomes ever more murky @thatginamiller is right about dark forces behind what is less of a democratic decision and more of a soft coup #StopBrexit 
#Finalsay #StopBrexit #BrusselsProtestPlease join your new friends in Brussels to protest Brexit 11/12/2017  
#Finalsay #StopBrexit #BrusselsProtestIf it's not broken don't Brexit.......  
So the Brexit divorce bill is £50bn, there will be no £350m a week for the NHS and there will still be freedom of movement of people for some time, fell for a blinder didn't you brexiteers?  
Strip away the layers and Brexit becomes ever more murky | Gina Miller  
Either @DavidDavisMP has produced heavily redacted impact studies, which shows contempt of parliament, or the government has not carried out proper assessments of Brexit impact, which is criminally reckless. I don't know which is worse. 
Gotta believe that #Brexit is behind the fall in job vacancies exposed by the latest @adzuna data. The most reliable job data in the uk 
What military incompetence can teach us about Brexit | David Boyle  
Good morning, Brexiteers. Could I just check that the additional funding available to the NHS as a result of Brexit so far is, er, minus £50bn? 
Morning! Leavers sticking Brexit would cost Britain £50bn down the side of a bus would’ve produced a different result. Discussing on @GMB in a mo 
From @LiamFox visit to @LowyInstitute UK/Aus dialogue. A mental change of gear, though #Brexit still a hot topic! Enjoyed the discussion.  
Govt didn’t think it fit to give sixteen to eighteen year olds a vote in EU Referendum ...but that hasn’t stopped @Theresa_May saddling them with debt for years to come.#DivorceBill #CalamitousToryMess.has saddled Sixteen to eighteen year olds with £billions debt 
Britain close to deal on Brexit bill with EU: sources  
Commons Speaker says Government faces contempt of parliament unless full Brexit impact files disclosed  via @LondonEconomic 
If parliament has another vote on the Brexit damage cover up, we want another fucking referendum 
What a day: Brexit Ballistic MissileBitcoin 10k  
Quick prediction. Within days, or possibly hours, Senior Brexit Ultras will be using the Govt's agreement to the Financial settlement as a pretext to call for that same Government to walk out of negotiations and precipitate a Kamikaze no deal Brexit. 
I'm certain it's mock surprise and indignation, designed to inflame Brexit Ultras and get them to put pressure on for a walk out of talks, esp if Ireland stands firm. Appalling stuff really. 
Southern Culture™ is ignoring the fashy home counties then blaming the north for brexit 
We can save all this wasted time, effort & money Chris, simply by giving the Ppl another vote; a Binding #FinalSay in 2018 to Confirm #Brexit or #StopBrexit & #Remain in the EU.There's no way 37% of voters backing Leave in a non-binding Ref can be the final Will of the Ppl. SOS 
Hanson “wanted it to go to a referendum to address it under the constitution”. You can’t have referendum to give parlt a power it already has, Pauline. 
Dear god, @PaulineHansonOz is still banging on about a referendum, carts and horses. Get in the bin. #SenateQT #MarriageEquality 
English people blaming Irish people for their idiotic decision in the Brexit referendum is why I can't sleep tonight 
Ransom and blackmail to be paid to the EU in a Conservative suicide note on behalf of the British people in Theresa May’s final Brexit fling?  
Industry bosses demand answers over what migration rules will be after Brexit  
Britain and the EU are closing in on a financial settlement over Brexit  
Brexit Britain, the only place in the world where turning your country into an international laughing stock is called "patriotic"  
David Davis said the 58 Brexit papers were in "excruciating detail". Now Keir Starmer tells us they barely fill 2 lever arch files. 850 pages/58 = <15 pages per topic. That's less than I would have written in a university essay. #FBPE 
Some of you may accuse me of being hyperbolic, but I truly fear the outcome that a hard border and Brexit will have on NI. We're facing economic destruction and mass unemployment - both known factors that contribute to increased civil unrest, sectarianism and political violence. 
"In the era of Brexit and Donald Trump — a time when we’ve seen an increase in racially motivated crimes, hateful rhetoric and fear mongering — Prince Harry’s union with Ms. Markle is not only a bold antidote, it’s astonishingly political."  
Churchill literally called for a United States of Europe. Read his Zurich Speech of 19 September 1946. His grandson, @NSoames fought for Remain in the referendum. You need to brush up on history & current affairs!  
@RCorbettMEP Can't help thinking that Cameron ought to have published Brexit Impact Studies WAY BEFORE 23rd June 2016#ToriesOut 
From raunchy poems to an anti-Brexit poster: Meghan's VERY revealing online pictures  
Good call. Meanwhile, #Brexit is slated to be responsible for spike of #TokenGhetto boys. 
No, you twit. Ireland didn't poison British politics. As a colony of Britain its role in the relationship was mainly passive. Where did YOU learn Anglo-Irish history? Most English people know little history since their studies are restricted after age 15, partly explaining Brexit  
And still Brexit politicians plough this inane unchartered, unplanned, unfathomable exit from the EU....Despite so many unanswered questions:WhyAt what costWith what impactFor whose benefit  
Last observation before bed. Reading loads of people in disbelief at how the WM gov. is treating the Irish over #Brexit/borders & I agree it's awful. But it pales in comparison to how they treated Scotland during the #indyref. 
Strip away the layers and Brexit becomes ever more murky | Gina Miller  
Genuine question: how has the hardest interpretation of Brexit --  leaving the Single Market and Customs Union, which was barely discussed in the campaign -- become politically impossible to climb down from? 
brexit is a very delicate political situation, some really unhelpful comments from the queen of england today  
#TonightTV3 #RTEPT #PKNT #TodaySOR #Liveline #MorningIreland #BBCR4today #BrexitJust when you thought some UK politicians couldn’t be any more out of touch with reality or had reached peak arrogance, along comes Iain Duncan Smith with this gem......  
Brexit talks: for all Britain's bluster, the EU has it over a barrel  
A brilliant article from @ChrisDeerin on Brexit.It perfectly encapsulates the state we are in and what millions of us feel about it. 
There should be a Remain option when Parliament votes on Brexit.MPs vote on this soon. And the petition calling for it is up to nearly 25,000 signatures. 100,000 gets the petition debated. So sign, RT & share to help #StopBrexit. 
Brexit Explained  
Translation - "Th wa to avoid a border in Ireland is to stay in the single market but I'm going to use lots of big words and hope none of my hard Brexit supporters notice".  
Keir Starmer keeps pressure on David Davis over edited Brexit papers  
It's “remarkable” that the government has rejected a referendum on an Indigenous voice to parliament and has put no other options on the table, @LindaBurneyMP tells @PatsKarvelas: 
We've resloved the #Brexit border issue:  
About that £50bn Brexit divorce bill, here's our story from July by @alexGspence and @AlbertoNardelli.Response at the time? "That figure does not reflect the views of Theresa May or her closest advisers, a spokesman for Downing Street said." 
Certain members of the Labour Party are a disgrace. Criticizing the cost of Brexit divorce bill & “that there won’t be the ‘£350 million’ a week left”; yet they have done everything possible to make it easier for the EU to hype-up their demands. 
Melanie Phillips thinks issues around Irish border are attempt to reverse Brexit. @IanDunt: “That is tinfoil hat conspiracy theory nonsense”#SkyPapers 
Not a constituent but thanks anyway for speaking out against Brexit and in the national interest.  
The Irish are incredible aren't they? First they force us to vote for Brexit, then they insist on a hard border. Unbelievable. Couldn't make it up. 
On #channel4news this evening, Iain Duncan Smith looked and sounded really rattled on #Brexit - a much diminished figure and voice, sounding like a man who's run out of excuses. 
[#Brexit & #RoO] UK-based carmakers: "We won't find enough local parts to qualify for UK's future FTAs". EU-based carmakers: "We will disqualify ourselves if we keep using UK-made engines". 
The Dutch parliament's Brexit team have warned no-deal is a serious possibility and urged government and businesses to prepare for it  
FFS we’re going to pay for Brexit, a fuckin boat for her maj, a royal wedding, a clock, a decaying auld mausoleum of a Parliament, the DUP fuds to prop up a shambolic government that WE didn’t vote for. Waken up Scotland!! 
You're supporting a Hard Brexit, despite promising that it could never happen, and you're complaining about Remainers flip-flopping? Really!? 
Now watch how quickly the Twitter hive-mind goes from "You're blocking any chance of a deal, you hard Brexit morons!" to "Ha! Caved in! Pathetic!"Some people, it seems, are morose by nature 
Divided Britain, where the Brexit alarm is sounded but no one wants to hear | Rafael Behr  
History will sadly judge EU Referendum Campaign to have been one of the most dishonest & frankly reckless by government and Leave campaigners who seem woefully unprepared for Brexit outcome and made false promises of sunlit upland economy with unshackled UK from EU rotting corpse 
David Davis said this before he withheld the Brexit impact assessments from the public for no good reason other than to spare the blushes of the Brexidiots...  
I love how some political journalists are using the phrase "I have learned tonight..." regarding the new developments on Brexit. Yes, they learned it from @pmdfoster, the @Telegraph's Europe Editor who broke the story at 5.45pm this evening. #CreditWhereCreditIsDue 
Should David Davis in time honoured fashion be thrown into the Tower of London for contempt of parliament for not providing the Brexit impact assessments? 
.@IanDunt on Brexit bill: “We were assured by Brexiters, over and over again, that we had the power in this dynamic... We’re now in the situation where we’re paying exactly what they asked for.”#SkyPapers 
£89bn financial settlement to leave. Insane. How did this happen. Disaster for UK. #Brexit 
If Government can rerun this legally binding vote, why can't they rerun the advisory referendum as well? 
UK and EU agree Brexit divorce bill: UK newspapers  
I'm actually more pissed off with the British people over #Brexit than the shyster politicians and the press. If you read the Sun or Mail you've chosen to eat shit and deserve what you get. It's the rest of us I'm angry for. 
Uk to pay a gross financial settlement of £89bn to the EU.What an incredible waste. 254 instalments of Boris Johnson's promised £350m NHS funds post #Brexit 
Sweeties, what’s the problem? Considering Brexit will be such an amazing success, can’t we learn about that amazing success?  
Where did it say that on the referendum? It only said leave the EU, and we were told by leave we could stay in the customs union and/or single market. Regardless, it might be what the UK wants, but it is not what NI wanted. 
#FBPEMay and Hammond both know that #Brexit will be a disaster yet they continue to press on.There must be an alternative agenda.It will involve money, sex and power.I have never in my 50+ years seen anything as disgraceful as this in government #FBPE #StopBrexit 
"Taxpayers deserve to know why Theresa May thinks this Brexit bill is worth it" #premium  reason! 
Ok @theresa_may and @Conservatives I'm with Mike. I'm not paying for your Brexit. In fact none of us will pay for it without a damn good fight. If you want civil disobedience/riots carry on.ONLY alternative, stop Brexit. Or let Brexit voters pay for it if they want it so badly.  
.@vincecable on Brexit bill: 'The true cost of Brexit is becoming clearer by the day. This underlines why people should have a referendum on the final deal with the option of an #ExitfromBrexit.' 
So no extra money for the NHS or anything else for decades. Confirmation of the lie at the heart of the leave campaign. Those who voted for #Brexit were conned! pic.twitter.com/KVnfg5Ptrv 
Diane Abbott says she would back referendum on final Brexit deal  
U.K. and EU negotiators have reached an outline deal on a divorce bill. Here's how the pound reacted to the news  
Daily Mail: American tourist on holiday in London. Daily Express: Diabetes story. Neither want to mention £100bn Brexit bill. They don’t want to show their readers that UK isn’t ‘winning’.  
#UK : An election victory by Jeremy Corbyn could pose a bigger threat to British business than Brexit, a City investment bank has warned its clients.      #fo2eu 
Why not cancel Brexit and spend the £50 billion on the NHS instead ?  
Boris was right. The Brexit bill of 100bn is roughly 5 years of 350m per week, just as the bus predicted. 
On *just* the BBC tonight, Ireland characterised as EU pawn, "running scared of the IRA", about to be sold out by the other 26 states, "unstable" & "delusional"Fasten yer seatbelts, folks! #Brexit 
Nicola has been party to fibbing since the great fib that was Scotland’s Future and the non-existent legal advice she yapped about prior to the 2014 referendum.  
Wednesday's i: "Brexit divorce bill deal is 'close'"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @MsHelicat) 
Theresa May previously told a nurse that "there is no magic money tree" to end their 7 year pay freeze. Yet, she has miraculously found £1 billion for the DUP and £57 billion for a Brexit divorce payment.Apparently, the magic money tree only grows money for bribes and stupidity. 
Consultations with businesses and the likely consequences for them should be obvious. An OBR assessment of likely outcomes from no Brexit to no deal.Legal advice on extracting the UK from the EUAnd, speaking from Belfast, what to do about the border 
What a farce Brexit is. £60bn bill to divorce the EU. £60bn that we could have spent on our own country not leaving in the first place. To make matters worse, 7yrs of Austerity where we are told there's no money to spend but have no problem finding £60bn for Brexit. 
The British people voted for Brexit & placed our faith in government to deliver it, today we hear they're offering £50bn in ransom for trade talks to commence, this is a betrayal too far & we must apply pressure to PM. 
Channel4: "Hello random intelligent young British person. Brexit & borders are a hot topic. Could you draw the border between Ireland & Northern Ireland?Person: "Certainly".......  
UK could pay £50bn Brexit divorce bill after bowing to EU pressure  
Pro-Brexit MPs want a second parliamentary vote on the 58 Brexit sector analyses because they dislike the result of the first one.They should accept they lost and get over it, and stop moaning.Oh.ht @DavidLammy 
Britain 'to assume €100bn EU Brexit liabilities'  
Editing the Brexit Impact Statements to protect UKs negotiating position presumes EU can't deduce the effects for themselves.Nice try David Davis, but unfortunately they're not nearly as stupid as you. :-/  
UK #Brexit divorce bill is £50bn +That wasn't on the side of the busTomorrow's Guardian  
Time to make the Brexiteers take responsibility for this expensive mess: next Wednesday my amendment (new clause 17) would ensure MPs have to vote specifically to authorise the ‘divorce bill’ £bns. Boris et al should be made to own this debacle #Brexit  
This £40billion government sellout to the EU will unite the British people in disgust  #Brexit 
This is a good piece of work and worth reading. Brexit is already costing £300m per week. When are our MPs going to wake up and do the right thing?  
Potential EU leaving names. Brexit, meet Oui Out, Polskedaddle, Czech Out, Quitaly, and Swedone.  
A sample of the analysis awaiting you via @Channel4News. Apparently the Irish lost a referendum they took no part in  
From "go whistle" to "here you are" in four top @ft Brexit bill stories:the original scoopthe first E20bn offergove and boris signal they will go above E40bnthe end game 
AWOL as usual, - but only when it counts. We need the Remainers to get a collective spine and coalesce around @vincecable and kill off #Brexit. #FBPE @ChukaUmunna @Keir_Starmer @DavidLammy @Anna_Soubry 
#Brexit - supported by Trump, Murdoch, Farage, Rothermere, Johnson, Putin, Desmond and other charlatans. You have to be seriously fucking gullible to believe in bastards like these. 
No matter how fucked up the Tories are, as long as @jeremycorbyn maintains his position on Brexit, @UKLabour had better prepare themselves to not be in government. How mad is that? 
Wednesday's Metro: "'Divorce deal for Brexit is reached'"  #BBCPapers (via @MsHelicat) 
“In the referendum that we had just a year ago 70% of Labour held constituencies voted to leave the European Union. This is something that very many people when they encourage Labour to try and scupper Brexit are completely and simply ignoring”#LIVE #Brexit  
Britain set to agree Brexit divorce bill with the EU, and at a huge cost  
Brexit Explained  
£55 bn (if it is as low as that for the #Brexit divorce bill) is £350mn per week for 3 years, 1 week and 2 daysAnd that's just the downpaymentReal financial cost will be slowdown in economy announced in the Chancellor's Budget last week. #ThinkAgain 
If companies like Tunnocks had supported independence we may have gotten a Yes vote.We would have remained in EU.Our currency would be more valuable than pound thus imported ingredients would be cheaper. Tunnocks also wouldn't be a facing a less regulated Brexit marketplace  
Wednesday's FT: "Britain bows to EU on divorce bill in search of Brexit breakthrough"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @MsHelicat) 
It's truly pathetic how Remoaners are quicker to abuse Leavers for voting for #Brexit in a democratic election than expressing disgust at @theresa_may for handing over £50billion of our money to the bullying EU. 
Patrick Blower on the UK EU agreement over the Brexit Bill – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
#Ford  issues a warning about the catastrophic impact of a no-deal #Brexit on Channel 4 news, which unlike BBC TV news, gives appropriate priority to the seriousness of the #Brexit idiocy. 
BBC News - 'I gave up my job to fight Brexit'  #stopbrexit #LoveEU #Remain 
Haha my old friend Martin - a great hack who taught me how to read company accounts - draws by far best border (only one to include Donegal). Some of responses are woeful #brexit  
Again. We are not paying for "access to the EU". We're paying for an Article 50 deal - ie a transitional period that avoids a chaotic No Deal Brexit. Any trade deal will come later.  
Steve Bell on the growing pressure on David Davis over Brexit reports – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
So much for telling the EU to "go whistle" over the Brexit bill, Boris...Britain has just whistled away £57 billion because of Brexit.  £57 billion that could have gone to the NHS.Put that on a bus, Boris.  
Lots of people doing a bad take on how Brexit bill cash could've gone to NHS instead. No, it was cash that had already been earmarked for EU. Cash that could've gone to NHS won't because of lower growth post-referendum. 
Dear Philip Hammond,I do not want my hard-earned taxes to be used to pay for a Brexit divorce. I pay taxes willingly to support schools, hospitals and those less fortunate than myself. I’m sure the 17m leave voters are prepared to pay the £58,383 each to back up their decision. 
30% of the beef herd, 20% of the sheep, and 60% of the fish landings are in Scotland.Brexit will hit Scottish agriculture hardest with tariffs of up to 50% 
The similarities between the behaviours of pseudo-religious cults and Brexitists are way too numerous to discuss in 280 characters; if you watch Theroux's recent film on Scientology, you can play Brexit bingo with some of it. 
The full cabinet today approved the UK’s complete offer for the first phase of Brexit talks, I have learned. Read about it here  
"Britain has bowed to #EU demands on its #Brexit bill, removing a key obstacle to a divorce deal."-@FTPrice-"100 billion #euro.But will, try and pay less."UK is the supplicant. Not the EU.Outplayed and Outclassed.#DavidDavis 
So, Mr Davis @DavidDavisMP, how has your day been so far? You realise you cannot lie or cheat your way out of this, you are undone. If you have even the slightest shred of integrity left you need to come clean about Brexit and acknowledge it is in nobody's interest to pursue it. 
David Davis at risk of contempt over Brexit impact reports, says Speaker.MPs need to keep holding this government to account. Take back control: #StopBrexit. 
But the British ‘government’ - that cheating minority ‘government’ run by charlatans & crooks - is trying to hide the truth about Brexit impacts. The *dies irae* are coming.  
BREXIT BETRAYAL: Appeaser Theresa Agrees to Hand Over €45-55bn to the EU, Cover-up Planned  
Yet another unintended fuck-up consequence of Brexit: creating a new rabidly nationalistic crop of Irish people, just as we were all turning into West Brits 
I have found the last horcrux of Brexit. If we destroy it the north is ours  
.@jk_rowling, Russian interference and the deleted @DanielJHannan Brexit post. (Statement from Reaction, following full inquiry.)  
After creating an awful lot of fuss & achieving precisely nothing, it seems Britain is surrendering over the Brexit bill  
Well said @darrenpjones MP. Brexit is causing pain now and for generations to come.“I would put the national interest first, revoke article 50 and stop this Brexit period before it causes any more damage” … 
It's all beginning to add up when you start to join the pieces...Farming, Flying, Trading, Banking, Pharmaceuticals, Automotive industry, Fishing, Environment, Health Services, Global Control & Influence, Economic growth. the £ etc...one big #Brexit debacle..best we #StopBrexit. 
BREXIT SELL-OUT? May 'to keep final deal SECRET from UK public to avoid political row'  
Strip away the layers and Brexit becomes ever more murky | Gina Miller  
Watching this & other recent UK declarations on Ireland feels like living with someone for years, knowing everything about them including their grandmother's birthday, only to realise that they still don't even know how you like your tea#brexit   
UK and EU agree #Brexit divorce bill that could reach £57bn. This was about the size of it all along, so all the histrionics have merely trashed goodwill and undermined negotiations without reducing the bill 
Brexit bill could reach £50BILLION under an 'agreement in principle' A bill has not been produced, neither have we got our Trade Terms!Silly May!  
Ian Duncan Smith tonight accused Ireland of “showboating” over #Brexit because we have a presidential election coming up. There are no words..... Oh, wait, there is one: Eejit 
It is becoming clearer that Brexit, in the end, will be an operation to deliver almost what we had previously, but at a cost of a huge amount of time, money, energy and opportunity. Well done us. 
I cannot believe that people are blaming the Irish because the Tories have made a mess of Brexit. So everyone knows Ireland is it’s own Country. It has 32 counties 26 are Southern Ireland  & 6 counties are under British rule. Ireland is in the EU. SIMPLE 
.@FT “Letters” features a rather apt note by Chris Huhne on #Brexit and Ireland’s moral high ground @campaignforleo @simoncoveney 
On c4 News, IDS said that Ireland is playing politics over Brexit because it has upcoming presidential elections. 1. That election is in Nov 2018.  2. The president in Ireland has no power 
Toyota boss, SMMT President Tony Walker: “a hard Brexit would undermine all we have achieved... PM has embraced transition, we need concrete progress, transition shd be on current terms and crucially not time limited” 
Ignorance is bliss and that old hag is proof. Many many more where she came from unfortunately. She is under the impression that the Republic had a vote on Brexit. Ive said it many times, schools need to teach politics to their children to eradicate this madness. 
How long before @DanielJHannan takes the Katie Hopkins approach of deleting all his past history?Hannan is rapidly progressing from one of the alleged 'brains' of Brexit to being one of its career casualties.  
The main reason, I believe, that resistance to Brexit hasn't diminished as the govt had hoped, is that it is that all aspects of it are such a profound assault on common sense, rational thought and honesty. 
I agree w/Peter. Especially with Brexit, WM is NEVER going to let go of Scotland. It's certainly going to take very brave leadership to lead us to independence.  
My fav. was the lady who said "they lost, they have to lump it, you can't have everything you want in life , you know!!" Is she for real?? It betters belief the total ignorance of some people. Lala Brexit land. 
This is a staggering cave in and a national humiliation. It removes at one jot any claims Brexit made on any subject. We will never recover this amount. Far from it, we are buying our way out of the best possible deal. A national disaster.  
Brexit bus update: “Let’s take the £57bn we could spend on the NHS and spend it on Brexit instead”  
Britain and the EU. Well I think the 48% shouldn't be expected to pay any of the £50,000,000,000. Get it from the 52% who were stupid enough to vote for #Brexit. 
the old women in the red hat is definitely a brexit believer; it's demonstrated by the arrogance, ignorance and sheer idiocy that she manages to display in about 30 seconds. 
Adding insult to injury: After being ripped off by the EU for decades, British taxpayers will now be forced to fund a c.€50billion 'divorce bill'  #Brexit 
The smell of desperation - UK and EU agree Brexit divorce bill that could reach £57bn1 week to decide the border issue & citizens rights & can start talking trade! Might as well cave now, save yourselves some time.  
My position remains that there is no 'good' Brexit, but some versions of it are substantially more damaging and harmful than others. It should be stopped. If it can't be, harm from it should be minimised. 3/ 
And I am genuinely glad. Even as a committed Remainer, this removes one of the factors that would lead to a Kamikaze no-deal Brexit happening. That would be the worst of all outcomes. 2/ 
Exclusive: Diane Abbott tells constituents she would back referendum on final Brexit deal  
Anyone trying to attribute the blame for the state of the economy solely on #brexit is either being deliberately misleading or has been deliberately misled. Brexit hasn't caused this mess, the government and Cons @Conservatives have. Don't let let them pass the buck. #ToriesOut 
Prompted by @jk_rowling have launched top-level investigation into how @DanielJHannan Britain after Brexit piece for @reactionlife was deleted. May have been Russian interference. Or sustained editorial incompetence. The piece is back up: 
Boris, Gove and other Leave campaigners never said there would be a big divorce bill to pay -quite the opposite. This big new fact means the £350m extra per week for the NHS -without which Leavers say they would have lost the referendum- simply will not happen. V. significant 2/2 
#Brexit divorce bill:We started with:Go WhistleThen £18bnThen £40bn-Now £54bnShambolic  
In Brussels, Juncker and Barnier crack open their third bottle of the EUs most expensive champagne and raise a toast to the UKs Brexit impact assessments & the stupidity of our MPs. 
BREAKING: @FT on UK’s #Brexit divorce bill: “Negotiators are working on how to present the settlement as a net estimate, with the UK side pressing for an implied figure of between €40-45bn once UK receipts and other deductions are taken into account”  1/2  
What does #Brexit mean for the #GoodFridayAgreement?@DPhinnemore and @hayward_katy have presented their findings in Brussels: #LoveQUBResearch #LoveQUB 
To start paying for the 50 billion Brexit bill, can we start by getting @Nigel_Farage to give his redundancy and pension (for a job he never turned up to) to the NHS please? 
For British friends who cannot read the 58 Secret Brexit impact Studies: the European Parliament provides a very useful service.  
UK and EU agree Brexit divorce bill that could reach £57bn  
The difficulty of finding a Brexit divorce bill analogy, when nothing like this has ever happened before  
If Brexit was going to be a success, money would now be flowing in & the £ would be soaring. Money talks & money is saying this is all shit. 
"There is no magic money tree""We need 50bn for the DUP""Yeah""And 50bn for this brexit nonsense""Fine""And the NHS needs...""THERE IS NO MAGIC MONEY TREE" 
I see David Davis is in trouble for redacting the Brexit impact assessments.  
More important than ever that Irish government stands strong against any movement in #Brexit talks before agreement is reached protecting all-Ireland economic, social & political framework. 
The Guardian view on MPs and Brexit: no hiding place for the facts | Editorial  
Spot on about May's Brexit betrayal. Churchill would be turning in his grave at her abject surrender to a foreign dictatorship.  
after brexit we can finally drop the ludicrous "metric" system and go back to good old-fashioned British measurements like a pound for a pound and 2 stones for 3 leaves and .20 clams per bones 
#BREXIT #PATRIOT #PritiPatel @patel4witham: “I don’t like spending money so I would have told the #EU in particular to sod off with their excessive financial demands”   @theresa_may @Conservatives #Conservatives #BBC #SKY #TORY #NEWS #EU #Brussels 
Who would have guessed? The Legatum Institute sends out a press release based on the Legatum's own prosperity index saying British economy is in tip top shape post-Brexit. 
Over 70 people fighting brexit in @ZacGoldsmith's constituency tonight - nearly double his majority... 
David Miliband is absolutely right not to accept Brexit as inevitable, endorsing a second referendum and believing that the ideal outcome is obviously that Brexit doesn’t happen.  
Woah!!!!!!!!!The Tories have agreed their EU liabilities and Brexit bill and it’s a hundred billion €100Billion!!!!!!!!  
Google questioned by UK election watchdog over Russian meddling in Brexit  (via @christocarbone) 
Oh god the @houseofvoltaire and @fantasticman Brexit merch by @jeremydeller  
Incredible bit of Brexit spoofology by Ian Duncan Smith on @Channel4News:Cathy Newman: what about Ireland? They might veto talks?IDS: well there’s going to be an election soon...CN: Not now there won’t...IDS: oh I’m talking about a presidential election. 
What I like about #Brexit is now the rest of Europe can experience  the clueless high-handed nonsense that Scotland has had to put up with for years from Westminster!! 
A cameraman who covers N.Ireland and Brexit said he can't find 'Welcome to Northern Ireland' signs to film for his reports. They don't survive in the borderlands.Those who would erect physical border infrastructure should take note. 
The UK & the EU have agreed a deal on a brexit bill. We have all been betrayed by Theresa May & the Tories. We legally owe nothing at all & the money should be spent on the UK. Disgusting stab in the back, our Parliament is the most corrupt on earth  
It's Boris & Gove undermining the PM's negotiations, not the #Brexit impact reports which the govt are seeking to cover up. Please RT:  
But Remainers should not get their hopes up.Every crisis, every fail, every unforced error - none of these make Brexit any the less likely.The UK is out of EU on 29 March 2019 by automatic operation of law, unless something exceptional (and not yet in view) happens. 
Britain will not get a #brexit with dignity. We are no longer a great power and will fade into the sad twilight life of has been nations. 
This is what you get when the woman negotiating Brexit campaigned on the same side as the faithless cowards who thought leaving the EU would turn Britain into Somalia.  
OUTRAGEOUS! The so called #BREXIT divorce bill seems to have been agreed by the #Conservative gov’t.... at somewhere between £45 billion & £55 billion of our money! Or around £850 from every man, woman and child in the U.K.! 
The Leave campaign was keen to use the gross figure to describe how much Brexit could save us to spend on the NHS.So it's only fair we use the gross figure for the agreed Brexit exit bill. It's €100bn  
£100 billion #Brexit divorce bill says @FT plus £billions for contingency planning - the true cost of this shambolic #Brexit policy @Open_Britain 
Speaking exclusively to Channel 4 News, Steven Armstrong, @Ford boss in Europe, the Middle East and Africa, says a hard Brexit could be "disastrous" and added that if Britain doesn't remain competitive, then Ford could rethink its plans to invest in Britain.  
Ford Europe says hard Brexit would be “disastrous” for UK car industry. Dyson says it would be fine. Ford manufactures a lot in the UK. Dyson manufactures nothing in the UK. Spot the difference. 
Reports are that Britain’s Brexit divorce bill could be up to €55bn. What for?  
The UK pulls a Full Tsipras. #Brexit #Kolotoumba 
"Terms of #Brexit bill agreedFinal figure will be between €45bn & €55bn"This is scandalousWe shouldn't be giving the grasping EU a brass farthing of our hard earned taxesWe should offer a free trade deal & walk away.EU would soon come running.@AMDWaters@ForBritainParty 
Britain and the EU have come to a settlement-in-principle on the Brexit bill. €50 billion - making the Tory Brexit obsession the most expensive tax avoidance scheme yet. 
Stay calm. If the government does not sign a deal, it will not survive. And if push comes to shove, no deal likely means no Brexit.  
Breaking News: Britain has bowed to EU demands on its Brexit bill, removing a key obstacle to a divorce deal.  
It’s not undemocratic to say: Britain has made an awful mistake over Brexit. We should halt this car crash in its tracks, apologize to the rest of the world and sort ourselves out.  
Britain and the EU have 'agreed a €50 billion Brexit divorce bill'  
Irony alert: Some MP's have today been saying we need to have a second vote in Parliament about the Government publishing the Brexit impact studies because they didn't like the result of the first one and they won't respect the will of sovereign Parliament demanding publication 
A £50bn Brexit divorce bill could provide the NHS with £350m for 143 weeks.  
Brexiteers: WE WANT TO TAKE BACK CONTROL OF OUR BORDERSIreland: grand, what’re you going to do about this one?Brexiteers: NOT THAT ONE YOU POTATO EATING SAVAGE. #brexit 
The Telegraph are reporting our ‘Brexit Bill’ will be up to €55bn. I’m on @LBC at 7pm - you won’t want to miss my reaction. 
Pound soars against the euro on #Brexit divorce Bill agreement. 
Forget Trump and Brexit and all that, the thing I hate most about 2017 is getting vaped in the face. Fuck OFF 
"[Exit] terms were agreed easily enough."The fantasy land of an easy Brexit.  
The U.K. and EU agree on Brexit bill in a breakthrough, Telegraph reports  
The OECD have confirmed #Brexit is already damaging our economy. No-one voted to become poorer, and people have the right to keep an open mind on whether leaving the EU is really best for our country.  
The irony is that people who recognise the idiocy of leaving will be compelled by conscience and common sense to defend a £50 billion bill to people who don't.(On the grounds that while it's much, much worse than Remaining, it's infinitely better than a 'hard Brexit'.) 
Well, well, well the real cost of #Brexit is becoming clear.  Scotland must now consider a different path  
From that piece by @DanielJHannan from last year on Britain after Brexit. Completely wrong. On every single assertion.  
Delighted to meet up with Border Communities Against Brexit @BCABforEU today in Westminster as they highlight the catastrophic implications for border communities due to Brexit  
Proceeding with #Brexit without even bothering to examine its impact is the height of #Government irresponsibility 
EU: 50bnUK: Whistle!EU: 50UK: 20EU: 50UK: 30EU: 50UK: 40EU: 50UK: Split the difference, 45?EU: 50UK: 49?EU: 49.5Telegraph: May wins stunning concession in Brexit talks!Sun: Up yours, wossname!  
Corbyn is worse threat than Brexit, says bankOh no he's not, says hospital 
2 Lever Arch files? Is that *it*. The sum total of our governments analysis on brexit? The Chilcot report on the Iraq War was 12 volumes. Two binders? After 18 months? By an entire department? WHAT. THE. FUCK. HAVE. THEY. BEEN. DOING? 
UK bows to EU demands with breakthrough offer on Brexit bill  
The 'Will of the People' provides a  democratic sounding excuse for delegitimising and suppressing democratic opposition. It is a tool of dictators and demagogues and is absolutely toxic to democracy. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Hilary Benn tells @skynews the “Government decided to edit, to fillet, to sanitise the Brexit material” says Davis must explain why 
REMINDER: 71% of Brits regard a Brexit bill of £40 billion as unacceptable.  
UK TO PAY BREXIT BILL OF AT LEAST €45 BILLION  
Tory MEP calls for Northern Ireland referendum on membership of the EU customs union and single market  
A digital copy of the Brexit impact studies would have revealed the dates of creation. More attempts at a cover-up then.  
Theresa May has ‘no plans’ for a lot of things... bank holidays, Brexit, the economy forecast 
The trouble DExEU is in over these incomplete Brexit studies reminds me of the Blackadder episode when they have to rewrite the dictionary overnight. It's as if Davis gave officials a bag of scribbled fag packets and said "quick, put them in some binders" 
Pound pops higher as Britain and EU agree Brexit divorce bill. Apparently there is an agreement in principle to a €60bn financial settlement according to sources on both sides.  
Meanwhile... the Irish border question is now the only issue stopping Brexit talks from moving onto phase 2  
The current Brexit papers farce is typical of the Tories whole approach to Brexit:- Ignore an issue until the last moment- Then take a foolhardy position to avoid Cabinet rows- Get caught in a mess and spend time fixing it- Try again, having wasted precious time on #Brexit  
Kate Hoey calls for Ireland to pay for physical border in event of 'no-deal' BrexitI wonder if this has anything to do with her unusual stance??? 
Just spoken in Commons Budget debate. Focused on alarming growth forecasts that mean living standards won’t go up for years & public services face cuts for years. With UK economy so weak, it’s time to stop this risky, dangerous Tory Brexit #exitfrombrexit 
I hope the British public won’t have the true costs of #Brexit hidden from them by Ministers. Public have a right to know how much it will cost - and the right to think again and change their minds  
Redacted and incomplete documents have been given only to Brexit committees, not to Parliament, and only in a closed "reading room". This is contempt for Parliament.  
What are the odds on the BBC news not mentioning David Davis fudging the #Brexit impact reports and being in contempt of parliament. 
Important point here - Parlt cannot stop Brexit without the Tories, an extraordinary and helpful GE result or the ref the LibDems have always stood for.  
Ministers could trigger new vote to avoid full release of secret Brexit papers  Are there any lengths that this government won't go to? So much for the prized parliamentary sovereignty, taking back control & democracy. 
Jeremy Corbyn becoming Prime Minister is a more serious threat to British business than any kind of Brexit, a leading investment bank has warned... 
Someone pour Theresa a glass of wine  Exclusive: Britain and the EU agree Brexit divorce bill' | via @telegraph 
"Britain and the EU have reached an  agreement-in-principle over the EU’s demand for a €60bn. financial settlement." Should have agreed to a figure in pounds as will be worth 20% less by the time Brexit goes ahead. If it does go ahead 
#GBPUSD According to the Telegraph -> UK, EU, reach agreement on Brexit divorce bill  
Did Russian meddling sway Britain's Brexit vote? Facebook says it will cooperate with a parliamentary inquiry  
"Brexit preparation has been squeezed into two lever arch files... woefully unprepared". How MPs reacted during Urgent Questions earlier in Commons.   
The UK's EU departure date is only 16 months away. In the 17 months since the Brexit vote, comically little progress has been made. 
For goodness sake Dan, it is called the Internal Market! You have been a part of it since 1973, setting the rules and standards, together with your European partners. Now you are voluntarily marginalising yourself from the d-m table. Can’t have your cake and eat it too. #brexit 
David Davis and his excruciatingly detailed Brexit studies: a timeline. 
Brexit-as-Imagined...vs Brexit-as-Found  
#BREAKING: Britain and the EU agree Brexit divorce bill  
Ireland was always going to be an insurmountable problem due to its complexity, but Farage's Brexiteers thought it would be simple, because that's what they are.... 
The Electoral Commission is probing Google over Russian meddling in Brexit - Business Insider  
Britain, you're being idiotic over #Brexit, says @PennyRed :  
For the first time in his otherwise pointless life, Julian Assange could actually do something useful if, with his  Russian pals, he leaked the unredacted Brexit impact reports. 
Secretary Tillerson comments on #Brexit during his remarks at @TheWilsonCenter. 
Another notch in my theory that many Leavers are moving to Remain but it’s the reverse trend that means aggregate polls are only slightly in favour of Remain. Is Brexit still the “will of the people”?  
Sinn Fein – IRA Threatens Violence over Brexit 
As David Davis fails to release complete #Brexit impact assessments, the #EU Parliament decides to openly release all of its own.Britons now have to look to Europe to understand how Brexit might effect UK economy. The irony isn't lost on us.  
If anything shows that Brexit has absolutely nothing whatsoever to do with parliamentary sovereignty, it's the Brexit Secretary threatened with being held in contempt of Parliament after defying a binding parliamentary vote. Couldn't make it up.  
Inexplicable that the European Commission waited 17 months to tell the UK that we won't be allowed to host European Capital of Culture in 2023 because of Brexit.  
UK banks 'strong enough for no-deal Brexit', following Bank of England stress tests on the UK's top ten banking institutions, reports Sky News.This news comes after the World Trade Organisation's assessment that a no-deal Brexit would NOT be the 'end of the world' for Britain. 
Who didn't know David Davis would be a disaster 'leading' #Brexit? Who didn't know Boris Johnson would be an appalling Foreign Secretary? The Prime Minister, that's who. #ToriesOut asap #Labour IN 
Leave.EU are desperate that nobody sees the Brexit impact reports, especially the British public.Just why could that be I wonder...?  
Back from the Brexit hearing on the environment. It’s not looking good folks, lots of complicated problems thrown up by Brexit (and that’s just the environment). We need a ratification referendum on the final Brexit deal.  
Big FT story coming tonight on the #Brexit divorce bill which will put @BorisJohnson £350m claim in the context it deserves..... 
We're increasing UK's involvement in European music industry networks on behalf of UK artists because we think it's crucial to have strong links with European promoters & festivals in the context of Brexit. Share the news and get involved!   
Hans-Olaf Henkel, a German MEP, blamed Brussels for Brexit saying they changed the game after Britain joined the EU  
 Dear @DavidDavisMP: share the Brexit analysis with the public.  
David Davis is at risk of contempt of parliament over Brexit impact studies. Does the public have a right to see these reports?  
In what sense are Labour the official OPPOSITION? Yet to oppose the government on any Brexit vote, instead actively supporting their position. 
Well they will be with over 80,000 vacancies in our NHS and the 96% drop in EU citizens registering to work in it since the EU referendum. The cuts to nursing bursaries also mean hard to see how will be resolved…  
The cruel and inevitable reality of Brexit dawns: it will hit the most vulnerable the hardest.  
Plenty Brexit impact assessments floating around EU and EU countriesIreland: Netherlands:EU Parliament: -economy: - Agriculture: - financial services:  
'You're doing Project Fear!' Jo Coburn tears into Owen Jones in explosive Brexit debate   
Interesting indeed. Seems to tally with projections showing Brexit hitting poorer ‘Leave’ areas much harder than wealthier ‘Remain’ ones.  
Just a reminder. Since the Brexit vote last year the EU has not reformed or listened to any of the concerns Brexit or Remain voters had. 
OK kids, fun's over. Tillerson tells EU and UK to resolve Brexit 'swiftly and without unnecessary acrimony' - AFP 
Order of the OTT: LSE';s Nutty Professor Claims "Brexit Is Our Vietnam"  
We're proud to be pro-life! A referendum on the right to life is going to take place within the next 6-7 months; stand up for mothers and babies; be proud to be pro-life and talk to your family, friends and neighbours in the importance of saving the 8th amendment!  #savethe8th 
For those interested, read here for Northern Irish sanity on Brexit. Important that NI Assembly backed @allianceparty am for NI to stay in Single Market. Arlene Foster + DUP do not speak for the majority of NI citizens. #Brexit  
David Davis accused of keeping voters 'in the dark' over edited Brexit impact studies 
.@Feorlean calls for Brexit analysis to be shared with public and full version to be given to devolved administrations #Brexit  
Scottish Brexit minister @Feorlean’s letter to @DavidDavisMP calling for full Brexit analysis to be shared  
WALES: Welsh Government set to open offices in Canada, France, Germany and  Qatar in a bid to boost trade and inward investment post-Brexit.  
The EU has openly and transparently published all its reports. If #Brexit's so great, I for one, want to be adequately prepared for the downpour of milk, honey and unicorns from its bountiful coffers. 
Remainer MPs, with straight faces, pretending they could be trusted with confidential material re the Brexit negotiations 
UK should be asking for an annual payment FROM the EU for a free trade deal.Can anyone explain the mystery of why the UK Gov is so pathetic over #Brexit?most Tory voters voted to LEAVE.they can't be happy with the supine surrender they are witnessing by their Gov  
Tory and Labour did the #BetterTogether double-act, but now with their Hard Brexit and leaving Customs Union they have become #DamagingTogether esp to Scotland. #DamagingTogether 
'You're doing Project Fear!' Jo Coburn tears into Owen Jones in explosive Brexit debate   
When I was in Barcelona speaking to senior politicians the Referendum process in Scotland was constantly referred to. They believed Spain was a democracy and they could not conceive that people would be brutalised by the state for voting. Nor could I.  
David Davis has either lied about the Brexit studies looking into economic impacts of Brexit in 'excruciating detail' or he is lying about them never existing. It's one or the other. Either way it shows the disarray the Brexit team is in. 
Contempt of parliament used to mean imprisonment in the clock tower of Big Ben. Maybe Brexit will be worth it after all. #DavidDavis#BrexitReports 
Ministers are holding Parliament, and more importantly the British people, in contempt. Voters have a right to know what #Brexit is going to mean for them and their families  
Corbyn is more DANGEROUS to UK than any Brexit: Morgan Stanley issues warning on leader  
Chaos in parliament over the #Brexit impact studies - and still 7/9 @BBCnews ‘top stories’ are the royal wedding, and *none* on parliament. 
UK government on verge of contempt of parliament for not releasing Brexit impact assessment studies. Meanwhile, in the non-transparent EU.....  
John Whittingdale rightly fears Eurofanatic MPs will leak sensitive information from 1000 page Brexit economic impact assessment.  
The cost of Brexit: the story so far.  About 1.3% of GDP (or £300 million/week).   This estimate, using "synthetic counterfactual" quite similar to those using other techniques. pic.twitter.com/7fGMXsFOSc 
That's a sad article. I'm sorry you feel that way, Chris. But for me, Brexit is still one of the greatest things that has happened to this country in my lifetime & my tears remain tears of joy. I hope one day you'll feel the same joy about our nation xx 
After Brexit we set sail for America, says May 
Labour MEP points out that no Brexit supporting MEPs bothered to turn up at the Brexit hearing on the environment and health. Do they not care about this issue? 
Is it me, or does the establishment try to push a new narrative everytime their attempts to derail Brexit fail? Despite what they want you to believe, we LEAVE voters knew what we were voting for, we listened to both sides of the argument and decided to vote LEAVE.  
.@hayward_katy: Pushing Northern Ireland to decide whether to be closer to Britain or Republic of Ireland "contravenes the spirit of the Good Friday Agreement" #brexit  
Just a THOUGHT !I wonder if the amount we owe the EU in terms of our #Brexit liabilities will feature in #Budget2018 next year ?ANDNo prizes for guessing who will bear the brunt !#JustThinkinAloud innit. 
Conservative Lord Higgins says incompleteness of Brexit studies suggests govt resolved to leave single market "before they had all the information available" 
Euro Quote of the Day is Brexit minister Robin Walker on the redacted reports:  
Surely obvious what these hitherto redacted Reports contain: Almost unanimous demands from all sectors of UK trade & industry that we remain in Single Market & Customs Union. Brexit fanatics are at war here, & they know it  
Want to make a difference in the fight against Brexit? Why not attend @BestForBritain a “barnstorm” training event?Find out more: 
.@TheBMA now raising Brexit and Irish question. Dublin hosts the only children’s cardiology unit on the island of Ireland. LondonDerry serves radiotherapy for a population of 1/2 million across border. Lives are saved with cross-border health services. No hard border. 
Voters have the right to know the impact of Brexit based on the analysis carried out by their Govt, & that Parliament is being informed  
EU DEMANDS extortionate RANSOM money in return for trade talks...Priti Patel: "My views on money are pretty clear, I don't like spending money so I would have told the EU, in particular, to SOD OFF with their excessive financial demands"#Brexit #EU 
David Davis at risk of contempt of parliament over Brexit reports, says Speaker  
And there it is. Sinn Fein's not-so-subtle threat of violence if there's any harder NI/RoI border. This is what they mean when they talk about #Brexit damaging the 'peace process'. UK Gov must NOT bow down to Sinn Fein/IRA threats.  
David Davis is set to face a Commons Committee over his botched release of the Brexit Impact Reports. The government could be in contempt of parliament...  "Take back control, take back our sovereignty"??? Tories have no respect for parliamentary sovereignty. #BrexitShambles 
SPLURGE: Brussels is spending around €600,000 on an EU guesthouse. No wonder they're desperate for Brexit cash! 
"David Davis" there is no point trying to hide the fact that #Brexit is SHIT. It's quite clear for anyone with a shred of common sense & decency to see that we must stop driving headfirst to economic, social, political, environmental and cultural suicide.#StopBrexit #DavidDavis pic.twitter.com/4UXdkNpEQY 
Yes I was quite incredulous at the Minister's total failure to even engage with my question about the seeming absence of #brexit impact assessments for Scottish economy #BrexitImpactReports 
The UK's election watchdog has now questioned Google over Russian meddling in Brexit  
#Brexit is proving hugely divisive, but it is also bridging the political divide. Three SW MEPs have united over concerns about Kremlin meddling in the #EUref. We're demanding action. @ClareMoodyMEP @juliegirling 
"We have not edited or redacted reports... we have collated information in a way that doesn't include some material."The under-secretary for Brexit responds to an urgent question about why key details of Brexit impact reports will remain secret.  
11. And of course, just supposing the government's Brexit impact assessments really DID consist of no more than 2 lever-arch files ... government would be hopelessly unprepared and Brexit should be stopped *immediately* until proper assessments were done. 
Political will required to protect Good Friday Agreement from Brexit - @M_AndersonSF  
If there has been a cover up to prevent parliament and the British people from seeing the full extent of the damage that Brexit will unleash then there shouldn't merely be resignations - there should be a general election #BrexitReports 
Is this what David Davis is trying to hide? and why has Theresa May not read the #Brexit Impact Reports?  
The big question in the Brexit impact studies scandal is:What, in God's name, is so terrible in these reports that the government risks contempt of Parliament rather than reveal it? 
WATCH: @Keir_Starmer's Urgent Question in the @HouseofCommons earlier today on the release of the Brexit impact papers.  
Some people really hate it when I call far left nationalists who support a racist Brexit "Nationalist Socialists".But sorry ... if you vote with UKIP, talk like UKIP, and still call yourself a Socialist, that's what you are!  
"We must take back control from those who distorted the result of the EU referendum." #Brexit @MollyMEP 
Looking forward to filming Chopper’s Brexit Podcast later this afternoon. Will be available to watch and download on Friday! @christopherhope 
David Davis is treating Parliament with contempt by refusing to release the full Brexit impact reports. Parliament needs to “take back control”, hold him to account, and #StopBrexit. 
Joanna Cherry points out UKGov has wiped key information on Scotland from Brexit impact report.  #BetterTogether 
The criteria used for the BoE stress test (no-deal Brexit test in all but name) are a little disturbing :27% further fall in £33% fall in domestic property prices 40% in commercial property 9.5% unemployment rate 4.7% fall in UK GDP 
Reading the news, about Brexit mess & Trump awfulness, with facial expressions provided by Fra Angelico:Unconvinced  unimpressed  totally overwhelmed with rage & despair.  
I’ve got hold of the conclusion of David Davis’ redacted Brexit impact report:Brexit will be a total  █████ People are going to be much ███ because of it. Should we go ahead with it? Do bears ██ in the woods? 
Thread: This is extremely serious. Govt may have deliberately misled Parliament.Govt: We have excruciatingly detailed Brexit economic impact reports. Parliament: You must give them to the scrutiny committee. Govt: We've been clear all along - there are no reports.  
Because, to them, it doesn't matter. Brexit is a goal worth securing in and of itself and no price is too high. For them, the 'sunlit uplands' and unicorns were just sugarcoating for the masses; they genuinely don't care what happens, as long as Brexit happens.  
Peter Schrank on the effect #Brexit might have on the border between North and South in Ireland - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
All these impact assessments support the work of the European Parliament. Under the terms of #Article50, the European Parliament must consent to any final UK-EU agreement:  6/6 Ends. #Brexit #EPonBrexit 
Davis is summoned back to give evidence to MPs on the mysterious Brexit papers - while all MPs will get the chance to look at the versions that have been passed over, so their findings more likely to leak - has govt managed to make what was already a messy situation even worse? 
And the @EP_Environment Committee are holding a workshop on the impact of #Brexit on the #environment, #PublicHealth and #FoodSafety, LIVE now:  5/6 @CharlieBEU @ginny_acha @AdinaValean 
The European Parliament also organizes regular Brexit hearings and discussions which you can watch online - @EPInstitutional committee have a workshop today at 3.30pm GMT on the implications of #Brexit for the #IrishBorder. Watch the #livestream:  4/6 
Having heard about impact of Brexit on food safety we’re now hearing about environmental impact. I cannot see any Brexiters in attendance. Watch live here:  
He can run but he cannot hide indefinitely. David Davis HAS to face the Exiting EU Committee, the Speaker has ruled, and do so 'quickly'. So no sending weak and feeble deputy Robin Walker. Hilary Benn and co will be ready and waiting. End is nigh for Davis and hopefully Brexit.  
The biggest story in all of this must be that the government appears not to have sought to inform itself as to the potential consequences of Brexit. Not before the Art 50 notice and not to inform the strategy for the negotiations with the EU. 
It’s clear now the Article 50 letter was written without even a basic understanding of the economic implications of #Brexit. There needs to be a stronger word than incompetent. Criminally negligent probably covers it.  
.@jon_bartley was on #skydebate this morning calling for a ratification referendum on the final #Brexit deal. Watch here   
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
1 in 6 people in US get food poisoning every year. Just 1 in 60 do in the UK. Food safety standards post-Brexit must not be lowered @michaelgove @WhichUK 
It's not often we agree with Jacob Rees-Mogg, but he's absolutely right to urge Gov't to release the Brexit Impact reports in full. Pls RT:  
Ireland’s deputy prime minister resigns in a move that is likely to avert a government collapse, snap election that could have threatened #Brexit talks  
Brexit must be stopped, and the best way for that to happen is for this government to do the decent thing: withdraw Article 50 and fall on its sword. It’s not as if the administration is long for this world anyway. We can turn this around, and we ought to-  
Leader of Wandsworth Council has met with representatives from @The3Million to discuss how the council can support the borough's residents who are EU citizens during Brexit uncertainty.  
Brexit minister "Robin Walker" Speaking today 28 Nov 2017 "We have not edited or redacted reports...we have collated information in a way that doesn't include some material."  
David Davis dealing with questions about the Brexit impact papers.  
Join us on 12 December for a special panel discussion on Brexit and the Irish Border. The event will take place at 7pm @HCAatEdinburgh and is open to all. More details here:  @irlscotland #irishstudies 
"We're being diminished in front of our own eyes, in real time" @chrisdeerin on the Brexit tragedy  
Whichever genius came up with using the nineteenth century "humble address" binding motion for disclosure of the sector reports deserves a constitutional prize.Cat, meet the Brexit pigeons.This is chaotic. 
Redacted Brexit reports spark new row in UK parliament  
Venezuela and Russia teamed up to push pro-Catalan propaganda during the referendum  
Morgan Stanley comments are perfectly rational - City can survive Brexit ("a disruption") but a Corbyn/McDonnell government would indeed constitute a much more significant threat to our economy and financial stability. 
Cost of Brexit vote so far: 1.3% foregone GDP growth. (This is an excellent way to measure Brexit costs/benefits, simply explained too)  
There are some that argue that monarchy protects us from  having a leader like #donaldtrump well it didn't protect us from the inhuman poverty of the great depression the excesses of Thatcher the Iraq war austerity the racism of the right or Brexit. #princeharry 
5. So (a) unless government manage to get a new amended binding motion, and (b) if Brexit committee say disclosure so far insufficient, then real prospect of contempt motion. 6. Government is in a serious hole here.7. Bercow is playing a blinder. An outstanding Speaker.2/2 
Scottish Government also not happy with info they've been provided in relation to Brexit analyses - writing to David Davis today to call for the bits that have been left out 
David Davis told Parliament that the Brexit economic impact studies existed in "excruciating detail" and the PM had read summaries. Then he says that they never existed. The Govt are in contempt of Parliament and if they believe in parliamentary sovereignty should publish in full  
What a complete cock-up the Tories have made of Brexit  @BrexitBin @smburningham1 @dontbrexitfixit @dorsetnative @chrisfburgess @carolJhedges @DavidoOrr @theskibeagle @lbjfanbigups 
Theresa May is towing the Rupert Murdoch line. He is using his agents Michael Gove and Boris Johnson to dictate Brexit policy - and none of the cabinet are challenging it. #SaveTheUK #StopBrexit #MurdochOut 
BREAKING John Bercow tells Government to meet "very soon indeed" to discuss Brexit papers with Brexit committee chairman Hilary Benn 
10. The Brexit report scandal won't die. There is now no way of killing it. Nothing government now does or says will be believed. This could well be the Iraq War Blair moment for Brexit. 
Of course the EU know precisely what UK's negotiating hand is - the weaknesses and the strengths if any.  So this is utter bull from the Gov.   Brexit STOLE  votes through Lying - a dishonest campaign by charlatans  
David Davis withholds critical Brexit information from Parliament on grounds of commercial sensitivity. Why then must the NHS provide all information when bidding for contracts whilst private companies enjoy commercial confidentiality and often undercut NHS to win the contract? 
Just as any of these “turmoil elsewhere helps Brexit” lines, ask this question:Does any viable alternative to the current government in Dublin have a different stance on the border and Brexit issue?  
8. If HMG hands over the missing Brexit reports grudgingly, they will look dishonest, foolish. If they don't:It means our government is no longer democratically accountable.It means that government ministers, not Parliament, are sovereign.It means we are in a dictatorship. 
What most surprises me about the eurosceptic movement is how, from 1993-2016, it not only considered EFTA to be Brexit, it actively advocated that position. 
'We could see a significant shift in favour of remain next year — and a second referendum.'  
John Whitingdale: 'The important thing here is that we get the Best Poss Deal for this country..'Me: Again #Brexit BS ..we already have the 'Best Possible Deal' in the EU. I'll never give up the fight to #StopBrexit until I hear a cast iron guarantee we'll get a "Better Deal"! 
Shocking that @DavidDavisMP has left it to his junior minister to explain failure to comply with promise to provide #Brexit impact analysis to DExEU Committee 
OECD even more gloomy than OBR: forecasts higher unemployment, weakening economic growth, falling consumer confidence and collapse in investment. UK growth falls to 1.2% in 2018, 1.1% 2019, from only 1.5% for 2017 (1.8% in 2016). Largely down to Brexit, says OECD. 
In any case @Keir_Starmer, do you think your voters are hoping when you get hold of hard evidence #brexit is a bad idea @labour can then justify a u-turn towards #remain? 
DExEU minister Robin Walker squirming, David Davis absent. They’re doing everything they can to avoid releasing the #Brexit impact statements in full. Even Brexiters are annoyed. If not in contempt of the House, they are in contempt of the people @Labour4EU #FBPE 
Jeremy Corbyn is more dangerous for markets than hard Brexit, warns a leading US bank. What's worse - Corbyn, the banks or Brexit?  
Irish Deputy Prime Minister Resigns Avoiding Government Collapse And Brexit Complications  
Excellent piece @EveningStandard by eminent Irish historian Roy Foster of the Irish facts of life for Brexit  
Ireland's outspoken premier left humiliated today by the resignation of his deputy - but fresh Brexit chaos diverted by the departure to the delight of Downing Street:  
Refusing to comply with the expressed will of Parliament, in the name of supporting the true sovereignty of Parliament. Ladies & Gentlemen, I give you our Minister for Brexit.  
.@PeterGrantMP pointing out the irony that Brexit Ministers might well be held in contempt by the very Parliament they wanted to return sovereignty to. What a mess. 
"WE WANT PARLIAMENARY SOVEREIGNTY" wails David Davis for decades... "but I'm not going to let MPs see the Brexit impact reports in full as they can't be trusted" 
With the Tories in crisis and Brexit in disarray, surely time for us to unite against the real enemy: Labour councillors. 
Spot on from Ken Clarke on the Brexit impact assessments. "If the Govt had wanted to ignore the motion, it should have voted against it, and if it had wanted to qualify the motion it should have tried to amend it." 
Starmer says can’t believe that the sum total of the impact analysis the Government has done on Brexit is two lever arch files, less than one of his old crown court cases 
Masterful double-speak from Brexit minister Robin Walker: "We have not edited or redacted reports...we have collated information in a way that doesn't include some material." 
This is getting VERY Yes Minister. Brexit minister Robin Walker says impact assessment not redacted or edited cos didn't exist in current form until requested by MPs... 
Brexit preparation has been squeezed into 2 lever arch files. No wonder govt is caving to EU negotiators on everything. Woefully unprepared 
LEGEND: Big Sam Allardyce backs Brexit. Back of the net!  
In @HouseofCommons to hear about the Brexit Impact Studies. @DavidDavisMP isn't here and Government says they didn't exist! #BrexitShambles 
Showing contempt you mean. So much for Brexit being about restoring the standing of Parliament.    
The Government knows that predicted Brexit outcomes are so calamitous, they’re fearful of sharing even with Parliament.A message in itself.  
Robin Walker - a Brexit minister- admits that civil servants pulled together the info for committee over past 3 weeks. Said documents didn't exist as 58 assessments. 
Another Brexit document which he gone MIA is the Government’s long-awaited White Paper on services especially financial services. Just raised in Treasury questions in the Commons - Chancellor agreed to pursue with DExEU 
Bit of a side note on the shambles of the Brexit “impact assessment” reports, but one takeaway some will likely take is that Davis was bluffing on the UK’s preparedness 
Brexit looking more and more like a COUP by the minute, even co-conspirators like #JacobReesMogg turning on the coup plotters over #BrexitReports, a shure sign this gov't does not represent the people. 
David Davis running scared of Parliament, sending Robin Walker in his place to answer Urgent Question on government's failure to fully publish Brexit impact assessment reports 
Bank of England predicts that under No Deal scenario, the £ and property prices will drop by a third. That is the wonder of a hard #Brexit for you. 
States working against #gerrymandering:By ballot referendum: CO, MI, MO, OH, SD, UT.By study group of lawmakers: LA, IN, MD.By executive power: OR, VA.By lawsuit in state courts: PA.  
Fast forward almost exactly a year. David Davis is answering questions to Brexit select committee on October 25th 2017. Look at the way he answers questions from Seema Malhotra.  
David Davis called in to Commons committee demanding he release Brexit papers  
There's fury in Parliament from anti-Brexit campaigners like @DavidLammy over the secrecy of the Brexit impact papers:  
Facebook and Twitter say they're ready to co-operate with a UK inquiry into Russian meddling in Brexit  
‘What a bloody nuisance #Parliament is to the #Tory government these days, when all the Prime Minister wants to do is get on with #Brexit.’ Read and share @Jon_Danzig’s satirical account of Tory rule. Link:  
As far as we can tell there are also 'no plans' for Brexit, but it seems THAT'S still happening - so let's not rule out the bank holiday just yet...  
Interesting that the BBC call Brexit concerns "Project Fear", yet scaremongering around Corbyn and Momentum are treated as genuine? #BBCDP 
8 hours off will damage the economy.So will coming out of the EU with the Brexit process, as countless studies and experts have predicted, with stories appearing every day on negative impact it's having already. We're still doing that though, right?Swings and Roundabouts.  
Benn and Brexit committee summon @DavidDavisMP to appear before them to explain why he has defied parliament by not giving them all info on impact studies. At request of @Jacob_Rees_Mogg their letter says “you are potentially in breach of parliamentary privilege”!!! 
Who in the Tory party will have the will to put country over party & say "Enough is enough! Stop this madness". Brexit is an outcome of Tory in-fighting, Hard Brexit is more of it - each step makes the UK poorer, less of a world power and doomed for generations #StopBrexit 
Had to leave press conference in London on Launch of Legal Advice showing how designated special status for north to remain in EU can be delivered - after an hour - in goods hands of @ChrisHazzardSF Off to Brussels on Eurostar for #AFCO Brexit & GFA hearing #StandingUpFor56% 
The EU is doing incredible work in Europe and in the rest of the world. We need to make sure everyone knows this, please do your part. If we’re going to win this we need to combat the negative #Brexit mindset. 
The telling story of the 58 Brexit sector analysesNew, by me at @FT 
Brexit to keep hammering down UK growth rates   
UK Banks Can Withstand "Disorderly Brexit" But Need Additional £6BN; $35 Trillion In Derivatives Affected  
i've been playing the long game since i stabbed a dog with a garden fork at my desk in 2001. i hope you're all enjoying the results. sorry about the timing. i didn't mean to obscure the brexit shit-storm. it's a fairly minor superpower. @StephensSimon 
Politicians are Not Sovereign over the people 
Darren Jones MP...been waiting so long to pick up on a speech in Parliament like this...reporting the direct link because this is so important...direct challenge to #StopBrexit..we need this leadership now...#Brexit harms the UK!! 
I support EU membership, but I do NOT support joining the Euro.(I don't think monetary union works without fiscal union)So if you're thinking, "OK we'll Brexit now, but we'll re-join later."... The price for that may be exactly one Pound Sterling. 
Indeed. Time the UK politicians and media stopped with this Anglo-centric view.It’s the failure to recognise that the other side of the table has their own agenda that has crippled brexit thus far. (Well that and UK incompetance). 
David Davis could be in contempt of parliament over Brexit studies  
This is very simple: if you HAVEN'T performed impact assessments on various Brexit scenarios, you are irresponsible and reckless as you have no basis for decision making. If you have but won't publish them, you are dishonest and acting against the will of parliament. 
"The Liberal Democrats want people to be given the facts, so they can decide what they think of the Conservatives’ Brexit deal."@thomasbrake on Brexit reports 
NEWS! Brexit studies redaction necessary to prevent nation getting overexcited about the tremendous possibilities,  
Despite the allegations against the Republican candidate Roy Moore, the Alabama Senate race has become a referendum on reproductive rights:  
Recommended reading ahead of @Keir_Starmer Urgent Question at 12:30 - @davidallengreen sets out all the occasions where @DavidDavisMP told Parliament about the existence of Brexit impact studies that he then said do not and never existed.  
Did @DavidDavisMP lie to Parliament when he told the Brexit Select Committee the reports existed in excruciating detail and the PM had read the summaries, or did he lie to Parliament when he said that the impact reports never existed?  
Sir Keir Starmer will challenge ministers about the secret Brexit papers in the Commons today after the Speaker granted his request for an urgent question  
Increasingly clear that the Government knows how bad #Brexit would be, is intent on concealing the impact, & being driven by fear & political considerations, not the wellbeing of the country.  
Today's Urgent Question from @Keir_Starmer on the release of #Brexit Impact Assessments is expected at 12.30pm.  
.@M_AndersonSF & @ChrisHazzardSF fielding questions from international press in London today at launch of legal case for Designated Special Status for the north after Brexit.  
Do you think David Davis has heavily redacted the Brexit assessments bc they are unbelievably good & will give the UK an unfair advantage in negotiations with the EU or unbelievably bad embarrassing Brexidiots & putting Brexit at risk? 
‘Brexit is happening so let’s get behind it’ is like saying ‘yes, we got sold a bus with £350m on it but it’s empty so stfu & lets all push’ 
Irrespective of one's position on #Brexit or party loyalties there is a case on its face that1) DD lied to Parliament.2) DD acting on behalf of Gov is in contempt of Parliament.If these actions have no consequence then it is a major turning point for UK Democracy. 
Russian interference in the #Brexit campaign is not a tinfoil hat conspiracy theory. It happened & it needs to be properly investigated, writes @MollyMEP. 
Fixed it for you:BREAKING Leave-supporting DExEU Secretary David Davis  forces urgent question request after his failure to release the 58 Brexit papers correctly, in possibly contempt of the House. MPs will debate it at 12.30pm today. 
"We should have a ratification referendum on the final #Brexit deal with the option to stay in the EU." @jon_bartley #SkyNews 
Another potentially devastating impact of #Brexit. New stats show Britain is 2nd largest beneficiary of EU research funding. Our schools and unis now in peril.  
Looks like Iceland has given more thought to Brexit that UK.  
The EU are completely open about punishing Brexit Britain for voting to leave the EU.  It's certainly not free to join & it would appear you are not free to leave either.  
Chancellor committing £3bn to Brexit spending is an unnecessary waste of money when our public services desperately need funding. 
So... the barney over the Brexit documents goes up a notch with Speaker granting @Keir_Starmer urgent question over sags 
BREAKING Remain-supporting Speaker of the House of Commons John Bercow grants an urgent question on the release of the 58 Brexit papers. MPs will debate it at 12.30pm today. 
Speaker grants Starmer an Urgent Question to Brexit Secretary in the Commons to answer re fulfillment of the binding vote on publication of Brexit sectoral studies. 1230 
One of the biggest of many big Parliamentary scandals in this sickening time - the cheat on the Brexit impact studies - and what are the newspaper front pages full of - ? If I believed in conspiracy theories ... 
It is clear that during a negotiation, there is some sensitive information which must remain confidential. MPs must respect this when considering the Brexit sectoral analysis papers.  
Shortly after telling Parliament that the secret Brexit reports did exist in "excruciating detail" and that the PM had read the summaries, David Davis changed his mind and said that they don't exist and they never did exist. An Orwellian attitude to the truth.( @DavidLammy ) 
WATCH: @JamesMcGrory on why the 30m people working in the 58 sectors covered in Brexit impact reports should get it see them. Please RT:  
Facebook to hand over details of Russian-backed Brexit posts  
This article is fundamentally flawed. If May's government collapsed, Labour could not "take over Brexit" without a coalition partner. And all potential partners (apart from the Tories) are for Remain  
In essence: the 58 sector analyses became something the government could refer to against it being said not enough was being done to prepare for Brexit.But ministers assumed the analyses would never be disclosed, and so could be bigged up.And then... 
The Irish question may yet save Britain from Brexit | Polly Toynbee  
UK Government may be keeping MPs in the dark over Brexit but today MEPs from all 28 member states will hear from experts on impact of Brexit on the environment & public health. Watch live from 1.30pm UK/ 2.30pm CET  
Brexit is British imperialism & xenophobia rebranded as exceptionalism. 
1. Crispin Blunt talking bollocks: It's clear that A50 is irreversible. We voted Leave therefore Parl or the People are not allowed the option of #RemainMe: Utter nonsense...it simply #Brexit supporters wishing it to be...legally it is reversible #Brexit can be stopped. 
Call me crazy but withholding information on the impact of #brexit from the same public that was given the responsibility for voting for it is a tad conspicuous. 
In summary:Me: "Have you done any Brexit impact assessments?"@DExEUgov: "Yes, loads, in excruciating detail. We're on top of it"Me: "Ok, can you publish it so we can see it?"@DExEUgov: "No, it's secret"Parliament: "Publish the studies"@DExEUgov: "They never existed, sorry" 
Is it possible that @DavidDavisMP should also be investigated for misconduct in public office? #WolchoverAction are pressing for same in regard to ministers misrepresenting the referendum result. This makes a 2nd instance. Culture of impunity now embedded in @Conservatives. 
Good article. What a complete cock-up the Tories have made of Brexit  
Since the June 2016 referendum, UK GDP has fallen by 1.6% - the equivalent of £300 million per week or *£60 billion* by the end of 2018 #Brexit #economics 
Communism worse than Brexit, top investment bank boffins warn. 
Hi, are you aware that a Parliamentary debate on a 2nd referendum is happening on December 11th? Please can you help me ask people to add their voices to those calling for #FinalSay on any Brexit deal? Thank you. #CheckBrexit #FinalSay 
#Brexit was always gonna be a cock-up..It'd have been a cock-up in the hands of someone actually competent..You can't polish a turd..#stopbrexit#BrexitGate@dontbrexitfixit@Andrew_Adonis@RemainingKind@spaceangel1964@IanDunt @HardingMike @Keir_Starmer  
》Parliament is sovereign.》Government uses advisory ref to force through constitutional change.》Government passes bill giving it power to change/write law without parliament.》Government refuses to inform parliament about impact of Brexit.》Is parliament still sovereign? 
Brexit will inevitably destroy the Tories in any event. To my mind, that's a very good thing. But I would prefer that it didn't destroy the UK in the process, which means it has to be stopped. Stopped dead. 
(17) The Government then said they needed 3 more weeks, claiming that there had been "some misunderstanding" about the impact studies. No, the only misunderstanding was the Brexit Secretary misleading Parliament and the public 
What have other countries do when a referendum goes against the national interest......cancel it. 
(16) Things then took a turn for the worse. Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW questioned the patriotism of MP's asking about the impact assessments, asking "which side are you on?". Erm, on the side of parliamentary sovereignty, just like you said you were! 
DAVID DAVIS: “Who are you going to believe over Brexit? Me, or numerous official reports that have been deliberately censored to withhold negative information about the impact of a political folly that requires ignorance to succeed…?I think the answer is obvious.” 
Scoop from @MarkDiStef: Facebook and Twitter are co-operating with the UK parliament's fake news inquiry – and will hand over Russia/Brexit info next month.  
Brexit: Each little crisis adds up to a whole picture  
Poll.Have your general political inclinations moved in response to Brexit?I’ve moved to the left but I’m curious to see what my typically centrist echo chamber says 
Corbyn becoming PM is 'worse threat to business than Brexit', says bank  
If you still think Brexit isn't a coup, then please explain why our Parliamentary Select Committee on Leaving the EU can't see the government's unedited impact reports  
Simple summary of the research paper I tweeted yesterday estimating the cost of the Brexit vote: £300m a week.  (Simpler still, perhaps the researchers could rent a bus to display the number?) 
If the allegations of Russian interference are true, the #Brexit vote would be utterly invalidated, says our @MollyMEP 
Another frustrating Brexit 'debate' this morning; can the DUP finally outline how a North South border can be grand & seamless, but an East West border is intolerable & unworkable?   (without recourse to insults about the Dublin government or beating the drum on Irish unity)  
Ireland will shed 2.5% of its workforce in event of hard Brexit, according to new @cepr_org projections. Germany will lose most jobs overall. But UK hardly coming out of it well either. Conclusion: 'There are only losers from Brexit.'  
Lord Tebbitt speaks for many of us who Voted Leave. #Conservatives #Brexit  
Important letter by Ambassador @AdrianGONeill in today's @thetimes. Now is the moment for 'creativity, imagination and courage'. #Brexit  
Time is running out on Brexit. We need all politicians to put country before party.  The truth is what matters, not saving face 
Not sure I've ever said this before (or will again) but I agree with Jacob Rees Mogg. Unlike other Brexit enthusiasts, he is at least consistent about Parliamentary sovereignty. 
(12) So on 1 November Parliament votes unanimously for the Government to hand over the impact studies, unedited and unredacted, to the Brexit Select Committee. Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW says "There has been no suggestion of redaction" 
Just some of the reasons why the Brexit ref was flawed ☟  
》Advisory》No thresholds》No supermajority requirement》Millions disenfranchised》Leave "victory" 5 million votes short of 67% consensus won by Remain in '75》Binary question flawed as no distinction made between hard/soft Brexit》Many of Leave's claims outright lies 
'I would have told the EU to sod off over Brexit divorce bill', says Priti Patel  
(9) David Davis confirmed to Parliament (Brexit Select Committee) that the reports existed, but that the Prime Minister had not in fact read them  
A summary of our report on the potential implications of #Brexit for Iceland is now available in English @IcelandinUK @UKinIceland @IcelandMission  
WATCH: on @GMB this morning explaining how it's Boris & Gove undermining the PM's negotiations, not the #Brexit impact reports which the govt are seeking to cover up. Please RT:  
Do you want to know if the acolytes & political commentators who support Corbyn’s Brexit stance,are being principled or politically opportunistic?Ask yourself this, If he said tomorrow “ we should stop Brexit” would they answer “ no Jeremy, we can’t it’s the will of the people”? 
ps.Fwiw, as there is almost no evidence of significant engagement with any of the 58 sectors, my guess is that the analyses will not stand up to robust scrutiny.Whether devastating or supportive of UK Brexit policy. 
@StephenNolan SF fighting against Brexit every day everywhereDublin Yesterday with lawyers launching legal advice showing special status deliverable London today talking to international journalistsBrussels this afternoon  
So Morgan Stanley say Jezza as PM is a greater threat to the UK than Brexit. A statement of the bl**ding obvious or what!... 
So Morgan Stanley, who the left hold in such high esteem, are now saying that @jeremycorbyn @johnmcdonnellMP and @UKLabour are more dangerous to us than #BrexitThere have been too many warnings now.Can you afford #Labour ?#LabourLies #TheCorbynCon 
Select committees were devised to scrutinise government policy. If the Commons one on Brexit can't have full access to the impact studies then the system becomes utterly meaningless. And the lack of info downright dangerous! 
Priti Patel condemns May's Brexit strategy and says EU should be told to 'sod off' over money - Politics live  
(3) So I started asking questions of @DavidDavisMP and @DExEUgov. On 13 September Brexit Minister @WalkerWorcester refused to acknowledge such analyses existed, and refused to publish them. Same story on 12 October when @SteveBakerHW answered. 
#Brexit Sir Keir Starmer getting on my bloody nerves!!  Talking bollocks everyday trying to derail Brexit. We voted we’re leaving idiot.   
Worried about Brexit? You should worry about Corbyn more warn financial analysts   via @telebusiness 
£1bn Brexit boost as 2 pharma giants move to Britain  
Cheer up Remainers, Brexit will be a liberation   
Amazing how many in UK are only just getting to know that Northern Ireland exists & is part of the UK,that there is a separate Irish Republic,that there is a border,that there was war & a peace process, that the Republic remains in the EU & that the border is an issue for #brexit 
Keir Starmer keeps pressure on David Davis over edited Brexit papers  
From Suddeutsche Zeitung, an establishment paper:“Oh, Ireland. For the first time since the dawn of man, the island has might over the UK (because of Brexit negotiations). And what does Dublin do with this chance? Plunge itself into a government crisis.”  
Eire voted NO the Lisbon Treaty and effectively to leave EU. EU made them vote again and gave them massive bribes to vote YES. Is the EU bribing them yet again to try to block Brexit? 
'Ireland is miscalculating by asking the impossible of Britain. But there is a way out of this Brexit impasse.' read my latest @Telegraph 
3 weeks ago I wrote to the Speaker about this Government being in ‘contempt of Parliament’. They were given 3 weeks to meet the conditions of the Brexit analysis papers motion. This morning it is clear they’ve failed.  
This clip reveals why Brexit is destined to be such a catastrophe. Implicit is notion that Brexit is a series of reasonable choices, to which other countries are responding unreasonably. It isn't. 1/  
Petition to make “is Brexit linked to xenophobia?” the new “do bears shit in the woods?”  
UK banks strong enough to cope with 'disorderly' Brexit, Bank of England says, the UK's top lenders could withstand a 4.7% GDP slump, a 9.5% unemployment rate and a plunging pound. Not so good for the public though ! 
It’s offensive to be accused that I couldn’t be trusted to act in national interest by colleagues of #Brexit Select committee @BBCr4today 
"Ireland should have been the UK’s natural ally on Brexit, and with a bit of care and effort might have helped advance Britain’s interests behind closed doors in Brussels." Very good piece from @thistlejohn 
The EU has behaved like hard Brexit would be relatively painless for EU27. But this paper published by  @VoxEurope suggests otherwise. Via @MehreenKhn 
I don't shirk from the challenge but one of the most unfortunate things about #Brexit is the rapid pace with which a government is having to make hugely consequential policy decisions -domestic and foreign- in such a short order. Little room for normal consultation, scrutiny etc. 
When a man is tired of Brexit, he’s tired of May, Davis, Gove, Fox, Johnson, Corbyn, Hoey, Field, Hannan, Carswell and every other attention-seeking screw-up. 
Blimey. Brexit is savaging the spending power of Britons. This hits the poorest, hardest. Merry Christmas.  
CATALONIA: Ousted Prez signals support for EU referendum. Catalexit?  
Mark Carney now reportedly saying a disorderly Brexit would lead to “lower growth in the short-term” ie not even a recession. 
Today's Brexit News- Davis hands over edited sectoral analysis- May faces backlash after extending EU rule- Priti Patel would have told the EU to “sod off”- Irish government in crisis  
Priti Patel unleashed an attack on Theresa May's entire Brexit strategy saying the government lacked 'conviction'  
People who don't understand what Mark Carney does having meltdowns about Mark Carney doing his job.Brexit is stupid, we won't stop saying it. Get over it 
Very instructive charts that help understand the economics of #brexit 29 charts that explain Brexit  
“Even if the referendum hadn’t been held, the plan was already in place, including an attack on Kirkuk. Had we not been betrayed on Oct. 16, however, their plans to attack the Kurdistan Region and its regions wouldn’t have succeeded.”#TwitterKurds #Iraq 
The negative Partition of Ireland needs recast onto positive conversation - if in doubt - read this Brexit would hit 142 Irish cross-border agreements  
Britain’s Brexit press at it again - Daily Telegraph editor seriously just said “Ireland has poisoned UK politics for centuries” - where do you even start with that?!?!  
I would have told the EU to sod off over Brexit divorce bill, Priti Patel says.  
No you can't see what Brexit really looks like as it might put you off the idea.  
"There is a big cloud hanging over the industrial strategy caused by the major uncertainties around Brexit." @vincecable 
RTE's @tconnellyRTE in the FT today providing in one column more balance and detail on Ireland than a week's coverage in the rest of UK press. Brexit: Britain and Ireland talk at cross purposes on the border -  via @FT 
The issue of the Irish border might look small from afar, but has huge implications. Another of the Brexit nightmares.   
The Royal Weddung swamps the news on the day a redacted document in Brexit is handed to Parliament- possibly in contempt. Coincidence? Balls 
 Your secret studies say you will be worse off with Brexit! We had no idea! We utterly deny it! Dr Fox is even now in Micronesia, negotiating a trade treaty to replace Germany! Where is Micronesia? it is strong & stable! Unlike Germany! 
This is shocking from @sinnfeinireland no basis for new talks? - what about their responsibility to set a govt? Stopping Brexit&Tory cuts that they promised at election time? Ruling out talks without any Plan B is totally irresponsible & exposes inability to deliver & to govern.  
Govt’s redaction of Brexit impact assessments shows they will do what they want and not respect Parl. Primary legislation to approve Brexit deal only way to ensure proper accountability on Brexit and safeguard country from govt over-influenced by ideology not national interest. 
Breaking news: The Bank of England is forcing UK banks to hold an extra £6bn in capital to guard against risks beyond that of Brexit  
This morning a Minister of the Crown is, for 1st time since 1880, facing charges of ‘contempt of parliament’ for not releasing Brexit impact studies unedited - but even this doesn’t warrant ‘top-story’ billing on #r4today. 
Jeremy Corbyn becoming PM is a 'worse threat to business than Brexit', says a bank. Do you agree?  
Mark Carney should have been fired. His hysteria and anti-#Brexit stance is entirely political and everyone knows it. The Bank of England is run by Remoaner Hammond and oh look, more negative claims this morning. 
Tories accuse Labour of “putting party politics before the national interest” for wanting to see Brexit impact papers.Hmmm.....#r4today 
Farage says Britain should NOT pay a penny for Brexit UNLESS promised something in return  
This is OUR future you are editing @DavidDavisMP, release the full Brexit Impact Studies now!   
"I would have told the EU to sod off with their excessive financial demands." And that is why we love @patel4witham #Brexit #TeamTory 
A Tory friend describes Hannan as ‘a fool’s idea of a smart person’. Can see why #brexit  
Wednesday's first @theSNP @HouseofCommons debates since #ge17 focus on justice for @WASPI_Campaign women & #EUNationals - let's hope we get cross-party support & force action from Tory UK Government #WASPI #brexit  
Big story today; Brexit cttee meet 9.30am to discuss redacted impact assessments (58 of them). Ballooning  into big row. All you need to know via @bbclaurak > 
Until such time as proven otherwise, it must be assumed that the contents of the 58 impact assessments are so damaging to the British economy that the government dare not publish them. Brexit must therefore be cancelled as it is not in the best interests of our country. #Brexit 
The Tories are failing administrators. The country can't move to the next stage of Brexit negotiations without the nation seeing the Brexit impact assessments. @Keir_Starmer should fight David Davis for them if necessary 
The threshold of what's considered acceptable conduct in public office continues to fall. Davis won't resign or be sacked over this, just like Johnson hasn't been over Nazanin Zaghari#Brexit has contributed to this decline.  
Dear @chrisdeerin - we may not agree on everything, or even on much, but on this from today’s Herald we can most certainly agree! #Brexit  1/  
This woman is a Labour MP...and clearly one influenced by Trump...MP calls for Ireland to pay for physical border in event of 'no-deal' Brexit  
Sir Keir Starmer says Labour will ask John Bercow if the Government is in contempt of Parliament by handing over already-redacted sector-by-sector Brexit economic impact assessments to the Brexit Select Committee. Parliamentary row ahead. 
My piece in today's @theipaper - we don't want a Canada style trade deal, favoured by No 10, for the UK #Brexit  
LSE Professor has compared Brexit to Vietnam. Violation of human rights and a reluctance to criticise it for fear of being labelled unpatriotic. ‘Taking back control is a long war, fed by scapegoats for failure'. #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit #r4today 
Why not #StopBrexit and rather than wasting 10s of billions on the lies of #Brexit populism, give people real control over their own lives through education & training.#BrexitBetraysBritain 
Here’s my piece in today’s FT on Brexit and Ireland: “Brexit: Britain and Ireland talk at cross purposes on the border” via @FT 
Its very very simple, #brexit can not be allowed to happen.#Brexit means a hard border between ROI & NI.A hard border between ROI and NI means a high probability of a return to the troubles.A return to the troubles means murders and bombs in NI & mainland UK.#StopBrexit 
Keir Starmer in Brexit Papers row: “The govt could be in contempt of parliament, they are clearly treating parliament with contempt.” #r4today 
Nick Robinson, telling Keir Starmer ‘it’s common sense’ to redact Brexit impact reports, doesn’t get Parliament had been promised all of it 
The British misreading of its own history is one of the biggest factors in the Brexit disaster. We need a lot of large, well-polished mirrors.  
Do not get distracted by tribalism. An honest case can be made for brexit (obviously I don’t agree with it). This is about deception - about concealing facts from parliament (let alone the public) and, possibly, contempt of parliament. It is not acceptable whatever your views. 
Signs of a climb down by EU on Irish border in Brexit talks. Inexperienced Irish PM has overplayed his hand. 
Brexit will be a total ████.It will ███████ the UK economy.  
I think for the media it's a story about Brexit. Not a story about lying. That's how low our expectations are of these politicians. The Committee will, I'm sure, try. 
By me for @heraldscotland: I am not coming round to Brexit. I am not making my peace with it  
In the not so distant past, such obvious deception and / or incompetence from a minister would have resulted in instant resignation. There is virtually no integrity left in public life. And before the trolls / bots pile in, this specific comment has nothing to do with brexit.  
... was of course David Davis being exposed as having lied about the Brexit impact reports.  
BC Liberals claim that they should be governing by getting 40% of a 60% voter turnout (or 24% out of the total pool of possible voters). Yet 50%+1 of decided voters is to them way too low a threshold for a referendum. OK got it. #bcpoli #bclib18 
Until he announces a full public reversal of @UKLabour position on  #brexit and they go full #remain I won't believe a word @jeremycorbyn  says#FBPE #exitfrombrexit #StopBrexit 
Love the way Remainers like to pretend there is such a thing as a ‘hard Brexit’. There is only a complete Brexit and the Irish need to waken up to this reality.   
Yeah cos writing a spiteful song slating Brexit voters is really peaceful & highly conducive to healing the division in UK society isn't it Paloma?! 
ICYMI: The Brexit 'impact assessment' row isn't going away"We in the Labour party will raise this in parliament when we know the full picture, but ultimately, it could be a question of contempt of Parliament." - @Keir_Starmer 
Exiled Catalan leader calls for Brexit-style vote to leave EU. 
UK faces chaos at its borders after Brexit warns Turkish Prime Minister. Outside the single market and no freedom of movement means extensive checks are needed at the borders. #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit #r4today 
Notwithstanding that this is contemptuous behaviour (and poss contempt of house), it shows Davis for the grandstanding, untrustworthy fool he so clearly is. It beggars belief he’s been put in charge of anything, let alone #Brexit 
David Davis could be in contempt of parliament over Brexit studies  
Having been deeply involved as a government minister in EU issues and having attended many meetings of EU ministers at a time when Ireland's vital interests are gravely threatened by Brexit and the British government's incompetence I believe a general election is total madness. 
No, Iain - wrong on both counts,   It is #Brexit which is completely mad and now being seen to be so.  The  border issue is about peace , politics and choices.   The freedom to trade without hinderance is the outcome of those choices if made sensibly .  
After TfL’s astonishing comment blaming BREXIT for fall in passenger numbers the District Line continues to excel itself with a slew of Edgware branch trains - well done! 
No European government has prepared better for Brexit than the Irish  
If Bristol Council is able to detect me veering even a micron into a bus lane and send me a fine within 48 hours, the technology exists to manage the NI border. #Brexit 
It's not just an America thing - populism vs elitist establishment is a force that contributed to the far-right Eurosceptics rising in Europe (not commenting on Brexit), because political elites tend to ignore populist tides until it's too late. Especially among the working class 
In the case of working class, they'll take a broad range of populism. Long as they feel they'll actually be represented, they'll vote for Brexit in the UK or Trump in the US, but they'll also vote for Corbyn in the UK or Sanders in the US - don't want Blairites nor Clintonites... 
Great start to @LiamFox visit to Sydney. Media - tick. Business - tick. @BritishChamber - tick. Upbeat convos on #Brexit &  relations.  
As Brexit nears, new London office construction slows: survey  
Governor @PeteRickettsNE was very excited to unveil a new “Choose Life” license plate today. But not as excited as he was to illegally buy execution drugs from India or spend his dad’s money to buy a referendum that brought back the death penalty after the legislature banned it.  
Aerospace is a thriving British industry. What price will it pay for Brexit?  
As #Brexit comes nearer, #UK looks to #Israel as a new partner. 
#DespiteBrexit being brilliant, the before and after doesn't look too good.UK shares vs. Eurozone shares, before and after the referendum.  
Panorama missed the big story. Brexit was driven by fraudulent claims and it will cost the UK many times more that UK £1bn. Those making false claims should be jailed for treason 
Priti Patel: Brussels should be told to 'sod off' over Brexit demands  
Despite the allegations against the Republican candidate Roy Moore, the Alabama Senate race has become a referendum on reproductive rights:  
Thank you...time is running out...damage has been done but we must halt #Brexit somehow. The will of 37% of voters is not the Will of the Ppl. The latter has shifted enough to warrant a #FinalSay with a #StopBrexit & #Remain option. Country before party. 
Oh dear. I guess #Ireland needs to pay the #UK #Brexit reparations, for centuries of oppressing the UK, poisoning its politics, undermining the liberties & generally acting like an imperial hegemony. And let us not mention the things Ireland done to all of its other colonies…  
'This stinks of a cover-up': MPs are furious after the government releases redacted Brexit reports  via @BIfrance 
We’re rooting for you. The Brexit referendum was when half of us woke up in a country that no longer felt like home so we have an inkling how you guys must feel. 
'This stinks of a cover-up': MPs are furious after the government redacts Brexit impact reports.Parliament needs to “take back control”, force the reports to be published, and #StopBrexit.   
Research links Brexit vote to xenophobia and narcissism  via @LondonEconomic 
A fascinating afternoon with former Prime Minister of New Zealand, @HelenClarkNZ. We had a wide ranging discussion covering Parliamentary reform, Brexit, South East Asian international relations, the Commonwealth, the UN and the global financial crisis. I certainly learned a lot!  
Wrote this on 3 Nov - Davis should be removed after lying to Parliament.  We need fact not fairy tales in relation to Brexit  
When you’re flying high in the polls, call a snap election, fail to win majority, have to bung £1.5bn to Northern Irish party to stay in power, and end up with DUP politicians -like this chap- representing your #IrishBorder Brexit policy on #Newsnight.Great job, @Conservatives. 
I love the Union Jack, makes me so proud of Brexit  
Me: Hey cat, what's your opinion on the UK and Brexit?Cat: I think they should repeatedly ask to leave but then when the door is open just sit there and stare at it. That's what I would do. 
Brexit is UK's Vietnam as ‘no one wants to say it’s not going well’, says LSE Professor.  
Perfidious Albion watch.(But shrewd post-Brexit strategy.)  
Is the Welsh brexit vote clear evidence of the power of English media in Wales? If Wales had a strong Welsh media outlet I wonder would it have been more aligned with the other Celtic nations..... #IndyWales 
So the government are refusing to allow anyone outside of the inner circle to read the unedited brexit impact reports. Anyone smelling a rat? 
DUP support for a Hard Brexit has NO majority in NI.  Serious Unionists- farmers, businesses, workers-MUST know that the only stable political & economic outcome for NI is that UK stays in the Customs Union? So unless it is unreconstructed anti-Irishness, why is nobody saying so? 
BBC News - The Brexit 'impact assessment' row isn't going away  but the BBC are downplaying an outrageous abuse of democracy and a clear case of lying by #DavidDavis. Excruciating detail, my ar**. #stopbrexitforxmas 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
This may be of interest - if true, what is being released to Brexit Select Comm is only 16% of the material, which is unacceptable. 
AT LAST! Tonight an MP did what’s right for our country & called for a halt to Brexit. Thank you, Darren. When the reckoning comes, know you’ll be on the right side of history.  
Hard-left Corbyn government would be bigger threat to UK asset market than Brexit, says Morgan Stanley  
From cross-border heart surgery to special needs education for autistic children - British and EU Brexit teams identify 142 areas covered by North Ireland/Ireland co-operation impacted by UK exiting the EU   
No, the sovereign state of the Republic of Ireland is using its membership of the European Union to help defend its national interests. #brexit 
The Irish question may yet save Britain from Brexit | Polly Toynbee  
Aye, after all, it couldn’t possibly be the case that they just don’t want their country fucked up by our #brexit bullshit could it?  
Dear @OwenPaterson You’re on @ViewFrmStormont talking absolute bollocks.The people of Republic of Ireland are EU. The people of Northern Ireland rejected BREXIT. Britain doesn’t land border the EU, here does.Respect the wishes of the democratic wishes of the people here. 
Everything you wanted to know, and everything UKGov hoped you'd forget, about the 58 Brexit studies.  
I wrote a blog post about Northern Ireland and Brexit.  I propose having a referendum in NI on the EU proposal that it remains in the single market and customs union. 
Well said, well done #IrishTimes! Britain looks to you and other Irish newspapers to tell the sobering truth about the idiocy that is #Brexit.  
Corbyn more dangerous for markets than Brexit, say Morgan Stanley. Are they right?  
I think that many Remain voters continue to be taken in by the feeling they should accept the democratic mandate of #Brexit and are unaware of the edifice of chicanery and deceit which makes the whole thing into a mockery of democracy.#StopBrexit 
Sorry Sammy, the Irish are the EU & we're clear we want detail on the future of relations on this island as the we agreed #brexit negotiation timeline  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
It’s gotten so daft, @simoncoveney, who is doing a v good job in Foreign Affairs, sacrificing #Brexit strength for party politics. 
Three weeks ago Priti Patel resigned because she broke the ministerial code by meeting Israel's political elite. Theresa May didn't even have the strength to sack her for it. What is Patel doing today? Criticising her own government for being weak on Brexit. What a state 
Politicians think to the next election. Statesmen and women to the next generation. We're lacking in the latter #GE17ِ #cblive #brexit 
#Nigerian Gov has lost the argument on issue of Biafra restoration it’s high time the international communities and United Nations should take a central role in conducting a referendum between Nigeria and Biafra Enough of injustice against indigenous people of Biafra, #freeBiafra 
Fianna Fail and Fine Gael toying with the country ahead of hugely important Brexit talks. They will both pay dearly for this in the upcoming election. 
Leo Varadkar hasn't walked to the edge of a cliff... Britain walked itself into a crisis of its own making & is now trying to blame the Irish government #brexit  
"The potential damage is catastrophic" - Steven Donnelly TD on possible border controls around Ireland post-Brexit #newsnight 
The DUP re Brexit on #Newsnight - "It works at the moment." Well, yes... we're in the EU at the moment. 
Hope more's going on behind the scenes of Brexit negotiations, as publicly they're truly pathetic. Starting to wonder if our political leaders can really be that inept or whether they're being individually blackmailed. 
The UK is acknowledging that the Irish border question is now a greater threat than the Brexit financial settlement, says @nicholaswatt 
Tuesday's Guardian: "MPs' fury over edited Brexit impact reports"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
New at Jack of KentThe early history of the 58 Brexit sector analyses 
UK says Irish border question can't be answered until Brexit trade talks begin. But Tories pre-empted that by vowing to leave Customs Union. #newsnight 
- the analyses dealt with the "impact" of Brexit on sectors- the analyses were to be complete before notification and before Brexit policy-making- the analyses had been complete before A50/25 
And despite later denials, the analyses were indeed about the "impact" of Brexit.Davis told Commons in Feb 2017: "We continue to analyse the impact of our exit [on sectors] - I think it was 58 at the last count - to shape our negotiating position."/22 
The government again say that disclosure would be prejudicial.  Not even a list of sectors will at that point be published.All the same, for nearly a year the analyses had been bigged up by ministers in response to Brexit concerns./21 
The Guardian front page, Tuesday 28.11.17: MPs’ fury over edited Brexit impact reports  
Me becoming PM is 'worse threat to British business than Brexit'. I hope so.   
Days before the A50 notification, a Brexit minister says DExEU is:"engaging with over 50 separate sectors of the economy, many of which have cross-cutting issues that need to be addressed, to ensure we are in a position to plan for whatever may eventually take place."/17 
The analyses are now described as "wide", "extensive" and "thorough".In February 2017, the Brexit White Paper refers to the the analyses which will "shape our negotiating position."On 29 March 2017, Article 50 is triggered./16 
For a couple of minutes, Liz and oneself mis-heard and thought Prince Harry had proposed to Merkel rather then Markle. Just assumed it was part of Theresa’s Brexit deal.... #RoyalEngagement 
We still need to reach out to more Remainers. The overwhelming majority of Remain voters have little idea of the chicanery driving #Brexit and the consequences if is driven through. If they did our movement would grow hugely.#StopBrexit #Remain 
Polish hooligans recruited by neo-Nazis from Blackburn to fight anti-fascists in Liverpool - An every day tale of Brexit- Liverpool Echo  
The Tories have their heads under a Union Flag pillow with Rule Britannia on loud speaker, hoping it'll all be OK. It's time to halt Brexit. My (rushed!) response to #Budget2017:  
Brexit is a hydra with a hundred heads, all of them spitting poison. Can't believe that any event short of a war or natural disaster could have SO MANY negative consequences in so many diverse areas.And yet this is voluntary. 
I would have told the EU to sod off over Brexit divorce bill, Priti Patel says  
Corbyn more dangerous for markets than hard Brexit, warns Morgan Stanley #premium 
Priti Patel re: Brexit - The government has lacked “conviction and clarity in terms of our end state" and "I would have told the EU to sod off with their excessive financial demands.” An antidote to Soubry, for sure. 
Goldman Sachs and Morgan Stanley were integral in causing the financial crisis. This led to seven years of austerity and under-investment, culminating in Brexit. Don’t forget that 
Cross-border shopping next year #Brexit #Ireland 
Criminal @MorganStanley says Corbyn is a ‘bigger threat to U.K. economy than Brexit’.Why? Because they want socialism just for the rich and free market capitalism for the rest of us.  
I have already written to the Speaker on ‘Contempt of the House’ proceedings on the Brexit analysis papers. Tomorrow I will raise the matter again and ensure this is now progressed. 
Beautiful analysis of the complete cock-up the Tories have made of Brexit. Short and to the point  
@GuitarMoog @JolyonMaugham @IanDunt Davis’ letter to Brexit Committee is his usual complacent condescension. It won’t wash.  
You make programmes that debase & humiliate the working class, then you lie to them over Brexit to fulfil an ideology where people like you can take the credit for rescuing them. They don’t need your humiliation or rescuing. They deserve the truth.  
If ever there was a good reason to vote for the amendment to get the data on gender inequality in our tax system it’s to show them facts don’t have to be scary and feared, they can lead to positive change …if only they had learned that from brexit ey….  
Taking back control: UK will "have to legislate to extend Brussels’ powers in Britain during a two-year Brexit transition period"  
I voted Labour as @emmadentcoad hates Brexit as much as I do. It’s tragic, however, that a vote for Labour is not now a vote to halt Brexit. 
“This stinks of a cover-up”#Government releases only heavily redacted versions of the #Brexit impact assessments.What are they hiding?Shouldn't public be told about the likely impact of #brexitreality?Is #CostOfBrexit rising further? via @BIfrance 
There is a much better than 50% chance that Brexit will not happen. 
Exiled Catalan leader calls for Brexit-style vote to leave EU 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
On Brexit “Sad thing about the Tories they still think they are an empire, throwing their weight around like the schoolyard bully when they no longer have any power”Bernadette Devlin McAliskey  
For a gobsmacked couple of minutes I thought Harry had proposed to MERKEL rather then MARKLE. Thought it was part of the Brexit settlement. #RoyalEngagment #PrinceHarry 
What will be the outcome of the Brexit process 
“I have discovered a truly remarkable Brexit plan which this margin is too small to contain.” 
Neither Govt nor Official Opposition have the solution to UK's #Brexit problem. The first wants to drive us off the Brexit cliff. The second wants to drive us off the cliff and hover for 2 years before also  crashing to the ground. We need a vote on the deal & an exit from Brexit 
PM’s Brexit strategy lacks “conviction and clarity”, says @patel4witham. Leave or Remain, it’s hard to disagree. Designed primarily to keep the Cabinet intact. 
The EU plans to tell Theresa May that the UK will have to extend Brussels’ powers in Britain during the Brexit transition  
Priti Patel: "Brexit is an enormous challenge.... I would tell the EU to sod off". Righty-ho.   
For decades, British politicians have criticised ‘less developed’ countries on the way they conduct their elections & referendums, but Brexit has shown that many of our own politicians are just as bad, if not worse.And what has been their punishment for Brexit lies? Promotion.  
During the independence referendum in Catalonia, Russia used the ‘combination’ (kombinaciya), an operation that integrates instruments such as cyber warfare, cyber-intelligence, disinformation, propaganda and more @MiraMilosevich1  
Meghan Markle was on the anti brexit march 2/7/2016Looks like the whole Royal family are remain That'll confuse Ukip! #FBPE #stopbrexit 
Kate Hoey MP - "The Republic of Ireland is going to be actually even worse off if they veto this and we end up with a no deal because they are going to suffer even more." #Brexit  
Boom. Priti unchained. Ex cabinet minister fires brexit rocket at PM.  
William Hague: Ireland is miscalculating by asking the impossible of Britain. But there is a way out of this Brexit impasse #premium 
Corbyn more dangerous for markets than hard Brexit, warns Morgan Stanley 
BREXIT: This stinks of a cover-up - MPs are furious after the government releases redacted Brexit reports / #Brexit  
It is perfectly clear that the Brexit politicians - many of whom now hold cabinet positions - don't have a clue what will happen with the #IrishBorder. They are simply lying to Ireland and the EU in order to move onto trade talks. It's utterly disgraceful behaviour. 
BFE: Welcome to the Twitter Feed for the Grassroots Voice of Opposition to ALL forms of Brexit! Join us today and connect with YOUR local campaigning group!  Then listen to our partner SMR's current show for FREE:  … … #StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/5byha8lQUZ 
The Irish are now the Brexiteers' Mexicans. Britain's going to build a wall and make them pay for it. What a post-imperial basket case the UK is. #Brexit 
Now ministers are keeping parts of the Brexit Impact Reports secret from Parliament. So much for Parliamentary Sovereignty and taking back control.Release the reports and in full and give MPs a vote to #StopBrexit. 
Jonathan Arnott MEP - "The UK needs to send that message very clearly and very firmly and basically call the EU’s bluff on a no deal scenario." #Brexit  
This is absolutely right. The BBC mustn't be intimidated by the Brexit gang  
Nailing it on the head -  "It is becoming increasingly clear that Brexit is serving as the trigger for a culture war involving universities" great piece by @davies_will  
Really good news about the Royal  engagement, just what we needed after a terrible year. I think this is a sign that changes are ahead. Really exciting times we live in. I think this shows we live in a dynamic Britain, and it makes me optimistic about Brexit. GSTQ  
This from the Associate Editor of the Daily Telegraph. Part of the UK establishment has always detested the Irish. And Brexit has given them they think permission to publicly voice it.  
Dear #EU please accept our charityI enclose cheque for £40bn as agreedYou will notice it's post-dated March 30, 2019 & will bounce without a free-trade agreement as I mentioned on telephone.Sorry you find yourselves in such dire need of our help#Brexit 
Given the number of Daily Mail readers having heart attacks over Prince Harry marrying a mixed race, foreign, divorcee, Remain would walk a 2nd Referendum. 
You said UK would stay in CU. Now you don't. Brexit was about borders, but now you're against borders. Brexit was anti foreign workers vote but India has made it a precondition. If EU workers such problem y didn't u send any home if they had no job? Or y not cut non-EU wrks? 
Ok Jeremy , it’s dead simple tell Ireland to unify and forget all about Brexit . Problem solved and while your at it let’s Scotland go as well . Easy peasy 
Brexit is strongly linked to xenophobia, according to scientists  
Dear Ireland,With all the nonsense about the UK/Irish border & Brexit you'll understand what we had to put up with in the independence referendum in Scotland. Imagine all the Irish papers backed the UK Gov and the UK Gove ran RTE to get a flavour of our situation. 
Disgraceful from Hoey. Lacking in facts, lacking in diplomacy and lacking in honesty over the fact that #Brexit is the UK’s doing. Brexiteers need to stop playing the victim and start solving the problems they’ve created. #StopBrexit #FinalSay 
Yes @ChukaUmunna it's a disgrace & thank you for your voice. Either they exist & the Govt in contempt or they don't & they're in contempt. Either way this cavalier response to our democratic procedures cannot stand. If all labour do not stand up now & oppose Brexit then when? 
What happened to the not doing radical idea that you sold Brexit on @DanielJHannan ?Not forgetting the consultation with EU allies...... 
.@BorisJohnson, Feb 2016: 'Brexit would leave arrangements on the #IrishBorder "absolutely unchanged"'How are these Brexit politicians not on trial for their lies? 
Hard Brexit would hit 142 Irish cross-border agreements  
Richmond Council (@LBRUT ) making funds available to provide citizens advice for EU nationals worried about #citizensrights post Brexit 
 It’s here!Eric Cantona talks to @mrjamesob on the latest episode of #Unfiltered. Manchester United, Brexit, Trump, Immigration, the financial crisis, fighting policemen, astronomy and Sir Alex - it’s all here...  
‘Brexit will hurt EU MORE than UK’ German MEP breaks ranks to admit Brussels is BLUFFING  
Brexit  
Keep this in mind amidst the chaos of Brexit & Royal wedding storm... Drs taking Jeremy Hunt to Court re/ Americanisation of the NHS.  
. @DavidDavisMP is talking rubbish. I'm a member of the Brexit Committee and we have given him categorical assurances about how any information would be used. The British ppl need & deserve to know, and the gov need to stop treating us like children. /1 
MPs attack David Davis for handing over edited Brexit reports  
Where's the Bremorse?Two tribes dig in#Brexit #EU 
Serious things happening today on Brexit, natural disasters and international politics. But @BBCNews thinks this is the biggest story. Shameful. 
David Davis last June: “We’ve got 50, nearly 60 sector analyses already done”How can one have any faith in UK gov to deliver Brexit competently when it is not even able to count the number of sectoral reports it has produced...  
For those looking for #Brexit prophecy @DanielJHannan provides a rich source of amusement. He was literally wrong on everything 
I used to think Americans were extreme in their superiority complex & denial of the rest of the world. But English arrogance on Brexit has convinced me that they're even worse. It's mind boggling. 
The border conundrum.  What border? says UK.  The one you’ve created by Brexit.   
Well done @Channel4News & @mattfrei who had to resort to kindergarten graphics tonight to explain the #brexit border problem to the multitude of people who just don’t seem to get it  
Great to see @fotoole on @Channel4News explaining clearly that the #EU27 are rock solid on the  Irish border question & have been from outset. Not just an issue for Irish Govt #brexit 
Seems to me the 48% are not represented in the commons. Given the chaos #Brexit is becoming how many of 52% would still vote the same way now? #brexitshambles 
Well done @Channel4News best package thus far on Brexit/Ireland and great interview with @fotoole , with @mattfrei in Dublin. More please. Can the BBC do it now too?   
City of London voices in unison on Brexit threat to investment  
Sir Keir Starmer tells me Labour will raise David Davis's refusal to hand over Brexit impact assessments/sectoral analyses in their entirety in the Commons tomorrow and says 'ultimately this could be contempt of parliament'  
Out of sheer incompetence.  Brexit of any sort was a bad idea, but I struggle to think how it could have been handled worse.  From the moment the referendum was called it’s been one mistake after another & no-one has the guts to say so and change course. 
."This is the standard operating procedure for Brexit: Ignorance, followed by ineptitude, followed by nationalism. And so it is with Ireland.". 
Alastair Campbell says he thinks Prince Harry should be pressed on why he's "marrying an immigrant in Brexit Britain". As  PG Wodehouse said..  
This cover up stinks. All this talk of parliamentary sovereignty and the Government are in contempt of Parliament. What are they scared of? Let MP's and the public see the Brexit economic impact assessments  
This stinks of a cover-up, pure and simple. Ministers don’t want the public to know the facts on the impact of Brexit. This has less to do with any supposed undermining of negotiations and everything to do with pulling the wool over people’s eyes. Totally and utterly unacceptable  
63% of the electorate didn't vote for Brexit.37% of the electorate did but they could not have possibly known what they were voting for, even now the government has no idea what Brexit really means.37% wanted change, they did not vote for this. #revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
Keep rocking the leaking #Brexit boat. At some point it will sink without trace and the UK can start tackling its real problems. #StopBrexit 
‘I’m afraid we couldn’t release the Brexit impact studies until we were absolutely sure a royal wedding would bury any coverage of it.’ 
“I would have told the EU to sod off with their excessive financial demands” @patel4witham on the Brexit divorce settlement  #SpecTories 
David Davis must release the 58 sectoral reports for all to see.  We will not let him get away with redactions made for 'commercial reasons'.  What is he trying to hide? Everyone is entitled to an accurate description of the impact of #Brexit . 
Do you support Carles Puigdemont’s calls for Catalonia to have an EU referendum? #FarageOnLBC 
#Brexitters and the #IrishBorder.#Brexit #DUP #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Brexitshambles #EU #NorthernIreland @DavidDavisMP 
Priti Patel says there should have been clarity from the government on the Brexit end state and she would have told the EU to “sod off” with their financial demands #spectories 
Think #Brexit negotiations are going badly? It’s about to get a whole lot worse...  via @prospect_uk 
I’ll be debating/arguing w/ DUP’s Sammy Wilson about #brexit and Ireland on #scotnight later. For viewers in Scotland. 
10 People Who’ve Been Driven Mad By Brexit:  
Come to think of it, this sums up the three biggest brexit demographics pretty neatly as well.  
The Irish chattering class has allowed itself to be turned into a patsy of the EU and its war on Brexit. This is a new low in Ireland's subservience to Brussels, says Brendan O'Neill 
Senior Tory says government must prepare to WALK AWAY from Brussels without Brexit deal  via @Your Brexit 
Please, Natasha, stop it with your actual facts - Brexit is a post fact movement.  
It's quite an alarming signal about how well Brexit is going that a prince of the realm feels the urgent need to get a Green Card. 
Maybe, in time, Labour will produce just one report, not even 58, which tells us what a 'jobs first Brexit' looks like. 
Publishing material that had been edited is against the spirit and the letter of parliament’s motion #Brexit :  
For the purposes of clarity, can we just refer to the line that divides UK and Ireland as the European Union border, because for the purposes of Brexit, that's what it is. 
The information the govt has deliberately & wilfully chosen to redact from the impact assessments tells you all you need to know about Brexit. There is no positive upside to Brexit, none, not in the slightest. Parliament must therefore #revokeA50forthwith 
Retweet if you remember when Michael Gove was the original lead singer in Depeche Mode! #DepecheMode #MichaelGove #Brexit  
Leave/Remain it doesn't matter. The Government is holding the nation in contempt. Brexit is a huge undertaking, the effects will affect millions, the efforts to obscure just what the impact will be are beyind shameful.EVERYONE deserves to know. 
NEW: Brexit impact assessments should have been shared in full without redaction - @Keir_Starmer 
MPs attack David Davis for handing over redacted Brexit reports  
Come on Mr Starmer, you were the DPP - why not simply now report Davis for Misconduct in Public Office ? You have the power to stop this "brexit" madness if you choose to use it - enough is enough 
The news regarding the impact assessments is an utter outrage. The only information being provided is very likely to already be available, with nothing of interest being revealed. It should be up to MPs on the Brexit Committee, not David Davis, to make that call. 
Hooray - this one's free.  Should the PM tell us whether she has assets in a tax haven? A petition by @JolyonMaugham and @GoodLawProject also doing excellent work on the referendum of course #a50challenge  
Call me Mrs Picky but shouldn’t we have had an impact report BEFORE we actually voted in such a divisive referendum 
The Brexiteers too often forget that other countries have domestic interests too (Ireland, Germany, France). And Brexit has made them more, not less, determined to assert them. 
Increasingly clear whole #Brexit process being “led” by bunch of incompetents on the UK side. #brexitshambles 
Meanwhile, in non-royal news...Nothing like a royal wedding to keep the heat off. The PM has quietly hidden the cost of Brexit. 
"If you like a lot of chocolate on your biscuit join our"–ANTI BREXIT ANTI-TRUMP ANTI-AUSTERITY TRANS AND NON-BINARY INCLUSIVE INTERSECTIONAL FEMINIST SOCIALIST MOVEMENT WHILE THERE'S STILL TIME TO AVOID GLOBAL DESTRUCTION UNDER ROBOT-ASSISTED NEOLIBERAL CIS CAPITALIST PATRIARCHY 
Llythr agored / open letter to Labour leader - we need strong, principled opposition to Tories’ extreme Brexit & we need a voice for #Wales. Labour MPs - stop giving the Tories a blank cheque. #WheresTheOfficialOpposition? 
Once you accept that Brexit is a right-wing, disaster-capitalist coup, and that Labour Leavers are just their useful tools, too dumb and stupid to realize it, nothing can surprise you anymore. ... Not even Kate Hoey suggesting that Ireland should pay for a border wall.  
More Brexit ripples as EU businesses dump UK suppliers @theresa_may 
Steve Baker said a few weeks ago that there was no intention to redact anything from the Brexit documents, now Dexeu team saying it was always the plan  
Good news: finally a viable plan for Britain after Brexit. Bad news: it’s this.  
Parliamentary scrutiny being treated as an optional extra by a Government which treats our democracy with utter contempt. #Brexit  
this #brexit tweet has aged well. #IrishBorder 
Sorry if I've been banging on about trans rights recently. Trust me I'm bored of it too. I'd rather talk about Brexit, climate change or lots of other issues that directly affect me, but I've felt compelled to try and counter some of the nastiness and misinformation I keep seeing 
A team of researchers conducted studies which found that fear of immigrants & foreigners is associated with support for Brexit. Right-wing Authoritarians, Social Dominants and Collective Narcissists - all displayed prejudice & xenophobia. #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Brexit is strongly linked to xenophobia, according to scientists  
This is precisely why @JolyonMaugham and myself are pressing ahead with our legal action to ensure full and public disclosure. We all need to know what Brexit really means for us and our livelihoods  
The Brexit scaremongering over N Ireland's border is so far removed from reality. People both sides of the border desire only peace. Anyone saying its a threat to peace is quite simply lying. Don't believe me? Go there and talk to them. 
‘Brexit and Tories are twin threats to our economy’ – O’Neill  @moneillsf 
"Brexit and tribalism"At Jack of Kent, a response to this tweet saying that to criticise Remain is to "cross to the other side".  
Government has already edited Brexit economic impact studies before handing them over to Brexit Select Committee. In clear contempt of Parliament.  
Uhoh - big row brewing now. David Davis, in letter to Brexit committee, admits sweeping amounts of info have been left out of the Brexit impact reports. Committee member @SeemaMalhotra1 furious. "British businesses and families deserve better" 
Great discussion with students passionate about their generation not repeating our mistakes on Brexit. I told them we can stop Brexit & they have a big part to play. They are up for it!  
‘Brexit will hurt EU MORE than UK’ German MEP breaks ranks to admit Brussels is BLUFFING  
I spoke to @HuffPostUK on the #Brexit impact studies being published: "It seems like the Government have already decided what should and should not be seen by editing them before sending the impact studies to the Select Committee."  
The biggest #brexit misconception made by Brexiteers is that "Remoaners" are working with the "elite" against the poor. We are doing quite the opposite. We dislike such capitalism derived abuse as much as you. 
Mid term, mid Brexit negotiations, in Government - #Labour must be asking of themselves: Why aren’t we at least 10% ahead?(The polling has been consistent for several weeks.) 
Countdown to Trump/Farage attacks on Meghan Markle once they learn her lifestyle blog The Tig promoted the Women’s March in January, the day after Trump’s inauguration, and shed a tear for the EU the day after the Brexit referendum  
Brexit-backing Labour MP Kate Hoey has been mockingly compared to Donald Trump after saying Ireland will have to pay for a physical border.  
"Never in my lifetime has British politics been in such a state of permanent banana republic crisis as over Brexit."   
Labour issues contempt threat over Brexit impact papers  
'As Brexit comes closer, British ignorance about Ireland becomes unforgivable' - by @stephanieboland 
An LSE Professor just said Brexit is Britain's Vietnam  
Brexit Committee now have the sector reports - there are 39 Sectoral reports, not 58 (some cover same areas), covering 800 pages - will discuss tomorrow when to publish 
(Just to add, Cunk on Britain covers the WHOLE of British history from the Big Bang to Brexit. In five half-hourly chunks.) [4/3] 
.@conorgearty: "Brexit strikes me as our Vietnam. Everybody rational knows it is – how can I put it politely? – not going well. But no one with authority seems able to say so."Very polite, and very understated.  
You can understand why the Irish are getting tetchy about #Brexit | @DanielJHannan 
What you need to know about the Irish border’s role in Brexit  
Hugely important election added to 2018 calendar after petition drive: referendum on new MO law that ends mandatory union fees. (Law suspended for now.)  
A Royal marrying an American? Post-Brexit I thought this could not happen. Because the Royal Family should have been deported back to Germany/Greece by now. 52% 
"If this ends with a no deal we won't be putting up the border, they'll have to pay for it because it doesn't need to happen"@KateHoeyMP on the Irish border post Brexit #r4today 
‘EU has treated Brits as SECOND CLASS’'Sack Barnier!' says Czech MEPEU Brexit negotiator MUST GO for trying to 'punish' UKHe should be sacked & replaced with a “much more generous” negotiator if EU is really serious about reaching a good Brexit deal, 
Brexity Folk say: "But how can we have the control on immigration Brexit promised if there is no hard border?". The answer is: "You can't. Sorry. We made that up."  
Walk away May, it's time to Leave.#Brexit 
Not exactly diplomatically smart. The Irish & European people do have access to our press - they’re all over it right now... and are *not* impressed by our Brexit-cocaine-snorting belligerent dinosaurs.  
The costs of #Brexit to those who didn’t want it - and those who did - are enormous  
Michael Gove is scrabbling to deal with a PR crisis surrounding Tories' refusal to keep animal rights in the Brexit bill  
Indeed, many Remainers raised this, but were roundly dismissed as talking "Project Fear"...  It'll come down to a decision between delivering Brexit or keeping the Union. If NI goes, Scotland will surely follow and that'll be the end of the UK. 
BREXIT CHAOS: Tories risk being in contempt of Parliament as Brexit report deadline looms / #Brexit #StopBrexit 
How will Brexit impact Father Christmas entering the country to deliver presents without a visa? 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Brexit latest, Calais migrant shoot-out and Catalexit - LIVE NOW:  
EU Net Contributors and Recipients (by population) - next time a politician from a freeloader country talks about how Britain must pay up, you know where to look:#Brexit  
Bertie Ahern has pleaded with both London and Dublin in the Brexit negotiations to "cool it" and told me Liam Fox has shown a worrying lack of understanding and knowledge of what the border means to Ireland. #Brexit 
Brexit is UK's Vietnam as ‘no one wants to say it’s not going well’, says LSE Professor  
We had already figured this out for ourselves.....“BREXIT will hurt Brussels more than the UK, a German MEP has admitted in a crushing blow to supposed European Union solidarity.”#Brexit 
There are some Tory MPs who want all of the following: hard Brexit, higher public spending, tax cuts *and* a budget surplus.  
Seems timely to bring this back up from earlier this month, especially as I sent a statement on Russia’s Brexit bots to the Digital, Media and Culture Committee chair a week later, on the 21st - the same day other outlets were reporting Brexit’s Russian accounts as new news...  
Actually, @UKLabour, why not just say you'd rather spend the €85,000,000 -100,000,000 that leaving Europe will cost us, on creating a more equal, just and humane society? Or at least explain why you think Brexit is so essential?  @Keir_starmer 
So it sppears the government has conspired to find a way to keep the #Brexit impact assessments secret from both parliament and the public. My God they must be bad. Surely even ardent #Leavers will want to see them now, just to see what they've dumped on the UK 
There's a new slogan for Brexit  
imagine being Ireland , and having the totally unnecessary shit show of brexit imposed on you by a lunatic neighbor.  Imagine the other important things you could be getting on with. Imagine how annoying that would be. 
ICYMI: Randolph County Republican Sen. Jerry Tillman opposes Senate plans to push referendum to remove North Carolinians' ability to vote for judges: “What we’re saying is, ‘People, you’re not smart enough to vote for your own judges.’”  #ncga 
Nov.27 Gina Miller, Founding Partner SCM Direct, on #Bloomberg discusses the Brexit process and why she says the British government isn't being straight with the British public Also @vincecable says 1 in 5 chance #Brexit wont happen ... 
Callous, detatched and thoroughly rotten to the core, Hoey calls for Ireland to pay for physical border in event of 'no-deal' Brexit  
Brexit committee will get a physical copy of the impact assessments later today - probably won't be distributing to members until tomorrow. 
Irish Simpsons Fans continues to provide the best commentary on Brexit pic.twitter.com/k606qUNa1w 
The UK rejects a hard Brexit according to new polling.   
It is the Govt that has decided on the course of #Brexit, not the British ppl. If we can't have our cake and eat it, as Leave leaders promised, then Britain can reconsider what's best for our future. Democracy demands the option to change course  
Thanks to Guido for listing 10 brexit people everyone needs to follow.@acgrayling @Andrew_Adonis @BenPBradshaw @carolecadwalla @ThatTimWalker @JolyonMaugham @JeremyCliffe @LiamByrneMP @thomasbrake @campbellclaret#FBPE #StopBrexit #Stopbrexitnow 
Editorial: The best industrial strategy would be to cancel Brexit  
openDemocracy has done amazing work digging into 'dark money' that financed Brexit. Now they want to find someone who knows about the DUP's mystery £435,000. Do help by sharing 
Friends! Exciting news!If Our Vince says there's a chance that Brexit won't happen, then we must all - literally - sit up and take notice of his typically objective prediction!He is, after all, the man who shrewdly managed to predict at least seven of the last two recessions.  
NEW: Tories Risk Being In Contempt Of Parliament As Secret Brexit Report Deadline Looms - with comment from @Keir_Starmer 
They told us that #Brexit would help the #NHS, but in fact #BrexitReality (if we go ahead with it) will be somewhat different. 
Just came across this. Makes me think of Brexit.  
Hello @DavidDavisMP. Parliament did not vote for edited or redacted Brexit economic impact studies. The Govnt is clearly in contempt of Parliament. Any editing or redaction should be done by @CommonsEUexit Committee, not the Govnt @DExEUgov.  
This is the most credible post-Brexit strategy for the UK that I've heard so far. 
The recent @patribotics story stating the “Brexit Referendum” may need to be redone due to Russian interference is accurate. UK security services are concerned with the high level of activity surrounding the vote.  
'Put a sock it in, Paloma': Brendan O'Neill reviews @Palomafaith's insipid, hateful ballad about how stupid Leave voters are.  #Brexit  
"Davis and PM believe that editing out information [such as that] highlighting where certain kinds of Brexit are most economically toxic is consistent with the vote by MPs and the ruling of the speaker". What a cheek! Surely the whole point is to understand 'impact'.  
The Select Committee must be given the analyses which were completed. The public & parliament must no longer be kept in the dark. #Brexit  
BREAKING: Angela Merkel has just been told to RESIGN by people in her own party  via @Your Brexit 
Tories talking about raising defence spending to 3% of GDP, while Brexit is forecast to cost £300m a week, is ambitious, to put it mildly.  
.@SeemaMalhotra1 – Parliament must not be short-changed over Brexit impact assessments  
.@PennyRed loves her country so she needs to say: Britain, you’re being an idiot over Brexit 
I swore I'd stop writing these threads about Brexit and Ireland, but level of nonsense - by accident or design-from senior politicians and commentators demands it. Yesterday one expert on BBC told me 'there hasn't been a border since 20s'. Did I dream the check points as a child? 
This is great, and sad, but mostly great. Remember, establishment fools are humans too. And all humans have a breaking point. Theirs was Brexit...   
Brexit is not delivering British sovereignty. The cowards running our government run scared of parliament every single step of the way. The people’s parliament demands, deserves, and has a right to these reports  
.@mrjamesob takes down Brexiteer's suggestion that Ireland should pay for its Brexit border  
To save you the long scroll, I've saved you some of my favourite #RoyalWedding comments from the Daily Mail... My Favourite being "I hope Meghan can help push through the Brexit deal"  
TODAY’S LIVESTREAM @ 16:00- Migrant shooting in Calais- Secret Brexit bill- Metal detectors in mosques See ya there:  
Good to meet @USAmbUK on his first visit to Wales. The US is one of Wales’ most important trading partners – this relationship is more important than ever as we seek new opportunities post #Brexit  
The mood of the humourless @ThomasBrake has not been helped by Brexit:  
Bring power back to Manchester, not Whitehall, says Greater Manchester Mayor Andy Burnham, who is demanding that powers returned to the UK after Brexit should be handed to the regions, because, he says, Westminster has failed the north of England.  
Such a shame to deny Humphrys the chance to press on why he is marrying an immigrant in Brexit Britain   
Animal abusers could be jailed for five years says Government, as it vows sentience WILL be recognised and protections strengthened after Brexit  
.@KateHoeyMP: “We’re not going to be putting up a border. If they wish to have a border, they’ll have to pay for it”@nealerichmond: “We didn’t choose Brexit. We’re dealing with the mess of it”Another day in the delusional, irresponsible and undiplomatic world of Brexit.  
Hey Ali. Mate, we're not "weirdos" because we voted for Brexit. We're weirdos because we still listen to what you say, (even if only for the comedy value).  BTW, not all Brexit voter are "hard right", most are intelligent people who can see what you can't.  
MP calls for Ireland to pay for physical border in event of 'no-deal' Brexit  
Have you apologised for Brexit yet?  
This really is an extraordinary state of affairs. It just cannot be right that the Government has conducted assessments on the impact of Brexit and now obscures them even from MPs. This is Not acceptable.  
The video the entire nation needs to watch. How #Britain was conned into voting for #Brexit. Please share as widely as possible.  
Corbyn is a real and present danger to our economy. Especially if Brexit is difficult. Why would you leave years of hard earned for that traitor to pillage and squander on his mates .   
This is unacceptable. The people have the right to come to an informed view about what Brexit means for them and the UK. Why is the government so afraid of scrutiny?  
Actually, Brexiters are quite right.Merck and Quiagen have decided to move their research to Britain BECAUSE of, not despite Brexit:  
Hoey knows that if there’s No Deal, Tory govt will collapse & likely to be replaced by her own party in govt. But she doesn’t care. All that matters is ramming through Brexit no matter the cost & damage. Appalling dereliction of duty to country, constituents & her own party  
Labour urge ministers to meet deadline for releasing Brexit impact studies @Keir_Starmer 
If Brexit is Sasamach, perhaps a hard Brexit would be Ard-Sasamach, which would combine the Irish ard (high/loud/advanced) with the Cockney 'ard (hard). 
10 people NOT driven mad by #Brexit :Nigel Farage Tommy Robinson Katie Hopkins John 'invest elsewhere' RedwoodTrump PutinMarine Le PenJayda FransenJulia Harley-BrewerPaul DacreNow we've put that in proportion, we know we've picked the right side.#StopBrexit 
Rejoice Plebs & Good luck 2Megan @Inlaws full of tax dodgers, parasites & racists- Ooh wonder what she’ll wear? #RoyalWedding just what we need 2lift nation’s morale at our expense  #Brexit #Austerity #Homeless 
This is outrageous contempt of Parliament. Parliament did not vote for extracts, edits, summaries or redacted Brexit impact studies.  
.@JLongworthLML: "This demonstrates that Brexit has had no effect on City performance – you could almost say it’s had a positive impact" 
8 reasons the government should publish the 58 Brexit sectoral studies. Plus one more, it is the right thing to do, the ordinary decent people of this country deserve to know the truth.  
In Togo 14 opposition groups unite in calls for fresh mass protests against Faure Gnassingbé who wants to stay in power through 2030. Ghana Pres Akufo-Addo and Guinea’s Alpha Conde facilitating gov-opposition talks with referendum as idea for Togolese to find change through vote.  
Can you help us find out where the dark money for the Brexit campaign came from?   
I VOTED LEAVE I didn't Vote for any half measures.SHARE IF YOU AGREE#Brexit  
I raised my concerns about the possibility of a hard Irish border with lots of Brexiteers prior to the referendum, and was  continually poo-pooed as an alarmist inventing problems that didn’t exist in order to frighten the electorate. I think they were seized by a wilful myopia.  
Update on the Brexit sectoral studies - Commons Brexit committee have not yet received them, stand by notion that it will decide what may or may not be redacted or edited, not the Government 
Even the OBR don’t know what the govt’s Brexit strategy is, and are unable to factor it into economic forecasts. Westminster shrouded in smog again 
Release the 58 Brexit reports! Time is ticking for the Government. They have until tomorrow or risk being in contempt of Parliament.   
BREAKING: Prince Harry and Meghan Markle are going to distract you so Theresa May’s shower of fools can press on with their #Brexit idiocy. 
Hearing rumours DExEU will be handing Brexit impact statements (or whatever they want to call them) to Brexit committee today. 
Driven mad by Brexit: Carole Cadwalladr, who doesn’t appear to realise she is being elaborately trolled by @Arron_banks and @andywigmore  
"There is a big cloud hanging over the industrial strategy caused by the major uncertainties around Brexit." @vincecable 
'Offer a POSITIVE solution’ Kate Hoey TEARS APART downbeat Irish Brexit negotiator  
Top 10 people driven mad by Brexit: where else to begin than @acgrayling?  
RT It’s 40mins into #Bbcdp & torygirl @Jo_Coburn has started her DAILY attack on @UKLabour & @jeremycorbyn but wouldn’t dream of airing this #Brexit & Tory scandal #Bbcdp @BBCNews #WATO #r4today #Newsnight #Bbcpapers 
10 People Who’ve Been Driven Mad By Brexit:  
Kids will be vacuum packed and stored in cupboards after Brexit.  
The shocking anti-Irish/"Eire" sentiments on the right of British politics that have suddenly surfaced. Any chance they were always there? #Brexit 
Please get a grip and oppose Brexit. Brexit is a right wing coup masquerading as the "will of the people" Time to be for the many not the few.  
The Windsors will need to breed more so that after Brexit they provide us with a royal wedding every year - then we can chunter about in a permanent red, white (very white obviously) and blue 1950s dreamland while the rest of the world leaves us behind 
The *public* should have been given unedited copies of the Impact Studies *before* we triggered Article 50. #Brexit  
Tories puting a hard #Brexit tax haven above peace in Ireland. #StopBrexit 
Other non-EU countries have hosted European Capital of Culture. The UK shouldn’t miss out just because of Brexit. I’ve written to Juncker and the Culture Secretary to call for urgent action.  
6) And then there’s #Brexit. That threatens everything - and forcing the UK out of Single Market and Customs’ Union won’t help build a ‘Britain fit for the future’, indeed it threatens our economy for years to come.  
The invective language currently being used about Ireland is genuinely frightening. It's the match to the fuse.There's nothing about Brexit that I don't hate, but worst of all is taking a hammer to the fragile peace than ended a century of violence. 
This is the heart of the Irish border debate. Hard-won peace in NI under threat from hard Brexit.  
The Government will rightly be slammed for trying to hide what it knows about how Brexit will affect your life. Only 9% of the public think the Government should keep the studies secret.  
TFL blames uncertainty over BREXIT for falling passenger numbers - utter bunkum. Poor service is the reason! 
"We're not putting up a border. If you want a border, you pay for it. Won't be long before the Irish will want to leave the EU." @KateHoeyMP to RoI Senator @nealerichmond.Brexit plan basically boils down to: If we get our cock out other countries will suck it, because BRITAIN. 
Watch @KateHoeyMP dismiss arch-Remainer Michael Heseltine's comment about ‘stopping Brexit’ on @daily_politics 
Best possible move @campaignforleo could make now:"Brexit is now clearly a national crisis.  We need a national government and I'm inviting @fiannafailparty to join this national government until the crisis passes."(Then make sure Justice is one of FF's portfolios).  #GE17 
On #bbcdp, @KateHoeyMP simply cannot understand why Brexit threatens the Good Friday Agreement. It *could* be because it's an international treaty, in which the UK and RoI are signatories and co-guarantors and their status as EU members is explicitly written into the Agreement. 
This is the new Labour strategy. Drop hints that Corbyn has changed his mind, promise to oppose a hard Brexit, whilst meanwhile doing nothing & timing the Brexit clock down. We are being played. https://t.co/d9DiNSxaIc?amp=1 
Owen Paterson slams 'myth' of Irish border chaos as part of anti-Brexit blackmail  
Utterly contemptible.  #Brexit has become a nasty & vindictive affair, with nasty vindictive views going unchallenged, much less the flat out lies  
Brexit is spurring European banks to trim their exposure to U.K. assets  
Understand the Brexit sectoral studies and assessment are on their way to the Dexeu Committee I’m told, before tomorrow’s deadline - not yet sure in precisely what form or if they ar to be published 
MPs won’t get unedited studies of Brexit’s impact on economy  
Spotted in London, someone has done a whole anti brexit billboard. Whoever you are, we love it. Respect #FBPE #EUloudandproud 
No idea who did this, but we love it. Spotted in London, a whole anti brexit billboard. #FBPE #EUloudandproud 
Only 11% of the public want a no deal Brexit.Nice to know that nearly 90% want to stay in the single market. Sad to see our minority government pushing forward recklessly with its detrimental version of Brexit.#ThinkAgain#FBPE 
In 2019 when we ask what Labour did to oppose a Tory Hard Brexit we will honestly be able to answer with one word ... nothing. 
READ | Pharma giants announce huge investment in Brexit Britain. £1bn boost and 1,750 skilled jobs!When will Project Fear liars apologise for trying (and failing) to deceive the public? 
"THE FACKIN IMMUGRUNTS COME AND STEAL OUR FOOKIN JOBS NOW THEY STEALL OUR FORKIN PRINCE, THIS ISNT THE BREXIT I VOTED FOR" 
Heseltine says best industrial strategy would be to stop Brexit  I hate to say he's right, but he very obviously is 
How strange Brexiteers celebrating Prince Harry’s engagement. Yet in same breath not wanting one more foreigner here. Is Brexit over then. I have I missed something was it a duoble announcement. #FBPE 
BREAKING: Government confirms post-Brexit industrial strategy will focus on exporting patriotic press releases and royal wedding commemorative souvenirs. 
The Americans were quicker to put up an effective resistance to trump than we were to brexit. But we are British, Dunkirk spirit, Blitz spirit, stubborn and proud. Join us 11th Dec, from 11am at Parliament square.  
Want to better understand the disaster capitalism roots of Brexit & the military precision of the information war that delivered it?Watch Adam Curtis’s documentary ‘The Mayfair Set’. 
Ireland will have to pay if it wants to erect a post-Brexit border with Northern Ireland, Kate Hoey has said.  
Why is Prince Harry going to marry a German politician? I reckon it’s all to do with Brexit 
Irish border: Nationalist Brexit rhetoric gets ugly  
Thanks Gina, this is crucial- and you are right- the chaos of Brexit is also being used as a convenient cover for some very impt issues going on in this country at present. What is really going on with the NHS is something govt absolutely do not wish for the public to know. 
Since when should the democ right to change minds, & reverse #Brexit if the Will switches, be prevented on the basis that some ppl will become violent? Surely if a maj now want to #StopBrexit Brexit must be stopped? After all only 37%of the electorate wanted it in the 1st place. 
Have we had "Why the royal wedding will be good news for Brexit?" yet? 
Brexiteers said citizens' lives would not change as a result of Brexit. The European Parliament does not believe a word of this @guyverhofstadt 
Someone out there knows where the DUP got their secret Brexit cash. Maybe you, or someone you know? Why not whisper it to us?  
Government is undermining the parliamentary sovereignty the Brexit Secretary claimed to be a champion of for years.  
Brexit negotiations crunch is coming much sooner than realised. (My weekly newsletter for Reaction subscribers @reactionlife) 
Nothing quite like a #RoyalWedding to distract the population from thinking about #Brexit, austerity, welfare cuts, food banks, local government spending freeze, a housing crisis, looming environmental disaster, continued selling of arms to Saudi Arabia etc...But hey, day off.  
Greg Clark got so flustered on @GMB this morning that as well as refusing to confirm his own name, he also wrongly declared that he voted FOR Brexit in the referendum, which he definitely didn't. Via @mikeysmith 
The hard-won kinship between Britain and Ireland is threatened by Brexit idiocy  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
EU solidarity means Ireland will not need Brexit veto - minister  via @Reuters 
Is there a leading Brextremist out there who is not paid by other leading Brextremists, not gaining financially from Brexit ..or already very rich?Yes. Jeremy Corbyn  and John McDonnell. They are Brexiteers with a warped ideology that the capitalist West, incl. EU, is our enemy  
This is the sort of vitally important domestic issue Brexit is distracts us from.  Doctors are taking Jeremy Hunt to court to stop him 'Americanising' the NHS  
I delight in seeing people engaged and then married, but don't think for a second it is going to distract me from the wilful mismanagement of the NHS, the shambles of Brexit or the iniquity of Government policy. Don't you dare try... 
Labour Leaver Kate Hoey (pictured with friend) has said Ireland will have to pay for a physical border after Brexit #bigbeautifulborder  
I missed the last royal wedding as I was abroad. I’m likely to be abroad for this one too. Under the rules of Brexit, that’s probably High Treason, so I guess it was nice knowing you all 
By the way, the speed with which Brexit twitter just became a fizzing geyser of anti-Irish hatred is *very* cool 
We keep hearing that Brexit is the 'Will of the People' - yet consistently polls show that will has changed; evidence of collusion with Russia; election fraud; and right wing press media moguls driving agenda for personal profit. How is Brexit still the people's will? #StopBrexit 
POLLING: Is it me or has polling gone very quiet? Are pollsters worried even polls with questions assuming #Brexit's a given will now show the Will is changing clearly to #Remain? Come on let's have some honest questions...A50 can be revoked you can #StopBrexit. Leave or Remain? 
England. England owns the Scottish economy. Which is why we are vulnerable to shocks like Brexit. 
》UK has a trade deficit in goods》It has a trade SURPLUS in Services》We're perfectly placed for success in the Single Market due to Free Movement of Services》Our manufacturing base is also reliant on the EU supply chain》No Brexit #IndustrialStrategy can ever replace that 
I genuinely congratulate Prince Harry & Meghan on the wonderful news of their engagement. I also hope that Meghan won't have difficulty with her visa situation unlike many In Britain right now married to 3rd country nationals. There you are @IanDunt a #Brexit royal wedding angle 
Are Brexit and Boris to blame for Britain losing its place on the International Court of Justice?  
The British-Irish Brexit impasse looked inevitable if you consider how our common history is(n't) taught over there. Our episode examined the curriculum  
Just come back from helping out at a local food bank, something I've never done. What an eye opener. In 2017? Brexit will increase the need. 
Well that's it. Brexit coverage is over..... Royal wedding dominating the media until Spring 2018.... No doubt Ruth Davidson will be hired as Wedding Planner.... But Monica Lennon will claim the credit for arranging a wonderful event. 
"The royal wedding is a government ploy to distract us from Brexit!"Aye mate, I'll be too busy putting up bunting to remember how shite our country is.Fuck up 
No, Gerry, it's just an announcement that a young man intends to marry someone he loves.Nothing to do with Brexit or any political matter.Get a grip man.  
The UK govt is rushing through a new law to keep the DUP's Brexit #darkmoney donors a secret. Citizens have a right to know - so today we launch a secure channel for all Brexit whistleblowers to tell us what they know. Pls RT: 
A royal wedding before Brexit is like having a living room disco before burning your house to the ground. 
It would seem that #May can please neither Remainers NOR Leavers! Therefore, as Brexit is no longer the will of any of the people, surely better to #StopBrexit or allow a #FinalSay?  @CommonsEUexit @LordsEUCom @StopBrexit17 @CCHQPress @Number10gov @FT 
Prince Harry is going to marry Meghan Markle. Is that meant to make everything alright? Take our minds off Brexit, economic worries & the complete incompetence of the UK Govt? It worked in 1981 but that was a long time ago. #royalwedding 
Media uses the term ‘despite Brexit’ with scraps of good economic news because it’s never ‘because of’ Brexit.  
Personally I am hoping that a royal wedding will take our minds and attention away from all this boring Brexit stuff 
Even though Brexit is making a good show I never feel more strongly that this country is losing its marbles than when there is some royal guff to bore on about. 
Royal wedding...  What’s the bet those Brexit impact assessments or cabinet office investigation into Damian Green comes out today? #cynic 
This is @GerardBattenMEP a voice of the arrogant, rabid, hate-filled, conflict-igniting nationalism which was crushed in 1945. No wonder he hates the EU whose prime purpose is to prevent the resurgence of this kind of madness. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Economy in meltdown, government of utter chaos, scandals all over the place, Brexit in a mess, Ireland question intractable? No worries, have a #royalwedding . 
An early election will result in #8Committee ending and referendum postponed, indeed even stopped if FG/FF/SF are returned in big numbers. I think #8Committee should vote for repeal now & a #repealthe8th Bill advanced now. They can use Solidarity/PBP Bill if they wish #dubw 
Brexit (Farage) is like a dodgy mechanic:Owner complains about his car. So he gives a diagnosis that fits the part HE wants to sell.Hate Cameron? UK too London-centric? Can't find a decent job? Terrorism fears? Ooh I have part for you that will fix everything!  
Waiting now for someone to find the Brexit angle on #RoyalEngagement so the Leavers and Remainers can scrap here all day, as usual 
Is not, by your own admission, the single market with UK your most important trade relationship? Doesn’t it make sense to preserve it post-Brexit? Why then pursue a strategy in the opposite direction? Dublin’s being played by the European Commission. 
Here's what really happened with the Brexit vote on animal sentience  
Remoaners:'Just forget this silly Brexit vote and our lovely cuddly friends in the EU will welcome us back with open arms and no hard feelings. We can all hold hands and sing 'Ode to Joy' together'  
"If this ends with a no deal we won't be putting up the border, they'll have to pay for it because it doesn't need to happen"@KateHoeyMP on the Irish border post Brexit #r4today 
Can we stop Brexit? Yes, when the real impact is felt the public will demand a chance to vote on the deal #GiveusasayMrsMay #thecostofbrexit  
Heseltine says best industrial strategy would be to stop Brexit  When Heseltine is the voice of sanity, you know something has gone deeply wrong with the world. 
That sound you can hear is DExEU rushing to release every bit of bad Brexit news they've got piled up in the corner.  
Hey kids! Remember when I used to talk about things OTHER than the sheer mindbending stupidity and dishonesty of Brexit and Brexiteers? Do you miss those days?Yeah, me too. 
Avoiding a hard border in Northern Ireland means staying in the Customs Union & possibly the Single Market. The Tories either prefer to pretend this choice doesn't exist or would prefer to risk a resumption of the troubles rather than stay in the CU and SM. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
The Labour front bench is helping, yes helping the Tory right do Brexit.They are just a guilty.I can't care that that's an inconvenient truth for Corbyn lovers. Tough.That also makes Corby Lovers guilty.Everyone knows the score now.You are either for Brexit or against.  
 @AlfredBosch a @CatalanNews: 'We don't need more evidence of violence, we have seen all that. During the referendum, we saw Spanish police attacking people'  #21D 
May will keep the final Brexit Bill SECRET fuelling fears the final divorce settlement will soar far higher than the £40billion already offered  
So, the latest strategy is, we’re going to build a great, beautiful Brexit border and Ireland’s gonna pay for it.  
If we could just stick to the facts, the #Brexit mess the UK has imposed on Ireland, would be hard enough to sort out. Sadly, some British voices either don’t know the facts, or distort them. As here.  
(ctd)- A study commissioned by the Irish Government found that Brexit hits Irish GDP by 2%-4%. - But our trading relationship with EU is more important than that with the UK.- Ireland is not trying to frustrate Brexit. It merely wants UK to put its border policy into practice. 
Heseltine is right - plans for industrial strategy, whether Tory or Labour, are irrelevant in face of Brexit damage to investment and growth  
Brexit could cost £100bn and nearly 1m jobs, CBI warns.Would the last person to leave the UK kindly turn off the lights.  
Listening back, Kate Hoey asks why Ireland "can't be more positive about Brexit?" and implores Govt to drop the "negativity". You'd be forgiven for thinking the concerns of thousands & thousands who cross that border for work, family life, import/export every day were imagined. 
A Brexit conundrum that's bubblingIs looking increasingly troubling,A deal on the borderDemanded in orderTo head off a veto by Dublin. 
.@conorgearty: 'Brexit strikes me as our Vietnam. Everybody rational knows it is – how can I put it politely? – not going well. But no one with auth seems able to say so. Does anyone have the clout & courage to go with it? Where is our Sen Eug McCarthy?'  
.@dolorsbassa has been active for workers' rights for 15+ ys. She was Minister of labour &soc. affairs in #Catalonia until 27/10 when she was dismissed for holding a referendum.She has been in prison for 25 Days. Show your support through #freedomletters #LlibertatPresosPolitics 
The hard-won kinship between Britain and Ireland is threatened by Brexit idiocy  
Funny how all those opposed to brexit are those who have never had experience of the alternative. What idiots they will feel when brexit is complete and our country free and democratic once again. 
Just out of interest, is there a leading Brextremist out there who is not paid by other leading Brextremists, is not gaining or has gained financially from Brexit or was before it started already very rich? 
Heseltine says best industrial strategy would be to stop Brexit - Politics live  
26. You may not be interested in Brexit, but Brexit is interested in you. Ends 
Irish PM Leo Varadkar has EVERY right to be worried 1) ECONOMY2) SECURITY is damaged by #Brexit MORE than any other CountryIt’s NOT “blackmail” it’s SURVIVALThese ”5” obfuscate the issues#Brexiteers 
22. Treating a small majority at a referendum as justification for major constitutional change created polarisation. 
My position is simple, Alexandra, I'm against Austerity and I'm against Brexit. Corbyn, however, says I can only be against one.  
Cognitive dissonance, Brexit edition  
Really cool to hear British pundits, policy heads and cabinet ministers call the NI border issue "unexpected", "new" or "unforeseen". We were screaming this at the top of our lungs the day of the referendum.  
Any UK industrial strategy needs to help sort three problems:1. The hard one - 5million people lack basic literacy and numeracy skills & 12million digital2. The one everyone forgets - childcare3. The one that underpins everything: Brexit. 
Finally, a Brexit good news story.... for those, like me, who believe Brussels sprouts are the devil’s testicles.  
This is what we're up against. Still, no one said it was going to be easy.But make no mistake The Tories will mobilise all it's power & might in London to do anything to preserve their 'precious union'. We must redouble our efforts & counter their brexit shenanigans at every turn  
BBC remorselessly pushing the ‘power’ of the Irish Government to stop Brexit talks. Truly risible stuff even by bbc standards.  
The worst thing that could happen to British industry is Brexit. The solution? #StopBrexit That is by far the best industrial strategy... #ToryShambles #IndustrialStrategy 
The worldview that underpins Brexit:(1) zero-sum(2) exceptionalist(3) empiricistIn other words: they and we cannot both win; we deserve to win; why question our winning streak?HT a wise friend. 
Brexit is that guy in the street who tells you to “smile more” when you’re on your way to a funeral  
#Brexit was not a "revolt against the global elite".It was a con trick promoted by liars, crooks and cheats. They cared not a toss for the electoral laws that protect our democracy.And they were bankrolled by the very wealthiest of that global elite.  
Announcement today is largely continuity but Brexit is a cloud of uncertainty hanging over #IndustrialStrategy. @BBCr4today 
Please support the @rescue_news open letter to UK government in support of the 'polluter pays' principle post Brexit - which is the basis on which most #archaeology work is undertaken in this country!  
Kate Hoey wants Ireland to be positive about Brexit. Told by an Irishman that Brexit isn’t an Irish project. Suggests Ireland might want to leave too.  Common theme: Brexiteers find it very difficult to properly own this vanity project #r4today 
Kate Hoey on @BBCr4today the epitome of Brexit: selfish, bloody-minded wrecker, no clue, no plan, nothing to offer, just pointless bullying 
Jaysus. Kate Hoey’s position on #r4today is staggering. You won Kate, get over it. It’s not everyone else’s job to sort out the mess you’ve created. You wanted to Leave, you come up with solutions. You’re blaming the Irish government for your complete lack of planning #Brexit 
Kate Hoey on @BBCr4today in full daft & arrogant Brexit mode: a) claims 'there are solutions' to Irish border b) of course fails to detail what they are d) says any hard border would be fault of Irl/EU & d) says Irl should follow UK out of EU 
#r4today Kate Hoey giving classic example of leavers' ostrich approach to #brexit: there's no problem and if it there is, it's everybody else's fault except the UK. No recognition of the disaster she and her chums have created. 
In today's Brexit news: Liam Fox says Irish border won't be resolved until EU-UK trade deal is struck | Big pharma to unveil £1bn boost for May’s post-Brexit vision  
Kate Hoey asks why Ireland can’t be “more positive” about Brexit #r4today 
According to @BBCr4today the Irish border has "just emerged as a stumbling block" to Brexit. Some of us have been worrying about this for a while. 
Brilliant piece here from an Englishmen living in Ireland about how politicians and commentators on this side of the Irish Sea get it wrong so often when it comes to the logic between Ireland's stance on Brexit: 
Forget About Catalonia And Brexit, The Next European Black Swan Could Be Transylvania  
I know it's deeply unfashionable to say anything positive about bankers and listening to them about Brexit. But. Just. Look. At. The. Tax. Take.  
"There is a distinct possibility Brexit won't happen." - @VinceCableWant an exit from Brexit? Add your name:  
.@WelshGovernment expands overseas operations to boost trade & inward investment post-Brexit.Offices in Canada, France, Germany & Qatar will help protect existing markets, pursue new trade & investment opportunities & promote Wales to the world.More:  
Law firms worry that Brexit might put a brake on dealmaking. But so far there is little sign of this  
Come on @DavidDavisMP, when are the Brexit impact studies being released? Or are they undergoing thorough reactions? #StopBrexit 
Every year thousands of animals leave the UK on trucks and ships destined for slaughter in other countries. They endure immense suffering and many don't survive the journey. Join us in calling for a ban on live export post Brexit.  
Well @DavidDavisMP Those 58 #BrexitImpactReports are due (overdue) tomorrow. They need to be released IN FULL, unedited, unredacted. People need the truth about what Brexit means, and a #FinalSayForAll 
EU27 consultations. Good meeting in Tallinn w. President @KerstiKaljulaid. Thks to the Estonian Presidency & #eu2017.ee teams. United we stand! #Brexit  
Damian Green offered to pay Tory money to DUP. We are witnessing re-creation of ancient toxic alliance between Tory England + Protestant Ulster to do down Ireland as Fox remarks on border underline. DUP want Good Friday Agreement buried by Brexit. Lab has a view? @GreensladeR 
Wow. The post Brexit plan is a dirty great research centre in a deal done with massive US Pharma. We are going to be reaping the harvest from the seeds of the shit tree for decades...  
."Ireland is not threatening anybody, least of all a friend, but we REMAIN resolute in our insistence on a sensible way through Brexit that protects Ireland.". 
#MondayMotivation SAVE #AnimalSentience law post #Brexit. PlsRT support HELP @SueHayman1's push for #LAWS4Animals PLS Tweet email call yr MP 
'It's time to get real: the elite revolt against #Brexit is dangerous, destructive and a menace to democracy.' Brendan O'Neill on the use of the 'Irish issue' to thwart democracy in Britain.  
Set against Brexit, today’s ‘industrial strategy’ is irrelevant. Like discussing a new diet while the Titanic sinks. 
Ignorance of Irish history means #Brexit talks will not end well  
I wrote something for @Open2Progress on Brexit, trade, independence and an Icelandic sheep farmer:  
Theresa May's friends the DUP - The new dodgy, homophobic and rabid Brexit supporting party are the new UKIP... #r4today 
Project Fear fails again as international students apply in record numbers despite Brexit scaremongering  
Hypocrisy, and it is hypocrisy, regarding Ireland is disgusting. Brexit isn't internal UK politics and every country it affects has right to protect its interests. Brexiters assuming Ireland should toe the line miss point that UK caused the issues and is owed no favours by anyone 
And in this one tweet the whole point of #Brexit is summed up: Global Britain opened up to a global world  
The migration crisis, Russian aggression in Eastern Europe, and Brexit now challenge the EU's existence 
Perhaps the Referendum has taught people to be skeptical about these broad pronouncements from ideologues that it's all straightforward and everything will be fine. /6 
Perfect way to start week – Brexit-breakfast in #Tallinn #Kadriorg w/ @MichelBarnier . The time is of essence & no-deal-scenario would be the worst out come. Hope UK domestic policy will not hamper the deal. 
Norman Smith just committed heresy on #r4today -Smith: “The Government’s industrial strategy is meaningless if the economy tanks because of Brexit”.Humphrys: [dismissively] “Ah! Thank you, Norman”. 
Sad (although not surprising) to see Matt Ridley asserting in The Times that the House of Lords "confirmed" the UK has no Brexit Bill. /1  
If Brexit proceeds, the damage caused won’t be because those who voted Remain didn’t support it or because businesspeople are lazy, it’ll be because it is an inherently terrible idea. 
If the majority of people now want Britain to stay in the EU, surely Brexit is now against the will of the people?  
No, you don't do you Gerard. That's why you're in UKIP. 
The EU's plan for the next stage of Brexit talks has been leaked to The Independent, and it doesn't bode well for Theresa May  
After being chased frm her Kyeserwa & Nkose constituencies,Kalangala NRM MP Nabayiga had this to say; “I am not ready to suffer alone with the voters, if President Museveni so much wants this amendment, he should put it to a referendum & go around the country campaigning for it.” 
British Prime Minister Theresa May has been warned to change course over Brexit and the Irish border  
Sadly there is little evidence that Britain's elites are prepared to use Brexit as a spur to thinking up bright new policies  
British journalist's article about Irish attitude towards Brexit takes irony to a new level | JOE.ie  
 BREAKING: Angela Merkel has just been told to RESIGN by people in her own party  via @Your Brexit 
You all better watch out or Alberta will hold a referendum to get that Grey Cup back. Because that’s something a referendum can do. #ableg 
"To put it bluntly, Ireland has evolved a complex and fluid sense of what it means to have a national identity while England has reverted to a simplistic and static one. This fault line opens a crack into which the whole Brexit project may stumble." 
"[Brexit] threatens to devour those who cannot solve its great riddle: How do you impose an EU frontier across a small island without utterly unsettling the complex compromises that have ended a thirty-year conflict?"  via @nybooks 
So what, in a 2nd referendum I would vote remain too. Difference is I didn't have the chance to scupper it recently and not take it. Who are you kidding.  #StopBrexit  ADD Your name 
47 lakh Dalits and  6.5 people of Gujarat wanted me to contest election,  so I am contesting election - Jignesh Mevani  referendum party wale Jigneshbhai 
Headhunters Odgers Berndtson open Dublin office for Brexit  
A must read. If Brexit is stopped, or even mitigated, those brave and smart enough to change their minds will rightly be regarded as heroes. All Remain efforts should be directed at helping people to do this.  
Scotland's Brexit miniser: says if Northern Ireland remains in EU market, Scotland should have choice to stay in too  
City of London says tax take backs case for Brexit banks deal  
Just like Brexit, the resurgence of the cassette tape shows we’re all pining for a golden age that never existed  
BREAKING: MSU Student Representative Assembly votes to send OPIRG fee to referendum in Jan. 2018. 
Brexit ends a golden age of good-neighbourliness and places two countries on opposing sides of the negotiating table  
LETTER: The Referendum Act did not commit the country to enact the result  
20% chance it won't happen? Not good enough. After all the deceit & political incompetence to achieve a #Brexit which costs more for even less return, based on the supposed Will of 37% of the electorate in a non-binding vote, we need 100% certainty it won't happen! #StopBrexit!! 
#Kashmir is brutally beautiful & likely the greatest untapped skiing destination.It is also occupied by India & 95000 people were killed since 89. Maybe lobbying for a #Referendum is a better idea than whitewashing occupation?  
Pretty much all brexiteers on twitter seem angry. Angry despite "winning" the referendum but also angry at the idea that someone would oppose them. They seem driven by anger and that suggests one thing. #Brexit is an ideological stance not a pragmatic one. #stopbrexit #RevokeA50 
Not as 'funny' as a chancellor who claims unemployment is zero, Foreign Sec who threatens freedom of Brit abroad, Deputy PM with illegal porn on work comp who gives Tory funds to another party, Brexit Sec who makes up/hides impact assessments, Home Sec in contempt of court... 
Worry now is that voters have mimicked UK politicians of last 50+ years with an illusory & illogical chop 'n change knee-jerk vote, without thinking about key issues longer term. Any responsible parliament would throw out #Brexit and engage with the public's already amended view! 
Merck blueprints $1.3B research hub in a post-Brexit London, with 950 staffers$MRK 
Big pharma to unveil £1bn boost for May’s post-Brexit vision  
This video also works as a beautiful analogy for Brexit, as well...  
Just met with UK International Trade Secretary Liam Fox - had a great chat about the UK/NZ relationship and trade opportunities post Brexit.  
The EU actually trying to do something about the sleazy tax havens, many run from British dependencies, is one of the main reasons the Brexiters want Brexit.  
Hospitals in crisis.Schools in crisis.Brexit in crisis.Housing in crisis.Prisons in crisis.Social Care in crisis.Police in crisis.Economy in crisis.Cabinet Ministers in crisis.Theresa May in crisis.Welcome to the #ToryWinterCrisis 
Ended up in such an awful situation at 31! 2016: Brexit, Trump2017: Published author2018: Vacationing with your mum?  
"A right-wing Tory Brexit will end with huge deregulation. This will be sold to the general public as freedom from the red tape of an EU bureaucracy that Britain escaped, not the public protections put in place over decades to ensure civil society thrives"  
I'm blaming Theresa May and Brexit for this impending defeat against Australia in the Ashes 
Barmy Army singing “God Save YOUR Gracious Queen” at the Gabba as Australia cruises to Victory in the 1st Test. Bring on The Republic Referendum? @Peter_Fitz 
My 88-year-old mum (DM reader)voted leave to stop immigration.She still speaks about brexit with the fervour of a brainwashed cult member.Completely deluded to think immigration will stop - wants to go back to the 1950s.Reality will hit when I move back to EU27 #StopBrexit #FBPE 
If Legatum were really, really smart, they would arrange with their "people" to stop "brexit" , having made bets on Sterling - they would then make £ hundreds of billions. Sound fantastic ? Mr May's US Company's fund went up by ~£100 BILLION on the "unexpected" leave vote in 2016 
We must lobby politicians to stop Metro being distributed on public transport, especially during election/referendum periods. It is a Tory, unionist rag and it pains me to see it on Edinburgh buses.  
Brexit really has become a shouty old smelling-of-piss drunk hasn't it? 
Brexit is only just starting to show. 90% of current damage is down to Osborne and his team of fake economists 
#Brexit 800 years of genocide, wars, famine, starvation and troubles. The legacy remains written in stone, word and memory  but not in deed since the 1998 Good Friday Agreement. And now in their blind madness the #Brexiteers repeat the errors of the past and re-engender war. 
Brexit means Britain's banks will lose EU passporting rights.  
My preconditions for supporting Corbyn: he moves against Brexit and he starts caring more about immigrants, both in cutting out the xenophobia and loosening the Immigration Rules. I am ready to throw my support behind him if that happens. RT if you agree.  
Dear Ireland, Pls forgive us!Britain is currently indisposed...You see the billionaire-sponsored-swivel-eye’d-loons have finally taken over the asylumHelp! ...Save them from themselves!SOS! ...#StopBrexitSincerely yours,Sane folk trapped on Monkey Brexit Island   
Oh David, David, David...."We should all focus..."Really?Just publish the Schrodinger's Brexit Impact Assessments (that either do or don't exist). Then we'll all see all your mythical opportunitiesDo your job. Do as Parliament require.Then @DavidDavisMP .... #Resign 
In Ireland we learn about UK history but in UK you don’t learn about Irish history. That’s really quite apparent now in the #Brexit discussions. Brexiteers making it very personal as usual.... 
1/ This is quite simply staggering from Kate Andrews on the IRE/NI Brexit issue! #skypapers @IanDunt @StevePeers @GuitarMoog 
Doesn't the issue about the Irish border exemplify the English attitude to the Brexit talks, how dare the EU and EU countries think about what;s best for them don't they understand they should simply do what we tell them  ? 
The EU's plan for the next stage of Brexit talks has been leaked to The Independent, and it doesn't bode well for Theresa May  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
How fascinating.Rupert Murdoch’s pal  Michael Gove retweets Rupert Murdoch employee Steve Hilton. Original tweet: how Gove made up his mind re Brexit.  
15% of exports are to the UK. That’s far from ‘most’. With innumeracy like that, it’s not as surprising you support Brexit. 
The last thing #Ireland will ever do is be bullied or browbeaten by a London GovernmentWhy would they?They’ve come through centuries of hell to escape London’s mailed fist#Brexit 
I'm the one that was happy to resign himself to the referendum result, but has got so pissed off by the constant whining by Brexiters that I'm now happy to do anything to stop it. 
-May’s 2016 visit to India a disaster- Much higher immigration from India if UK wants FTA-Liam Fox “utterly unfit” for office. @Lord_Bilimoria rips apart Govt on Brexit/India.  
If Brexit takes place based on the terms agreed so far, this is a million miles from what was promised to the population.  So no mandate at all #stopbrexit #fbpe 
Figures from NISRA on NI sales,* to counter some of the nonsense around. Local NI trade huge. Of external sales, 60% to GB, 15% ROI. Option on the Brexit table now for NI is not either/or but to keep both. *With credit & thanks to @MikeTQUB 
All the fascist Brexit fans are going into a total tailspin right now.  
From my earlier short thread on the Brexit blind faith & bunting. leading to a car crash just waiting to happen.  
Britain just really doesnt give a fiddlers how Brexit will effect us in Ireland.The English Tories have got themselves into an unholy mess by their incompetence & ineptitude & we're all meant to suffer as a consequenceDon't think so! #Brexit 
18 months after #Brexit referendum, #Ireland & border finally on UK front pages - 2 weeks before EU summit. 
The Empire is the hairline.Brexit is the overpriced convertible.  
“The strategy British business wants right now is clarity on Brexit”  @PaulBrandITV - he’s right 
And the award for the most convincing argument to get behind Brexit goes to   
So Ireland relies on UK for its existence! We Irish could teach UK all about sovereignty. Our knowledge & expertise comes from having had our own sovereignty denied by a nasty violent nationalist (imperialist) neighbour for many centuries. #Brexit   
Not true. I blocked CC because her whole Brexit-happened-because-of-Russia thing is just so truther-ish  
I voted for devolution, but it has been a waste of time & money.What has Holyrood done to improve our lives?Zilch.Maybe the next referendum should be on whether we scrap Holyrood and have a system of local authority control via WM?  
A very useful thread. Everyone should read.During the referendum debate the Remain side tried to disqualify EFTA/EEA as an option, in order to promote Remain - but that led to a poor understanding of it - especially the very misleading "rule taker" chestnut.  
A true British patriot will do all in their power to stop Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn says he would vote remain in a second EU referendum  
'Brexit WON'T happen' Political elite will FORCE Britain to stay in EU, claims Morrissey  
Just a reminder from Irish chieftain Con Bacach O’Neill (1480–1559) re Brexit & Irish border & Tory-DUP attempt to treat Ireland as still a colony. “Do not enter into disputation with the Sasanach, it leads to confusion of the mind”. It's England's screw-up, not ours. No border. 
#Brexit won’t happen. Here’s what I think (& hope!):.@Conservatives will end up with ‘no deal’. .@UKLabour have said they would reject ‘no deal’.We have a GE with @jeremycorbyn offering a second referendum. He wins by a landslide, referendum happens fast & Brexit is stopped.  
Brexit is going well apart from a few minor considerations that haven’t quite been fully thought through:1. Ireland.2. Trade.3. Everything else. 
Missing - 58 Brexit Impact Studies, if found please return to @DavidDavisMP a reward will be posted on the side of a big red bus! 
These self deluding, clueless Brexit fantasists don’t so much have a plan for the Irish border but never had any idea about how it could be resolved. 
How dare the Tories hold peace in Ireland to ransom over their pitiful xenophobic Brexit fantasy. That party is an enemy of democracy. Utterly disgusting. Boot them the hell out as soon as possible 
Top notch work, Twitter accounts declaring themselves to be Irish citizens discussing Brexit, referring to Eire gov.Your secret can never be uncovered.  
“We have moved from one of the fastest growing economies in the EU and OECD to one of the slowest. The cause: Brexit.” - @FT#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
The British have to remember, Ireland was never theirs in the 1st place and it was England voted for Brexit, yet now they try and blame the Irish for their own making. Typical British, make a mess of everything then blame the victims of it for the fallout. Despicable 
If it does nothing else, Brexit will destroy the relationship between Britain and Ireland, says @fotoole 
Am I only one sick to death of this Brexit roundabout? Is the British government trying to start trade talks or is it just on strike? I can’t tell anymore  
I voted Leave but regret it now, would rather  we were pursuing a Norway style relationship within the EEA/EFTA, I would personally value the Union over Brexit and think the Brexiteers attitude over the issue of the Irish birder is poor to say the least 
"How Brexit Was Engineered by Foreign Billionaires to Bring About Economic Chaos – for Profit" by Graham Vanbergen☞  
Like most of the Brexit calamities ... they were known about by MPs and the movers and shakers behind the Brexit ‘Coup de lie’ which makes them all the more culpable and dishonest now for continuing to race towards the abyss   
A Remain supporter on Facebook just said that Brexit was won on a campaign of lies.When I detailed 10 of the obvious lies told by Remain and asked her to give me examples of Leave lies, she cited the red bus. I pointed out it was the gross figure.Silence was then forthcoming!  
#A50challenge It's about more than Brexit - it's about finally holding our corrupt politicians to account. It's about stopping the rot.The future of UK democracy is in the balance. 
FT: Big pharma groups to unveil £1bn boost for May’s post-Brexit vision #tomorrowspaperstoday 
There is a distinct possibility Brexit may not happen. We may get to the middle of next year and find it is just a horrible mess. The public should then have a choice whether to go ahead or exit from Brexit  
Britain is warned it faces the longest fall in living standards since records began  
Remind us what the Electoral Commission originally said? That there were "no reasonable grounds to believe Vote Leave and Grimes had been working together"  
I'll be on @bbc5live after 10pm explaining that Coveney is not a republican zealot competing for "Green vote" with Varadkar (or Adams).& that we're a sovereign nation negotiating in our own interests.& busting other Brexit myths.. 
#a50challenge  A legal challenge in order to test whether we can be dragged out of the EU on the basis of an advisory referendum.  Please support. #StopBrexit 
To all the  folks suddenly  shocked by UKs attitude to Ireland re #Brexit You do all know the UK at highest level is still covering up its role in arming paramilitaries, and refusing truth and justice to families of innocent it's army murdered. But yeah, some rude tweets.. 
The EU's plan for the next stage of Brexit talks has been leaked to The Independent, and it doesn't bode well for Theresa May  
ICYMI: I got annoyed w/Uk media coverage of Ireland today and did a wee thread #brexit  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
“It is time for the Opposition to bring a defence of the Single Market and Customs Union out from the shadows of the Tory hard Brexit agenda.”   
There's still a “distinct possibility” Brexit might not happen.   
The DUP yesterday told world N Ireland ‘wanted’ the opposite of this. Increasingly looks like the dreary steeples of Fermanagh and Tyrone is where #brexit rhetoric will hit reality  
Each day that passes, more brexitears die, more remainers are born. Simple demographics mean ultimately brexit will fail. More pro EU daily  
Score One for the Experts as #Brexit Costs Grow  
Brexit is taking its toll on Britain's economy before it's even happened  
In the BREXIT negotiations the Southern Irish could overplay their influence. If EU talks fail it is the Republic of Ireland more than any other EU nation which will suffer most! It will have lower CAP receipts; increase in taxes to EU budget; and collapse of Agric sales in GB! 
Polls on Brexit & NI are quite rare so read this. Clear majority of catholics & protestants appear to back free movement across Irish border with border controls between the island & GB. (NB. it's a slightly odd Q. IMO).  
Speed at which media are coming out to bat for Legatum is remarkable. I wrote this earlier today. Features almost no Russia but raises questions about access, influence and #brexit  
For those who thought the racism of the #Brexit referendum campaign was bad enough...now begins the hate against Ireland & the Irish. People like @GerardBattenMEP really do want the 19th century back 
Brexit or the Union. Over to you, Brexiters.  
'There is also widespread public dismay about how the Brexit negotiations are going. Almost two-thirds of the British public say they are unclear about the UK Government’s negotiating position, and over half think the Government is handling the negotiations poorly.'  
There's a new slogan for Brexit  
Theresa May's policy of heading for a hard Brexit is supported by just 11% of the public. Probably mostly loopy UKIP voters anyway.#timetostopbrexitmadness 
No, the Kremlin is not behind the Legatum Institute - or Brexit. My blog:   
BREXIT's Irish Impasse: Ireland's perspective:   
Britain's banks will start moving staff abroad early next year because of Brexit  
This is a superb analysis of Brexit (in general), English nationalism and the Irish border, from @fotoole 
Northern Irish public:"People should be prepared to accept border controls between Northern Ireland and Great Britain if agreed in the Brexit negotiations between the Gov and the EU":Agree: 49%Disagree: 39%via @IpsosMORI 
Theresa May will keep the final Brexit Bill SECRETHer Days are numbered at No 10! Is that what she wants?  
.Oooh!The DUP have scored a spectacular own-goal with Brexit.....Unionist voters would accept a border in the Irish Sea!. 
Just in case anyone thinks the British were not given due notice. Brexit’s Irish Question  via @nybooks 
Dear US friends.....this week I write about @michaelgove, his strategist & Brexit.You won't know him. But he met your very own @realDonaldTrump before our PM @theresa_may.Because: @rupertmurdoch pic.twitter.com/va0KFUW3bq 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
The hard-won kinship between Britain and Ireland is threatened by Brexit idiocy | Fintan O’Toole  
Keep talking like this and you may find Ireland will be a bigger country and the UK a smaller country than you ever dreamed before #BrexitYour bravado is foolhardy and unconvincing  
Fleeced: Scottish farmers to lose £2 billion in EU funding after Brexit Do they really think the Tory government in Westminster will make-up from the loss of EU subsidies???  
Granite Brexit Ball, bloody great stuff. No room for nancyboys in this game. Wouldn't see this today in the first division  
In many ways the most logical thing would be to put any trade barrier resulting from Brexit in the Irish Sea. But that would bring down the UK government, I guess.   
Already 26% of people who voted for #Brexit believe they were duped by the Leave campaign:  via @LondonEconomic 
Us at #LabLon17 "In our view, it is time for Labour to champion truth. It is time for honesty. It is time we respected voters, both Leave and Remain.""We should call Brexit for what it is, a right wing coup."#StopBrexit 
BREAKING: MERKEL finally being asked to resignAngela Merkel has just been told to RESIGN by people in her own party  via @Your Brexit 
Open to EU members, countries wanting to join & EEA states. Brexit Britain none of those  
The BBC always wants to blame things on #Brexit. I’m not saying this is a conspiracy, I’m saying it is a fact of life.  
Nicola Jennings on Britain’s economic outlook and Brexit – cartoon  
I’ve always admired Irish diplomacy-till now. Can Dublin not see that to protect its interest it should insist to EU partners that Brexit talks move ahead in parallel not sequentially so that Irish question can be wrapped into future relationship with UK? 
94 MPs have signed my letter to Michael Gove demanding he makes a statement to the @houseofcommons guaranteeing the status of animals as #SentientBeings post Brexit.  
'We want our waters!' Fisherman insists UK fishing industry will DIE without Brexit  
The government is now thinking about selling #Britain out to the #European Court of Justice after #Brexit. An independent, sovereign country should not submit to unaccountable foreign #judges - this would be a huge and unacceptable betrayal! @theresa_may? 
Brexit Explained  
Brexit's cost to aerospace is "extremely" worrying, a parliametary committee says  
Wow. Missed this. Why did Michael Gove back Brexit? Here's the moment he decided. A phone call to Legatum backer Paul Marshall. And @FoxNews's very own @SteveHiltonx 
The Brexit vote has caused a significant rise in prices, especially food  
Job losses. Thousands and thousands of them.Did you vote for that?#Brexit #StopBrexit #StopBrexitHour #ExitBrexit #FBPE 
WATCH: Retired special forces sergeant says DEPORT ALL TERRORISTS AND THEIR FAMILIES  via @Your Brexit 
Stopping Brexit is THE issue of this moment in history. I will sign any petition, go on any march and support any cause with that aim.There may be many long, exhausting battles, but we will win this war.#KeepTheFaith#StopBrexit@LBC @Skynews 
The Brexit Referendum was about EU Law and its effect on our Sovereignty, Economy, and Society.If the referendum had been on nuclear physics, I would definitely consider myself "uneducated".  
Irish Minister for Europe @HMcEntee makes the Irish position on Brexit absolutely clear on @Channel4News : Ireland doesn’t want to veto UK progression to next phase but will do so if necessary to defend vital national interest. Irish position consistent from the get-go. 
Hi there @DavidDavisMP - Where exactly are those 58 #Brexit impact studies. I'm guessing the @DExEUgov is busy making them out of things air. #StopBrexit #StopBrexitHour #FBPE #ExitfromBrexit  
59% of supporters of Unionist parties agree with the statement "People should be prepared to accept border controls between Northern Ireland and Great Britain, if this is agreed in the Brexit negotiations between the Government and the EU"  
#DUP lost #Brexit referendum in Six Cos & political unionist majority in north has ended...No veto, No authority!#SpecialDesignatedStatus 
If patriotism means loving your country & wanting its best, I plead guilty. As a UK citizen, I believe #Brexit will damage us irretrievably.  
‘Brexit will hurt EU MORE than UK’ German MEP breaks ranks to admit Brussels is BLUFFING  "This is not a banana republic, this is Great Britain. If the Prime Minister said she will fulfil financial obligations, that should be enough." 
I still find it hard to believe that a lot of Scottish farmers voted Tory knowing the Tories would go for a hard Brexit.......BUT THEY DID!!!Scotland has only ONE choice.....INDEPENDENCE!!!Brexit: 'catastrophic' for Scotland's sheep sector, report warns  
Ireland aren't threatening the UK. They are looking to protect their own interests, and those of NI, which aren't being considered by the UK at the moment. Brexit will prove that Ireland isn't reliant on the UK, especially when companies are already moving from London to Dublin. 
Lots of people slagging off millennials as they have a mobile phone, don't want massive debt & didn't want #Brexit. In other news:Average house price in London:1996: £79,0002016: £488,908 (518% increase), Londoner's average wage:1999: £22,4872016: £36,302 (47% increase). 
EXCLUSIVE POLL: Unionist supporters content with East West post #Brexit border controls…  
."We have moved from one of the fastest growing economies in the EU & OECD to one of the slowest. The cause: Brexit.". via @FT 
Newsflash: if you want indy, that requires an indy referendum, which requires indy supporters to not vote Labour. 
We'll be in London on 11th December to demand the Tories don't get the #FinalSay on Brexit.Come and join us and thousands of other Pro-Europeans campaigning for a bright future for the UK.#StopBrexit 
I was denied the vote but stand to lose my rightS.The referendum was an undemocratic sham.I will NEVER get behind Brexit.  
“The independence #referendum was the peaceful and just voice of the people,”@masoud_barzani said. “Neither a law nor a government can cancel it.” #SupportKurdistan #TwitterKurds 
Full, clean Brexit... Bring it on!  
Incidentally Legatum fellow @montie blocked me months ago for pointing out his funder, hedgie Paul Marshall, got a pretty good return from Brexit. Gave £100,000 to Vote Leave. Made £10 million on market movements on the night.  
A clear, balanced, deeply worrying must-read piece from my colleague @Lewis_goodall #ireland #Brexit  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Whatever else Brexit is about, it isn’t workers’ rights   
More shocking revelations about how the Vote Leave campaign in #Brexit referendum didn’t just tell lies but also broke the rules.  What will be the consequences? 
It's a bit funny to expect the Irish to have a plan for Brexit, when Britain clearly has no plan. 
The next two weeks are a huge test of Theresa May’s authority and her ability to negotiate Brexit - @Keir_StarmerRT if you agree. 
I don't regret voting Leave. In fact, I'm proud to be a #Brexit Leaver and no amount of political objections, economical pessimism, EU threats, media bias, Remoaner whingeing or personal abuse would ever make me change my mind.   
Wise words, from a British perspective, on #Brexit and us: “The Good Friday Agreement has been almost too successful: it has allowed us to put Northern Ireland’s troubles in a box marked ‘history’.”  
Fascinating detail from @PeterKGeoghegan's excellent Legatum backgrounder. Paul Marshall - hedgie & Vote Leave donor who made £££ from Brexit - is a funder. And @montie is a fellow. Marshall also funds Unherd. Which today published this. Shock. 
CORBYNISTA: The majority voted for Brexit! We have to accept it!REMAINER: The majority also voted for Austerity. By your logic you should support that too.CORBYNISTA: Err ... #StopBrexit 
Boris Johnson & Michael Gove, #Brexit is far from simple. Costs of your cavalier approach could be huge #StopBrexit 
Which bit of leaving the EU do Brextremists not get when demanding Brexit Britain pick the EU's 2023 European City of Culture? Fruitcakes wanting their fruitcake and eating it too 
The biggest threat to peace in NI isn’t Brexit or dissidents, it’s ppl walking round Belfast Christmas Market pushing triple buggies 
Does a 'Jobs First Brexit' mean the jobs leave first? 
You know how the shady Legatum Institute was originally backed with 90s Russian emergent oligarchy money?The Legatum Institute is there to lobby for the conditions to implement disaster capitalism.There’s your Russia angle. Brexit is about the enrichment of a financial elite. 
NI voted to remain. Then DUP promised a #Brexit deal recognising "the reality of our geography and of our history". Now DUP blocks NI deal?  
UK government told to accept high immigration or forget trade deal with India after Brexit  
Remarkable that these Brextremists no longer even bother to make the case Brexit will be good for Britain, just we have to deliver it because people voted for it.  
Irish Govt tells me they’ll use veto to block Brexit talks if @theresa_may refuses to budge on the border question. @Channel4News in 5 mins 
I've never seen Sterling go down that quick since Brexit 
My long read on the Irish Brexit crisis. The EU riddle about which the government seemed to entirely forget.  
I suspect, given that #Brexit is turning toxic, Mrs May would be glad of the chance to re-run the referendum, this time stipulating a super majority being needed to trigger leaving.  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
As if #Russiagate cannibalism couldn't get weirder—the Legatum Institute that funded Pomerantsev & Anne Applebaum's "Russian disinformation" hysteria now accused of secretly helping Vladimir Putin stage hard Brexit "coup" in Britain  
His Grace AoC Welby warned against hatred generated by Pro-Brexit papers. Hatred should never be tolerated! Some ‘Remain’ supporters are also full of hatred and vitriol! I know! Have sent my last tweet on BREXIT such has been the bile levied at me for one poorly worded tweet 
The PM does NOT believe in *sharing* - remember she didn't want to involve Parliament in #Brexit discussions until the Courts overruled her !  
."The insouciant shrug of the shoulders will no longer do.The Irish issue was the referendum issue which did not bark.It's barking NOW.We must answer its call & do it urgently & convincingly.". 
Not the first time autocratic instincts shown. Replying to the petition seeking a referendum on the deal: "There must be no attempts to remain inside the European Union, no attempts to join it by the back door and no second referendum," irrespective of the will of the people.  
When even the FT starts writing about "creative solutions" for the Irish border without providing a hint of what they'll be you get a sense that the UK political elite still doesn't grasp how grave its Brexit dilemma is 
I wonder if Theresa Villiers still thinks it was "highly irresponsible" for John Major and Tony Blair to go to Ulster and warn about the consequences of Brexit for N Ireland/Eire in early June last year?  
9/11 These are the sorts of issues that were blithely waved away by the Leave campaign before the referendum with an "it'll be alright". I had foolishly assumed this was because they were difficult issues for them. It turns out that they had genuinely not given a thought to them. 
A tank-tank funded by a foreign businessman with close links to Putin helps produce a secret letter designed to influence Brexit policy behind the backs of the cabinet. And we're not supposed to report or discuss it? Seriously? 
8/11 The reason is because they know they have no answer for scenarios 3, 4, 5 that keeps their "invisible border" promise, does not threaten to bust their 'Confidence and Supply" deal with the DUP, expose Brexit for the clusterfuck it really is and, probably, cause an election. 
More Brits want Swedish citizenship since Brexit: report  
There will never be violence/unrest by Leavers. They've not had one significant pro brexit march/rally because most of the active ones are bots. 
Ireland: The Brexit riddle Britain forgot  
British Prime Minister Theresa May has been warned to change course over Brexit and the Irish border  
Nigel Farage has finally secured a face-to-face meeting with Michel Barnier – and he has vowed to tell the EU's #Brexit negotiator to stop wasting Britain's time.  
In bizarre intervention, a former Italian PM and EU Commissioner says EU should 'force UK to give us English language after Brexit’  
.@OwenJones84 says Brexit has fundamentally damaged our democracy  
Major & Blair both say Brexit will break up United Kingdom,caused primarily by a Conservative govt with a mantra Brexit means Brexit  
Brexit talks delayed because of EU ‘OBSESSION’ with ever-closer union, Liam Fox blasts  
Brexiteer Tory MP @OwenPaterson SLAMS 'myth' of Irish border chaos as part of anti-Brexit 'blackmail'  
Sean Dyche: "It wasn't a penalty at all. Arsenal are cheats like all foreigners. I can't wait for all their players to be kicked out of this country after Brexit. HARD BREXIT! Arsenal are worse than ISIS."  
Serves you right for voting for Brexit #twitterclarets 
Sometimes politics means doing the right thing. Standing up for what you believe in. Sometimes doing the right thing is more important than public opinion. Brexit is one of those things.  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
20 year of frozen pay and productivity?  What’s the plan?  My column on the bizarre Brexit Budget.   
Breaking!#LouiseMensch & her "multiple sources" have found 'Kremlin trace' in #Brexit!Must be true  
The biggest danger to the UK economy is not Brexit but Corbyns loons. Common sense will flush them out before 2022.  
THAT’S for Brexit, Burnley #UTA 
To all remainers. I sincerely apologise for my vote contributing to the #Farce #Chaos #CliffPlunder that is Brexit. I bitterly regret my decision to rid the younger generations of a worthwhile future. I bow my head in shame. 
Dear young remainers. The original vote was sold to us a trading agreement. Nothing else. Over the years it has morphed into an unelected body that controls every aspect of our lives. We were duped. That's why I voted out.#Brexit 
I’ve watched a lot of interviews on Brexit and nothing will top Ann Widdecombe in her panto costume setting out why she voted to Leave  
Could Brexit threaten the “soft power” of English law around the world?  
Will someone sensible on the Brexit or live-with-Brexit continent explain to us where Fintan O’Toole has got it wrong?  
Some Remainers, utterly unreconciled to the referendum result, are attempting to delegitimise it by both linking it to Putin boogeyman, & implying that ordinary day-to-day think tank activity is shadowy & mysterious. 
Brexit is not inevitable, it can must and will be reversed. #revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
EU on the brink: ‘no deal’ Brexit leaves Brussels with no money for France, Germany.  
.@OwenJones84: Yes the Russians interfered in Brexit, but they're not responsible for the result  
Leave people forget key issues with immigration:1. People have to WANT to come2. The country needs to be welcoming3. The economy needs to be strong4. Opportunities need to existBrexit torpedoed the first two and is currently smashing up the others.  
Philip Hammond falls victim to Brexit fall-out – cartoon  
We're discussing Ireland and Brexit with Ireland 'to play tough' over talks. We'll be speaking to @MarkHennessy of The @IrishTimes about what this means. And you can have your say too... 0345 60 60 973 84850 LBC#SalmondOnSunday 
.@OwenJones84 "By obsessing over Russian interference in Brexit, we're letting our own elites off the hook."  
This week I talk to a dumb animal (Tim), and a lovely clever little doggy. #AnimalRights #Brexit #Tories #FakeNewsMedia 
Former Government minister Lord @Digbylj warns businesses in Britain need to see strong leadership over Brexit and that means standing up to EU demands  
@DorothyBruce14 I definitely remember that during the 2014 Scottish referendum, Westminster insisted a frictionless border between an EU UK and a non-EU Scotland was impossible. What has changed in five years to make such a border possible in Ireland?#brexitshambles 
Brexit is a heartbreaker and a country wrecker, all the politicians know this. The 58 impact assessments would prove this too which is why the government is reluctant to release them. Brexit can, must and will be stopped.#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
1. Most nations require a super majority for constitutional change. They are right. 51% winner takes all is simply not good enough. Virtually the same amount of people said no as did yes. #FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
Brexit has been shown to be a mistake. Don’t wait till it’s too late. Reverse Article50. Save the nation.#ThinkAgain@acgrayling @RCorbettMEP @SebDance @MollyMEP @julie4nw @TheresaMEP @Anna_Soubry @johnmcdonnellMP @jeremycorbyn @EmilyThornberry @Keir_Starmer @TulipSiddiq 
Whatever your view on Brexit, Leave or Remain, it is increasingly apparent that it is weakening democracy in Britain, not strengthening it. 
Make no mistake; the Tories are to blame for Brexit as they initiated the whole absurd process purely to shore up their OWN support base, but right now, LABOUR is the party that’s making Brexit happen. 
3/ On Sept 25, the Kurds adopted an Independence Referendum, which Putin opposes, because it threatens his energy interests in that region. (Id)  
Vital reading on the disaster capitalist think tank delivering a billionaires Brexit, by @PeterKGeoghegan. 
Why is everyone acting so shocked that T May appears to be on the brink of selling the country out over Brexit. She is a Remain , she put all Remain in places re negotiations. Anyone who goes into negotiations offering 40 billion when you don’t owe a penny is a traitor 
Brexit is not working. It will crush the country. It is ordinary families who will pay the price. #ThinkAgain#FBPE 
Certainly a hard border in Northern Ireland would be bad news for all of us. But in threatening a veto, Dublin has missed the point that Brexit with no trade deal would be very bad indeed for Eire’s economy. 
I own a small wine importing/retailing business. The Sterling crash has already caused a big increase in costs/prices. If Brexit happens, the inevitable further crash, along with potential tariffs and extra layers of bureaucracy will signal the end for my business. #StopBrexit 
I believe #Brexit could be stopped if we offered the EU, say, Lincolnshire and Morrissey by way of an apology. We could even throw in James Corden for free. A small sacrifice. 
."Brexit has poisoned British political life & it now threatens something similar for relations between the UK & Ireland." 
Only 37% of voters c.26% of the UK Public actively voted 4 Leave/#Brexit in a legally non-binding test of public opinion...what followed incl. the decision 2 make it mandatory & deny all right 2 a #FinalSay + #StopBrexit option is pure politics. Not heard 1 MP say this..amazing. 
And the final point is the crucial one. The EU have singularly failed to prove any legal basis for their Brexit extortion.  
Man will go brexit on them pull out the ting and flex it on them @DDoubleE7  
."The Archbishop of Canterbury has accused Brexit-backing newspapers of "stirring up hatred" in a major intervention". 
Brexit: No Irish border decision before trade deal - Fox  
I am no fan of Brexit transition deal but UK must resist Spain's shameful attempt to exclude Gibraltar from it.  
So many reasons to abandon #Brexit, all of them enough on their own.The liesThe financial cheatingThe GerrymanderingThe fact it was an advisory referendum and MPs have not voted to leave.......and much more.When will May stop it or quit?  
Puke. Jeremy Hunt setting himself up as a ‘Brexiteer’ Tory leadership candidate to rival BoJo if May goes.Hunt well knows the damage Brexit is doing to the NHS. But does he care about the lives in his charge? Nope -he’s all pro-Brexit for self interest. 
Liam Fox behaving as if his fantasy trade deals will solve all the issues of Brexit, they won’t. This is not a time for political ping pong and brinkmanship but common sense and pragmatism. UK Gov running out of time and ideas. #brexitshambles 
Thanks to many (well, most) for positive response to me & Benny on A.Marr. I felt we dealt with Brexit gracefully; it’s a rearrangement of friendship not an Alastair Campbell hatefest. Luckily the new presentation of Chess also got a mention. Coliseum w/ENO May 1 just 40 shows. 
Voted against a 3 line Whip on Monday for Britain to stay in the #CustomsUnion which would eg solve the #NIreland #Brexit #nightmare 
This is the same guy who writes in @TimOBrien's @BV that Russia's annexation of Crimea, which involved kidnapping, killing, torturing activists, was a legit referendum. : 
Great summary of what Hammond’s budget means for UK science, tech & infrastructure. It’s the right general sentiment- but not enough juice, not fast enough- and will only counterbalance Brexit damage rather than build on current position.  
“Brexit divorce bill to be kept secret”So ministers can put lies on the side of a bus, but they won’t come clean with the public about the cost of Brexit.Stop the damage to jobs and the NHS. #StopBrexit. 
the government will pay: - £61 million on big ben - £1 billion on a deal with the DUP- at least £30 billion on the Brexit dealthe government won't pay:- £17 million to support Manchester after the terror attack (money which they're entitled to)#JusticeForManchester 
British Prime Minister Theresa May has been warned that Ireland will "play tough to the end" over its threat to delay Brexit talks. 
This is the motivation for Brexit on the right.It is also why the cry of ‘Russia’ is convenient to the disaster capitalists at home & in America.Hence my antipathy to the endless invocation of Russian interference to the exclusion of the financially-driven motivations.  
This sucks. Whatever your view on Brexit, it's sad to see the hard earned political friendship between our two countries being somewhat jeopardised :/ 
If I thought Brexit was good for the country as a whole, I would support it. But, as I know from my international business travels, it is turning us into a pariah. 
#Brexit: Liam Fox says no deal on Irish border until the end of trade negotiations with the EU - Contradicting the agreed negotiating schedule agreed between the UK and EU.  
Agreed. Would listening back to Paterson on #wato. A very level, magnanimous Irish politician faced w/raised voice and nonsense statements. This is how #brexit looks from Ireland  
The Brexit fantasists haven't worked even the basics of Brexit. There has to a hard border in Ireland if the north isn't in the customs union. It is just an inevitable consequence of Brexit. #StopBrexit 
British diplomats lobbied hard, but were undermined by Boris Johnson and international confusion around Brexit  
The Democratic Unionist Party's leader has warned she will not back any plan for Northern Ireland to adopt European regulations after Brexit  
There's a new slogan for Brexit  
John McDonnell 'worried' by Liam Fox's comments on Irish border after Brexit – video  
Owen paterson talking nonsense on #brexit and Ireland on radio 4. Goodwill plus electronic invoices will solve the issue. He sounds like a madman 
Irish Republic govt is absolutely right: Brexit was pursued without any regard for consequences for Good Friday Agreement. So if Tories won’t concede on Customs Union, Irish justified in blocking any deal & bringing down May’s govt. Not least if Labour willing to remain in CU 
The UK press has suddenly woken up the Irish issue buried in Brexit.  It is absolutely maddening that this appear as to have come as a surprise.  It was 100% predictable from the beginning.  Shocking strategic planning. 
My late dad worked 40 years on an assembly line making tin cans-at night because the night  shift paid more money and he was our sole provider. So, yeah, I get why people voted #Leave. And why folks voted #Trump,too.But they made a mistake. #Brexit -and Trump-is against THEM.  
Vote Leave donations: the dark ads, the mystery ‘letter’ – and Brexit’s online guru  
Ireland are making a mistake by threatening to veto Brexit trade talks - @Nigel_Farage 
Shad inter trade sec Barry Gardiner hints  Labour might stay in customs union & single currency. Another shift in policy & death of Brexit 
David Davis’ 58 secret studies on Brexit finally released by brave MP. Here’s a snippet. Content much as we suspected.  
This chart is quite a handy way to visualise all the different ways the countries of Europe are connected. The proposed #HardBrexit UK can be seen bottom left outside any European organisation trade & otherwise. #Brexit #StopBrexit #exitfrombrexit #FBPE #FBR pic.twitter.com/AmCKEu91Fh 
Ireland will block Brexit talks unless border issue agreed  
Alex Deane - "We were told we would trigger a recession and go into economic meltdown if we voted to leave but face it, the dire predictions that some people want to be true simply are not true." #Brexit  
Just watched benny from ABBA say to Tim rice that it’s wrong for a pal to leave the other pals- Tim (clearly a Brexit man) said : “we just don’t want RUN by you” - Scot is RUN by England - Uk was NOT “run” by EU 
He hasn't just put the UK at odds with Ireland. He is putting himself at odds with much of his own Cabinet. This is internal lobbying & Brexit-true-believer positioning through Ministerial public statement. Game-playing of the most damaging kind.  
The Observer view of the Irish border farce and Brexit | Observer editorial  
Michel Barnier uses clearest language yet to say Brexit banks will lose single-market access  
The hard-won kinship between Britain and Ireland is threatened by Brexit idiocy | Fintan O’Toole  
FOR SALE: Magic Brexit glasses.  Whilst everyone around sees disaster and economic ruin ahead, you can be happy in deluded belief that there will be pots of money, trade deals and unicorns for everyone.  
Honestly interested to know how the British government think their behaviour over the Irish border — lying, grandstanding, breaking promises — is going to help them in their future as a freewheeling negotiating nation post-Brexit. 
For whatever reason you voted for Brexit it probably wasn't to wreck the  country or the NHS. But that is EXACTLY what it is doing in both cases. You claim to have done your research before the referendum, do it now and see what Brexit is already doing to your country. 
BIAS: Ah, yes. Sunday. When the ever-so-slightly more credible MoS becomes a George Soros funded, anti-democratic, pro-EU, globalist propaganda machine because it features stories that are inconvenient to the Brexit narrative.  
Arlene criticising the media for "not being positive about Brexit". Does she understand their role is to hold government to account- they're not her Press Officers. 
‘Racists are in for a big surprise when they see what happens to immigration after Brexit’Next they’ll be campaigning to leave planet Earth.  
Barking - rumours that UK government doesn't want to sign up to a treaty that would simplify trade with the EU *and* many non-EU European and North African countries after Brexit  
Brexit will cost Britain £72 billion in lost economic activity annually. 
After #Brexit, #Israel senses a chance to boost #trade with #UK. It is hard to sell fruit into the #EU, but when #Britain leaves it could become a big market for #Israeli agriculture and for its burgeoning cyber-industries   #BBC #SKY #ITV #TORY #NEWS #EU 
The Irish issue has suddenly become the biggest obstacle in the Brexit talks, exploding the ambiguity that underpins Northern Ireland. 
Whatever poll surge Corbyn might get from opposing Brexit, reality is it would unite the Tories, revive UKIP and set the right wing papers at his throat. He can't move until public opinion moves and that won't happen until the Tories make clear what Brexit actually entails. 
Really is sad & worrying that in 25 years we've gone from Troubles to peace process, mutual respect, best friend partnership working within EU, Queen's historic visit, etc. to, shut your gob, know your place, you bunch of Micks!    #Brexit  
Senior Conservatives are backing a report calling for an end to low-skilled migration after Britain leaves the European Union, in order to "honour the results of the referendum"  
These arguments are obsolete.1) Our net contribution to EU is 0.5% GDP. Budget shows OBR forecast of 0.5% GDP drop every year (cumulatively) - ie Brexit means less money overall.2) Cannot ‘replace’ multinational funding schemes with national funding - and former is greater ROI.  
‘There are perfectly sensible technical solutions to the Irish border’ can someone tell me what they are ... anyone? #SundayPoliticsNI #Brexit 
Sorry to hear your time machine will no longer function after Brexit. Looks like you've already collected some passport info from the future though.  
Russia is being blamed for Brexit and Donald Trump, but why are we letting our Leave elite off the hook?  
Risk of science brain drain as survey shows 80% of EEA researchers in UK feel less welcome since Brexit vote. Concerns over their future but also concern of UK govt not having a plan in science.  
We need you to understand @jeremycorbyn that your result in #GE17 was anything but a validation of your stance on Brexit. Voters are fickle things & the Remain voters can make or break the Labour Party in next GE. We want a #FinalSay to show true will of the people. #BrexitGate 
Arlene Foster says "Northern Ireland is British and British it will remain" when talking about Brexit, but on other topics such as Marriage Equality and Abortion she refuses to acknowledge British law. You can't pick and choose when you're "British" and when you're not. 
Actually, we need to stop Brexit. Extreme policies beget extreme language!  
This had better be right as #Brexit is about to pretty much stop my kids working, playing, learning and living anywhere else  
Dominic Cummings also talked about how in the end the #EURef came down to being able to swing 600,000 votes. And guess how many British people living in Europe weren't allowed to vote in the Referendum? That's right:  roughly 800,000.   #Brexit  
Putin sucks. But did Russia really make Brexit happen and Trump win? Or are we just letting our own bankrupt elites off the hook?RING ME NOW on @LBC on 0345 60 60 973 / LISTEN:  
Playing toy shop with my daughter. She's just charged me £8.40 for some fish fingers and a banana. Fuckin brexit 
Michel Barnier tells Britain to come up with a Brexit solution for the Irish border  
What a self indulgent, self harming, small minded shambles. A leader with vision would get on the front foot and pursue soft Brexit. 
Irish Border: .@MaireadMcGMEP on why Brexit could cause business & people on the Island of Ireland - considerable difficulties. #bbcsp 
They've pretended for months this is somehow not real Brexit. Look at the consequences: Britain poorer, humiliated, tearing itself apart. 
So you think Brexit is all about our membership of the EU? Think again! It's about money, billions. Billions that are going to be made by those driving us towards Brexit catastrophe; those who are going to feast on Britains devalued assets. @guyverhofstadt @acgrayling @krishgm 
A reminder: we can, even now, stay in the single market, stop a border in Ireland, preserve our economy and respect the referendum result  
The Mail on Sunday exposing the Legatum Institute - - and its well-funded aggressive push for a crash-out Brexit followed by standards-slashing. Legatum leverage on No#10 comes via Gove, BoJo & DExEU.  
Meet the charity who are funded by Dubai-based disaster capitalists, have unrivalled access to Brexit ministers and think the Irish border can be solved with drones.... I've had a long look at Legatum  
The EU imposes its “directives” from the top. Its credo remains ever-closer union and ever-shrinking accountability.  #Brexit 
Finally Gov may realise UK has to stay in SingleMkt/Customs Union. Referendum said we'd stay in (even if some claim they said otherwise). If we leave CU/SM then N.Ireland border can't be free & we'd break up the United Kingdom  which ppl certainly didn't vote for! 
If the crew of a ship knew it was being captained by someone knowingly steering it to disaster, it would rightly mutiny. Time for the UK population to mutiny over #Brexit. 
If Legatum were the Russian front the Mail claims, Putin's propagandists wouldn't denounce it.   Legatum is a clique of Christian rightwingers determined to deliver a hard Brexit. And that's bad enough 
Friends! Summary:1. My children are millennials, but are far from the stereotypes society pokes fun at.2. They read the Guardian; are vegans; oppose Brexit & Climate Change; want loads of free stuff; and support Jeremy.3. Talk about not being stereotypes!4. That's all, folks!  
Fucking love #AnnaSoubry on Brexit: ‘History will condemn those who haven’t tried to stop all this nonsense’  
Brian Adcock on Brexit and the Irish border problem – political cartoon gallery in Putney pic.twitter.com/oHTBg1IjpW 
I always loved Abba and I love the Swedes and Sweden too. I am going there tomorrow for a week. It is my temporary sanctuary from Brexit.#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
Grant Shapps slip of tongue today on #bbcsp - "Corbyn an even greater danger than Brexit." Cat. Bag. (I'm referring to the 2nd part of the quote).#FBPE 
This's what #Brexit means no? 2 keep sovereignty, control openness, transparency, honesty accountability, good govt, human rights, freedom to go anywhere, border control for others, cake & eat it?Oh..no..sorry..that's what membership of the EU gives...  
I got angry - again - w/UK media's vacuous coverage of Ireland and #Brexit so done a thread. There's a big problem than just colonial mindsets in this....  
This is so typical of the government’s shambolic Brexit. They dismissed staying in SM & CU, without considering the political turmoil it would create with NI border. Now they’re blaming EU. Tories: You created the chaos. No one else.#Paterson 
Crypto’s Revolutionary Moment? Catalonia Referendum Allegedly Funded by Bitcoin  #Bitcoin 
Rogers most devastating remarks came in Q&A. Said he talks to Tory MPs now who know Brexit will hurt, but wd rather crash out in 19, take a recession on the chin, & bounce back for 2022 election. Problem: economic disruption much, muchworse if no prep time  
Ireland attests to a much wider problem in UK media - inability to try to understand 'the Other', a morbid fear of detail and an obsession w/vacuous political theatre. Why have I spent a year covering in depth Brexit stories from my spare room, largely in my spare time? 
Good example: @BorisJohnson managed to write a 4,000 word essay on Brexit and not mention Ireland once!  
I have already read the responses of Brexiteers to this. They *literally* don't care. Like humming loudly while plugging their ears. Their centre-piece argument is "don't care, just want out". Brexit is a cult like a destructive, damaging religion where logic and reason fails. 
Periodical reminder of what Brexit Minister Mike Russell thinks of the people he represents.  
'Britain's economy is in trouble not because of Brexit but because of the denial and hypocrisy of leading Brexiteers'  
Brexit towns of Tamworth and Clacton slam PM Theresa May's £38bn divorce fee  
Britain's economy is forecast to be £42 billion smaller in 2022 than was estimated in March  
It fits the facts & delegitimises the result but I don’t welcome the shadow that Russian influence casts over Brexit. It allows Brextremists to shift the argument away from the fact that almost all of the things they promised voters have already been debunked. 
Guardian and MoS seem desperate to make facts fit their narrative of Russian links to Brexit. Why do we trust journalists? 
It's a brilliant piece from @fotoole - as good as has been written on Brexit - and you should read it. (). 
Sick and tired of journalists and politicians saying EU budget is a lot of money. It is only 1% of UK government budget and outweighed ten times by the economic damage of #brexit in terms of lost export markets and inflation caused by lower pound  @pestononsunday 
If we don't move on to next phase in #Brexit talks we are "rapidly going to run out of time" - @RuthDavidsonMSP tells #Marr 
BREXIT FURY: Leaked papers reveal transitional deal CONDITIONAL on accepting NEW EU rules  @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP 
:“It’s the language we’ve seen since that (Brexit) vote that many people find upsetting”Archbishop of Canterbury:“There needs to be much more discipline in our use of language. All these headlines to stir up hatred’Daily Mail, Telegraph & Express readers: You fuel it.  
Seems the majority of EU researchers don't want us on their research programmes any more. They think the EU should pull the plug on research funding to ungrateful and hateful Britain. Brexit is damaging our place in the world. #StopBrexit 
"There's a distinct possibility Brexit won't happen" - @vincecable explains his reasoning #Paterson 
Only rarely are we given *Irish* writers on what Brexit means for Ireland.  
In the Brexit debate- information only goes so far. It’s also about trust and empowerment.  
Observer reports DUP member as hoping Brexit would not result in a hard border: "The current arrangement, where there is a freedom of movement north and south, is the perfect solution". Yes, dear chap, it's called 'EU membership', the opposite of Brexit. #cakeeatBrexit 
If proposed Brexit deal proves a terrible mess people might want to re-open the question of staying in the EU, says @vincecable #paterson 
Distinct possibility Brexit won’t happen - about 20% chance, says @vincecable #paterson 
Today seems a good day to recall how @Nigel_Farage used Nazi-style propaganda in his brexit campaign  
Archbishop of Canterbury hits out at headlines like Brexit 'mutineers'. Says they "seem conditioned to stir up hatred" and calls for "more discipline" in language.  
International Trade Secretary Liam Fox has told Sky News the Government does not want a hard border in Ireland but no decision will be made until the final Brexit deal is agreed 
If you are really into the Russia angle focus on Trump. That one’s cut and dried.There’s a Russia angle to Brexit too.But also a set of homegrown TRAITORS WE CAN NAIL ON THE BASIS OF THEIR ZEALOUS CONTEMPT FOR BRITISH LAW  
As @BarryGardiner tells #Marr that the options of single market and a customs union are "not off the table"Here he is in July this year spelling out why that would be a terrible idea for post-Brexit Britain:  
Ah, John ... But Europe as a geological landmass doesn't offer funding for cultural programmes. It only offers rock, soil, sand and water. Surely you knew this before you voted for Brexit.  
Dear Remoaners,It’s not difficult.We had a choice between Britain & Independence or the EU & servitude.We chose Britain. Not the EU.#Brexit #Marr 
Putin's link to Boris and Gove's Brexit 'coup' deeply alarming | Daily Mail Online  
Gove complaining about Fake News is brazen after his £350m, Turkey, etc Brexit lies. His co-conspirator Johnson(sacked x2 for lying) invented Fake News with made-up EU stories at the Torygraph 
Since he was appointed, @LiamFox simply hasn't stopped promoting UK all over globe. Impressive performance. Great prospects for #Brexit Britain. He must be able to sign AND start new #FreeTradeUK deals from 30 Mar 2019.  
One flaw in the @LegatumInst conspiracy theory is that the alleged mastermind of the Brexit ‘coup’ @ShankerASingham was a Remainer before the EU Referendum. Did he only become a Putin puppet after the result? 
Fascinating story of voters who now regret backing Brexit - so far too few of them, but that could change  
Can we all be clear. The referendum cannot be "re-run" or "invalidated". People voted to Leave. That's it. But that cannot, and must not, preclude serious investigation into the scale of Russian interference in UK elections. 
What would happen to the UK economic outlook if Brexit were scrapped? Why is no one asking this critical question? Cowardice? #Marr 
A #SundayMorning thread on Brexit incompetence, blind faith & a car crash predicted by experts, in their own "raw & authentic voice".  
I’m calling for a complete shutdown of Brexit until we can figure out what is going on. 
I think you might find supporting the Russian funded Brexit campaign was a rather bad idea.I wonder if after the war people will look back on politely critical tweets like this and laugh at the British.  
Ireland may threaten to use its EU veto to prevent #Brexit talks from moving on to trade because of issues around its border  
@UKLabour Brexit clarity:Not in the Customs Union, but a customs union.Not in the Single Market, but access to Single Market (like N Korea has).Not in the EU, but blah, blah, blah. Not this Brexit, but another form of the complete disaster that is Brexit. #marr 
Vote Leave‘s Dominic Cummings: ‘Law/regulatory agencies are such a joke . . . anybody who wanted to cheat the law could do it easily without people realising.’We left front door open; #Brexit carpet-baggers walked in and stole our democracy #StopBrexit 
Irish border issue symptomatic of Govnt's Brexit approach - ignoring stark warnings and sticking rigidly to ideological dogma. If we leave SM and CU only 2 feasible options: hard border btwn Eire/NI or East/West border btwn NI (in CU) and mainland Britain would both be disastrous 
#Marr  #pestononsundayVery good to see Barry Gardiner refuse to get drawn into Marr's "pretend you are in government" hypothetical. Labour is the opposition. The Tories got us into the referendum and, for once, now have to live by the consequences of their incompetence. 
"Huge range of uncertainty" - @PJTheEconomist says economic future after Brexit "could be worse than suggested" #marr 
Noting with interest how noise about Russia is being increasingly orchestrated. Coincidentally just as more verifiable facts leak out about the actions of both leading Brexit campaign groups  
We want FREE VOTES, unwhipped and unforced, for MPs on anything to do with Brexit in Parliament. They must vote their judgment & conscience, not a Party line. Brexit would quickly be over. RT. 
Russophobia is now eating itself- as I predicted. We’re expected to believe that Legatum which employed Anne Applebaum(!) - and other hardcore critics of the Kremlin (& RT) is part of a Russian Brexit plot! Words fail me.  
Ireland's European commissioner has urged Theresa May to change course on her border Brexit plan  
.@Keir_Starmer gives Theresa May two weeks to save Brexit talks — and her job  
There is a clear trend that shows support for Brexit is fading. It is time for the government and parliament to think again. Brexit is no longer the will of the people. People are starting to see the truth, that Brexit is bad for Britain. #StopBrexit 
The government is now thinking about selling Britain out to the European Court of Justice after Brexit.An independent, sovereign country should not submit to unaccountable foreign judges - this would be a huge and unacceptable betrayal! 
Dear #brexiters, by now you will realize that brexit was organized by a small group of corrupt people who wish to the weaken the country so they can take control of it. It was never about "taking back control" for your benefit. Never. Please join our fight for justice. 
Britain, it's time to say no to this. @UKLabour, it's time to say no to this. It's not a jobs-first Brexit. It's not for the many, it's for the very few. We can't say we weren't warned. /8 
BACKTRACK: Theresa May could let the ECJ still have role in British legal system after Brexit. That's not what Leavers voted for, Britain is a sovereign nation! 
Do think about the sheer numbers of experts who said then & say now Brexit is a car crash unfurling in slow motion as May's govt wraps the wreckage in bunting. /6 
I am against Austerity.I am against Brexit.I want the Tories out.I want to remain in the EU.RT if you agree.#StopBrexit 
May will be instant toast politically if she agrees any continuing jurisdiction in the UK for the judicial-activism ECJ post-Brexit or in any transition period.Disgrace it's even being contemplated. 
This is Adenauer and De Gaulle looking at Harold Macmillan at the time of the UK's first attempt to join the EEC#Brexit  
Anna Soubry on Brexit: ‘History will condemn those who haven’t tried to stop all this nonsense’  
"Tory Moscow poodles, bought & paid for a hard #Brexit...this comes in a week when it was revealed the tories are being funded by Russian oligarchs & Michael Gove said social media was undemocratic, even Gove's dad called him a liar..."  
The reality is that: The people of the UK MUST have the facts, in terms of the true IMPACT of Brexit, and then HAVE a say over the final terms of the Brexit deal, or the   OPPORTUNITY to reject Brexit completely. 
"Reality is a barrier to the successful implementation of Brexit and must therefore be ignored."  
Dublin is taking a huge risk with its hardline approach. No decent UK government could agree to what it is demanding. It is therefore making the collapse of the Brexit talks more likely, says James Forsyth  
And here's Britain’s former EU ambassador, Sir Ivan Rogers, again warning May’s Brexit strategy is “an accident waiting to happen”. /4  
Oh no, another Brexit reality check (FT) you won’t read in the Daily Dacre  
#Brexit: “My God. History will condemn this period. It will condemn those who’ve sat back and kept their view to themselves, who haven’t stood up and tried to stop all this nonsense.” @Anna_Soubry 
Bought a Brexit bauble yesterday but as I was proudly saluting it this morning something didn't feel right, then I read the small print. Been vomiting ever since.  
May could hand European Court of Justice a role in post-Brexit Britain. If she caves in on this issue, she will only encourage the EU to press for more ECJ interference in our legal system.  
The threat to peace in Northern Ireland is reason alone to abandon #Brexit  
Ireland 'threat to veto Brexit trade talks' over border issue  
Historians will wonder why nobody asked the crucial q's about those who led Britain into Brexit. @carolecadwalla is asking for us all.  
May told to remain in customs union to avert Ireland border crisis over Brexit  
The hard-won kinship between Britain and Ireland is threatened by Brexit idiocy | Fintan O’Toole  
1. There might have been Kremlin meddling in the Brexit referendum.2. Kremlin meddling might not have played a significant role in determining the referendum result.Hypothesis 2 does not contradict hypothesis 1 
Absolutely!“Brexit has had already seen 20% reduction in German car sales in UK: as grave as during financial crisis. Britain is not a banana republic. If the Prime Minister said she’ll fulfil financial obligations, that should be enough" @HansOlafHenkel 
Excellent thread on #Legatum from Liam Byrne. If you care about our democracy you should care about this. #brexit  
UK does not want a hard Irish border, so (Obama-clone) Varadkar is unnecessarily risking Ireland's prosperity by threatening to veto Brexit talks from moving onto next stage.  
Well as both PM May and Mr Corbyn have refused to answer the question " will you stop paying £billions to the EU even after our Brexit? We can rightly assume that they are going to keep paying and that's a disgrace as we voted OUT.  
Hold on: #Brexit will cost £350m a week? That's not what @BorisJohnson and @michaelgove told us 
Why is a dodgy think tank - funded by a Kiwi billionaire with links to Putin exerting so much influence over Gove, Johnson and Brexit? If you care about sovereignty you should care about this  
EU's drugs regulator hopes to retain its 900 staff when it quits London for Amsterdam  
Irish warn Theresa May: change course or risk Brexit chaos  
Sorry Remainers. I know you’re just gagging for it all to go horribly wrong but... #Brexit  
Now remind me, wasn't #Brexit something to do with preventing foreign powers from interfering with our democracy?  
David Davis - Brexit Minister and 'hell for your family'. Steering the UK towards the cliff #BrexitShambles  #marr #paterson 
Bring power back to Manchester, not Whitehall, says Greater Manchester @MayorofGM , who is demanding that powers returned to the UK after Brexit should be handed to the regions, because, he says, Westminster has failed the north of England.  
#Brexit will cost Britain £72 billion in lost economic activity annually, according to an analysis of government figures.   
All planes between UK and Europe could be grounded if there's no Brexit deal, pilots warn  
The irony of this palaver is it’s the best illustration ever of a country’s increased strength through pooled sovereignty (Ireland’s) and the weakness of going it alone #Brexitِ 
Russia connection to Boris and Gove on Brexit feels a stretch but this report raises serious question: how come Legatum enjoys charitable status?  via @MailOnline 
Irish warn Theresa May: change course or risk Brexit chaos...by changing course they mean STOP BREXIT! Peace in N I more important than the awful Tory party.  
Theresa May tries to keep £45bn~£50bn #Brexit divorce bill secret in order to avoid public backlash over Brexiteers' lies  /via @thetimes 
Brexit..so idiotic is the approach to the border it's on the verge of making @fotoole sound republican   
#Putin's link to Boris and Gove's #Brexit 'coup' revealedThere are tectonic shifts taking place when even @MailOnline starts hyping #Russia links to Brexit vote 
If UK leaves the single market, there is no solution to the Northern Ireland border issue - and May's govt has failed to even seriously engage with the issue #Brexit  
Oh dear Gaukey the minister for Swiss Bank Tax evasion doesn’t know about Boris and Gove Putins Ruble boys.. Tory Moscow poodles.. tongues hanging out waiting for a bone for Brexit and Powerless Theresa May the perfect patsy  
Morten Morland on Philip Hammond’s autumn budget  and Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
The public rejects a hard Brexit.   
Cambridge Analytica was involved in Brexit, and it appears Russia was too.  Just like the US.  
OMG!!!!!!!!!!! Gaukey have you seen this,.. David Gauke will shit his pants Boris and Gove Putins Ruble boys.. Tory Moscow poodles.. tongues hanging out waiting for a bone for Brexit FFS!!! Legatum ‘soft coup’ Powerless Theresa May the perfect patsy pic.twitter.com/U06pjS6Eh3 
Thanks to everyone who participated in the #Leeds for Europe Day of Action yesterday. Great discussion about impact of #Brexit on science, research & innovation. Powerful contributions from @mikegalsworthy @LindaMcAvanMEP & @Vie_Promo & an engaged audience of passionate people. 
Disgraced Minister and current International Trade Secretary Liam Fox is a danger to the UK. He wants to privatise the NHS, blames UK businesses for not wanting to export and thinks Brexit will be the easiest trade deal ever. #FoxOut #marr  #paterson 
The Irish issue has suddenly become the biggest obstacle in the Brexit talks  
wanted: a labour party willing to fight tory bastards. my @scotonsunday column about the unfolding brexit catastrophe:  
The EU’s master plan for Brexit negotiations is ... not to negotiate, but impose. It’s no wonder the EU’s success as doing international trade deals is so pitiful! After 50yrs, the EU still has no free trade deal in place with a single top 10 economy! 
The ECJ must have no jurisdiction in the UK after Brexit. Will the UK Supreme Court have powers in the EU?  
Lots of people have been telling me it's great that Australia voted yes to marriage equality in the recent referendum.I have to explain that it wasn't a referendum, is not legally binding, and was an expensive attempt to get a different result than what the public wants. 1/ 
the convict chants from the barmy army are getting pretty tired these days, i wish aussies were smart enough to come up with some Brexit/Farage chants #ashes 
Philip Hammond falls victim to Brexit fall-out – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Brexit: Ireland 'to play tough' over talks - commissioner  
I'm proudly British European and I'm not giving up either. I vow to resist brexit and if we do leave now to fighter twice as hard to get us back into the European Union.Who's with me :)Retweet if you vow this too  
Vote Leave donations: the dark ads, the mystery ‘letter’ and Brexit’s online guru. The donations are now the subject of a new investigation by the Electoral Commission.  
More evidence accruing - both on data, messaging and personnel - that @vote_leave and @LeaveEUOfficial illegally colluded during the #Brexit campaign. Meanwhile Banks et al try to distract us by being rude about Hannan. 
I don't feed trolls, ymmv. "Never try and teach a pig to sing. You waste your time, and you annoy the pig." My reporting on Brexit and Russia has always been consistent. I support Brexit and oppose Russian hacking of it. I broke the story, Oct last year  
"Most of these dire predictions, that people seem to *want* to be true about our country, simply are not true".@ajcdeane takes issue with those who wish ill fortune on a post-Brexit UK.  
Perhaps the best Brexit cartoon I’ve seen so far...  
And fellow citizens, don't forget that £600,000 of tax payers money was given to @vote_leave to fund the xenophobic, mendacious campaign led by Boris Johnson, Michael Gove, Dominic Cummings and Matthew Elliott #Brexit  
Irish Government On Verge Of Collapse, Could Impact Brexit  
When the topic turns to #Brexit, the usual response on BBC is to big up Europe, but put down the UK.@ajcdeane takes none of that & rattles off facts, like a Browning of old. 
I wonder if Legatum realises that their ambitions on standards divergence actually breaks a number of those WTO rules they are so fond of. #Brexit 
If 600,000 swung #Brexit vote @carolecadwalla asks whether the Beleave and Veterans donations under investigation "£775,000 – more than one tenth of the campaign’s total budget – could have made a difference?" Mon  
If #Resistance is #Deza because Russia is pushing it to sow chaos, surely #Brexit is #Deza because Russia is pushing it to weaken Europe.  
Putin's link to Boris and Gove's Brexit 'coup' revealed: Tycoon who netted millions from Russian gas deal funds think tank that helped write the ministers letter demanding May take a tougher stance on leaving the EU   
"..it (#TheMailOnSunday)is owned by  Daily Mail and General Trust (DMGT), but editorial staffs of the two papers are entirely separate."-#Wikipedia The #DailyMail could attack the #MailOnSunday ...on MondayThe Crazy World of #Brexitpic-@Undercover_mole 
Where Brexit hurts: The nurses and doctors leaving London  
Article worth repeating - still true:One by one, Brexit’s ‘salvations’ are seen to be illusory 
“History will condemn those who haven’t tried to stop all this nonsense” - @Anna_Soubry MP on Brexit and how she will now be voting with her conscience.  
I'm so glad @DUPleader is committed to Northern Ireland having the same rules post Brexit as the rest of the UK. I look forward to her support for introducing equal marriage and abortion rights into Northern Ireland law forthwith. 
Anna Soubry on Brexit: ‘History will condemn those who haven’t tried to stop all this nonsense’ - the guardian  
#Brexitgate 'Putin Britain First' #FBPE #StopBrexit time to put a stop to brexit.  
It was simply a referendum advising parliament about the view of the population who were allowed to, & actually bothered to, vote at that point in time. HMG was never required to implement it. That was just another lie by the anti EU ideologues.  
#Legatum, baby.#BorisJohnson#MichaelGove#Brexit 
Having seen the coverage and followed the speeches of the #dup17 conference today, I have to say I am very very excited for the future of our country post Brexit. All 32 counties of them. 
Looks like we're gonna need another referendum & some new Brexidiots bc some of the old ones are gonna be in jail.  
“One senior Government source claimed the [Legatum] institute had ‘staged a soft coup via Johnson and Gove’ and that civil servants who have to obey strict anti-corruption rules had effectively been bypassed”. Welcome to Brexit Britain.  
It's actually quite inconceivable that the #brexit vote was not influenced given what we now know about #US presidential election.   
Thanks, muppets. It’s this ‘clean break’ talk that’s fracturing our Single Market into UK vs EU and driving our pharma & manufacturing to choose larger EU market over UK.British Pharma have said this is a rubbish idea, but Brexit politicians don’t listen to industry.  
In #Brexit Britain every Friday is Black Friday. (via @davidschneider) 
She wouldn’t have had a stupid referendum in the first place 
Putin link to Gove & Johnson hard #Brexit coup. Tomorrow’s Mail on Sunday.  
Australia condemns UK's post-Brexit trade plan as 'not acceptable'   
As we move forward I suspect there's going to be a lot more revealed about Putin-Brexit. This will inevitably become a part of the Remain/Leave culture war. There'll be some mad conspiracy stuff. Stick to one simple rule. What is factually right, and what is factually wrong. 
Brilliant, brilliant call. Bravo, Linda >>”This Idiocy Needs To Stop Immediately": One Pensioner's Take On Brexit  
Irish warn Theresa May: change course or risk Brexit chaos  
Hard Brexit on the way? Euro banks pull business out of UK over fears talks will collapse  
Indeed. I did not enjoy breaking the “Russian bots for #Brexit” story last autumn, but I reported the truth nonetheless. They also pushed Le Pen, Orban etc in native languages, as well as Trump.  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Boris Johnson, Prity Patel, John Redwood and Vote leave should be investigated & prosecuted for all their lies and Deceit during the European Referendum. Vote leave was truly rotten to the core and is trying to destroy our country. #StopBrexitNow #Notthewillofthepeople 
Absolutely.  This Brexit is a runaway train!  Who voted for a shambles and economic self-harm?  We need to slam the brakes and put Parliament back in full control - for Leavers as much as Remainers!  
I think we should tweet @DavidDavisMP EVERY DAY asking about the 58 Brexit impact studies to be released until he responds. Sick and tired of incompetent politicians ignoring us in pursuit of their demented agendas.  
The UK Government: May so socially awkward they call her the Dalek. Notorious liar Boris. Grinning idiot David (likes a drink) Davis negotiating Brexit, Fox sacked for taking his 'friend' to security meetings without clearance & supercilious little weasel Gove pulling the strings 
Tusk diving into the referendum on the side of the Remain campaign to warn #Brexit could mean “the end of Western political civilisation” was no problem, of course.   
I'd rather put my energies into making people realise what a bad deal Brexit is/believe it can be stopped, and into policies which bring the country together & address the resentments which fuelled Leave  
Brexit Santa style...  
I'm old enough to remember folks like you telling voters the Brexit talks would be as quick and one-sided as your visit to a massage parlour  
Even Cambridge is not immune to the chill winds of Brexit. How bad is this going to get before we see reason?  
Facing the fact that Brexit vote was compromised but still wanting it to win - how is that inconsistent?  Personally respect this type of even-handed analysis & wish we’d see more of it. 
Leaving the single market just isn't a good idea. But don't forget this is a Tory governance decision, not a preordained consequence of Brexit.  
Theresa May 'could let ECJ keep role in UK after Brexit'That will be the END of May if she agrees! It will be revoked by her replacement JR-M!  
Johnson & Johnson pulls plan for UK research centre... citing political & economic weakness caused by Brexit, concerns over access to EU research funds and concerns over splitting UK from single market for medicines. 
Finally, after months of work by the likes of @Byline_Media @peterjukes @J_amesp and @carolecadwalla even the disaster capitalists are now under Brexit scrutiny by other media outlets. About time. 
With the Sunday papers reporting a possible link between Gove, Boris, and Russia here's more on the Brexit and Kremlin links.  
No John; I am morally consistent. If @PutinRF threw a sovereign decision of the British for the British, we should vote again. I will still be for #Brexit as I have been since I was at Oxford. 
Yep, my exclusive report is that UKIC believe #Brexit referendum will need to be redone. Everything coming out in UK press confirms my reporting  
Maybe @Keir_Starmer your duty lies in reversing #Brexit Maybe saving the #UK is the #Future21st century Britain needs a NEW kind of Socialist thinking, an Inclusive European focussed Party for the People.#StopBrexit now! #LeadOpposition #NoLabourBrexit 
The EU's plan for the next stage of Brexit talks has been leaked to The Independent. It doesn't bode well for May   
Hahahahaha!!! Gaukey have you seen this,.. David Gauke will shit his pants when he sees this Boris and Gove Putins Ruble boys.. Tory Moscow poodles.. tongues hanging out waiting for a bone for Brexit FFS!!! pic.twitter.com/KgZBX3HyIa 
Please. Leaders. @Number10gov @jeremycorbyn Accept #Brexit is a disaster & work to stop it. History will judge you as being brave & altruistic. 
You know how to help our country. Stop Brexit. So far all you’ve done is help the Tories.  
THE OBSERVER FRONT PAGE: Irish warn May: change course or risk Brexit chaos #skypapers 
It’ll all come out in the wash...Brexit essentially a Russian foreign policy priority. Leavers nodding along with it... 
Ruth Dudley Edwards in the Financial Times - for crying out loud, will you give us a break from this bloody nonsense? Make some calls, do some research. How did this garbage get past editing?  #brexit @FT 
We should demand FREE VOTES by MPs in all Brexit matters in Parliament. Whipping the vote - forcing MPs to vote against their judgment & conscience - is profoundly undemocratic. Especially at this crucial time: most especially the vote in the Commons 11th December. RT this! 
MAIL ON SUNDAY: Putin link to Boris and Gove Brexit ‘Coup’ #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Growing evidence that EU Referendum was improperly influenced by Russia & illegal payments by Vote Leave & so should be declared void 
The latest post-budget data is now showing that the true cost of Brexit is likely to be at least £72billion a year by 2022... the UK's £8billion a year EU membership fee is good value! 
I would like to thank @InLimboBrexit , @mikegalsworthy and @LeedsEurope . Mike was amazing both in his presentation of facts on impact of Brexit on science and innovation, but in the way he responded to questions. Thank you so muchWonderful people met!  
‘Animal abusers could be jailed for five years, says Governmentas it vows sentience will be recognised and protections strengthened after Brexit’   
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Pro-science budget is not enough for a #Brexit world. Our President, Sir Venki Ramakrishnan, on why clarity in UK & EU policy must come soon, so science funds can be spent well  
If it's materially pointless, lacking a referendum mandate, and actively harmful to most of our strategic interests, naturally our government must be enthusiastically endorsing it. @IanDunt on leaving the customs union 
WATCH: Peter Lilley says that the EU is a BLACKMAILER that deserves NOTHING  via @Your Brexit 
Life in Brexit Britain.  
There is general agreement that there is no legal requirement for the UK to pay the EU anything on exit. There is no provision in the Treaty for an exit bill.  No one in the referendum campaign said we would face a bill & the EU has never produced a legal base for a divorce bill. 
.@guardian published a long interview with me by Decca Aikenhead today. Cats, council housing, sexism, choirs, selfies, foreign policy, purple thread, husband, Brexit - it's all there!@deccajourno 
“Languages are invaluable for a generation growing up in an increasingly connected world. If the UK is to be truly global post-Brexit, languages must become a national priority." Vicky Gough @BritishCouncil @tes  
Turns out, the Russians interfered with the brexit referendum in the UK.  
‘Corbyn has seen the light on Brexit. Now he’s taking the fight to the Tories’ Polly Toynbee’After Labour just voted with the Tories on the Withdrawal Bill, this is GENUINELY hilarious!! There’s still people out there who think Corbyn is anti-Brexit! 
BREXIT FURY: Leaked papers reveal transitional deal CONDITIONAL on accepting NEW EU rules  @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @BorisJohnson 
#BrexitReality check: Barnier tells EU27 that UK must accept new EU law during transition period after Brexit much to chagrin of #BorisJohnson. EU law will not be diluted during transition in which UK is subject to all benefits and responsibilities of membership.#stopbrexit 
I hope you don't advise gvts on these lines because dismissing 80 million odd Brexit & Trump voters as "insane" is -in my view- part of the problem  
Leave Single Market: whatever...Leave Customs Union: never mind...Leave Euratom: Eurawhat?...Make millions of people bargaining chips: That’s fine...Can’t be European City of Culture anymore because of Brexit: Total meltdown @infinite_scream on steroids freak-out like 
So the #EU wants fair treatment of #EUcitizens in the #UK post #Brexit... but this doesn't seem to apply to #BritishCitizens living in #EUcountries..?  … @theresa_may @Conservatives #Conservatives #BBC #SKY #ITV #EUNEWS #TORY #NEWS #Brussels #LABOUR #UKIP 
Good reception for this message.....Mike Russell calls on Scotland and Ireland to deepen ties as Brexit looms |...  
Foster criticises Irish govt on 'aggressive' Brexit stance:   
There's a new slogan for Brexit  
Why aren't the Press and opposition parties making one holy row about the missing #Brexit impact assessment papers? Who has been gagged and why? 
Bulgaria’s PM says EU can't afford to let Britain go without a post-Brexit deal  
How shameful it is to be a country that is led by a coward. #Brexit  
Brussels mocked“Negotiations are like you walk into a restaurantYou say, ‘can I have a menu please’The maître d' says ‘no, here’s the bill’You go, ‘I’ve not ordered anything yet!’They say ‘no, pay the bill first, then we’ll give you menu!"#Brexit #EU 
This is the first good news since Brexit!  
Animal abusers could be jailed for five years says Government, as it vows sentience WILL be recognised and protections strengthened after Brexit  
Thank heavens for the Brexit common sense promoted by @ajcdeane All too rare at the BBC these days! 
Leaked Brexit paper shows UK airlines risk losing flying rights...  
SPIRITUAL LEADER COMES OUT FOR SECOND REFERENDUM  
The Brexit fantasists lie that just won't go away. Democracy based on lies is electoral fraud.  We the people DEMAND a new vote on leaving the EU. People are changing their minds on Brexit. #StopBrexit 
The most vocal Remainers in my timeline operate a simple algorithm. Good news: "WE. HAVEN'T. LEFT. YET. YOU. MORONS."Bad news: "BREXIT IS DESTROYING THE COUNTRY!" 
Both sides of the #Brexit debate forget the reason the #EU was originally formed. From pre-Christian times until 1945 Europe was almost continuously at war. WW2 alone killed 50 million & displaced another 10, but there's never been a war between EU members. 
#EU CRACKS: 8 favourites to Leave EU8: Denmark 16/1 to exit7: Czech Republic 16/1 to exit6: Ireland 12/1 to exit5: Hungary 12/1 to exit4: France 10/1 to exit3: Sweden 10/1 to exit2: Italy 5/2 to exitFinally1: Greece 2/1 odds to exit #EU#Brexit 
Every time I need a reason to oppose, with every fibre of my decrepit elderly being, the evil that is #Brexit, I look at this picture. And I keep going. #stopbrexit #FBPE #austerity #animalcruelty #NastyParty 
BREXIT BETRAYAL: @theresa_may  considering 'ECJ keeping role in British justice post-Brexit'  
English commentator has just called Mo Salah a "Muslim Messi". Definitely voted Brexit. 
You’re enabling Brexit, after which you won’t be ABLE to properly fund services, invest etc. The country will be bankrupt and nobody will lend us a penny as our economic woes will be entirely self-induced.Stop enabling the Tories.You’re the opposition.OPPOSE.  
Clearly @montie worried about legitimacy of Brexit being questioned given official  investigations into funding of Vote Leave & Leave EU  
Just a little reminder of all things May has accomplished since becoming PM120,000+ DWP Deaths33,300 Old Folks Death Due To Fuel PovertyWM Sexual HarassmentGrenfellBrexitHomelessFoodbanksUC CrisisNHS CrisisParadise PaperChild PovertyPolice CutsFire Service CutsEtc  
Brexit has turned The United Kingdom into The Divided Kingdom - thank you Dave.  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
how cartoonist Bruce MacKinnon for Canada's Halifax Chronicle Herald sees Brexit.  
Which reminds us... where are those Brexit impact papers?   
Bob Moran on Brexit and the Irish border - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Dear @DavidDavisMP You must publish the Brexit impact studies immediately as required by Parliament! Thank you. 
Another fantastic #Leeds for Europe public meeting this afternoon. Thanks @mikegalsworthy & @LindaMcAvanMEP for your superb insight into the effects (bad) of #Brexit on education, science & innovation.  
And #Brexit will mean the NHS getting less money not more  
"Finally, the reality of Brexit can no longer be avoided": @Independent Editorial 
If @jeremycorbyn is finally coming round to seeing sense and opposing #Brexit, he may yet win my support. I hope @pollytoynbee has it right. 
I think the whole population of the UK should protest to the goverment and every single MP about how they seem to want to give EUupto £40bn of our tax payers money if it were their personal money would they just give it away NO so why are they going to pay a brexit bill 
If we're going to stop Brexit, we'd better do it soon. The companies spending huge budgets relocating aren't going to come back in a hurry.UK plc is holed below the waterline and already leaking like a sieve. We must act before the tipping point comes. 
BREXIT TRUTHS: Theresa May is too frightened of the Brexiteers to act in the national interest / #Brexit #StopBrexit 
The question on my mind at the moment is this. In the next hung parliament, who is going to pick up the pieces from Brexit? What a poisoned chalice that will be.#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
I really, really hope the rumours are true that @jeremycorbyn is turning against Brexit.I have no problem with the idea of him as PM, other than the Brexit thing. I will even sing the chant.Everyone, let Corbyn know how we feel. 
Theresa May 'could let ECJ keep role in UK after Brexit'NO WAY MAY! What a weak PM we have!  
The EU's plan for the next stage of Brexit talks has been leaked to The Independent. It doesn't bode well for May  
Brexit has prompted a flurry of applications by British lawyers to the roll of solicitors in Ireland  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Did I miss a referendum? #NotInMyName#DUP17 
Would you vote differently to last time if the #EUREF was to be held again? #Brexit #EUPlease RETWEET POLL after you vote for a larger sample. 
"There is little evidence that Britain’s elites are prepared to use Brexit as a spur to thinking up bright new policies." < too true  
So the EU wants fair treatment of EU people in UK post #Brexit... doesn't seem to apply to British living in EU countries.  
Only 18months ago demographic problem for unionism seemed far from terminal. But Brexit has turned many soft union Catholics and others into nationalists. Seem it first hand w/friends. DUP in denial 
Hey @DavidDavisMP where are those Brexit reports? 
The simple truth is if you handled your responsibilities at work with the same arrogant incompetence as Theresa May has handled #brexit, you'd be sacked without severance. 
Too bad ! You could have repealed Brexit and outrumped a narcissist . Do reconsider professor . You are also more photogenic than that the goofball .  
European banks slash UK-related assets by €350bn after Brexit vote, to put this in to context, it's more money than the TOTAL 43-year contribution the UK has made to the EU in membership fees. #StopBrexit #ExitFromBrexit #FBPE 
'Sack Barnier!' Czech MEP says EU Brexit negotiator MUST GO for trying to 'punish' Britain  
Poverty is the biggest driver of ill health, both mental & physical, and biggest driver of poverty is Tory Austerity! Brexit will hit all UK countries and make this even worse.  
Grim. Will peace in Ireland join national prosperity, our international reputation, the future of the Union, and the NHS on Brexit's sacrificial altar?  
The Europhobes whined like bitches for over 40 years after the LAST referendum. Get comfortable.  
A great article from - get this - a Brexit supporter. This is, oh the words escape me because we don’t see it enough these days. Oh right, objective reporting.  
It's up to "those who wanted Brexit" to solve the Irish border issue, Michel Barnier says  
Case for Putin as @TIME #PersonOfTheYear2017 is pretty strong: sustained attacks on Western democracy coming to light (Brexit, US 2016, Catalonia, France, among others) reshaping politics; wars in Syria & Ukraine; pulling together autocrats like Orban, Erdogan, Assad. It's a lot. 
The most viral UK politics story in 2017 - bigger than any single piece about Brexit, the election, or Cobyn - was about animal sentience. Here’s how it happened and why the government is struggling to fight back.  
MI6 disagree. @gchq #Brexit #Farage   
New thread: Remainers who have seen the light of #Brexit  
'Be proud of Union Jack' MP BLASTS BBC crowd 'full of EU berets' for heckling Brexit views  
Evidence shows that Russia can be directly linked to interfering with the Brexit Campaign. Read the full story via the link below  #BrexitRussia #BrexitReality #Russianhacking #RussianCollusion #Breaking_News #NewsPicks #UKPolitics #YENews  
Did Russian posts influence Britain's referendum?  
EXCLUSIVE: UK  intelligence sources say #Brexit referendum so flooded with Russian money and bots as not to be “free and fair”, may need a revote  
From a Tory MP: The leaked plans and stark analysis for Brexit.  
Anything to make a weak, snidey, anti Brexit point @joannaccherry 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
We should forget GDP, trade, etc. Apparently, that is not how we measure success any more! It's the values that make us successful. Ah, the values of Brexit: xenophobia  &isolationism. Sweet lord! I've asked for a list of benefits of Brexit. Does anyone think I'll receive it?  
The @LibDems are the only national party that wants an Exit from Brexit. #ExitfromBrexit  
Anyone want another election? and while we are at it... another EU referendum? The staus quo is untenable. We need a government who will work for us all - not the privileged few.  
Nigel Dodds and the DUP are single-handedly combating attempts to keep Northern Ireland in the EU's suffocating Customs Unions, which would establish a hard border within Brexit Britain. #DUP17 pic.twitter.com/BRcep37V5X 
Here's a graph to cheer us up after the horrendous budget and nightmare prospects current Brexit conjures up:  
Russia interfered with the EU referendum. Even TM has agreed that. The question is: what are we going to do about it?The referendum was clearly unsafe and has been hugely damaging to the UK. Conclusion: rerun the referendum and give vote to EU citizens. #FBPE#ThinkAgain 
Very thoughtful piece on Ireland and European Integration post-Brexit, by Joachim Fischer, @UL from @RTEBrainstorm , a very interesting new platform for exchange of ideas on our society. 
Finally the tories publish brexit plan 
Petition: Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU.  
Since the #Brexit vote, European banks have dumped £350bn of UK assets. that's more than twice the entire #NHS budget for 2 yrs. save the NHS, #StopBrexit 
“Labour are in bed with the Tories over Brexit, and I think a lot of people who voted for Corbyn didn’t realise that.” - @vincecable just now. 
‘One must ask whether in their present state of political disorganisation and diplomatic isolation the British government is capable of perfidy,’ quietening damning in @IrishTimes Today  #brexit 
“Official EU data released on Friday showed banks across the 27 other EU countries reduced their total assets tied to the UK €350bn (from €1.94tn to €1.59tn) between the Brexit referendum in June 2016 and June 2017.”  
If it is really true that Corbyn is moving to an anti-Brexit position, it is the best news for the UK since 23 June 2016. But he needs to hurry up. Our country is already staggering under Brexit-induced blows.  
Free trade, no need for us to have a hard border with Irish Republic, and no need to give £40billion bung to the EU! #Brexit  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
A short speech by @SebDance on #Brexit. Heard him speak yesterday @newhamfabians and here again @Labour4EU. #LonLab17 
I have never been quite so proud of the Irish Civil Service, but if this anecdote is indicative of the diplomatic acumen possessed by DexEU I can’t imagine any outcome other than hard brexit, which is good for no one.  
“We could see a significant shift in favour of Remain next year — and a second referendum” - @FT.#StopBrexit. 
Birmingham bin strike.this is just one reason why trade unions are so crucial in the work place and with this most right wing Government since Thatcher, and the potential loss of workers rights after brexit,they are more essential than ever @unitetheunion 
Listening to #AnyQuestions and still find it incredible that intelligent people think that a referendum result achieved through lies and misinformation should be honoured because it is “democratic” to do so. The logic of this is as incomprehensible as it is terrifying. 
Australia has criticised the UK's post-Brexit trade plans to split quotas of food imports from around the world. Australia feel UK plans to cherry pick imports would impose unacceptable restrictions on their exports. #NotSoEasy #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
BREAKING: Tory MP leaks excerpt from one of the 58 Brexit impact studies  
People *are* changing their minds on Brexit.  
The EU was not the the problem, people were misled in the referendum - @SeemaMalhotra1 @Labour4EU #LabLon17 
Brexit policy now being driven by a small number of special interest groups (I include the DUP) and around 30 or 40 fanatical MPs with little regard for the stability of the U.K. Negotiate a pause in article 50 process and call an election or form a government of national unity.  
Dear 63.82 million ppl in Britain,The DUP received 24% endorsement from the electorate or 16% of the population here. That’s their largest vote ever.Please accept, they do not represent or speak for the diverse people of Northern Ireland (especially on BREXIT).Ta,Brad x 
"Ministers confirmed that the economy would get back on track if Carol clapped her hands together and said 'I do believe in Brexit, I do believe in Brexit' like a deluded twat on pills" pic.twitter.com/pQgH8w4xXf 
A great #Brexit context fact from Ivan Rogers in @prospect_uk 
Australia joins list of countries arguing about details of UK in the WTO post-Brexit.Legatum dude threatens "no deal" with Australia!Is he aware that Australia and New Zealand are about to start trade deal talks with...the EU?  
#DUP17 gives us a glimpse of post-Brexit dystopia where soup in a cup and a sandwich costs 8 quid  
The UK is free to agree trade deals, free to protect its interests. It is NOT entitled to walk away from the Good Friday Agreement, and NOT entitled to silence when its actions threaten a neighbour and friend  #brexit  
It’s started. Who’s to blame for the negative effects of Brexit? Those who voted against it, of course! #horseshit pic.twitter.com/zHcNYjsPzv 
"The pound fell off a fucking cliff today because Carol from Worcester doesn't believe in Brexit hard enough. Carol, who wants the UK to fail, tweeted 'ooh not a big fan of this brexit thingy tbh' to her 34 followers, causing a 20 cent drop against the dollar." pic.twitter.com/wNF9vcfa72 
#DUP17 called to say I was probably going to be named member of the year but that I would need to deny minorities and women basic rights, whitewash terror links, run NI off edge of cliff in supporting Brexit, oh and be a member.I said probably wasn't good enough and declined. 
At the @AJStudies conference on the future of the Kurds in the Middle East. A critical & timely gathering of scholars & analysts here in Doha. I'll be discussing the issue in comparative perspective with Catalonia & Brexit  
Exactly and the main reason I quit the Econ advisory council Labour must be solidly opposed to Brexit which would be a disaster for ordinary working people especially  
"Today's target is the so-called comedian David Bad-Deal; call him a virtue-signalling cuck who hates Brexit or something"  
Brexit twats surprised to discover that Australia, New Zealand & Canada won’t be generous on trade just because they used to be UK dominions & the Queen is their head of state. All they can do in response is beg. Zero leverage. pic.twitter.com/eHrGIAod4z 
Its a good read but it is very frustrating that only two types of voters ever feature in stories about Brexit:1. Angry working class people in struggling towns2. People who voted Leave and now regret itBoth are small parts of a much larger, more complicated story  
They are fully aware that the NHS is 40,000 nurses short. *40,000* - right now. There is a 90% reduction in applications from EU nurses since Brexit referendum. Govt are doing everything to force nurses out of the NHS. 
I wonder at which point @jeremycorbyn will realise it’s not just “rich bankers” who are calling for Brexit to be stopped. But people across all levels of society. 
Superb long piece. EU doctors & nurses leaving NHS is accelerating... and those coming is dropping. Here are some personal stories of those leaving London due to Brexit.  
Brexit: UK could quit EU without paying a penny, say Lords . 
I worry that pieces like this give impression people are changing mind when a) so far they are broadly not b) vast majority of country want to see Brexit delivered whatever they voted & c) I've also met countless remain voters who have switched other way  
I hope that whatever alleged Christian values Mrs May @theresa_may still has, torment her in her sleep. The values her father instilled in her are not compatible with the damage, torment and suffering that will come with Brexit#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
We want special status for NI when it comes to blocking equality & women’s rights but not when it cud help NI avoid Brexit disaster #DUP17 
We will see UKIP leading the Brexit debate again  
He warned of MPs being “bullied into silence” by newspapers and social media as Brexit legislation passed through Parliament.  
No one wants an election esp. as   Dec. is crucial time for Ir. re #brexit .Where's common sense gone ? Time for a deep drink of Cop On. 
This is extremely good. Not sure many MPs got their heads round how much bigger (in all senses) UK government will need to be post-Brexit. Fairly unusual experiment in state-building.   
.@realDonaldTrump @jeffsessions THE BIGGEST COLLUSION IS NOT RUSSIAN THE BIGGEST COLLUSION IS SOROS COLLUSION!!! DEPORT SOROS & #MAGA!!!  via @Nigel_Farage #FusionGPS #UraniumOne #Brexit #PayToPlay @FoxNews @seanhannity @TuckerCarlson @IngrahamAngle 
We win by focusing on what we know. Which is that Vote Leave & Leave.EU won the referendum by breaking British electoral law 
“I Wish It Wasn’t Brexit Every Day” - Gotta smile at this wizard Remainer Xmas song by a Ray Would   
Unemployment down Richest currently paying more tax than under any Labour governmentEconomy growing despite Brexit jittersMore students going to university & higher education than ever#BetterOffWithLabour ? Really? 
Just how many billions of our money will this government waste before people come to their senses and reject Brexit? 
Can Keir Starmer Save Britain From Brexit?  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
You shouldn't leak brexit plans 
Please help this project to collect real stories of the emerging impact of "UK Brexit" on businesses.Add any you know of/have experienced below - jobs lost/revenue lost/businesses closed or under threat etc.Please RT so we get a true sense impact. #StopBrexit @Anna_Soubry 
The inside story of how David Cameron drove Britain to Brexit - Sir Ivan Rogers’ lecture in Oxford yday. MUST...  
“The govt’s position is clear. Brexit means Brexit... well, except for financial services, trade in fisheries products, frictionless trade generally, European City of Culture, science collaboration, Cornwall,  Grimsby any other bits where we want to keep existing benefits.” 
#EGP27 @margotwallstrom on #Brexit. Referendums require people to be fully & properly informed. If not, you are undermining democracy  
If Labour committed to:- Electoral reform- Continued membership of the single market- A referendum on any Brexit deal with option to remain- Cancelling Hinkley & HS2... then it would be easier to agree we'd be #BetterOffWithLabour 
There it is everyone. Michael Heaver insists that the poorest will benefit hugely from Brexit.Probably best we keep hold of this tweet. After all, it's nice to have it on record when people brazenly lie to you.  
The same Russian entities that were pushing #botnets for Trump were pushing them for Brexit, and for Marine le Pen and Viktor Orban.  
Actually I think I just pointed out that the cost of a no deal Brexit would add £260 to household bills and lose £50billion a year for the Exchequer. How exactly was that not “coming clean” about #brexitshambles This incompetent Tory government is in chaos. 
I wonder if there's a reason why it's so hard to find people who really understand how Govt works and also back Brexit?  
It seems to me that many leading Brexiters are surprised and shocked by EU nations working together in each other's interests because such behaviour is incomprehensible to their selfish, self-centred mentalities.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
I voted for musharaff in his first referendum, much to my fathers disapointment. I voted for Q league in 2007-8 election much to my fathers disapointment but he accepted this is how democracy works. I did it because I loved my army, today I’m disappointed. 
John Redwood: We owe the EU nothing!There is general agreement that there is no legal requirement for the UK to pay EU anything on exit.There is no provision in the Treaty for an exit bill.We received no payment on joining...#Brexit #EU 
Must Watch: James O'Brien has had enough of Boris Johnson and Brexit-supporting newspapers 
The last criticism of #brexit I heard on the BBC was a item about Welsh hill farming which was criticised in the HoC. They even interviewed a Fascist on Remembrance Sunday last year. The important speech on #A50 by Lord Kerr was totally blanked by the news. 1/n 
Out of interest Tim, how do you know Paul Waugh’s views on Brexit? I work with him every day and haven’t a clue. 
The inside story of how David Cameron drove Britain to Brexit  via @prospect_uk 
Soft Brexit performance from the city last night, Hard Brexit David Moyes had us walloped with toughness. A strong wallop was dished up from a set piece. Hammers have Moyes and Pearce, we're lumbered with a French nancyboy! 
Classic Brexiter response - it's always someone else's fault, blame the EU, blame immigrants, blame Remainers, blame anyone else, never accept responsibility. But that's what populist #Brexit has always been about - petulantly blaming others for Britain's failings.#StopBrexit  
Tory MP said: “Supporting Brexit will destroy UK. Opposing Brexit will destroy Tories.”Tories need to put our country…BEFORE THEMSELVES 
Q. Why am I against Corbyn?A. I'm against ANYONE who wants to take away my rights based on a wafer thin win in an advisory referendum that had no thresholds or need for a supermajority.I hope that makes it clear.#StopBrexit 
This is such a lovely piece. Outside of the Brexit stuff, it is a celebration of doubt and those honest and courageous enough to embrace it.  
Nine (I think) regular presenters of BBC Radio 4’s #WeekinWestminster. Not one of them back Brexit. At least five are Remainers. 
The real Elites: £16.7m of the £24.4m spent by the #Brexit campaign came from just 10 people.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Here's the final proof that brexit has become a cargo cult: brexit commentators  now declaring that the worst economic growth in Europe not to do with leaving the EU but because remainers don't believe in brexit enough. @truemagic68  
"UK Brexit"  
I would dearly like to be able to vote Labour but there’s a ruddy great elephant in the room.Neither party can make any legitimate claims whilst pursuing this MAD and BAD Brexit.As one of the growing number of people who think Brexit is a really bad idea I feel abandoned.  
Labour wants “jobs first Brexit” @jeremycorbyn tells #LABSW17. NB Jobs first Brexit impossible outside Single Market & Customs Union. 
The 7th YouGov poll that has give Remain a lead and shows that people are regretting the decision to leave the EU. It's time to take back real control and stop the Brexit fantasy before it becomes a living hell. #StopBrexit 
Supporting Labour Against Brexit @Labour4EU at the London Regional Conference 
Any politician with any guts would say: “Brexit is a huge mistake. I cannot impoverish my children and grandchildren. We must think again.” 
So the Brexiters' Empire 2.0 plan isn't going too well then!It must be the fault of Australia and New Zealand as it can't be the fault of #Brexit as for a Brexiter it's never their fault.We need to #exitfrombrexit 
Bring power back to Manchester, not Whitehall, says Greater Manchester @MayorofGM , who is demanding that powers returned to the UK after Brexit should be handed to the regions, because, he says, Westminster has failed the north of England.  
I have lost interest a bit in @Twitter with its 280 character idea but I want you all to know I still think #brexit is a shit idea too xx 
Really, the state of this.It is pretty simple.The EU is based on law. The law states what countries can be in Capitals of Culture. Post-Brexit UK does not comply with criteria, is hence out.If you are too dim or lazy to look at the law there’s nothing I can do for you.  
As news breaks of intelligence agency concern abt Russia & Brexit, here's what you need to know...  
Russia not only interfered directly in the election of Donald Trump. But also in our referendum. @LiamByrneMP explains more. 
Excellent thread on a very important question - why hasn’t @ElectoralCommUK confirmed whether or not they know who gave @duponline £435k for #brexit?  
*WA election*One Nation: this will be our Brexit moment. *SSM vote*One Nation: no, this is it.*QLD election*One Nation: no wait this.... 
1. What Brexiters think post-Brexit Britain will be like.2. The damage that UK Brexit negotiators are incurring, largely through incompetence.3. Britain 2020.  
A little noted feature of the #EURef was the asymmetry of the consequences. A narrow #Remain win would have left open the chance to push for another referendum. But, #Brexit once implemented would have irreversible consequences.A super-majority clause was necessary.#StopBrexit 
Alarming that UK cabinet still hasn't grasped that Brexit bill is price of orderly exit, not payment for FTA.  
New reports that intelligence services fear wholesale Russian interference in #Brexit - we need a US-style judge-led enquiry NOW!  
3. We have enough *facts* at our disposal to de-legitimise the Brexit referendum.For example, apparently unlawful collaboration between Darren Grimes & Vote Leave, to break legal electoral spending limits.We do NOT need to resort to fictional sources. 
So many examples how naive Leave gang was when bragging about WTO etc not looking into complexities like these: BBC News - Australia knocks UK Brexit trade plan  
There is no indication so far that the Department of Education and Skills has even begun to grasp the cultural and linguistic consequences of Brexit and the quantum leap that is required in the teaching of EU languages. 
Had the #EURef electoral franchise included EU 27 nationals & 16-17 year olds as in the Scottish 2014 referendum, #Remain would have won. So far from being based on the 'Will of the People' #Brexit is based on the government's choice of who was allowed to vote.#StopBrexit /1 
Good news: Cabinet willing to give ECJ role in guaranteeing EU citizens' rights post-Brexit (& UK citizens in EU27, presumably). Further concessions on family rights needed too..    
There's no such thing as "default to WTO" if UK walks away with "No deal" from Brexit. WTO needs negotiation too. Australia knocks UK Brexit trade plan -  
Remember all that confidence from #Brexiteers about how simple it would be to take the WTO option....? Australia knocks UK Brexit trade plan - BBC News  
Seriously readissimo speech by Sir Ivan Rogers, Cameron's former adviser, on the UK/EU history leading to the Brexit mess. Politico has the transcript. Worth every line  
When intelligent, educated people champion a cause that's obviously a catastrophe, (Brexit), the reason they give is a lie. That lie soon becomes more obvious, more indefensible. The lie usually hides vast personal financial gain. So it is with many Tory politicians. @acgrayling 
Prof. Patrick Minford - "We don’t have to agree to any divorce bill at all. It’s astonishing that the EU is so inflexible about the negotiations." #Brexit  
University vice-chancellors, start calling for a second EU referendum 
Election now would be reckless. Macho politics rules as country, Brexit, housing, homeless take back seat. Caretaker govt could linger on. 
This week Ken Clarke 'confirms' what we already knew that Coulson was Murdoch's placeman in No 10 and that Cameron did a deal with Murdoch. May met Murdoch in NY just after the referendum. What deal has she done? When the PM subverts our democracy we are undone! @acgrayling 
Hugely respect individuals making decisions which are best for them. But if you want GOOD political change - NEVER SURRENDER AND NEVER GIVE UP. The stakes are too high, esp the imperative to fight and stop BREXIT  
Oh wow! It looks as if @EUflagmafia have struck in #Leeds today. Perhaps it is a show of support for our Day of Action including our public meeting at 3pm with @mikegalsworthy #Brexit  
What the **** is she doing? : Theresa May 'could let ECJ keep role in UK after Brexit'  via @MailOnline 
Australia knocks UK Brexit trade plan.'Oh but we can trade with the Commonwealth!'We're about to find out the hard way it can be a very lonely World as an island without an Empire or the EU...#StopBrexit...Stop the Madness..  
- Dublin accused of hijacking Brexit- Bulgarian PM says EU can't afford 'no deal'- Tusk demands UK solves border issue Read all the Brexit news here  
 £72,000,000,000.00 £72 BILLION: The cost of Brexit is already turning Britain into a second-rung nation  
Watching Matt Canavan roll out the bullshit as his party sinks into dead Turnbull area is classic. If this election was a referendum on Adani, the electorate do not want it #qldvotes #qldpol #auspol 
Barring a major Brexit breakthrough, Britain's banks will begin moving staff in early 2018  
Gove attacks 'distorting' social media after animal sentience row.Oh absolutely Michael..passing over control to the unthinking, ill-informed mob. Here's an idea..let's listen to experts..you know the ones telling us #Brexit is harming us & it can't work.  
Multiple sources with links to UK intelligence report that Russian corruption of Brexit vote far worse than previously thought. Referendum received so much illegal foreign money and influence from Russia, UK intelligence minded to recommend the Brexit vote be redone, @acgrayling 
Australia knocks UK Brexit trade plan  
Dear @DavidDavisMP.Here's your reminder about the 58 Brexit Impact reports (excruciating detail) which do/don't exist and which you must disclose to Parliament.#BrexitImpactStudies #BrexitReports 
Interesting, #Brexit supporter & ex Tory MP @LouiseMensch says Referendum legitimacy may be undermined by extent of Kremlin meddling  
Tories selling Brexit "fiction". Here's why Dexeu lost 3 ministers in 4 months. Good people won't work on Brexit fiction.  
Saturday morning dose of tariff quotas on @BBCr4today. Australia now joins 7 others in objecting to the UK-EU plan for splitting the quotas in their post-Brexit WTO commitments. Explanation  
If Labour reverses its position on Brexit, Corbyn must go.He was the 1st to call for the triggering of A50.He supported an unamended Tory Brexit with a 3 line whip.He sacked Remainers from his front bench.He told lies about the Single Market.It's Corbyn OR Remain.Not both. 
Sick of Brexit? It hasn't started yet. And here's how long UK ex-ambassador to EU says it will take...  
Kate Hoey on the EU’s attempt to exploit the UK-Eire border in Brexit negotiations [2/2]:  
'I’ll have to compete!' Dutch fisherman MOANS about losing British waters after Brexit  
REVEALED: Spain's Brexit plan to KEEP British tourists flying in. Europe needs our Tourist money!  
Will someone just step up & lead #Remain...if there were 1 decent politician calling out the BS & getting a clear message over that #Brexit can't work we can stop this farce! We have probs with the rest of the World too! People must be allowed a #FinalSay. 
We're not going to let a referendum to #repealthe8th be delayed by political posturing! We've waited too long. Who ever the government is next year they won't be able to ignore us! 
Those safeguards were circumvented by politicians making the referendum ‘advisory’. If referendum had been ‘binding’, safeguards such as higher threshold wld have been obligatory. MPs then treated ‘advisory’ referendum as ‘binding’. Stinks to high heaven  
Just you wait for post-Brexit chlorinated chicken ...  
The EU Anti-Tax Avoidance Directive for all EU member states begins at the start of 2019. Brexit happens in March 2019.Are you thinking what I'm thinking...?  
Friends! Nor me! I shall NEVER make my peace with Brexit, no matter how successful it may turn out to be!Every day I loathe more and more that tiny handful of 17,410,742 bigots who voted against Our EU! Their stunning lack of humility in disagreeing with me is sickening.  
"When Britain enters phase two [of the Brexit negotiations], it will be confronted with a simple choice: do we want trade or control? And we don’t know the answer to this question."  via @prospect_uk 
Brexiter crass logic:Brexit means Brexit.£350m a week for NHS.Take back control. But I can't name EU laws that I don't like.Empire 2.0.Blue passports.It's worth eating poisoned chickens to be a global trading power.Who needs society to function? We've got our sovereignty.  
MI5 and MI6 say Brexit referendum was not “free and fair”, may need to be redone. The Russia problem comes to the UK... 
Unnamed sources claim #Brexit vote was bought with Russian money. Vote was not free and fair.   
Who is #hacking Brexit? And why we need our own Robert Mueller inquiry  
How British Ministers, Spies, Oligarchs, Bankers and Russian Diplomats Colluded Over Brexit 
BREXIT:UK has twice made compromises, first in Florence and now with the offer of additional money. Yet the EU just pockets the concessions and says still more is needed. It will be hard to see how the UK can stay at the negotiating table.  
No s**t Sherlock! : PROJECT FEAR: Economists admit predictions were ‘too pessimistic’ about Brexit  
'Sack Barnier!' Czech MEP says EU Brexit negotiator MUST GO for trying to 'punish' Britain  
Also makes the case @UKLabour will inevitably become more anti #Brexit. Hope you’re right Robert @Peston  
A symbolic,, a likely prophetically chaotic, #Brexit moment  
EXCLUSIVE: "2 Former Communists Now Run European Defence".  One runs EU Defence.  One runs NATO.  Both are passionate EU-lovers.  Read our shock report:  #Brexit  
Now the consequences of #brexit are starting to hit people’s pockets its time for like minded politicians of all parties to find their voices. Opposing Brexit is not opposing the will of the people. The EUref result was close, skewed by the old and is susceptible to change.  
Will the British people's famed patience finally start to run out?  Watch video, read our #Brexit analysis:  
The cost of #Brexit is already far in excess of our modest contribution to the EU budget. @FT headline this morning. 
Have a great Saturday everyone today!! Let’s have a day without Brexit talk. Playing 4 records from Pink Floyd. One of the best groups ever.  
There's a new slogan for Brexit  
Brexit simplified  
MPs have demanded Parliament’s Intelligence and Security Committee launch a probe into evidence that Russians colluded with Brexit campaigners in the run up to the poll. Putin aims to cause chaos in West #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
DUP leader accuses Irish government of hijacking Brexit talks: to somebody of my age, this increasingly hostile rhetoric and rising tension in the island of Ireland has disturbing echoes of the past #StopBrexit 
Theresa May given 10 days to improve her offer to EU for Brexit talks to move on  
19 GOP states refused the Medicaid Expansion, even though it would have covered 100,000's in each state, and was offered for free.Maine voters had to hold a referendum to force the GOP legislature to adopt it.GOP are *holding their own citizens hostage* to spite Obama.1/  
Inserts correction: Rory Stewart's visit to Zimbabwe is very significant-reflects the importance of Zimbabwe ECONOMICALLY to the UK & the government's desperate need to find solutions to the Brexit crisis. Zimbabwe's leadership change could not have come at a more opportune time  
Is there a greater conspiracy behind Kejriwal targeting institutions like Election Commission, Reserve Bank of India and asking proof of surgical strike from Indian Army? What do you think? Lets do a mini referendum on twitter #GujaratElections2017 #RohitSardana #KapilMishra 
NB If you are against EU army Brexit removes UK chance to stop this.  V important to remember Putin, Trump and Leave Elite want to weaken NATO. EU force is important given Trump is compromised.  
If the Brits are dumb enough for #Brexit they might be dumb enough to Take Trump for Murray.  
If this is right it presents TMay with a problem because it could undermine the democratic  legitimacy of the  referendum  
The annual loss of tax take because of Brexit is equal to 100% of the defence budget. Of course Brexit weakens us.  
Great article on Brexit by Louise  
The UK has had long enough to realise that this farce of a negotiation must end now. The #EU makes demands. It dictates. It doesn’t negotiate. The narrow margin by which I voted #Brexit is now a very firm resolve. We must prepare to greet the world instead of wasting our time. 
This is huge. @patribotics @LouiseMensch#RulesBritannia  #cdnpoli #ukpoli #Brexit #TrumpRussia#NigelFarage #Corbyn #Mnuchin #FVEY 
A smooth, orderly Brexit means Brexit, we are not leaving Europe, we are leaving the EU and we will make a success of it, with a deep and special relationship with the EU.Who would have thought you could arrange all these words to become something utter tosh & fucking bollocks? 
Stealing Butler Shores and public parkland from taxpayers will absolutely require a public referendum.  Solid reporting by @PhilJankowski & @MyStatesman #SaveButlerShores! 
The fashion for Alt right kekist politics sickens me. It’s adopted by the entitled Brexit generation who never fought, had growth handed to them by Scotland’s Oil, privatisation, the EU and immigration, and now the party has come to a close they cut the legs off the future. 
According to @resfoundation's analysis of @OBR_UK forecasts, Brexit will cost £72bn a year in lost GDP by 2022. For perspective, that is slightly more than the 1-off Financial settlement plus transition payments is likely to be. But every year.   
*Ep 13* Export Superstars & BillionairesEp 12 CPTPPEp 11 Developing CountriesEp 10 No-Deal BrexitEp 9 GATT OriginsEp 8 NAFTA IIEp 7 BombardierEp 6 UncertaintyEp 5 Solar TariffsEp 4 WTO Held HostageEp 3 Steel Ep 2 KORUSEp 1 NAFTA I  
What all people who voted Remain should understand is that   #Brexit was proof that we have underfunded education for too many years...#StopBrexit 
A #GE17 would mean:-Totally unprepared for Brexit talks in December-All work of #8committee gone-No Xmas social welfare bonusesBut that's ok because FF like their poll ratings and SF want to bring down their second government of the year, to break their records 
“Faced with the possibility of new barriers to trade with the U.K., Irish firms are scoping out new markets and rethinking their supply chains.The country’s fast-track efforts highlight how Brexit is already reshaping economic ties across Europe.”  
That’s about 20x the average UK wage. Why give it to this guy? Track record? History of campaigning? To circumvent the rules? >> Why Did Vote Leave Donate £625,000 To A 23-Year-Old Fashion Student During The Referendum?  
More Brexiter Irish nonsense #brexit  
#brexit cartoon from March 30, 2017 
#brexit cartoon from July 6, 2016 
@BenPBradshaw  At last our Intel  Agencies are getting the truth out there - watch out May , your cover up of Putin and his associates  subversion of British democracy so as to obtain a dishonest Referendum vote is now essentially over - as your "brexit" friends say - get over it 
#brexit cartoon from June 29 2016 
The 'root cause' of the problem in the UK is the legislation surrounding elections and Parliament itself - they passed a Referendum Bill, by a massive majority, on an issue of vital national importance without the necessary safeguards such as a threshold.  
Loads of Brexit-related polls here - get voting, the more ways in which we can get our voice heard the better! #StopBrexit #FinalSayForAll  @StopBrexit17 @ThatTimWalker @thomasbrake @ianw2000uk @StopBrexitMarch @EUflagmafia @TheNewEuropean 
There's a lot of talk about Britain's low productivity rate. Well it can't be the falling wages & life expectancy, the divided country, rising hate crimes, absence of permanent jobs & affordable housing, massive household debt or Brexit, so it MUST be the last Labour Government.  
I do support Brexit. I also report the truth without fear or favor.  
"YouGov survey found that only 42 per cent of respondents think it is right to leave the EU, compared with 47 per cent who think it is wrong. This is the biggest gap in favour of remaining in the EU since the referendum in June last year."Brexit unravels  
Britain has 10-day "absolute deadline" to deliver on key Brexit issues: Tusk  
They don’t get it. You don’t get it. This is a flammable sore. You aggravate with your Brexit. Can’t end well for us. 
Multiple sources with links to UK intelligence say Theresa May will be warned the #Brexit referendum was so corrupted by Russian money and influence as not to be 'free and fair'  
‘Michael Gove is scrabbling to deal with a PR crisis surrounding Tories' refusal to keep animal rights in the Brexit bill’  
EXCLUSIVE: #Brexit May Need to Be Redone  
Desperate to block #Brexit at any price liberals in the British media have stopped pretending they are impartial on the subject and are waging an open war against the very idea of Britain leaving the EU. The concepts of free speech and free press are dumped unceremoniously. 
Michael Gove is against the Good Friday Agreement.He sees a brighter future for Ireland without it.Brexit - the gift that just keeps on giving.  
Dear Mrs May @theresa_may help me please? I'm struggling with my understanding of "and we will make a success of it". If Brexit is a success so far, bearing in mind we've lost the EMA & haven't even left yet, how is Brexit a success and for whom?#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
Stuck on Brexit Island just got a whole lot more real (and Grayling's response is so ignorant it makes my hair stand up in all directions)  UK airlines risk losing flying rights, says leaked Brexit paper  
"Brexit means Brexit", said Theresa May, when all she needed to say was the British people have spoken and we will now be leaving the  European Union. That would not have been long-winded, nor hard. But, she chose to speak in doublespeak. 
Stanley Johnson says to @kezdugdale we must talk about #Brexit & Labour Party policy on it. She says yes maybe you could explain it to me  #TeamKez #ImACelebrity 
Stanley: You and I should talk about the Labour Party policy on Brexit -Kez: Yes, maybe you could explain it to me.Yas Queen#imaceleb 
Stanley: we should have a chat about Labour Party policy on Brexit Kez: perhaps you could explain it to me OMG 
Right. Strap in. Contraversial words coming. I am not in full support of Jeremy Corbyn. He has undermined his voters, and his euroskepticism has been mistaken for virtuous stoicism. He has, by supporting #brexit, made his promises untenable. 
Tomorrow's news:The English football team quits FIFA and demands to play in the World Cup while fielding 12 players and not being tied down by the offside rule. FIFA says no!Howls of "FIFA punishing England!"#StopBrexit #Brexit 
I agree @jonlis1 that Labour & @LibDems need to work together - totally up for that - but it would be much easier if there was real clarity about Labour's Brexit destination instead of having to read tealeaves  
‘Brexit is going to be a godsend for anyone who wants to be cut off from the world’  
This image by @CH_Cartoon is by far the best illustration of #brexit I have ever seen.  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
People who still back Brexit presumably don't understand that leaving the EU is just the start.The government's decision to drop the Charter of Fundamental Rights is a bit of a clue. 
#Brexit #FiddlyWhat @BorisJohnson said here about #Europeis getting   more               &                        more                                     &                                             more                                                        true. 
The hapless PM, her deputy and Chancellor all said Brexit would be a disaster but now have to swallow their words and insist leaving Europe will be wonderful.  
Donald Tusk has given the UK 10 days to make a #Brexit bill offer and provide a credible solution on the Irish border  
There is no solution to hard Brexit along the Irish border. Negotiators have been chasing this will-o-the-wisp for over a year. They have not found it because it does not exist. A border is a border, it is not “not-a-border”.   
Ireland’s political turmoil deepened on Friday, just weeks before it is set to play a central role in the Brexit negotiations  
Tomorrow's @ScotNational: Theresa May warned she has 10 days to fix the Brexit deadlock  
My review of Robert Peston's new book, on why people like him have made a mess of the country, and why they need to make amends by making a success of Brexit,  via @TheEconomist 
Leaked Brexit paper shows UK airlines risk losing flying rights  via @LibDems 
It seems some Brexiters are disgusted that Remainers took issue with someone like Gisela Stuart being pro Brexit.Well Brexiters, I am a Remainer, an EU citizen and I am aghast at Gisela betrayal. 
After we remaining traitors have all been kicked out, this will be his Brexit Britain  
At the 2016 Tory party conference Liam Fox said "The uncertain status of EU nationals living in the UK is "one of our main cards" in #Brexit negotiations"More recently Theresa May said that the government has not used EU citizens as bargaining chips. #StopBrexit #LeaveLies 
The real reasons for #Brexit:Liam Fox calling for further deregulation of Britain's Labour market, even though it is one of the freest in the OECD. #StopBrexit 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Before the referendum the Treasury forecast that #Brexit would reduce productivity growth, and around 18 months later that's just what Hammond's budget has forecast.'Project fear' becomes 'Project fact'#StopBrexit 
."Brexit strikes me as our Vietnam.Everybody rational knows it is – how can I put it politely? – not going well.". 
Plans for a £150 million tyre factory abandoned because of Brexit 
A General Election was held in 2017#TheresaMay asked for a #Brexit mandate; her #Tories failed to get a majority for itThat trumps any referendum held in 2016 (even if it had been 'binding')"No Parliament may bind its successors"THIS Parliament can vote to #STOPbrexit#BBCaq 
Theresa May's best solution for the Irish border? #Brexit  
The UK has long been a friend of our Eastern Partners - Armenia, Azerbaijan, Georgia, Belarus, Moldova & Ukraine - and supporter of the Eastern Partnership. Today I reconfirmed this at the #eapsummit and our commitment to the region after Brexit pic.twitter.com/LrWztKnokz 
Simply extraordinary#Brexit  
This under the water 'boring' financial stuff - like the ongoing brain drain and company relocation.investment plans - is really important: Brexit is already creating a slowburn national catastrophe and it's almost at the point of no return. Next couple of months crucial.  
Peston believes a universal basic income for every Briton is inevitable and that without a radical reinvention of the welfare state, the country is hurtling towards economic chaos. I agree, but first we're hurtling towards a Brexit catastrophe 
."Peace in NI depends on a complicated but stable balance of power between communities & it is THIS which is now being eroded by a Brexit-obsessed British Govt." 
To whom it may concern. I would like to return Brexit, it is broken and has not met expectations. Please refund all monies paid out iimmediately and pay the NHS instead.#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
It is hard to exaggerate just how little #brexit leader @KateHoeyMP knows about the disaster she wants to inflict on Nireland & RepIreland. Switzerland is in Schengen & EFTA following most EU single market rules. When did our politicians get so stupid? 
Daniel just pointed out that Roz from Monsters Inc looks like a Brexit voter and I can't unsee it.  
UK, YouGov poll:LAB-S&D: 43%CON-ECR: 40%LDEM-ALDE: 7% ↑SNP/PCY-G/EFA: 4%UKIP-EFDD: 3% ↓Greens-G/EFA: 2%#Brexit 
During the independence referendum in Catalonia, Russia used the ‘combination’ (kombinaciya), an operation can integrate instruments such as cyber warfare, cyber-intelligence, disinformation, propaganda and more @MiraMilosevich1  
Excellent UK2020 Fisheries Paper discussed at 3rd Brexit Seminar with @OwenPaterson @michaelgove @johnredwood.Policy allowing real-time data & management to work with nature essential for UK to lead world fisheries management. No more CFP/Quota disaster!  
Every day, in every way, Brexit gets shittier and shittier. We will all be in it up to our necks in Brexshit.#StopBrexit #revokeA50forthwith 
Stay angry and fight Brexit. Subscribe to The New European for 13 weeks for just £15 and get our exclusive Christmas cards free:  
To be debated in Parliament on Dec 11. Let's give this petition for a referendum on the final deal another push #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Another Brexit casualty. As of this week Eurotunnel is to be rebranded as "GetLink" when we all know the bestest brand name for it was to be "Le Chunnel".  
Release the Brexit papers @No10Vigil #releasethestudies 
Having an election now means...- A weak Ireland at the climax of the Brexit negotiations- Delays in social welfare and pension payments- Killing the work of the 8th Cttee- Candidates door-knocking at Xmas time- A need for new count centres (Funderland?) 
On the Eurostar home after more Brexit reporting in Brussels. Dinner is quiche again... If I write a Brexit memoir, it will be called ‘Quiche Under the Sea’. 
Catherine Noone on a possible delay for the abortion referendum: “This is 40 years in the waiting, and an election being caused in these circumstances, when the issue is being dealt with for the first time” in so long, is shocking  
EU staff already leaving Imperial over Brexit, says their head “with about half the remainder seeking legal advice.”  
When twattish Brexiters say, “You just want Brexit/Britain to fail so you can say ‘I told you so’!” important to realise what they’re doing. They’re deflecting: trying to make it about your motives, not about the factual arguments you’ve just put forward. #LeaveLiars 
This ex mandarin’s Brexit threats are as trite and unimaginative as he was in Office  
James O’Brien’s patience has finally run out with Boris Johnson and Brexit-supporting newspapers  
Why the hell are we still pursuing this destructive downhill road to #Brexit when it’s still perfectly possible to turn back?#StopTheMadness 
Currently, Whitehall policy is not Brexit and must be changed.‘Partnership Paper’ Sept 2017 says keep several parts of EU military union, joint…FinanceAssetsProcurementResearch.These necessitate adherence to:EU Council decisionsDefence policyProcurement rulesEDA mship. 
This lie is one of the most pervasive in Brexit- EU membership benefits the whole nation, poorest too. Did Nissan come to Tyneside for the weather? Were Liverpool and Glasgow renewed by the Home Counties?  
Dear TV news chiefs: please stop sending reporters 'to the north' to 'find' Brexit voters. There will be plenty in your West London street 
Ireland is playing a blinder in the Brexit negotiations & they currently have the Brits over a barrel.It shows what can be achieved as an independent sovereign state, as an equal player on the world stage. Devolution was only to placate us, never about us having real power 
Wait a minute! @theresa_may says she wants to keep an open border with Ireland and free movement between the two counties. Isn't Brexit meant to "take back control of our borders"? How's that going to happen if we keep an open border with EU? 
This is the core of historic misunderstanding at heart of Brexit: europhiles never recognising that the fusing of law enforced by supranational institutions is a political project.  
If I were Corbyn, I’d distance myself as much as possible from Brexit. The suction when it goes down will pull a lot of people down with it. 
Politics is about making choices with other people’s money.David Davis’s Brexit dept or Manchester terror victims?NHS or EU divorce bill? 
“I can guarantee you this [Brexit] will take over a decade” - Sir Ivan Rogers. 29th March 2019 awaits... 
Just before Britain joined the #EU, we had the second most equal country in #Europe. Now we're economically the most unequal country in Europe. The top 19% take 28% of all income, more than anywhere else in Europe & half of that goes to the top 1%.#Brexit 
Britain has 10-day "absolute deadline" to deliver on key Brexit issues: Tusk  
Best Brexit cartoon  
Donald Tusk has given the UK 10 days to make a #Brexit bill offer and provide a credible solution on the Irish border  
The Irish political crisis, Brexit and the view from Brussels via @RTENewsNow  
December 4 looking good already: Brexit deadline, Puigdemont in court and new Eurogroup chief. Happy weekend! 
This is the core of historic misunderstanding at heart of Brexit: euroskeptics never recognised that EU is a legal not political project.  
European banks have cut their exposure to UK since it voted to leave the EU, removing €350bn of UK-related assets from their balance sheets; 17% reduction shows EU banks are protecting themselves against the threat of potential losses if no #Brexit deal  
Dear David @DavidDavisMP, you are required to release the Brexit Impact Assessments to the House. Don't tell me, the dog ate them, turns out they were written in invisible ink, they spotaneously self destructed, abducted by aliens. Just publish them, do the right thing David.  
Britain headed for hard Brexit, Bulgarian prime minister says 
Cam’s top man on Europe, Sir Ivan Rogers (with Will Hutton) after giving a most revealing @prospect_uk address on The Road to Brexit. @andrew_adonis calls it the most important lecture he has ever heard at Oxford Uni. Predicts historians will study for decades 
I mean I don't advise it, seeing as my video "literally" wasn't calling white people unbearable, but looking at the role of white supremacy in Brexit. But best of luck, ya derkhead.  
A snap Irish general election has no import for #Brexit. The EU tells Ireland what to do, end of.  
Ah, of course. If we'd just "embraced" this crock of s*** that is Brexit, we'd be top of the league by now. It's all the fault of us Remainers that UK's outlook is so gloomy. Nothing to do with the biggest, most idiotic act of self-harm in living memory!  
Britain's consumer confidence hits lowest level since aftermath of Brexit vote  
How dare Brussels tell the UK that we have “ten days to make progress” on Brexit? Truth is, Brussels has about 16 months to reach a trade deal with its largest export market. 
By giving relatively little coverage to #Brexit, the @BBCNews gives an impression that it's going on more smoothly and is subject to fewer problems than is actually the case. It's a form of pro-#Brexit bias by neglect. 
Need full on hard Brexit victory tonight, proper shithousing 1-0 where it crosses the line in the 96th minute from a Joe Hart long ball and in off Mark Noble's right testicle. 
Latest @Telegraph cartoon#BlackFriday #Brexit #Juncker 
For all the sneering at Britain and Brexit, there’s Spain facing aconstitutional crisis, Irish govt collapsing, Germany rudderless without a functioning govt etc. Who’s next?  My bets on Italy....  
I'm sure Farage would agree what's sauce for the Leave goose is sauce for the Remain gander. Here's when he wanted another referendum:  
On the thorny question of Brexit...  
The body language in this is great. @theresa_may is the calm one and Merkel, well, she looks rather agitated.#Brexit  
“It's not just about #Brexit,” asserts @JolyonMaugham QC. “The reason we have spending limits is because we want to live in a democracy, not a plutocracy. We want all the people to have the power, not just the rich ones.” Share his guest article. Link:  
Young Labour party members & supporters need to understand that if there's a hard #Brexit, Britain will be forced to become something not far short of a tax haven economy, just to survive. It will be the end of all Labour stands for. That's why the Tory Right want it.#StopBrexit 
Dave Brown on Philip Hammond’s autumn budget  and Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Week in Westminster over. 40 peers & MPs met. Delighted to have spoken on 2020 Fisheries paper https://t.co/2CtaGIrXKj?amp=1  at Brexit Seminar with @OwenPaterson @johnredwood @michaelgove @BillCashMP @DavidJonesMP - Many thanks. 
US farmers could be using more than twice the antibiotic-per-animal than UK farmers, prompting people to fear for post-Brexit food safety  
The Irish stance against Brexit is a dangerous gamble says James Forsyth  
6 more suspects wanted after Polish man beaten. I bet the left would love to blame this on Brexit eh? Cant though  
Is that the same Tories that campaigned hard against Brexit, while you spent more on a Fife by-election than the referendum?You have clearly lost the plot.Don't you read what they write for you before you spout it?  
Insight into debate on Europe pre-referendum, which influenced how referendum played out  
Excellent on Brexit and Ireland by @alexmassie:  
British judge on European Court of Justice says ministers don't grasp difficulty of Brexit  
Voters across the UK are changing their minds about Brexit, says latest poll  
Herein lies a key Brexiter misunderstanding. For the EU27, and indeed much of the rest of the world, "It's against the law/rules" means just that. The idea that it will not in post-Brexit UK is something to worry about, not celebrate.  
Really insightful column on Brexit and Ireland by Prof Brigid Laffan. The border question is still not being given the attention it should by the hard brexiters in the UK govt and DUP - this explains a few things to them.  
The difficulties associated with #Brexit were greatly underestimated by Brexiteers, so don't blame Remainers for that. We have a weak government with divided views on #Brexit.  Also, #Brexit is an act of economic self-harm. Apart from that, all is Hunky Dory! 
This is the most measured piece I have read yet, on Brexit and Ireland  
EU backs Ireland on Brexit as government faces defeat  
Peter Lilley: Cheaper foreign labour has ruined UK Productivity - is Brexit exposing deeper economic truths now?  
Brexit Hurts: In the year following the referendum, almost 10,000 European health care professionals quit the N.H.S. (I go there less for work, but the pound’s #Brexit plunge makes London a cheaper destination. Photo: leaving National Gallery)  
Breaking news: European banks have cut  €350bn in UK-related assets since the Brexit vote  
As Theresa May said herself 18 years ago, "we want to be in Europe, not run by Europe".We're not leaving #Europe because of #Brexit; we're leaving the anti-democratic union.  
EU often blamed for failure to conclude trade deal with india. Fact is UK led by then home office minister May torpedoed EU progress because she wouldn't allow Indian immigrants. So no prospect of a UK #brexit trade deal with India. EU without UK might get a deal #brexitshambles 
The UK's former ambassador to the EU is certain: There will be no final trade deal before #Brexit  
God help any politician calling to my door if an election is called before the referendum because the gloves will be off & I will be spitting mad. It's not fair to dangle our human rights in front of us & then whip them away just like that. #Repealthe8th #StopPunishingTragedy 
Think Brexit negotiations are going badly?It’s about to get a whole lot worseBrits have been told for nearly two years now that they can have total control and total free tradeThey can’t & don’t know what they want 
Ugh. Lots of people on social media calling for the death penalty, because of Jon Venables etc. Just pray we never have a referendum on capital punishment. 
Good job we've a Parliamentary debate on Dec 11th for a 2nd Ref on Brexit despite DExEU trying to shut it down.#FinalSayIt's a way for everyone who's worried about (Hard) Brexit to register their concernNeed to get the word out.Can you help me please? 
What do we not want?A GENERAL ELECTION.When do we not want it?IN THE MOUTH OF CHRISTMAS WITH THE COMMITTEE ON THE 8TH STILL WORKING AND BREXIT TALKS AT A CRUCIAL STAGE, FOR FUCK'S SAKE. 
In a blow to the extreme EU nationalist here we have the EU Empire coming clear on the development of a #EUArmyWith the intention of easterly expansion & a militarisation of the EU it is becoming a very dangerous entity for European peaceThank God We Are Leaving#TGWAL #Brexit  
 #Christmas time is coming and we need to tell our #European friends how we feel about #Brexit  I've collected 1000 letters from YOU GUYS and i'm delivering them to #Brussels  Please support the project if you can 
Sufficient progress in #Brexit talks at December #EUCO is possible. But still a huge challenge.We need to see progress from UK within 10 days on all issues, including on Ireland. 
Whatever your previous party loyalty, would you be prepared to campaign, starting soon, for any decent and serious anti Brexit party, eg Lib Dems, Greens, SNP, Renew, given that this would be intended to unseat any incumbent representing a pro Brexit party at the next election? 
Theresa May on Northern Ireland vs Brexit:"We want to ensure that movement of trade and people across that border can continue as it does now"So... Free Movement of People with the EU, then? Why are we Brexitting again?  
This piece -- on the NHS and its dedicated European doctors and nurses, and the havoc Brexit is wreaking in British hospitals -- is extraordinarily smart, and also very sad. (Another reason to read it: it's by my super-talented colleague @kbennhold.) 
We have asked @fiannafailparty & @sinnfeinireland to postpone confidence motions to the New Year, to help our Brexit negotiating position.  
Ruth Davidson has made a real song and dance of her on-again-off-again Brexit position. But oddly, no-one in the media seems to have noticed.  
Sir Ivan Rogers lecturing on ‘Cameron & Brexit’ in Oxford at 5.30. It’s a blockbuster! Will be live tweeting  
Green Party Leader Eamon Ryan says country needs to get Brexit negotiations right and this cannot be done in the middle of an election.  
Great to meet EFTA Court President , Carl Baudenbacher, this week. Confirmed that EEA/EFTA membership wld square circle of sovereignty/control & unfettered single market access, and that UK has a clear path to membership after Brexit. Real common sense solution.  
Leaving the EU without a trade deal is now seen as the most likely outcome from the Brexit negotiations, according…  
There's a new slogan for Brexit  
Brexit u-turn as Downing Street admits Northern Ireland could stay in the customs union  
More than 1 million foreign people working in the UK plan to leave the country in 5 years. And who can blame them? A portrait series by Laura Pannack, commissioned by BJP & supported by Affinity for iPad explores themes of separation in the wake of Brexit:  
Where are we with 58 Brexit studies? Things are happening next week...  
The Referendum’s chapter is now closed. Meanwhile, seeds of greater conflicts are planted. - Baghdad's punitive measures go on- Kirkuk's stealth Arabization continue- Reconciliation remians illusive- ISIS is regroupingShort sighted politics will backfire. Begin Dialogue NOW 
You don't need a PHD in geopolitics to figure out that Brexit serves Putin's interests. Same goes for the election of a man-baby as the President of the United States and stirring up problems in Germany to undermine Merkel. #Brexit #Trump 
SCUMBAG!! Nigel Farage 'plays race fear card' with inaccurate story about Swedish joggers / #Farage #Toxic #Brexit  
The most sensible talk today has come from the Independent Alliance. Yes, Frances made a mistake, they say, but it is not sufficient to jeopardise the government during Brexit talks, as well as the work carried out by the abortion committee. 
Everton chairman Bill Kenwright to take over Brexit negotiations after showing it’s possible to spend £135m and exit Europe within three months. 
BFE: Join the grassroots voice of opposition to ALL form of Brexit, fight for our kid's place in Europe and speak out against xenophobia and lies. Join Britain for Europe and connect with a local group near you today!  #StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/zB4s5Gk5Pg 
#EUCultureBid Disappointing but unsurprised given the behaviour of Tory/DUP BREXITEERS Dragging us out of EU & thrown us off a cliff in 3rd Country Status This could be rescued.  By given Special Status to north within EU This is Tip of Brexit Iceberg Stand Up 4each other  
Redwood being two-faced is typical of the Brexit doublespeak; the faux public ‘respect’ for the people v. the private I-want-my-way politics. Good piece from @Bonn1eGreer in @TheNewEuropean 
Britain’s International Trade Secretary Liam Fox accuses British firms of not wanting to trade internationally, after he fails to secure a single trade deal delivering on his Brexit fantasy 
Public not sure what UKGOV Brexit policy is, expect 'no deal', don't want 'no deal', unhappy with handling of Brexit... new survey indicates the chaos of Brexit.  
BuzzFeed has uncovered a new network of suspected Twitter propaganda accounts—sharing messages about Brexit, Trump, and Merkel—that have close connections to the Russian-linked bot accounts identified in Twitter’s evidence to Congress.  
UKGOV seems to be in 'chaos' over Brexit says EU. Recent polls suggest the UK public agree.  
“Brexit has made me desillusioned and depressed and I’m happy I haven’t spent much time in my country recently.” - Damon #Popopop 
Why an east-west border is likely to be the answer to the #Brexit Irish problem. A long read. My latest.   
Good to see @michaelgove promising “no gap” in principle of #animalsentience after Brexit.Here's to greater animal welfare laws all round. 
This morning a spokesperson for Downing Street said the north of Ireland is up for negotiation in #Brexit talks, statement subsequently withdrawn. The Brits clearly want out. 
Liam Fox has racked up thousands of air miles without securing a single trade deal. UK businesses shouldn’t be held responsible for the fact that he can’t deliver on his Brexit fantasy - @ThomasBrake 
#brexit pitiful & petty of EU to block Britain from being European country of culture in 2023. Our punishment for daring to leave their club. Leave cant come soon enough 
If that’s an actual quote, then I agree. The Brexit Referendum has discombobulated our political elite across the spectrum.  
While we’re distracted by internal political shenanigans, this is happening in Europe. @lukeming will tell you all about the secret PESCO “invitation-only” meetings that exclude MEPs who refuse to sign away our neutrality.Thanks to #LisbonTreaty, we don’t even get a referendum!  
Thought #Brexit was going to kill UK biz? “UK ad investment to grow 4.8% in 2018....”  via @thedrum 
Michael Gove: "I want to make sure Brexit delivers not just for the British people, but for animals too". Everyone in this country has lost their marbles. 
David Davis refused to meet Brits in Europe 'countless times' to hear their Brexit concerns  
Brexit explained?  #Murdoch 
Audience member REMINDS Diane Abbott that Labour oversaw 2008 economic crash and it’s brilliant to watch  via @Your Brexit 
Two points:1. By and large Remainers pretty much denied this was on the EU’s agenda during the referendum.2. As the US turns it’s attention to the Pacific, it’s probably a good idea. Europe will need to start looking after itself.  
The problem with the dastardly Irish and Brexit is that the dastardly Irish are trying to hold the UK to its promises.   
No accountability for Brexit - the whole point of #A50Challenge If Parliament had made the Leave decision (as it must by law), it would own it and increasing evidence of the damage of any Brexit would lead to action - no decision = no accountability  … 
Theresa May is right to warn against Russia tearing apart our collective might. But what a crying shame that she’s then implementing a Brexit that will do precisely that. My latest  
Yet another consequence of Brexit nobody thought or cared of. And interesting that Hezza on right side again  
WAF: Norman Foster lashes out at the ‘madness of Brexit’  
An absolutely brilliant article by @IanDunt on the UK government's ridiculous and clueless "have our cake and eat it" approach to the Brexit negotiations.  
Before the 2016 referendum...On "feeling European" the Brits were ranked 28th out of 28On trusting the European Parliament the Brits were ranked 26th out of 28And yet "we" were surprised by #Brexit  
Unusual to see @BBCNews covering an EU press conference. If they had done so more in the past and people realised what the EU does for its citizens perhaps we wouldn’t be in this #Brexit mess. 
Brexit mustn’t mean an end to research collaboration with Europe: good piece by @EdWhiting1 on new @wellcometrust @royalsociety ‘Future Partnerships’ project ; 
#Brexit: So Leave lied throughout? They committed a criminal offence by overspending? The state broadcaster's political journalists were helping it? The Russians funded it? They had 1000's of bots working for it, it was an advisory ref & we are going ahead with it?  
Lord Adonis argues that Germany has been a model of stability since 1949 with only 8 chancellors while Britain has had 15 prime ministers in the same period.And he claims: "As we shoot ourselves in the foot with Brexit, I just wish we only had Germany's problems."  #StopBrexit 
Will be a tough match for the city tonight against the hammers. David Moyes is a Hard Brexit manager, his players will be in good condition after double training. Andy Carroll is a top walloper so I want Vardy to wallop him early doors. Up the city! 
I am getting increasingly frustrated with #Remain voters who now accept #Brexit as inevitable. Taking bad policy and pretending it can be made into good policy when all the evidence points the other way is wrong, weak and dangerous. Bad policy must always be called out. 
Ridiculous, the Eurozone is booming. It’s #Brexit Britain which is a disaster  
It's clear: Brits don't want a catastrophic & damaging 'no deal' outcome from Brexit talks. Pls RT so everybody knows that no deal is the worst deal of all:  
Perfectly expressed by the excellent @JolyonMaugham on the utter #Brexit shame of our inadequate MPs. Perhaps some of the Tories can be forgiven as they don't know better. But no forgiveness for those Labour MPs who do know better but fail miserably to act @Labour4EU @Mcr4EU 
In today's episode of 'Brexit Rotted my Fucking Brain' - classy contestant Jo points out that nobody likes multiculturalism. Not even people from different cultures who voluntarily travelled  here specifically to sample our culture. pic.twitter.com/3DqtvaO21J 
Dublin has intensified the pressure on Number 10 declaring Brexit will not progress until an agreement about the border is struck.  
Expect more of this post Brexit with probably a direct hit. No doubt Brexiters will dismiss this as yet more Project Fear scaremongering. 
.@michaelgove "I want to make sure Brexit delivers not just for the British people, but for animals too."  
UKIP collaborator and political ignoramous @KateHoeyMP holds up Swiss border as a shining example FOR #Brexit without realising Switzerland is part of Schengen, and accepts new EU laws and has freedom of movement and immigration.  Why is she there?  
I think @geekgirlpsych speaks for us all in this thread.Shame on any politician who allows this Gov to fall before we get our #Repealthe8th referendum. Shame on anyone who puts themselves before the needs of the women of Ireland.  
#brexit is making you poorer #brexitshambles Public opinion is being reshaped by the cost of Brexit  
Yes. When you see Brexit fantasists talk about how e-tags AI and blockchain will make WTO rules okay you know you've hit the end of a decadent empire. Wealthy leaders so detached from practical cause and effect that they think waffle is how the world works. That'll end badly.  
Busy week with #SFMPs in both London & Dublin covering a range of issues & engagements from #Brexit; to @OireachtasNews GFA Committee; to @dwaw_ni @addictionni; @PSCupdates; @CER_EU, @IrelandEmbGB … & everything else in-between! #TeamSinnFein #OnYourSide 
DUP's Nigel Dodds hits out at Ireland's stance on Brexit talks  
Not easy to translate, but I *think* he's saying we can reform immigration rules, Swiss-style, gain EU's consent, and therefore stay in the single market and a customs union fully equivalent to the one we're in now.Whisper it, but Labour might just be the party of soft Brexit  
This is so true: 'A statesmen tells the country the truth even if it's unpopular. A politician tells the country what's popular, even if it's untrue.'Where are the statesmen we so desperately need while the politicians are messing up #Brexit 
There could be a referendum tomorrow on free flights to Mars within the next fortnight. An overwhelming vote in favour of the proposal doesn't make it any more possible. 'The will of the people must be followed.' 'Yeah, but rockets.' 'Disgraced Liam Fox said it'd be easy.' 
Eurofanatic scumbag Alastair Campbell lashes out at Brexit legend Gisela Stuart. Imagine the uproar if a Brexiteer had been this vile to a Remainer. The media are complicit in not speaking up. Disgraceful.   
Nigel Dodds: 'The EU is acting like an adversary in the Brexit talks - and Theresa May must be prepared to walk away' - @brexitbroadcast 
Theresa May won't promise to pay the £17m to Manchester to cover costs related to the terrorist attack there. She's got the DUP and Brexit to spend billions on instead. 
Are you serious? Of course they didn't think it through. May is pretending an advisory referendum gives her absolute power, and will be very surprised indeed when the courts tell her she is in contempt of them. Again.  
Michael Gove goes to war with fake news as he warns social media 'corrupts and distorts' politics   via @telegraphnews. Time to declare the Referendum null and void by your own logic.#FBPE 
The Irish border problem is the ultimate barrier to hard Brexit | Simon Jenkins  
Either an interesting admission that staying in the Customs Union is the best way to avoid a hard Border in Ireland - or more evidence that the Govt. is utterly clueless on Brexit!  
We're delighted to announce that @Usherwood has been appointed Deputy Director of @UKandEU to help lead the way in producing high quality research on #Brexit. Discover more:  
Behind the scenes at Westminster: almost a year and a half after Brexit, surely *something* has been done to prevent an EU frontier in Ireland?Think again. Watch this stunning clip of British government neglect. 18 months on, & Irish citizens are still used as bargaining chips.  
In relation to the #Brexit Economic Impact Studies <please help Bob out here> 
Belatedly catching up with this article by @JolyonMaugham, a democratic hero. That the Electoral Commission has had to be forced by a court case to do its job is a shocking indictment. #Brexit  
#Brexit fan showing customary ignorance of the fact that it's the UK leaving the EU, not the other way around. A club doesn't make concessions when a member leaves. Where do they get these people? Bet she's also complaining about #capitalofculture2023. 
Ireland plays its cards shrewdly in #Brexit negotiations @InFactsOrg 
The vast majority of Brits don’t want ‘No deal’ in #Brexit negotiations - a new poll from @KantarPublic  
Irish government set to fall weeks before Brexit summit  
David Davis turned down "countless" requests from Brits in Europe to hear their concerns about Brexit  
UK will not be able to participate in the European Capitals of Culture Programme after #Brexit. How is this possible, if Bergen, Reykjavík or Istanbul were able to do so! So much for "no punishment!" #NewDealforBritain 
Hands off! UK Prime Minister @theresa_may Tusk frosty glare as smirking EU chief makes Brexit advance  
These Brexit zealots (& more) have destroyed your future and that of the next generation. They deserve the ire of a nation. #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
So, Michael Gove complains about distorted Brexit facts.It must be pantomime season.IT’S BEHIND YOU!!!  
How come the gov could call an election before Xmas but we're still waiting 34 years for a referendum? #Register4Repeal 
#brexit #EU This Brexit 'severed handshake' cartoon from 2016 is suddenly getting a lot of attention again on...  
DUP want parity on Brexit but not people’s rights’ .@conormurphysf  
Great to be back in the @Channel4News studio today. Plenty on the programme tonight #Zimbabwe #Brexit #YouTube & more 
By losing us EU doctors & nurses & giving Tories a further excuse to cut NHS, Brexit, far from benefiting our NHS as promised, is KILLING IT 
"We are closer than ever to making real and substantive change to the lives of women and anyone who can get pregnant in Ireland. We have waited long enough for a referendum to be called – it will not be possible for any new government to ignore this issue.” -ARC spokesperson tday 
Once more for the really, truly, *painfully* slow ones at the back:It is not the EU that "forces" us to take in asylum seekers & protect refugees, it is international law (based on minimum human decency) and Brexit will not change it.Get over it. 
Granite Brexit gold top milk, none of this semi skimmed nancyboy milk for Bob (I'm ex-forces). Can't beat it in a cup of Yorkshire Tea. Who knows what shit they are putting in the nancyboy semi skimmed milk pic.twitter.com/3hI7OV7aqJ 
Ha. This cartoon would be more accurate if the #EU’s arm was cut off to remove its grip from our throat. #Brexit is their loss, not ours. Bye bye.  
Wrong wrong. Cities from EU states, EU *candidate* states (hence Prague in 2000) and states within the EEA (hence Stavanger in 08) are eligible. If Brexit goes according to what for want of a better word we’ll call “plan” the UK will be none of these in 2023.Who’s a tool again?  
Sustain raises concerns on gap between UK & US food standards. Not the way to go in name of Brexit. US use higher on antibiotics, chlorine wash.   Beware politicians dealing us lousy food in name of 'free trade'.  Also see 3 Profs:  
Brexit u-turn as Downing Street admits Northern Ireland could stay in the customs union Tories promised to remove the UK from EU Customs Union and the Single Market.Another piece of Tory treachery.Tory promises are worthless@AMDWaters@ForBritainParty 
Even if we agree on a Brexit divorce bill, what would we be getting in return?  
And sorry guy from @dundee2023 on BBC Radio 2: I very much wish you guys could be European Capital of Culture. @AlynSmith made me aware of your predicament.But DCMS has led you a merry dance here, for their own political purposes. #Brexit 
I wonder how many #brexit fuqwits realisedThey would have to pay to saw their arm off.  
. @theresa_may briefed me on progress in #Brexit-negotiations. Hope we can move forward in December. #dkpol #eudk #euco 
Someone sent me this hilarious article in Frieze by someone called Paul Clinton which climaxes with the view that I am the voice of Brexit Britain! Yes, Brexit Britain! Must be my origins in a Polish refugee camp!  
Think things are bad now? Wait until we get onto phase two of Brexit talks  
Important Govt work goes on in Brussels today - thank u @MichelBarnier reaffirming EU solidarity with Ireland on #Brexit  
Grew up in Fife, living in England, works in IT.Give me the nod when you've decided to opt out of #Brexit and I'm on my way back. 
Remain teams including from #EUflagmafia last night flagbombed- UKIP London's Dick Braine- John Redwood's dinner party- BBC QT Colchester- Zac Goldsmith's office- Yeovil College CampusNot moving on, we are the people and the people won't stand for brexit #FBPE #StopBrexit 
Every time I read anything about Brexit.  
EU27 confirming that the document on EU27/UK citizens' rights post-Brexit was not updated in October due to lack of developments in the talks  
OK then, you're naive. Those who voted Leave own Brexit and should accept, not seek to shift, responsibility.  
“Look at all these non-EU countries that have been city of culture!”Yes, they’re in the EEA.“Non-EU countries can have frictionless border crossings!”Yes, they’re in the EEA.“Non-EU countries can get single market benefits!”Yes, they’re— Oh, what’s the point?#Brexit 
Another good meeting w/ @simoncoveney. I updated on #Brexit state of play. Strong solidarity with #Ireland: Irish issues are EU issues. 
Not for most of us. My children won't have the opportunities I had. I'll have to work longer and harder than most of your generation did. Easy to be positive when you're rich secure and can ensure a good future for your family. Our whole livelihoods are at risk thanks to brexit. 
He had to kill brexit. But first, he had to kill time.Professor Brian Cox isT I M E K I L L A  
For those of you who have problems with Periscope, note I also do many duplicate videos for @Scientists4EU YouTube channel. Do subscribe there.Here's the most recent one - an update on the 58 secret Brexit studies (*and* hidden Treasury report): 
Just a reminder that this was 17 days ago. 3 week deadline for publication of Brexit impact studies is next Tuesday.  
For the hard of thinking. This is open to EU or EFTA/EAA members. The Brextremists are stupidly pursuing a harmful WTO Brexit. That has consequences. This is the very least of them. #RemainersNow #FinalSay #Remain 
Okay Chris, fine...but are you shouting STOP BREXIT? I would suggest you do, and your anger might be tempered enough for you to encourage your colleagues to do the same. #Labour 
Flash protest against govt refusal to publish Brexit impact paper tonight - people meeting at the  Duke's Head in Putney at 6:30. 
Junker announces Brexit talks could move on to trade next month after substantial progress made, wonder what they've been offered behind taxpayers backs?? 
It's the ultimate barrier to Brexit period! That any responsible political party could risk NI peace over NOTHING, is beyond comprehension, but not beyond the selfish thinking of the Tory party. #StopBrexit  
Imagining xmas dinner chat:Mum - oh brexit is going to be fineMe - it's notMum - you would say thatMe - Literally spent some of this year working in a brexity government department - It's notDad - did you do that to win this argument?Me - A bit 
Well, well. Brexit does come with perks I guess....  
EU on the Brink: 'No Deal' Brexit Leaves Brussels With No Money for France, Germany  
Did you notice that it is not going well?We are not falling off the cliff just yet, for that only comes after Brexit takes effect.   But it seems that we are gathering enough evidence to know that this should be avoided at all costs. Not all is lost. #StopBrexit#FBPE 
Sorry to hear that. It's happening all over, just not being reported.Have seen comms from big corporates declining UK trade mission invites & very bluntly stating they're dropping #UK suppliers over #BrexitThis will get much much worse. 
Matt on #Brexit bargains ...  
Post-Brexit food safety fears - not only chlorinated chicken, excess antibiotic use too...  
Why am I giving @DanielJHannan a hard time?Because if you tell people (pre-referendum) that "Absolutely nobody is talking about threatening our place in the Single Market", and Brexit ends up ripping us out...You apologise, you fight Brexit, or you stay quiet.He's done neither  
The EU has no rules against nationalisation. As for benefiting big business, a hard #Brexit will mean a trade deal in which the US opens up the #NHS to private business, and Britain will be grovelling to international capitalists to invest here. 
.@michaelgove right to complain of social media that was absolute opposite of truth: Brexit = higher animal welfare  
If the @LegatumInst is so 'superb' why isn't it transparent about its funding (like so many obscurely funded pro Brexit think tanks)And why is it's senior fellow, Matthew Elliott, under investigation for his @Vote_Leave campaign finance? Answers on a postcard please 
The Irish border problem is the ultimate barrier to hard Brexit | Simon Jenkins  
Hands off!No, BOTH hands on your purse Theresa!Prime Minister appeared to grimace at advances of smirking European chieftain as the two exchanged pleasantries at EU's eastern partnership summit in Brussels.#Brexit #EU 
MUST-READ: Some hard Brexiters may regard Singapore as a model for a post-Brexit British future, but there are few in Singapore who would be quite so optimistic about going it alone. Pls RT:  
He hasn't needed to make any concessions. Contrary to Vote Leave's assertions during the referendum, EU27 is in a far stronger position.  
There are people with nowhere to sleep.There are people afraid for their safety.There are people on hospital trolleys.There are people with water in their living rooms.There are people running business in a panic about Brexit.FG/FF. Sort it out FFS. Do not knock on my door. 
Eeek. “Where was the European Parliament during the #Brexit vote?” an audience member asks at #EESCmedia17How the hell do we even start to answer that? 
Very irresponsible journalism from Brexit press, promoting articles that totally mislead the public (as the journalists should know) -  
@BBCNews , @BBCPolitics , @bbclaurak  and @bbcnickrobinson are the pits for interviews and analysis, expecially on Brexit.This is what @Channel4News can do: quality. 
We've waited long enough. We are more tone policed than you are. We don't like being put in this position. But we don't also don't want the JOC and a referendum being made into political pawns 
People so upset over City Of Culture bids. Gonna be furious when they discover the rest of Brexit  
Main economic benefit of Brexit is ability to cut red tape. Only 15% UK economy EU trade, so relief for 85% economy  
We are clear on our red lines in #Brexit negotiations. The Irish border question is one of the @EPPGroup's top priorities. We stand by our @FineGael colleagues and by Taoiseach @campaignforleo ! 
In case you missed it: The Donkey Sanctuary is calling on the Government to urgently clarify its position on how it will help protect animal welfare post-Brexit. Action must be taken to ensure that leaving the EU is not a backwards step for animal welfare:  
Wish you would just come clean @Keir_Starmer and admit that Brexit and leaving the EU is pure self-harm. Canceling Brexit will put @UKLabour in government. 
Ireland fought for independence yet now wants to give it up to Brussels, writes @patrickxwest.  #Brexit  
Leaked Irish paper reveals EU politicians' scathing views on Brexit progress - Ireland are our closest friends saying this.  We need real urgency and competence to ensure as a good a deal as possible.  Not all this goofing around   
The shocking truth of cancer waiting times in Scotland.One patient had to wait nearly a year for treatment to begin.Never mind though, the SNP are working hard on another independence referendum.  
A leaked report says that internal chaos in Theresa May’s Government is seriously undermining the Brexit negotiations. Britian now held in very low esteem across Europe following alarm at Tory chaos and incompetence of David Davis & Boris Johnson! #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Another glorious #brexit Matt cartoon.  
Some of us have been arguing for a while that Ireland (the entire island) is not a side issue on Brexit but *the* issue. This weekend will be fascinating, north and south 
Oops.... Brexit talks almost turn physical as EU guards try to stop PM’s aide Tricky following her on red carpet   
How these stories unravel, eh?How’s your faux outrage @JohnGlenUK in light of this?#Brexit  
New evidence emerges of Kremlin meddling in Brexit referendum as Theresa May says 'hostile' Russia trying to tear Europe apart 
Brexit problems that would be instantly solved by staying in the Single Market:1) Northern Ireland2) Gibraltar3) Capital of Culture4) Passporting rights5) NHS staffing crisis6) UK-EU trade dealReasons we aren’t staying:1) Xenophobia 
This week the EU categorically shot the "Have Cake and Eat It" unicorn dead.Brexit means Brexit.For everything.#StopBrexit 
Not coming round to Brexit. Not making my peace with it. Every day I grow to loathe it more. My lip curls and my heart grows colder with every Brexiter bark of jingoism and hollow, self-serving argument. The stunning lack of humility - the swagger! - as this catastrophe unfolds. 
There's a new slogan for Brexit  
Actually Ms Cherry claimed no such thing, she did say that you were talking up the problems in Germany to try to eclipse Brexit, but why bother being accurate, you only stake your whole reputation on it afterall. @joannaccherry 
Your sarcasm doesn't really get you anywhere. Brexit is proving itself to be a catastrophe for the UK. Opposing it is now a national duty. 
Brexit is not only bad for business, it also turns out to be the world's most expensive public education programme. This week's lesson: "Mhm, what is a European Capital of Culture?"These are the page view stats for the related Wikipedia page.  
3. Can’t say I blame the alleged unlawful referendum spending breach conspiracist & @BrexitCentral wonk @darrengrimes_  for scuttling into the dark. 
Can't remember a cartoon that better nails Brexit  
Better to just #Remain and keep all the benefits, work to change the bad and stop wasting money on the damaging #Brexit that could be better spent on the NHS Education or Public Services #StopBrexit 
2016 ‘Brexit means Brexit’ 2017 ‘Brexit means Brexit’  
Not going to stop arguing about Brexit... 
One of the best ever cartoons depicting the monumental act of self harm that is #Brexit.Hats off to @CH_Cartoon for this. 
I know buses help so here you are.Time to apologise for the disaster that is Brexit.True patriots want to #StopBrexit because it is blatantly bad for Britain. 
As the UK parliament debates the detail of the Brexit Bill, let’s remember the bigger picture too. Back in February I wrote for @TheNewEuropean on this topic and it’s just as relevant today. I’ll be a strong pro-European voice on Labour’s NEC #eddiefornec 
The Tories had a deal with Rupert Murdoch for the 2010 election. His papers would support Cameron if he appointed Andy Coulson as Murdoch's voice in the government... and let Rebekah Brooks have free rein. What did Murdoch influence? Was Brexit his? #MurdochOut #DontBuyTheSun 
There's nothing that fills me with sheer fenian delight quite like watching England fall apart with each new Brexit update 
Embarrassing that government trails so far behind the EU in their realisation... Wonder when they'll wake up to Brexit being a bad idea too...?  @BrexitBin @J_amesp @helenyg @kmqkatie @AcademyOfRock @voiceseurope @JoRichardsKent @Hayleeee1848 @JeanneBartram 
The EU is now now showing far more concern for peace in Ireland than a UK dominated by a populist English nationalism whipped up by a cynical elite clique willing to cause any amount of damage to win a hard #Brexit tax haven.#StopBrexit 
Irish Government On Verge Of Collapse, Could Impact Brexit  
Let's Leave. But continue to blame the EU for all the results of our leaving. What exactly did Leavers vote for anyway. Brexit means Brexit didn't mean anything at all did it. 
Where Brexit Hurts: The Nurses and Doctors Leaving London  
Another snowflake that thinks the EU should change it's rules especially for the UK....You just can't get more entitled than that. #brexit reality.  
If only UKGov was as concerned about Scotland and Northern Ireland: "Brexit deal 'must work for Gibraltar', says Downing Street" 
More please...if you support #Remain there's no way you can vote for parties supporting #Brexit..make your vote count to #StopBrexit & #Remain 
So @JohnGlenUK - you voted for Article 50.Had you read Decision 445/2014/EU on Capitals of Culture *before* you voted to trigger it?If you had you can’t be surprised UK is excluded. If you had not you’re negligent and a hypocrite.Which is it?#Brexit  
Labour must put national interest first and oppose Brexit.  
"Where Brexit Hurts" a play in two acts. In a surprise third act later today, Jeremy Hunt will accuse himself of scaremongering.  
UK’s Minister for Culture.Hasn’t read the law on Capitals of Culture. Did not advocate UK should stay in Capitals of Culture system post-Brexit.And then tweets this.Wants to have  and eat .#Brexit  
Brexit means Brexit.The harm you seek to inflict on others is bad enough.Whining about the harm you inflict on yourself ... 
Alex's RT show is brilliant. LGBT rights, Dyslexia Education, BabyBoxes - ScotlandGood.  It's a brilliant advert for Scotland to the world. . Alistair Campbell is brilliant on Brexit shambles 
My column has arrived, brought my valets on a velvet cushion, about your Brexit and Gibraltar  
EU citizens who are settled in the UK and have been paying tax, were appalled to find they could not vote on their own future in the referendum.  Where was democracy?#EU should not accept this. @guyverhofstadt @MichelBarnier @NewEuropeans#ThinkAgain#FBPE 
Pettiness?Two weeks ago we were arguing that the Brexit cut-off should be midnight UK-Time, not European-Time. 
It’s getting to the point that a lot of Leavers are starting to hate Brexit too. The problem is not just the idea, it’s the fact it’s being implemented by a sub-standard clown troupe.  
I think you might be mixing up a previous tweet of mine with last night’s show. Watch again and send me a quote where I said on air the German political crisis worse than the UK’s Brexit issues? If you can’t, I’m sure as a QC you’ll amend your tweet ...  
I suggested that we should give Mr Redwood chance to deny claim he advised his readers to move investments from Brexit Britain. This appears to be his only answer. He and we deserve better. It's a serious claim and it needs a direct explanation from a public figure.  
'Brexit is going to be a godsend for anyone who wants to be cut off from the world'  
I’ll believe that Corbyn has ‘seen the light’ and stopped abetting the Brexit assault on Britain when I hear him say, loudly & explicitly, ‘Labour is fully against Brexit and will stop it.’  
Instead of "warning of 'hostile' Russia threat to EU security" she should withdraw Article 50 until we know the impact of Russian interference in the pro #brexit campaign.RT if you agree.  
Gove persuades PM to let Britain break free from EU regulations after Brexit  
UK airlines risk losing flying rights, says leaked Brexit paper #sunlituplands 
For the future of social mobility,  innovative thinking, personal happiness, this is probably the most important issue of the day.  It will matter long after Brexit is an arid History GCSE optional question.  
Don't fall for it, James. This only happened because it could no longer be avoided.There's no evidence whatsoever that it means a change of heart.The same thing has happened before. It's not designed to stop Brexit. It's just designed to stop Remainers leaving the party.  
Polls show many people are blaming the government for mishandling #Brexit, while failing to understand than no-one can make a good job of implementing lies & delusions. A bit like Hitler blaming his generals for failing to achieve the impossible.#StopBrexit 
China ties important to Britain especially after Brexit: Britain's Economic Secretary to the Treasury  
What a surprise. Our Government merely had to ­suggest we might increase the Brexit payment to £38billion to get a free trade deal — and the EU already wants more.  
Do not believe this article.At best, it's wishful thinking.At worst,  it's another cynical lie intended yet again to paint Labour as a pro-EU party so that Remainers don't jump ship.Remember: Nothing has changed in Labour's hard Brexit stance.Nothing.  
Brutal. Absolutely brutal. On how deliberate lies, xenophobia, economic stupidity and sheer nastiness are destroying our greatest institution. I am so ashamed.Brexit, eh?(). 
Gove on #R4Today complains of inaccuracy on social media and, with his next breath, repeats the lie that Brexit will "allow" the UK to have stricter environmental or animal welfare rules. As if minimum EU standards somehow prevented the UK from adopting even higher national ones. 
From @nytimes | Where Brexit Hurts: The Nurses and Doctors Leaving London  
Jacob Rees-Mogg lashes 'gloomy' anti-Brexit forecast amid 'very strong' British economy   
After Brexit, Britain will still have European cities. Can someone tell the EU? My blog on its rather mean decision to exclude UK from "European Capitals of Culture" 2023.  
Gove does not understand EU. EU never stopped UK having higher standards in UK. But our higher standards can’t apply to other EU countries without EU law changes. Brexit won’t change that - except we can’t now promote higher standards across EU - bad news for animals @BBCr4today 
Well done @JustinOnWeb - think you might have extracted promise from @michaelgove that “there will be no gap” in principle of #animalsentience after #Brexit - that means he needs to get new Bill thro’ parliament before March 2019 - look forward to seeing it any day soon! #R4Today 
So jobs moving from Brussels to London will journos splash this on front page of BBC etc? Doubt it they would rather promote medical agency and city of culture stories as they fit their negative #Brexit hysteria better  
This week in Brexit Britain:》The size of our economy officially dropped to 6th place in the world》We were thrown out of the EU's City of Culture project》We rejected the sentience of animals》We lost our place on the bench of the International Court of Justice#StopBrexit 
Gove on @BBCr4today wants Parliament to be 'an effective & vigorous institution'. From a govt which used loads of taxpayer dosh to fight tooth & nail up to Sup Court to deny Parl control over Art 50 & is now resisting change to Brexit Bill 
All you had to do was give us a vote on Maastricht. Or the EU Constitution. Or the Lisbon Treaty...Every single time you failed. And then the Establishment chortled, and sneered. And the end is: Brexit.  
Listen to Michael Gove wriggling on BBCR4 Today Programme over animal welfare on Brexit. 0811-0820. Why won’t he simply carry over EU food, health & animal welfare standards? “Judge us by our actions” he says. Hmmmm 
"Austerity lost us a decade, and Brexit looks set to make it two, but do not worry: the Chancellor is rearranging the deckchairs."  
How grown ups conduct negotiations. End #Brexit!  
In today’s Ministers Not Understanding Brexit (episode 6873). 
Ministers ‘don’t grasp difficulty of Brexit’ 
Anyone who thinks Murdoch-backed Brexit was not about rich removing worker rights and anything that hinders profit is living in fantasy land 
Don't be fooled by the distortions & obfuscations of Arlene Foster on @BBCr4today. This article tells the truth & in particular tackles the spurious argument about needing to move on to 2nd phase of negotiations to solve NI border issue #brexit  
Not coming round to Brexit. Not making my peace with it. Every day I grow to loathe it more. My lip curls and my heart grows colder with every Brexiter bark of jingoism and hollow, self-serving argument. The stunning lack of humility - the swagger! - as this catastrophe unfolds. 
I know we're all chuckling about the European Capital of Culture debacle, but there's a serious point here.It shows that the assurances given by the @Conservatives to organisations over Brexit mean precisely jack. Toyota/Nissan will be watching. 
Ouch!!  Letter of the day riposte to Angry of East Sussex - all the way from Nicaragua!   #Brexit  
Theresa May: We must be vigilant against those pesky Russians interfering in our democratic process to undermine both the EU and our collective unity.Also Theresa May: Brexit is the will of the people and must happen no matter what.She's hopeless. Utterly fucking hopeless. pic.twitter.com/5g2nFBgf19 
UK airlines risk losing flying rights, says leaked Brexit paper  
The United Kingdom:   310 years in existence (Act of Union, 1707)  46 years in the EU by the time we leave, 2019#Brexit in perspective. 
Agreed, but what’s your plan for #Brexit Jeremy?  
"THE EUROPEAN DEFENCE AGENCY" - What anti-#Brexit Nick Clegg Will Never Tell You. Our shocking report from yesterday's EU defence conference:  
Brexit rules UK out of cultural boost. Let’s have our own UK City of Culture competition? National Pride!  
PATHETIC: Stroppy Brexiters want a hard no deal Brexit but still want to enjoy all the benefits of the EU. Yes, you knew what you were voting for. Pah!#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
#Brexit sentience vote procedurally inevitable #ToryFAIL to manage msg resulted in MASS public engagement for ANIMALS #FridayFeeling GOOD  
."EU Brexit negotiators taking tough stance on aviation - would dramatically restrict UK airline operating rights unless Britain follows [EU's] laws & courts". via @FT 
Not a huge fan of @bbcthisweek but it was more funny than usual last night as @afneil & Michael Portillo desperately tried to talk up political problems in Germany to eclipse the total #Brexit chaos here. Fortunately @Andrew_Adonis provided a reality check 
Brexit is amputating a broken limb because you don't have the skills to save it.#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
Theresa May is expected to increase the UK's suggested Brexit divorce bill in a meeting with Donald Tusk today - but on one condition. #BlackFridayDeals 
“The slow-motion self-immolation that is Brexit continues for the U.K....”  
Are there any academics out there carrying out research to compare the level of deceit on Remain and Leave sides during the EU referendum? I’m sick of being put on a par with a Kremlin bot 
We need your help! Every person who is outraged by Brexit must help us get back control by pledging. Parliament gave PM permission to notify there’s bn no decision to leave EU. #A50Challenge Too much is at stake  
MATT finds a #BlackFriday bargain Brexit offer   
I wish the BBC and C4 had a nice public index of all the Brexit debates from the last two years - so that for every event happening now we could have a nice clip of a Brexiter denying that it would be an issue.Planes... Gibraltar... Northern Ireland... Customs... Erasmus... 
Brexit is the result of those who think the years of damage done to them by the UK government is the fault of the EU (majority) and nationalistic, racist, lying little Englanders (minority). The first have been fooled, the second are just nasty enemies of the people. 
Guys, I don't want to depress you but this thread by @SimonFRCox about Brexit is terrifying. Enjoy your Friday.   
The way referendum backfired, Abadi's oversteps will backfire too. Such acts will serve the KRG in the longer run.  
It's the "having your cake and eat it" #Brexit delusion again. That's the infantile mentality of the people Michel Barnier and his team are dealing with.  
How could they not know it meant that? It really does feel like we’re being led by children. “I want my Brexit!”“If you have your Brexit you can’t have your culture prize”[Stamps feet]”I want both!” [falls to the floor and refuses to get up] 
Just saw the @GuardianAus #BirdOfTheYear poll has clocked over 50,000 votes. And still the Ibis is streets ahead with 30% of the vote. Is this Australia's Brexit moment? Is it our Trump moment? Is it just our Ibis McIbisFace moment? 
From @IainDale: Don’t believe claims of fewer EU nationals and doctors since the Brexit vote  
EU to Unveil Priority Energy Projects to Improve Grid, Prepare for Brexit  Today at 1230 CET here  #CleanEnergyEU 
The contrast couldn’t be more striking, a ‘booming’ eurozone and the biggest fall in living standards for a generation in #Brexit Britain. Time to end this madness.  
They're trying to de-legitimise last year's election result.  Likewise, over here in the UK, their Soros-sponsored brethren are trying to de-legitimise last year's Brexit referendum result by alleging Russian interference.  They must not be allowed to succeed. 
Coming atcha from MPs for the next five years: "What? I never knew Brexit meant that!"  
May doubles Brexit divorce offer on the day Harry Windsor announces an engagement? Discussing on @GMB #omen 
Theresa May is likely to offer politically painful compromises to advance Brexit negotiations, writes @laurnorman 
"Your" team (?) at DCMS have already issued this statement....in December of last year - bit late with the faux shock tbh. 
You can’t poll the public on what they want from Brexit when they’ve been wilfully misinformed by both press & government  
If Brexit is such a very good idea, why was it able to scrape a small majority only by recruiting a hugely disproportionate fraction of utter dimwits? 
Britain will be stronger without the EU after Brexit....      
Ok - time to put myself out there on this one. I hear that "we" are finally planning another march. This is good. The country is in meltdown & has serious interference from people who are unelected. We are pursuing the policy of a referendum with an unreliable result.  1/n 
The Attorney General is seeking public input in the upcoming PR referendum. Add your voice to this important convo about the future of our democracy #bcpoli 
And why did they do that? Because they didn't expect Brexit to affect them personally. "Pre-referendum surveys generally suggested that the majority of households did not think that a leave vote would have a negative impact on their personal finances." 
Whilst Labour still say Brexit must happen, we aren't allowed a #FinalSay to change our minds & #StopBrexit & we can't be in the SM or CU then no...it hasn't.. 
"We've seen a middle order #brexit" - Mick Molloy #ashes #TripleMRocksTheAshes 
The OBR is every bit as ridiculous as Brexit Economics. Just look at this chart.  
Oh jolly good Brexit is toast  
.Brexit voting city bids for European Capital of Culture. In other news, Newcastle’s bid to be Mediterranean Resort of the Year also looks to be in trouble 
UK consumer confidence slumps to post-Brexit vote low: YouGov/Cebr  
The Brexit extremists just won't stop lying, even when the facts and all the evidence that Brexit is hurting Britain is proving them wrong. Their Brexit fantasy is going to be the peoples nightmare unless we #StopBrexit 
One of the things that used to twist my melon working in bookshops was the amount of middle-aged Brexit-type Partridge-esque men that were obsessed with Wilbur Smith books about like the Pharoahs. 
This was my response to a similar question on Facebook."Brexit is going to happen. Why won't you (Remainers) just get behind it...."  
Wow. Voted Leave on basis of immigration then Jo? What did you think was going to happen when May & Co went to places like India & Philippines immediately after Referendum?!  
Let's go back to voting Labour & getting a Tory Gov just about all the time. Let's have austerity forever, Brexit to look forward too, spending 310 billion on Trident, letting another country decide our future. Honestly is there a thicker country anywhere else in the world? 
Hey fellow BC people, the government put out a survey on the upcoming voting system referendum. You should fill it out Let's finally get rid of FPTP because it sucks 
TRUE FACE of the #EU! #Irish #MEP @LukeMing dragged away by #police & refused access to #EuropeanDefenceAgency annual conference where #PESCO, the EU's plan for greater military integration was being discussed!  #Conservatives #BBC #SKY #UK #LABOUR #BREXIT 
Irish government on verge of collapse ahead of EU Brexit summit  
It's puzzling that people still vote Labour and Tory, the two anti-EU parties, but to take a phrase from Game of Thrones, Brexit is coming. 
Public opinion is being reshaped to Remain by the cost of Brexit via @FT 
At a popular level #Brexit is largely about emotions and patriotic loyalty to the nation. So when addressing hardened Leavers never lose an opportunity to denounce Brexit as treachery, betrayal, treason and disloyalty to our country.#StopBrexit 
What a ridiculous article. The fact is that the EU is disgracefully using Northern Ireland as a political football in Brexit talks. Like with “citizens rights” this is  window dressing. All the EU cares about is securing our money.   
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Hilary Benn (@hilarybennmp), please take off the #Brexit blinkers and grasp that we don't have to burn the building down in the first place. Do your duty as an MP, work for the well-being of Britain, fight to #StopBrexit! 
Watch: Big pharma to review plans as the EU's drug administration prepares to leave its UK headquarters following #Brexit. Via: @ReutersTV 
Switzerland is part of Schengen. It also accepts new EU laws. Doesn’t sound like current #Brexit proposals (such as they are) 
brexit didn't create this economic situation. three decades of neoliberalism, the financial crisis and almost a decade of austerity did 
Any Brexit deal “must work for Gibraltar”, Downing Street has said: Sadly #Brexit has removed Britain's power to ensure Gibraltar's status without Britain itself suffering adverse consequences.#StopBrexit 
5th Brexit loss this week: Dundee & Leeds kicked out of Euro Capitals Of Culture’23 plan after investing millions; and as shocked as cities with EU grant flags finding out EU grants stop! Voters didn’t fully understand all this #ExitFromBrexit #StopBrexit 
but we are a divided nation. More divided that at any time in my lifetime (and I'm 81). Simply because Cameron called a referendum in the hope of silencing his hard right backbenchers 
Calling a General Election in the middle of Brexit negotiations is like tidying your room instead of studying for the Leaving Cert. #GE17 
The EU seeks all the attributes of Statehood. Treaty by treaty it is tightening its grip on the member states as it takes over supreme control of more & more aspects.The slow motion coup d’etat continues!#Brexit  
Any politician thinking that a general election is a licence to kick the can on a referendum to #repealthe8th will get a kick up the arse. 
Having a Taoiseach in the middle of - or heading for - an election at a key EU summit is bad enough . But the whole pol and admin system would go  into a kind of do-nothing autopilot for a few months at crunch time in Brexit talks .... awful 
Your “team at DCMS” should have stopped the cities from spending millions on futile bids in the first place. There was never any chance of  a UK city being allowed to win after Brexit 
."Brexit - an existential question for UK & one that changes the nature of the constitutional debate on this island too." 
Brexit, the ultimate realising you have made a mistake but are too proud to admit it and will go through it despite great personal costs to you and others moment. 
'Racist' word thrown about so loosely by many it is sad & takes away the real disgust people should have for true racists ..You voted Brexit - Racist !You hate Hillary Clinton - Racist !" There's bombs going off in Sweden " - Racist !You don't like Diane Abbott - Racist ! 
GDP growth in last quarter remains unrevised at 0.4%. Despite claims of doom and gloom during referendum, economy remains strong  
Another bizarre thing about this Brexit lunacy. Senior Unionist politicians who couldn’t find the Republic of Ireland on a map of the Republic of Ireland are suddenly experts on internal Irish politics.  
The Irish government if it collapses at its moment of greatest strength in the Brexit border negotiations #GE17 
This week alone I’ve had 14 different canvassers, all eager & enthusiastic for change knocking at doors alongside me. My team are ready for an election, but my team recognise that there are issues occurring in our State that must take priority. #8Committee #Housing #Brexit  
What a clusterfuck of delusion,  & ineptitude Brexit is, a little Englander fantasy unraveling at pace  
Peter Lilley makes the fundamental mistake of interpreting Varadkar's Brexit line as being about elections. He demonstrates a basic failure to understand the depth of feeling across Ireland against any return of a physical, visible border. @bbctheview 
@MazzucatoM was brilliant on #channel4news tonight and the camera man/woman couldn't keep off her face when Lilico was talking about Brexit. 
First step to improving animal welfare after Brexit is banning export of live animals. Such a ban is not allowed under EU law  
#bbcqt questionAbbott: "all MPs should listen to their local voters"Audience: "what about Labour MPs in seats that voted for Brexit?" 
Some rabid right-wing nut on Channel 4 News said 'productivity is low because people are too busy tweeting about Brexit' to work. Simple solution, stop Brexit so we all get on with making widgets. #bbcqt 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
I just want a stable economy and some bodily autonomy, could we hold off #GE17 until we get that? #brexit #repeal 
Irish government on verge of collapse ahead of EU Brexit summit  
#BBCQT UK has gone from top to bottom of the G7 growth league & bottom of the EU28 growth league too since the Brexit vote but it has absolutely nothing to do with Brexit. It's just a complete coincidence. #Sarcasm] 
2/ Yup @andrew_lilico, that's why UK productivity is so poor, because of too many people spending 'all their time on twitter debating about Brexit instead of actually doing any work...'#channel4news @IanDunt @StevePeers @SamuelMarcLowe 
...will have to work for longer, to get a pension that isn’t worth as much, our wages haven’t risen in real terms in a decade, and thanks to Brexit, brought about by drawbridge pensioners, they probably won’t rise for some time yet.  No generation will ever have it as good as... 
BBC News - Brexit 'bombshell' for UK's European Capital of Culture 2023 plans  
No End in Sight to the Brexit Madness  
An unnecessary general election as #Brexit looms.The UK's big mistake.Say what you like about Irish politicians, they'd never do anything as daft.Oh wait. 
Why is no one at the BBC going ... "er ... perhaps all this Brexit stuff is killing the country" ... at exactly what point in the carnage will they stop trying to spin #Brexit as a superb thing and realise its the biggest mistake ever. Not sure they'll ever be forgiven for this.  
The Swiss overruled a 2014 referendum limiting immigration. That’s why their EU borders work. Either you know this and are dishonest, or you don’t and are ignorant. 
So stuff that will get thrown off by a #GE17:- The #8Committee - The #Brexit negotiations and EU summit in Dec- The Finance Bill to give effect to pay rises and the budgetAnd any emergency measures that need to be brought in to deal with Homelessness or the Health crisis 
For growth, living standards and our prosperity, @jeremycorbyn should lead Labour to Stop Brexit.The vast majority in our Party are Pro-EU,  please help to support and please RT  
To all these Brexiters wailing about the EU punishing Britain about the European City of Culture. Let's just say:You won! You got what you wanted! So suck it up and get over it!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Gob-smacking if this is how the diplomatic process of Brexit is being handled.  
EU’s NIGHTMARE: Shock report says bloc is facing post-Brexit budget CRISIS  
The headline says it all. #Brexit is economic, political and social madness.  
Where #Brexit Hurts: The Nurses and Doctors Leaving   
We lost the referendum in 2014 because the MSM spread the lies of the British establishment & pple bought into it. Now these lies have been shown to be exactly that. Why the feck is  the YES side not miles ahead in the polls? The future of a Brexit Tory UK is very bleak indeed. 
Dear Remoaners, Here's a handy #Brexit guide to cut-out & keep.Optimistic economic news = #DespiteBrexitDownbeat economic news = #BlameBrexit 
Finally, Jeremy Corbyn appears to be shifting on Brexit. And now he must go further. He must announce that a future Labour Government would immediately legislate for a second EU referendum. If he does this, it's a game changer.#Brexit 
It is official and even the Government now acknowledges that we are no longer fifth largest economy in the world. The french have gained that crown and India will soon push in to seventh place. Brexit is bad for Britain. IT's time to exit from Brexit. #StopBrexit 
I am still so bloody angry that Brexit is destroying the UK. How dare Cameron play Russian roulette with my kids future. What an absolute shit he was and is. Anger is not constructive but also not avoidable. 
Matt on Brexit and Black Friday – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
I encourage all British Columbians to get involved in the engagement process to help determine the question of next year's #electoralreform referendum.  #HowWeVote 
So, perhaps there is a Utilitarian Liberal case for cancelling, or at least softening Brexit. It would reduce unhappiness and suffering, and increase happiness and welfare. Next week, Rousseau on minimum alcohol pricing (that was a joke) 15/15 
Brexiters love feeling betrayed. Therefore in Millian terms, the best way to increase their happiness is to overrule Brexit 
EU’s reward to Britain for Brexit concessions may prove meager -- Brussels Beat  
#brexitcast klaxon! This week’s edition - special guest @tconnellyRTE - with me, @BBCkatyaadler @ChrisMasonBBC and @adamfleming #brexit #budget2017 and #ireland ... gory details galore 
Any politician with any guts would say: “Brexit is a huge mistake. I cannot impoverish my children and grandchildren. We must think again.” 
Reminder of this Tory poster from 1992 warning that leaving EU would cost 2.5 million jobs. #Brexit #brexitshambles 
Hammond failed to fully embrace the opportunities of Brexit says economist Gerald Lyons  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Brexit at the sharp end: great (& depressing) @nytimes piece on impact on @KingsCollegeNHS  
#bcpoli NDP stacks expert panel on electoral reform referendum: 3 advocates for proportional representation, 1 for status quo. 
Here’s why the EU can take their ‘European Capital Of Culture’ and shove it right up their arse  via @Your Brexit 
A bit of J.S. Mill-type thought on Brexit. Judging by the responses to this tweet, it seems that Brexit-Ultras - those most extreme, Brexit at any cost to the UK, and even themselves - will remain angry and unhappy whatever happens. 1/  
With this tanking Brexit economy 'We're all Remainiteers now!' Surely?  
"Irrelevant Brexit Britain" a phrase we are going to see and hear a lot more of once we leave the EU. Britain once a leading light in the world will diminish and fade away. It is time to #StopBrexit 
Watch now as some journos in the UK conclude that @campaignforleo current difficulties are because of his stance on Brexit... 
Brexit is not the disaster here Ali, YOU are. You fuc*ked this country up with your Blair pal because you GOT IT SO WRONG. People died. Remember? Your lot trashed our economy too, and blamed it on someone else. Cowardly. YOU are NOT qualified to tell us anything. Shoo. Go away. 
The UK economy would have grown “significantly faster” if it wasn’t for Brexit, George Osborne’s chief of staff tells LBC  
Hold tough, shitty government!  Hold fucking tough until the referendum, you owe us that much! 
‘Brexit means Brexit’ John 
Why do you keep saying Germany just ahead of the UK. They have lower inflation, higher productivity, wage growth and a massive trade surplus with lower Debt. I think you are perhaps, Brexit delusional.  
So while lives of @The3Million and @BritishInEurope are still in limbo, Good Friday Agreement is under threat and economy is tanking, UK govt begins “urgent discussions” on this, the logical consequence of “Brexit means Brexit”....  
*Brexit Explained*  
"Stop the bias over Brexit reporting" - @FarmersWeekly accused of peddling 'fake news' on Brexit. A reader writes - and our response.  
Britain's economy is forecast to be £42 billion smaller in 2022 than was estimated in March  
yes. exactly that. yes. when people voted on something as important as the EU referendum, they should have done it on facts, and not just what tabloid newspapers and Farage said would happen. this is the desperately sad thing about this whole mess, and this .. is just the start. 
Will #Brexit force us to realise  Britain’s problem aren’t the fault of foreigners but come  from our own failure to free ourselves from Medieval subjecthood, and fight for democracy? @AdamRamsay  
I heard a new word today to describe the economic & political mess created by Brexit which means another 5 years of austerity! Brexsterity  
And May has a deal with Murdoch today. He will support Britain's Brexit suicide as long as she delivers his Sky bid go-ahead.We take the consequences - but hey, what do we matter?  
EU blocks UK cities from European Capital of Culture bids after Brexit EU clearly believes it owns and controls all of Europe. Enough said.   
Britain is warned its longest fall in living standards in 60 years is on the way  
The work of the #8committee and the referendum hangs on the government staying put. If i was religious I would ask you all to light a candle but I am not so I will have to just hope a general election is not on the cards.  
If it really wants a deal, UK needs to commit to maintain regulatory convergence between Northern Ireland and EU post-Brexit, argues @BrigidLaffan 
Sweden warns UK not to emulate Norway border post-Brexit  
David Davis just revealed how badly the Brexit talks are going  
We didn't like your Brexit banner so added the word 'stop' before it and loads of EU flags and stickers. Welcome home. X our pleasure. #FBPE 
Receiving 100s of emails relating to the misinformation and #fakenews online regarding animal welfare after #Brexit. The notion that MPs recently voted to reduce animal welfare is utterly absurd. The UK is a global leader on #AnimalWelfare. 
Number of emails or phone calls regarding An Tanaiste. Zero.Number of emails or phone calls regarding homelessness/Brexit.Hundreds.@finegael has priorities. 
This is the hard reality of any modern trade deal. And after Brexit we’ll need India more than they need us. China too.  
Why do UK economic forecasts look so shockingly bad?Is Brexit the only reason?Has the UK’s economic outlook really suddenly become very much worse – or has this reckoning been coming for some time?And is there any way out of this mess? 
These are the 313 MPs – Tories & DUP) who voted down legislation on animals feeling pain and emotion as part of Brexit bill 
Polly Toynbee is a giant of British journalism, so let's hope she's onto something with this report. It would make so much difference if Labour would stop backing Brexit. #FBPE 
What would we do without public servants like @lucianaberger. She doesn’t write articles for the Morning Star, doesn’t push through hard Brexit, she just does a great job.  
“We are leaving the EU, we are not leaving Europe” is as cynical as “Brexit means Brexit” is dishonest. #Brexit also means we're strengthening #Russia & #China thus weakening the #EU (& we expect the EU to give us favoured treatment?!). Our collective GB arrogance beggars belief. 
Hilary Benn MP (@hilarybennmp) says Brexit is predominately about damage limitation now...He said a colleague recently told him that we’re in a situation where we’re trying to rescue the valuables from the burning building. #caselecture17 
The spoilt child doesn't know how to be happy. Always angry, never content, always blaming others to ward off threats to its own flimsy ego. Brexit is mass personality disorder. Infantile & insecure. These Tory big babies in grey suits & skirts, every one of them. 
Brexit has created a political climate no budget can fix | Martin Kettle  
We need your input to help shape key elements of the 2018 referendum on #ElectoralReform. Have your say now:  #howwevote #bcpoli 
take a second to consider this OBR forecast for UK increased exports after Brexit: more or less zero in 2020, 2021 and 2022 - even as world trade set to rise by 4% a year....  
Six casualties of a December election: 1. Brexit talks to settle Irish Q on Dec 132. Abortion Comm collapses3. Tax cuts from Budget not yet passed4. Pension hike from Budget5. Supplementary budget for Health Dept6. Christmas #GE17 
Brexit Britain in 3 tweets  
Ah no, spoke too soon. Turns out Brexit was about xenophobia after all. As you were, everyone.  
A consensus is forming within the EU that Britain will get a Canada-style trade deal  
Great initiative by @wandbc:EU nationals living in Wandsworth who are concerned about Brexit can now access a new advice service by telephone, email and drop-in operated by @CitizensAdvice 
How’s that post-Brexit free-trading global Britain working out for you @LiamFox? UK blocked an EU-India FTA over labour movement issue. Ironically, without UK at the table, EU can now do a deal with India 
I just had a polite exchange with a Tory MP getting all wigged out about the cultural city issue: why, I asked. You want out of the EU and it's an EU thing. EU is being petty, he said. Just following the rules, I said. Brexit means Brexit.  
The Capital of Culture one is especially baffling. It's an EU thing. Brexit. So, no more thing. It seems so uncontroversial. 
Hard-Right idiots: "INVOKE ARTICLE 50 NOW...WE WANT HARD BREXIT...FUCK NEGOTIATIONS, WE SHOULD LEAVE TODAY... IMMIGRANTS GO HOME!"News: A UK city can't be a European Capital of Culture after BrexitHard-Right idiots: "THIS IS AN OUTRAGE...THEY ARE RACIST..EUROPEAN SCUM" 
I am genuinely baffled by why so many Brexit Ultras seem to be permanently upset by the widely pre-known and/or predicted consequences of Brexit. It's as if there is nothing at all that would make them genuinely happy. 
Judge offers those injured during 1st October Catalan referendum chance to report police  
But Brexit “wasn’t about xenophobia”, it was about EU regulations or some shit apparently. So I’m sure the Brexiters will embrace this deal.  
UK faces two decades of no earnings growth, IFS warns This on its own will turn the British public against Brexit madness as they see the huge costs  
Euro-area economy heads for its best annual performance since the financial crisis  
Hardly surprising, but now obvious that Brexit is slowing down the UK economy. Not a good thing for anyone.   
Leaked diplomatic dossier says Tory party 'chaos' is undermining UK in Brexit talks  
Other Councils need to take led from Derry & Strabane - SF motion calling on 27 EU member states not to move into trade deal unless significant progress made on Ireland in Brexit “negotiations” passed tonight#BrexitIsBad4U #SpecialStatusCanBeDelivered 
The vote was on a proposed amendment to the European Union (Withdrawal) Bill, which sought to ensure that explicit recognition of animal sentience and the need to consider this in policy making is maintained after Brexit  
Sadly there is little evidence that Britain's elites are prepared to use Brexit as a spur to thinking up bright new policies  
Unbelievable that @bbclaurak should write this given the history of Britain & Ireland and the sensitivity of the border.The Tory Brexiters wouldn't give a damn about Ireland if Dublin wasn't forcing them. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Britain must accept more immigrants if it wants a free trade deal, warns senior Indian diplomat:So kind of Brexiters to give India the chance to control an important part of Britain's immigration policy. #StopBrexit #Brexit#LeaveLies 
#Brexit disaster can still be averted if ppl wake up to the danger. It seems like ppl don't want to believe how bad this is but all I'm hearing is about firms leaving and higher costs for UK. That's NOT what ppl voted for and democracy allows a change of mind  
The EU either ignore or do not understand this self-evident truth which underpins all economic prosperity. Yet another of the growing reasons for Brexit.  
Breaking Brexit bread with the very fine @adamfleming, @bbclaurak, @BBCkatyaadler and @ChrisMasonBBC on the legendary @Brexitcast. It’s all about Ireland.    
The Government's utter bewilderment at other countries ability to play politics one of the most eye opening parts of this Brexit shitfest 
No wonder they want to extract a massive Brexit bill...  
You simply can’t have the BBC and channel 4 on an EU payroll and not expect them not to dance to their masters tune. After Brexit this has to change. Luckily I believe The British people can see through this shabby spectacle. 
Don't they know Wales voted Hard Brexit?! Swansea pathetic nancyboys. Soft Brexit club  
BREXIT TRUTHS: Brexiters, Ireland won’t be tricked by your mendacity over the border issue / #Brexit #StopBrexit 
About how #Brexidiots are having fits over losing European city of #culture in #2023#Brexit #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Brexitshambles #EU #FBPE #CityofCulture 
 IT'S A #BREXITCAST IRELAND SPECIAL!  @tconnellyRTE brings us the gory details of a leaked Irish government report that calls the UK's approach to Brexit "chaotic."  / iTunes:  pic.twitter.com/cAF4IluSmJ 
Jacob Rees-Mogg - It was a “schoolboy error” for Treasury forecasts to suggest Britain would pay £3.5billion into the coffers of the EU in the year after #Brexit.  
I fell sorry for the people who have put so much work into the European Capital of Culture bids, as well as all of those that will lose their jobs over Brexit. Let's cancel this madness now. #stopbrexit #fbpe 
Twitter everyday: UK Gov is evil, EU are infallible, Remainer votes counted more, people who didn't vote are remainers, Leavers are stupid, solutions are impossible, Brexit is the apocalypse, no nation can survive outside the EU etcGive it a F***ing rest, I am going for a drink. 
Just because of Brexit, UK cities can’t win European City of Culture!? Hopefully this won’t affect my chances of being named Africa’s Greatest Strongman. 
Talks the talk. But then - on Brexit and the Single Market - troops through the lobbies with the Tories. Scared of the tabloids or old school Bennite Europhobe - either way not good....   #BrexitChaos 
God @sturdy - do you know what a snob that makes you sound? & how insulting it is? I appreciate many of us disagree on #Brexit but we could at least try not to treat each other with such dripping contempt  
Game On - Corbyn has seen the light on Brexit. Now he’s taking the fight to the Tories.  
And also - of course - if six months ago UK had said, OK, we’ll pay whatever it takes to make sure UK cities can bid for European Capital of Culture…then pro-Brexit folks would have screamed “Brexit means Brexit! No Money to the EU!” 
Leaked Irish paper reveals EU politicians' scathing views on Brexit progress  
There are lessons from today’s European Capital of Culture stuff for other #Brexit issues.The UK has made no solid commitment to Erasmus *either*.If EU then says OK, no more Erasmus for UK as UK is not paying for it, is everyone then going to scream “evil EU!”? 
“Hi, I’m John Glen. No, not that one. I proudly support my government and its extreme #Brexit, even though I’m completely unaware of the consequences of doing so.” 
"Downing Street said it disagreed with the decision and had begun “urgent discussions” with the commission".Sorry, Downing Street, but Brexit means Brexit. Remember?  
Brexit without a patriotic post-independence Party is having fish at one address and chips at another. We have the ideal opportunity for the wholesome restitution of a fractured Britain.  
Dundee's EU culture bid may be the latest Brexit casualty, but it's got a brilliant offer-not least the new V&A - so gaun yersels peh city. Just go for it all anyway! 
Watch: Big pharma to review plans as the EU's drug administration prepares to leave its UK headquarters following #Brexit. Via: @ReutersTV 
A pro-science budget is not enough for a Brexit world:  
A lot of fake anger about the @WeAre2023 bid being invalid.  Rules are clear, always were clear. Only 3 groups are to blame - those taking us out of the EU, Theresa May's Brexit plan and the DCMS Department and Minister for stringing them on 
Brexiteers were told they would have the cake and eat it too and swallowed this fantasy willingly, now they begin to realize that Brexit means Exit and Exit means Out.Reality bites.  
This is a welcome development. Another senior Labour figure backing the right of the British people to reject a bad deal on Brexit.  
Britain just lost the European Capital of Culture because of Brexit 
I told you what Corbyn would do. Vote for Brexit and then howl about it from a position of complete impotence. 
When Sturgeon goes on about "reckless Tory Brexit", it is worth remembering that Tories canvassed hard for Remain, whilst the SNP had a lacklustre Remain campaign. 
Since James Dyson’s Brexit rantings I choose to emerge from the loo with wet hands ratherthan use one of his ruddy airblades 
Business Secretary Greg Clark has drawn the short straw and has to defend Philip Hammond's budget on BBC Question Time tonight. Disastrous for NHS, Social Care, the Poor, wage growth, the economy, Brexit, homeless, Police & Fire services and Education - a lot to defend #bbcqt 
The real price of Brexit is hidden in the Budget small print, writes @ChrisLeslieMP 
Here are the qualifications for writing an opinion piece about Brexit and the Irish border.1. You have seen the border. Maps don’t count. 
Had UK opted for EFTA & EEA Norway plus status as I'd hoped then it would have been eligible for ECOC. Hard Brexit means as it implies going as far from EU & related structures as possible. UK agreed all the ECOC rules 
If you want to know how the Brexit negotiations are really going, you should ask Gibraltar | Mark Steel  
What life will after #Brexit? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
Quite an astonishing read - proof if ever needed that Murdoch and his goons have been effectively dictating government policy.  
Liam Neeson calls the European Commission after hearing they blocked our bid for Capital of Culture 2023 he took part in cuz of Brexit  
.@Conservatives have given up on #Brexit, Tony Blair’s former spin doctor @campbellclaret tells RT (VIDEO). 
The people of Dundee deserve more and better from a UK Government whose hard-headed hard Brexit has let them down badly #Dundee2023 
And whether you voted leave or remain, you can't be happy that govt forced to allocate £3 billion extra for Brexit costs, more than the £2.8 bill for additional NHS costs. No ££ for removing public sector pay cap. How are police, schools, NHS, local govt, prisons etc to manage? 
UK universities 'face disaster within weeks' without clear Brexit plan  
Eddie @bbcpm, I've been literally shouting at my radio during the European Capital of Culture piece & BBC News - Brexit. How can this be described as a "Bombshell"??? - how can any bidder have imagined they WOULD be able to host it!?! No clearer illustration of Brexiteer idiocy! 
1. Tories created Brexit vote - in their manifesto - to pander to the electoral colossus that was UKIP, before 2. contriving to lose it (cheers for not putting any proper safeguards re. a majority) and 3. failed to actually plan for it. 
YOUR COMMENTS: Its going to be a long fucking Brexit. pic.twitter.com/LATZycLajL 
If you are a PAYE taxpayer and voted Leave, the tax dodging #Brexit elite are eternally grateful. They couldn’t have done it without you  
Not sure why politicians who are supporting Brexit are complaining about the consequences of Brexit?  
We were told #Brexit would mean more money for #NHS.Instead:1. £3bn extra set aside, on top of possible £38bn divorce bill2. EU Medicine Agency leaving UK, slashing 900 jobs3. UK has no judge in ICJ for first time ever4. UK's turn to host EU Capital of Culture cancelled 
Your argument is "The UK has higher standards of animal protection than the minimum standards guaranteed by EU law... therefore Brexit"?Does leaving improve UK standards? NoDoes leaving improve Spain's standards? NoDoes leaving prevent us leading the EU to raise standards? Yes 
No @pollytoynbee Corbyn has not changed - you have. He’d seen the light on Brexit & took the fight to the Tories from the very beginning. It was the media that chose to distort his message:   
mmmmm guess 'Brexit meant Brexit' after all #idiots 
Nothing says snowflake more than leaving in a huff, then complaining b'cos you can't play anymore. #brexit  
More Brexit woe. UK banned frm hosting EU capital of culture 2023 - idiotic gov is shocked! If we joined EEA, stay in single market+customs union, either Leeds, Nottingham, Milton Keynes or Belfast/Derry could win.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg lashes 'gloomy' anti-Brexit forecast amid 'very strong' British economy  
Raise the alarm about Airbus after Brexit? Get cabinet colleagues to back the Tidal Lagoon or to rethink electrification? Nah, let’s hold a summit to complicate a policy field that’s been devolved to Welsh ministers for 18 years  
Brexit means BrexitThe EU can go whistleWhat do you mean we can’t be European City of Culture?? You petty bastards! 
There’s something almost fascinating about the extent to which the reality of Brexit has distorted the perceptions of its proponents. 
Why shocking John? Cities from non-EU countries have held the title before - but if a country isn't in the EU, it must be a candidate to join or must be in the European Free Trade Association or European Economic Area. Tory hard Brexit means this can’t happen. Straightforward. 
We’ve chosen to diminish ourselves, to hide away, to pull up the drawbridge, to pretend we’re ‘better’ than Johnny Foreigner. We have to own that. #Brexit 
Rather disappointed by @hilarybennmp’s attitude over the European Capital of Culture. It was inevitable. That’s the #Brexit that Labour’s backing. 
To Leavers who wail that the EU is punishing Britain, I say:The EU is not punishing Britain, it's looking after its members' interests. We're leaving. We've given up being a member. Suck it up and get over it! #StopBrexit #Brexit 
'Deciding against major investment in schools points to an uninspiring vision of post-Brexit Britain': my @tes blog:  
The European Parliament's consent is required for any final UK-EU agreement under Article 50. Find out more about the EU institutions' respective roles with @EP_Thinktank's infographic. #EPonBrexit #Brexit #Article50 7/8 
Just saw a German MEP on BBC, Hans ????, saying Brussels & London should reconsider Brexit and pick up from David Cameron talks to find common ground.  Who was he?  Did anyone else see it?  I missed the first part. 
Tory Brexiteer  @Jacob_Rees_Mogg lashes 'gloomy' anti-Brexit forecast amid 'very strong' British economy   
The @Conservatives remain committed to making sure that animal sentience is recognised in UK law after Brexit.  
Find out more about the European Parliament’s other red lines on #Brexit negotiations. #citizensrights 6/8 
Few people are aware of the BILLIONS that'll be made by 'investment firms', hedge funds & the wealthy elite from a hard Brexit Britain. But have they got 'fellow travellers' who are in a position to help their dreams come true? You decide @ThatTimWalker @acgrayling @LordCFalconer 
This article is mostly dumb, but the author does raise one good point - 90% of the ferocious, face-painting love for the EU we see today didn't exist before the referendum. To the extent that it exists now, it is mostly a cultural backlash against Brexit:  
A commitment to the Northern Ireland peace process and avoiding a hard border is one of the European Parliament's red lines on the #Brexit negotiations. #GoodFridayAgreement #peaceprocess  5/8 
Judge offers those injured during 1st October Catalan referendum chance to report police  
Joking aside, I’m properly fucked off about the City of Culture cancellation. The North will take the brunt of this brexit fuckery. It will finish what Thatcher started. I can hear her laughing below my feet. 
European Capital of Culture. Rules is rules and Brexit is Brexit. We'll no longer be contributing to the pot! So, unlucky Leeds, Dundee, Nottingham, Milton Keynes, Belfast and Derry. #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
That fucking idiot who masquerades across the world stage as if she was a national leader and not just the first minister of an autonomous region seems blind to the fact the hundreds of thousands of her own party people voted for Brexit. 
George Osborne’s former chief of staff tells @IainDale yesterday’s Budget would've been “very different” if Remain had won the referendum  
Juncker says 'I'm not crazy!'£40 BILLION is a very small bar tab: Britain must pay more, much more...And even if UK pays, still no guarantee of moving onto trade talks next month!He's right WE must be crazy to even try to negotiate with EU#Brexit #EU 
Secret #Brexit report: Europe alarmed at UK’s ‘chaos & confusion’ & ‘low quality politicians.’  
Here you are, a simple search of articles published prior to Jun 23rd 2016 shows that this, like so many other recent "shocks", was flagged up prior to the referendum.  
1 year ago the Foreign Sec confirmed to me that the 2023 Capital of Culture competition would go ahead. It is disheartening that, yet again, Scotland is losing out because of a hard Tory Brexit. The UKGov must do all they can to reverse this decision. #Dundee #Dundee2023 @theSNP 
Hammond was merely preparing us for the many decades of aftershocks of Brexit that can be forecast and expected. Brexit is reckless and will wreck the entire country. #StopBrexit#FBPE#ThinkAgainOr start thinking if you are still being casual. 
While I'm on my #EURantWagon can I just add, I'd much prefer @UKLabour to stop constantly kicking @Conservatives over their handling #Brexit & for parties to work together on this huge issue. This is new ground for UK & they shd work together to make it work, not point score 
As ever, the collected aphorisms of Theresa May can explain this unhappy predicament. Brexit means Brexit. If you're a third country outside European bodies, you're a third country outside European bodies. Maybe let's try staying in and participating? 
We could end up having an election that gives roughly the same outcome with a month of horse trading and no obvious government ...all at a time of National importance with the Brexit negotiations. 
Where #Brexit hurts: the Nurses and Doctors leaving London. #NHS 
If another Eu referendum was to be held how do you vote leave or remain? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
Reason 3 I disagree with this: If this was #EU position, they should not have allowed UK cities to spend money submitting proposals. #europeancapitalofculture #Brexit  
Coming up on BBC Newsline at 6.30 - A document leaked to RTE in Brussels says the UK government's Brexit talks have ben 'chaotic and incoherent'. The internal Irish government paper gives scathing assessments of key members of the British Brexit negotiating team.  
Corbyn has seen the light on Brexit. says Polly Toynbee. Well we'll wait and see, shall we?. When he says 'Stop Brexit', I'll be convinced. #Labour (But he MUST have clocked how vulnerable the Tories are over Brexit? Attack! Attack!)  
About time. Sadly @JBrokenshire failed to maximise transparency by backdating this to the earliest possible date, Jan 2014 opting for July 2017.In that three and a half years, we had 1 Local, 2 Assembly, and 2 General elections and a Brexit referendum.Wonder why the delay?  
EU bars UK from hosting Capital of Culture in 2023 due to Brexit in 'bombshell' announcement  
When I hear Brexiters ranting about the EU punishing Britain, I imagine England storming out of FIFA and then loudly whining that they're not allowed to play in the World Cup. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Lots of people saying this is a new example of why #Brexit is wrong. On the contrary, I was narrowly 'Brexit' on 23rd June but things like this are strengthening my resolve that Brexit was the right decision.. A few reasons why coming up... #europeancapitalofculture 
Now @IainDale is telling @LBC listeners that no one was told we would be joining a European Union before the Referendum in 1975.He's wrong.Our then PM, Edward Heath made it absolutely clear we were joining far more than a "common market" in a letter to the people in 1972.  
Interesting our living standard rose as a result of joining EU and now falling as we leave! The utter absurdity of Brexit is mind numbing!  
British conservative MEP Rupert Matthews who campaigned for Brexit shocked to discover that Brexit means Brexit on European capitals of culture.  
Downing St point out that countries from Norway, Turkey and Iceland have been capitals of culture, but they qualify by either being members of the EEA, EFTA or EU applicants. Britain will fail all three criteria after Brexit.  
Many people seem to imagine free trade as being a kind of unrestricted free for all. In reality its more like playing a sport. You join an association, pay the fees, play by the rules and obey the referee. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Brexit explodes the delicate ambiguity that underpins stability in Northern Ireland. My column:  
We're calling for greater clarity on #animal #sentience legislation in response to Environment Secretary @michaelgove's statement today #Article13 #animalwelfare #brexit @DefraGovUK @RavetzGudrun @CarolineLucas @Benfogle @petethevet |  
Makes you wonder whether a deal was done with Murdoch on the referendum, seems highly likely to me.  
BREAKING: Spanish Parliament decides to award the "Cross of Police Merit" to the Spanish police officers who acted against the Catalan referendum, leaving over a thousand citizens injured. 
Brexiters rant that the EU is some kind of bone-headed, corrupt, bureaucratic dictatorship.... and then are shocked and surprised that it doesn't look after Britain's interests in the negotiations. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Winning European Capital of Culture was a massive boost for Liverpool's economy and built a a significant cultural legacy. But this government's policy of pursuing a hard Brexit means the UK doesn't qualify any more...  
The European Commission has cancelled the UK's turn to host the European Capital of Culture competition in 2023. Is the EU punishing us or are we starting to see what life will be like after Brexit? #iainonlbc 
You are part of an economic superpower, you have a big say in what it does. But you decide to leave it and you are then surprised that it tramples over your interests. There is a word for that.... 'Stupid!'#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Only a few short months since Boris Johnson was telling Dundee that the drawbridge to European culture would not be raised. Our city's future plans now a victim in increasingly brutal Brexit negotiations. 
May's spokesman says she strongly disagrees with decision to rule UK out from European City of Culture and cites fact that Norway, Iceland and Turkey have all won before. Ignores fact that unlike post-Brexit UK, all of those countries met the criteria.  
Brexit people: When does your awful Remainer/Leaver thing end? How long on average do you expect to bang on about it?  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
In case anyone's forgotten, the Brexit bus promised the NHS an extra £350m per week...  
'We could see a significant shift in favour of remain next year — and a second referendum.'  
We welcome @michaelgove pledge to crackdown on #puppysmuggling. #Brexit provides a crucial opportunity to ensure that puppies entering this country are healthy, not underage and are not being brought in to sell on to unsuspecting buyers >>  
We have written directly to the European Commission today asking that the Belfast/Derry bid for European Capital of Culture is treated as a special case after it was reported that the bid would not proceed because of Brexit. #WeAre2023 
EU handouts to 'poor' regions in Europe will have to be cut when British taxpayers' money dries up after Brexit  Good. It will reduce dependency and corruption. 
Corbyn has seen the light on Brexit? Really? If he has ( and I don't believe that) then it's far too late. He's whipped his MPs time after time to support the Tories. I've given up on Labour. They are as damaging as the Tories.  
The DUP & PBP told us Brexit will bring benefits, well tell that to the people of Derry, Strabane & Belfast after loss of EU city culture bid because of BREXIT #ShameonUAll #DemandSpecialStatus 
David, we voted against Brexit because we think it's a bad idea. Now it seems we were right.Take responsibility. If you voted Leave, this is yours. Don't tell us to make it work. We don't think it can. We told you that. We haven't changed our minds. 
Same audience of business people had 4percent optimism for Brexit. Zero for Trump. One thought May will survive. Ten thought Corbyn will win 
Out-of-touch liberal luvvie Paloma Faith releases anti-Brexit song calling Leave voters "criminals" and suggests they are "guilty as hell".What an incredibly patronising, sanctimonious and talentless individual.  
It's hard-right idiots who pushed for Brexit and spread lies to influence the vote. They and ignorant voters are responsible for UK cities being banned from being European Capital of Culture cities  
'I'm not crazy!' Juncker says he could demand MORE than £40bn from Britain for Brexit  
Any psychologists in the house? The below #Brexit primal scream of hatred to the EU & simultaneous anger at being excluded from a EU run/organised/staffed/financed competition is a thing of wonder  
So gutted to see this...I'll be speaking in Leeds on Saturday at an event hosted by @LeedsEurope on what Brexit is doing to science, innovation & education. Leeds is a city which voted Remain  and would have been lovely to see it as European Capital of Culture.  
UK economic growth: the Brexit effect.  
The Cost of Tory/DUP Brexit - potential £800m lost to Belfast, Derry and Strabane in bid for #europeancapitalofculture 
I would have thought #Brexit people would be glad we’re no longer eligible for the European Capital of Culture. They’re not keen on Europe or on culture. *ducks* *canards* 
First class thrant (thread + rant) on the weird Spectator article on Ireland and Brexit  
British exceptionalism in a nutshell from @JGForsyth: pesky Irish demand #Brexit terms that don't breach our GFA peace deal.1800, Ireland was dragged into the UK with no mandate from the Irish nation?1918, Ireland's exit UK vote ignored?1921, UK imposed partition at gunpoint?  
Brexit & chemicals regulation...Yes - we'll tackle this issue soon. Bluntly there's so much fallout in science & health (Euratom, medical isotopes, EMA, pharma regulation, nurses, Horizon 2020, space, Struct Funds, EIB, REACH...) that we're struggling to stay on top of it all.  
Must-read NY Times article by @kbennhold about the impact of Brexit on the NHS. Tragic. 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
No matter how hard Brexit hits you personally spare a minute to think of the people of Florence and Vienna who will miss out on Dundee. 
There’s talk of a million person march in London in the spring. A celebration of our membership of the European family of nations and against #Brexit. Let’s make it happen! 
My City of Dundee and our people are another casualty of Brexit. The people of my city have worked too hard for this bitter end. Clearly this is not a UK Government taking back control, this is a UK Government that has lost control. 
I've rarely read @DanielJHannan sounding so cross. He is not impressed with the Farage/Banks Bad Boys of Brexit narrative  
EU blocks UK cities from European Capital of Culture bids after Brexit  
brexit: going ahead with brexit but paying billions more than we paid before brexit to protect brexit voters from the effects of brexit 
Only 2.5% of sample of British voters felt "primarily European".2.5%Research by Noah Carl @ Oxford#Brexit 
Another Brexit analysis piece w/obligatory two anonymously sourced para saying Ireland is playing internal politics. 18 months on and this is still standard UK media engagement w/Ireland...  (h/t @timoconnorbl) 
Welsh Labour think UK Gov are shafting Wales. They disagree with UK Labour's policy on hard Brexit. But they can't seem to follow that train of thought to its logical conclusion. 
Oor Kulchur bid jist got the chop,and it's #Dundee fowk will feel the loss,but Eh mind the signs in china shops -it's he wha #Brexit peys the cost.Eh seem tae recall that wisnae us:send the difference north, please, in a bus.  
Labour MPs abstained on a vote to give the Welsh Assembly a say over Brexit  
Asked about the single market by @KateForbesMSP,  @NicolaSturgeon says it is deeply revealing that more money has been set-aside for Brexit than additional funding for the NHS. #FMQs 
Milton Keynes told to ditch European Capital of Culture bid but not because of Brexit  
The EU Protocol on #AnimalSentience strengthened UK laws relating to animals. I hope you will 'be free' to strengthen post-Brexit #animalwelfare, @HenrySmithUK. It's disappointing the Government didn't allow @Conservatives to 'be free' when voting on this 
A shame @UKLabour supports #Brexit which resulted in this. Have you any idea how angry your members and supporters are when you continue to support this hard right policy?  
Brexit is a gift that will never stop giving:  
There is no satisfactory Brexit 'deal' for Scotland for the same reason there is no acceptable Tory government. We rejected both in democratic votes. #Referendum2018 
This is the clowncar of reactionaries who are eating this hatred fuel up, infowars soy conspiracists, dodgy pro Brexit accounts, and Trump fanatics. This is deliberately courting the extreme right as attack dogs against trans people these publications point the finger at.  
#Brexit 'bombshell' for UK's European Capital of Culture 2023 plans 
Extremely sad to see the UK candidate cities for European Capital of Culture 2023 forced to cancel their bids cause of Brexit. Any person who visited Liverpool before 2008 can tell you how vital it can be to a city’s infrastructure and economy. Brexit shambles once again 
Poor f**kers in UK would all be #Bitcoin millionaires now if you resisted your government’s censorship and libelous scumcuntery attacking @RT_com because we tell the truth about Bitcoin (since $3, with a $100k target) #Brexit, Pentagon poodles and banking terrorists in the City. 
I am so sorry about how my generation has behaved. Do remember some of us baby boomers are vehemently opposed to #Brexit. I’m tweeting for hours and going on demonstrations for the first time in my life. I don’t want my grandchildren’s future to be wrecked #StopBrexit. 
Far beyond your imagination! #Investors #Leadgeneration #Business #Startups #GrowthHacking #DigitalMarketing #IBM #Analytics #Tips #AI #DataScience #BigData #BigDataAnalytics #IoT #Industry40 #Python #Bots #Robotics #DeepLearning #MachineLearning #Geopolitics #Brexit #Economy #UN 
A patronising , sneering attitude towards Ireland from London is one of the key problems in this whole crisis.  Well illustrated here..The Irish stance against Brexit is a dangerous gamble | The Spectator  
“You can stick this on the side of a bus, why can’t we take the money we’re spending on Brexit... and give it to the NHS?” - @mrjamesob 
Giving Tsipras (a guy who called a referendum on a bogus question that divided a nation only to discard its result when he realized he’d be criminally liable for it) an award for his political courage is like giving Mugabe an award for his socio-cultural sensitivities.  
It is estimated that there are 1m people on the Irish border - already impacted by Brexit - I spent last week talking to some of them  
Side effect of Brexit: learning quite how extraordinarily foolish seemingly intelligent people might actually be. 
Thank you. I don't want to cancel 1st Ref, most people voted with the info & experience they had & thought they were helping. Clearer now that Brexit isn't going to deliver good change. Can still steer away from Brexit iceberg. Just need to get people to #ResistBrexit#FinalSay 
actually we have seen the slowest recovery in 300 years as a result of the Tory austerity policy made much worse by Brexit vote & idiotic MPC rate rise which is why the UK is the sick man of Europe in growth terms  
Public opinion is being reshaped by the cost of Brexit  
Report should surprise nobody with even a passing interest in Brexit. But does expose something far graver, and unthinkable just 2 yrs ago: relations between UK and Irish govts at lowest point in decades. All the painstaking diplomacy, all the building, all gone, for nothing  
Theresa May promises to further improve animal welfare standards post-Brexit  
Statistically more likely to have voted Brexit  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
The leaked #Irish report has it spot on : the UK government’s approach to #Brexit is ‘chaotic'  
Retweeted David Schneider (@davidschneider):Latest Brexit bus revealed. #Budget2017   
The @EU_Commission has ruled that no UK city can be eligible for European Capital of Culture after Brexit. Dundee, Leeds, Nottingham, Milton Keynes and Belfast were all bidding for the title in 2023.  
Few things personify the ignorance that drives #Brexit as the ignorance of a UK Member of European Parliament (DUP) not knowing that EU, EEA or Candidate-Country status is required to have a city name "European Capital of Culture".  
UK approach to Brexit 'chaotic' - leaked Irish report  
Hang on - I thought "no one voted (brexit) to be poorer"  
Someone has come up with a new slogan for Brexit and it is fantastic  
To the EU staff working in our NHS. We thank you for all your hard work, sorry Brexit is a complete mess.  
How Brexit is effecting the NHS. Yet another brilliantly reported @kbennhold story on post-Brexit London  
Leaked diplomatic dossier says Tory party 'chaos' is undermining UK in Brexit talks  
Budget 2017: Stagnant earnings forecast 'astonishing'I'm sure Brexiters will dismiss report as Project Fear. However, if it had mentioned that everyone will get a Brexit unicorn, they would have believed that bit, I'm sure. 
Sounds more like some people don't understand the Brexit they voted for. 
For many years we've been the 5th largest economy in the world. In his #budget2017 speech - Philip Hammond admitted we have slipped to 6th place - behind France. 7yrs of Tory austerity policies stagnating the economy and the Brexit vote have hit hard #ToryShambles #BrexitShambles 
Delighted to announce 2 new appointments for @UKandEU and Governance after Brexit programmes. The brilliant @Usherwood @UniOfSurrey and Professor Daniel Wincott @CardiffLaw. Congratulations!  @anandMenon1 
Corbyn has seen the light on Brexit. Now he’s taking the fight to the Tories | Polly Toynbee  
It doesn't matter that Istanbul won European capital of culture.  UK is no longer in Europe. However it could be if they give us more money. #Brexit 
Worst economic recovery ever.Longest period and biggest decline in living standards.Worst productivity in G7.NHS at crisis point.Worst decline in 5 yrs for UK construction.Weakest PM in living memory.Looming social care crisis.Brexit.Sorry, what were you saying Carrie? 
I understand facts are something a bit alien to you. But the UK doesn't meet the entry criteria. We can no more host it post-Brexit than you can join Mensa. 
Friends! Today I wrote to the Far-Right May, too!And have demanded that her Govt. also acts to:1. Abolish all poverty now.2. Stop Our Climate Change from changing.3. Cancel Cliff-Edge Brexit.4. Make Trump resign.And yet, nearly two hours later, I've STILL had no reply!  
As UK loses eligibility to host European Capital of Culture, government announces formation of new team to plan new #Brexit Capital of Culture.  
V tired of this meme - on both sides of referendum debate - of things like City of Culture, EMA leaving as somehow unexpected. 
‘EU reg 445/2014/EU says that only members of the EEA & countries which are cands to join EU can participate.’ Cake/eat unstuck again. Damn #Brexit  
My timeline is filling up with #brexit folk absolutely enraged that UK no longer allowed to compete for "European capital of culture" in 2023. What a strange psychological universe these people inhabit. Literally incredible 
"The near contempt felt by European leaders at the British government’s management of the Brexit negotiations" exposed by leaked report by @danielboffey 
Dundee City of Culture bid destroyed because of Brexit we didn't vote for  
Barn Llywodraeth y DG am ymddygiad Dulyn - gwrandwch ar y traha... // Interesting insight into the UK Govt view of Dublin's position - the arrogance is palpable... The Irish stance against Brexit is a dangerous gamble  
Wonder what could be the cause, I wonder........?Oh oh oh oh, I know, the twin Tory attacks of Brexit and Austerity.Stop brexit and the excuses for Austerity end as well.#FBPE #StopBrexit #exitfrombrexit #Remain 
BREAKING: Nottingham will not be the European Capital of Culture in 2023 as the EU cancels Britain's hosting because of Brexit - more to follow...  
When another predictable consequence of Brexit hits  
Watch: Big pharma to review plans as the EU's drug administration prepares to leave its UK headquarters following #Brexit. Via: @ReutersTV 
"If you call this referendum, you’ll regret it. Maybe not today. Maybe not tomorrow. But soon - and for the rest of your life." #updateafilmquote 
European City of Culture another casualty of Brexit. More disastrous consequences to follow. #remain 
Today at FMQS I asked the First Minister @NicolaSturgeon about the collapse of Dundee’s European City of Culture bid due to #brexit.  
Good job we've a Parliamentary debate on a 2nd Ref on Brexit on Dec 11th despite DExEU trying to shut it down.#FinalSayIt's a way for everyone who is worried about (Hard) Brexit to register their concernJust need to get the word out #StopBrexit4Xmas 
My @Twitter feed is full with a great cross section of #StopBrexit campaigners from @Conservatives @UKLabour @LibDems @Greens and no party at all. Many like me quit their own parties in disgust.Jo Cox was correct because we all have #MoreInCommon #Brexit  
Sky news, it would be intreresting for you to read the eleigibility criteria to be EU capital of culture: -EU countries-Candidates to join the EU-EFTA/EEA countries. As one of the many concrete consequences of #Brexit -29 March 2019- UK cannot host the EU Capital of Culture 
In Brussels for a conference about arts+inclusion, using data that is included in my mobile deal cos we’re in the EU to tweet this. Having a literal cry in this cafe full of people from all the cities. Not a single good news Brexit story so far. So angry  
I am torn between wanting to sit back and watch #Brexit  Britain fall off a cliff and wanting to do something to prevent it 
"Chaos in the Conservative government, with ministers and civil servants unable to agree a coherent policy on #Brexit."So says Irish Dept of Foreign Affairs in new report. #brexitshambles 
Opposition politicians attacking the Chancellor for putting aside £3 billion for Brexit preparations are “irresponsible” and against “doing what is necessary,” argues @isaby 
EU BLASTS France and Italy over deficits: Brussels in panic over post-Brexit budget  
Brexit has elevated people into positions they wouldn't otherwise be anywhere near  
Of course, Stavanger has been a winner and Norway isn't in the EU. Smacks of bitterness from @EU_Commission. Brexit destroys Dundee's hopes of being European Capital of Culture in 2023…  via @Evening_Tele 
You'd think they'd have better things to do, e.g. trying to figure out any possible way Brexit will benefit the UK. 
Brexit, Ireland and the ducks in London's Chinese restaurants.  
What a colossal waste of time Brexit has already been. I hope the UK can recover from the planning, let alone the disaster of it actually happening. 
Brexit is a tragedy for Britain and will reduce the country immeasurably and permanently. All this damage, upheaval, disgrace and economic pain can be stopped if we simply #StopBrexitNow. 
Out-of-touch #liberal luvvie #PalomaFaith calls #Leave #voters "#criminals" and suggests they are "guilty as hell" in new anti-#Brexit song. RT to let her know you don't regret your decision and you'd vote Leave again! #BREXIT @theresa_may @Conservatives #Conservatives #BBC #SKY 
Personally I don’t think Hard Brexit goes far enough. I want Super Brexit: chisel Wales off, hunt people for sport in Scotland, four new playable characters 
100% avoidable. Austerity + Brexit were manmade: "U.K. Faces Longest Fall in Living Standards Since Records Began".  
This analysis exposes reality of UK's economic future under this Conservative government. A squeeze on living standards until 2025, made worse by higher inflation since the Brexit vote  
No UK cities can win Capital of Culture 2023, EU Commission says. Guess Brexit really does mean Brexit. 
#Leeds hopes of becoming the European Capital of Culture in 2023 lie in tatters because of #Brexit >>"As a result of the Brexit vote, UK cities will no longer be considered for the title." Another opportunity ruined by #Brexit @leeds_2023 
.@MairiGougeon raises news that @dundee2023 bid may be scuppered by Brexit; Nicola Sturgeon is “absolutely dismayed” and is in “urgent contact” with UKgov over “how they intend to fix it” 
If the City is so Brexit-proof, why are financial services companies already starting to move jobs out of London? If we crash out with no deal, that means no passporting and no mutual recognition of services with the EU. That would cost the City tens of thousands of jobs.  
We welcome the Government’s announcement that animal sentience will be recognised in UK law after Brexit. When more details on how they will do this are made available, we will review the UK's top A rating in our Animal Protection Index. Full statement:  
Andrea Leadsom thinks that @thomasbrake is talking our economy down. Our economy is on its way down for one reason, and one reason only: Brexit. If anyone talked our economy down it was her & Vote Leave team by convincing electorate to vote for Brexit. 
The Government has promised to recognise 'animal sentience' in British law after Brexit  
Britain is warned it faces the longest fall in living standards since records began  
Brexit! It's GREAT!  
AWFUL: Paloma Faith's song Guilty labels Brexit a 'lie'. It went into the charts at number 81, not exactly an instant classic. 
The @Europarl_EN fully backs @campaignforleo & the Irish people over their #Brexit concerns. Essential the Good Friday Agreement is safeguarded in all its parts & peace process protected.  
The #Budget17 allocation of £2.8bn by the end of 2020 for the NHS is less than the £3bn which has been set aside for Brexit over the same period – further away than ever from Vote Leave’s promise that Brexit would lead to more funding for the NHS. 
EU rules prevent us from restricting or banning the live export of animals for slaughter. EU rules restrict us from cracking down on puppy smuggling & banning the import of puppies under 6 months. Article 13 hasn't stopped such practices. With Brexit we can do much better. 
The #Budget2017 showed the cost Brexit is already having. Growth, Earnings, + Productivity all revised down in every year forecasted.  
Brexit scuppers UK's 2023 European Capital of Culture bids  
The 2019 general elections will not be a referendum on GEJ.All these syndicated op-ed and book launch will not workBolaji Abdullahi and co should take noteGEJ is history...Let’s talk about the first tenure of Buhari 
ERASMUS founder warns of damage to young people's futures if/when 'no deal' Brexit ends participation  
Corbyn has seen the light on Brexit. Now he’s taking the fight to the Tories | Polly Toynbee  
Strange - don't you think the EU with its petty and vindictive behaviour should hang its head in shame?   Dundee is still a European city but the EU wants to punish.  Don't blame Brexit for EU intransigence and pettiness. 
Those rules were adopted in 2014, with UK voting for them. I thought #brexit meant Brexit? Honestly, there’s no pleasing some people. 
Lowest productivity since 1812. Greatest fall in living standards in 60 years. A lost decade for wages. Inflation rising. Brexit bleeding us dry. Don't ever tell me again the Tories are 'competent' with our economy. 
Dundee’s bid to be crowned European Capital of Culture 2023 is in tatters because UK cities are not eligible for the title...due to Brexit. 
Calling Michael Crick! Brexit inpact papers, can you shed any light on where they have gone? Rattle a cage, please Michael! @MichaelLCrick 
The issue is that, to many who voted for #Trump or #Brexit, it feels like the first time they ever won. Many now see that the prize was a pie made of shit, but it's still the only thing they ever won. So they're determined to eat it, make yummy noises and insist we all have some. 
I sat with a lovely family just prior to Brexit referendum, who were all voting Leave. I asked why. They said they wanted most of all, above anything, to help the NHS, & people in need of care.It is people like this family who will sadly lose out, whilst billions goes on Brexit. 
Alastair Campbell quoting a Doctor   "We can have #Brexit or the #NHS - we can't have both"    see the full interview - The Alex Salmond Show (E02) 
Out-of-touch liberal luvvie @PalomaFaith calls Leave voters "criminals" and suggests they are "guilty as hell" in new anti-Brexit song.RT to let her know you don't regret your decision and you'd vote Leave again!  
After Brexit, “the participation of the United Kingdom in the European Capital of Culture action will not be possible”  
Excruciating David Davis anecdote in @tconnellyRTE’s excellent Brexit & Ireland. pic.twitter.com/DmLk9fW05a 
The Leader of the House accuses me of pessimism over #Brexit. Has she spoken to business leaders in sectors as varied as automotive, hospitality and meat processing? If she had, she'd know I am realist. 
Is there anyone out there who would prefer money to go on Brexit rather than the NHS? 
BREAKING: Dundee's dream of being the European Capital of Culture is over - because of #Brexit.  
So Dundee to lose out on capital of culture bid because of Brexit! Tories should hang their heads in shame!  
In the last election, Theresa May went on about how there was no money tree. Since then, she has found £1bn to bribe the DUP and a further £3.7bn to spend on Brexit. 
Unfortunately David, confidence, positivity, nostalgia and dreams don't factor in the GDP forecasting equation! Brexit and its inherent uncertainty is damaging the UK! 
This December, instead of an advent calendar, each day we will post a question from the UK citizenship test that many EU27 citizens are doing to secure their future due to Brexit.Each question will be more ridiculous than the last, to show the hoops people need to jump through.  
Brussels says European Capital of Culture can’t be in the UK.  European Commission says #Brexit vote means a British city can’t be awarded the title in 2023.  Bothered? 
We are 6 months away from abortion referendum but already UK abortion giant BPAS has abortion.ie web address.Think about that 
Rebate, Rebate, what Rebate!Brussels plan to keep £4.5 BILLION of UK’s fee rebateEU are Blackmailers & Extortionists - now common Thieves!So glad we're Leaving EU#Brexit #EU 
The Brexit squeeze is leaving people poorer and starving our public services of the cash they need - my piece for @LabourList on #Budget2017 
Juncker confirms he will meet Theresa May on December 4. When asked if new Brexit bill offer likely enough, he replies: 'I am not crazy enough to give an immediate answer to your question' 
Never forget the #Tories are the most ruthless cynical party machine capable of an extraordinary ability to cling on to power & over #Brexit Labour fundamentally do not have clear Blue water..both are 4 Leave & a denial of a democratic #FinalSay & neither for SM or CU.#StopBrexit 
Right that Chancellor sets aside funds for Brexit preparations. Responsible action to take, and will strengthen our hand in negotiations  
Gov reserving 3 billion for Brexit. Here's what a 'no deal' will look like. My thoughts right here >>>  
“Linked to Brexit”. Once again the media seek to reinforce the notion that democracy is too expensive for Britain. Shameless.  
#latestvegannews #vegan BREAKING: Government Promises Animals 'Will Be Recognized As Sentient' After Brexit  
Do you know who is advising the government on Brexit? HSBC 
At yesterday's #Budget2017, it was confirmed in growth forecasts that Brexit is already damaging our economy. Please RT so everybody knows:  
Dundee's European City of Culture bid disqualified due to #Brexit, which Dundee & all of Scotland voted against. Another lost opportunity.  
.@TiceRichard: “This is the first time the Chancellor has had anything positive to say about Brexit and it is a small step in the right direction. However more must be done."  
"Pooh?" asked Piglet. "What does "Brexit" mean?" Pooh sighed. He did NOT enjoy Big Thoughts. "It's all about getting to grips with Slippery Things..." "And NEVER letting go!" yelled Tigger. "Imagineering gone mad?" suggested Rabbit. Eeyore eyed the clouds. "There is no Future..." 
Treacherous Remoaner  > LEFTIE  @Palomafaith says Brexit was 'mis-sold' to Leave voters in new song   Remainers have no loyalties to the UK ,they are intent on the destruction of the UK and Europe in favour of the EU. 
[23/11/2017]No one voted Brexit to become poorer.Now we know Brexit makes you poorer.So.... do we just get on with getting poorer?Or would we prefer a chance to rethink?  
‘Project Fear's NOT dead!’ Tory Brexiteer @LiamFox 's brutal jibe at Treacherous Labour MP @BarryGardiner over  Remoaner's Brexit bashing  Dangerous Remainers are intent in the destruction of the Britain in favour of the EU 
READ: Me for @Telegraph. Here's how we can cut through the Brexit deadlock: If the EU won't talk trade, we should get a deal on conformity then get out!  
Ann Widdecombe discussing Brexit this morning on GMB dressed in panto get-up was all kinds of brilliant.  
Time for @UKLabour to stop the 'jobs first' spin and abandon Brexit before it breaks Britain. Labour areas will feel it most and we will not be forgiven.#StopBrexit 
NEWS! Brexit supporter can’t wait for higher wages, cheaper housing and empty roads  
Just putting this out there: according to @resfoundation wages don’t return to 2007 levels until 2025. Puts #Brexit, the emergence of political extremes and general disillusion with the entire system in context #Budget2017 
‘@Mike_Fabricant: European manufacturing relocating to Brexit Britain. Huge opportunities ahead!  
Someone updated the Brexit bus with a new slogan and it's perfect  
Jacob Rees-Mogg lashes 'gloomy' anti-Brexit forecast amid 'very strong' British economy   
The UK was due to host a European capital of culture city in 2023 despite Brexit but the EU's now changed its mind and told Britain to piss off.  
These are the MPs who voted down legislation on animals feeling pain and emotion as part of Brexit bill  
Fascinating glimpse of EU frustration at UK over Brexit. Czech minister calls @BorisJohnson "unimpressive" & UK judge on ECJ questions "the quality of politicians at Westminster". Stand by for the push back... 
God bless you @C_NyaKundiH you are the POOR man's DARUBINI in this rotten country , I think we should call referendum to scrap the parliament and replace it with you as the people's watchdog.. 
The Committee has published 41 pieces of evidence on #Brexit and financial regulation / supervision as part of its current inquiry. You can read them all here:  
The End Times: John Humphrys, £600k a year, paid by public to talk about his small farm, cosy up to Tories, ignore Brexit crisis, villify Labour. Today his behaviour moved from inadequate to laughing in the face of the British public. Enough now. 
At a time of major national and societal challenges (Brexit & climate change, etc)  I think it is pathetic to see our politicians and media obsessing about an email. Get over it, and give your energy to real issues. 
Guardian quotes Spanish govt sources as saying UK has made no proposals about future of Gibraltar after Brexit. EU supports Spain in dispute 
Facing the biggest fall in living standards since the Second World War. And still we plough on towards reckless Brexit. Come on! We can do better than that.@jeremycorbyn @CarolineLucas @vincecable#ThinkAgain#FBPE https://t.co/j0kr3FBfAL?amp=1 
What’s going to be interesting is when the realisation dawns Russia has played all sides on all fronts, from #Indyref, to #Brexit, to #Trump, to #Catalonia. Infesting the social networks on every side of the debates (e.g. from #Maga to #Resist) to drive wedges and gather intel. 
In view of Brexit and the risk of a recession (which is due soon), the OBR's dismal growth forecasts could easily prove too optimistic. #Budget2017 
NIGERIA GOVERNMENT HAS BEEN KILLING AND MASSACARING BIAFRANS WHILE, THE WORLD MUST RESTORE BIAFRA #REFERENDUM  
Am listening to @Palomafaith's song about leave voters feeling 'guilty' about the EU Referendum and can confirm that it is complete and utter trash. Starts off with 'I've been a criminal'. WTF 
Euro-area companies are creating jobs at the fastest pace in 17 years  
Twitter shuts down a #UK based pro-#palestinian hyper active twitter bot (over 1.5 million tweets) with a particular interest in 2 things:❶ Spread #Israel hate in the UK❷ Get Brits to vote #BrexitTHINK ABOUT IT! 
I will never get behind Brexit. I will hinder it as much as I can because I believed it was wrong for the nation, I still believe it is wrong. Owning it when it does go wrong is a bloody poor show. #StopBrexit 
In Clean Brexit @DrGerardLyons & I cite 25 Art. 50 negotiation points17) The City is a strength, not a weakness 
Brexit is the elephant not in the room, but quietly waiting just outside, heading a queue of assorted ambulance-chasing administrators, receivers, vulture capitalists & undertakers. Who invited this fucking elephant into our Country? 
The Budget's cruellest truth is more extra money has been found for Brexit than the NHS  
H.M.Treasury has now officially acknowledged the UK has fallen from being the world's fifth largest economy to the sixth (behind France) since the Brexit vote h/t @faisalislam 
“But if we need more, we’ll find more”, says @PhilipHammondUK on Brexit. So why can’t you find more for the NHS, our schools, our nurses, our police? Money tree for the DUP, Brexit and the rich, folks. All a con. The @Conservatives are destroying this great country. #LBC 
So the Treasury officially recognises that the post Brexit vote sterling devaluation/ slower 2017 growth has this year relegated total UK GDP from 5th place behind France into 6th 
Extraordinary, revelatory article from @JolyonMaugham - thank you. Massive implications for the legality of #brexit result surely?   
Here's a more detailed version of the Brexit paper: European dismay at UK 'chaos and confusion' over Brexit  via @rte 
Are the UK Govt planning to abandon their promises to Gibraltar? Could this explain their mealy mouthed response to Spanish state repression in Catalonia & their retreat from commitment to principle of self determination? #Brexit  
Humprhys: “Are you a Brexit convert?”Hammond: “Err, um... I’m focused on making a success of it”He’s not a convert, and no Chancellor could make a success of it. It is economic lunacy. #r4today 
England 196/4. despite Brexit... 
These are the Brexit questions asked of the chancellor in his interview on the BBC flagship current affairs programme the day after the Budget. 
Are you a Brexit convert  ? Hammond: I'm a pragmatist. ie No. @BBCr4today 
Slight of hand from Hammond on Today - reality is he announced more new cash for Brexit than new cash for the NHS. Perhaps Boris should stick it on the side of a bus 
The penny seems to have dropped with the Chancellor. The headline of his Budget message was that we need to “seize the opportunities” of Brexit, writes David Paton of @Econs4FreeTrade 
Humphreys has finally asked about Brexit. 
Almost 20 years ago my family chose Britain as our adopted country. Since then the government has started treating my extended family as parasites and Brexit voters have devalued the very concept of British citizenship. You bet this is personal. 
Brexit - Letter - Look at the iceberg#Brexit#StopBrexit 
“Are you sure these square wheels are a good idea?”“Square wheels were the will of some people, so that’s what everyone will get!”#r4today #Brexit #Budget2017 
The one journalist I admire whose support for Brexit has been clear (albeit not explicitly declared) is now falling to pieces on Twitter.And the bigger the ego, the harder they fall. 
Office of Budget Responsibility confirms our economy is slowing and standards of living are being squeezed further as a result of #Brexit. Nobody voted Leave to become poorer.  Govt's incompetence is truly shocking. 
Today's Alex Salmond Show. Among other interesting snippets......Alex talks to Sir Jackie Stewart about dyslexia and dementia.Alistair Campbell talks frankly about the nightmare which is Brexit.Tasmina presents a report on the Arctic Forum.Enjoy! 
Possibly because if we do not get Brexit right all the rest will suffer?? Just a thought...........  
Farage was gonna demand another referendum if he lost but he is gonna pick up a rifle if the Hard Brexit not on the ballot paper he wants isn't delivered. #Democracy 
Media on climate change: 'its hard to cover such a slow-moving story even though we know its important'Media on Brexit: 'this will be front page news everyday forever whether anything is actually happening or not' 
Almost two months after Catalonia's Oct. 1 referendum, a Barcelona judge demands identification of riot police officers. When will this investigation conclude?  
Brexit will hammer the UK export market. Great businesses in auto, aero and space will leave and together with the skilled maker jobs we have to fight so hard to keep now. #StopBrexit #RemainersNow 
1/Having examined the websites of the LibDems, Greens, Plaid Cymru and the SNP, I'm anything but inspired.I was looking for two things: detailed information on issues surrounding Brexit, and a passion to fight Brexit tooth and nail.I did not find that combination.> 
Letter of the Day from angry in East Sussex: on the difference between English fairness and Gallic correctness in the Brexit negotiations  
If the whole point of Labour is to make people financial better (instead of just the few) and you know hard Brexit is an act of economic vandalism that will hurt the many, shouldn't Labour oppose it, even after #euref? 
'EU doesn't want to play ball' Farage calls on May to lobby EU businesses for Brexit deal  
So important that we console the hurt and marginalised Brexiters with £3Bn for their ‘no deal’ fantasy... rather than try to heal all the many other wounds Brexit is causing....  
The fate of Brexit hinges on May's response to her confrontation with Northern Irish reality - my latest  
The Chancellor says there will be faster growth will once there is "clarity and certainty" about what Brexit means to businesses and consumers. Quite the opposite I would have thought. 
This week, I speak to Sir Jackie Stewart on his F1 career and his life's work on campaigns tackling dyslexia and now the "race against dementia."Alastair Campbell states his case on how and why the PM should call a halt to Brexit.#AlexSalmondShowRT, 0730, 1830 and 2330 GMT 
European dismay at UK 'chaos and confusion' over Brexit  
Brexit is taking its toll on Britain's economy before it's even happened  
These are the MPs who voted down legislation on animals feeling pain and emotion as part of Brexit bill  
‘That Brexit preparations will cost the taxpayer more than the promised extra cash for the NHS underlines just what a wasteful and exhausting exercise leaving the EU will be’ @guardian editorial End #Brexit! 
We have this constantly in th UK over Brexit Ron. Anyone pointing out inevitable problems we'll face is accused of "Talking down the country". (We don't fall for this BS!) 
'Schoolboy error’ @Jacob_Rees_Mogg hits out at UK plans for Britain to pay EU £3.5bn post-Brexit  
A good summary of the pointlessness of Brexit. There's also the futility of it, because we already have the best deal the real world can provide. #stopbrexit  
This week, Sir Jackie Stewart talks about his F1 career and his life's work on campaigns tackling dyslexia and now the "race against dementia."Alastair Campbell states his case on how and why the PM should call a halt to Brexit.#AlexSalmondShowRT, 0730, 1830 and 2330 GMT 
Here's a link to the EU section of the Green Party's homepage.They're against a "hard" Brexit and want a ref on the deal with an option to Remain.I can't see any difference between the Green & LibDem positions. But neither go into much detail. 
So £30 billion for Hinckley, £57 billion for @stophs2 (it will be twice that), a huge as yet not revealed cost of Brexit..we have embraced fiscal chaos with enthusiasm and vigour  
As Greens we don't fetishise growth and think that much of the 'national product' is pointless or destructive. But this graph of declining growth, largely as a result of #Brexit, shows what a disaster leaving the EU will be in conventional economic terms pic.twitter.com/as2Cqw7AWZ 
The performance of the UK economy since the referendum - is Brexit starting to bite?  
Here's a link to the LibDems homepage section on Europe.They are against "hard" Brexit and want a ref on the deal with an option to Remain.If I could make a suggestion:It appears not to have been updated since the GE. Things have changed since then. 
My dear sons Sorry about the loss of freedom of movement in 27 countries, your massive uni debt, the 7% going nowhere, no chance of a home of your own, 0-hours contracts & the tanking economy.Sorry about the dying planet.(but er, a railcard?) Love, Mum #brexit #budget2017 
Still no #Brexit impact assessment papers. How are the  government; and the opposition for that matter, taking meaningful and considered decisions about the future of an entire nation, without understanding the consequences? 
Intriguing letter in the @FT - perhaps our Brexit negotiations with the EU are a waste of time, and money; Brussels' legal way of "thinking" may not be fit for purpose - it is designed for bureaucratic drones and no-one else.  
If Brexiters ever reach coffee-smelling phase, it is ABSOLUTELY CRITICAL that neither the Tories nor Labour are allowed to rely on the excuse ‘we were just following orders from the people’. The Referendum did not suspend MPs duty to act in the best interests of the country. 
To be clear: The @Conservatives can find 1bn to pay off the DUP and 3bn in preparation for its own failure to secure a #Brexit deal. But no extra pay for our teachers and only a paltry 350m all winter for the #NHS.It's the "Fund our own balls-ups" strategy. 
Emmanuel Macron has emerged as de facto head of the EU – and that's bad news for Brexit Britain  
Remember all those young Brits the Brexiteers want to train up in supersonic time in order to replace the EU citizens set to leave the UK due to #Brexit? Looks like we'll have a shortage of people to train them. 
Brexit: Battle over Irish border threatens EU-UK trade talks  
The real irony of #Brexit is that by the time it actually happens everyone who voted for it will likely be dead...#ThursdayThoughts 
This clip encapsulates what is going wrong with our politics. You can see the men either side of Caroline agree with what she is saying about Brexit as a waste of money that should go to public services. But they will vote for this to happen! #infuriating 
Britain has 40,000 nursing vacancies: a tale of Brexit, broken promises and struggling hospitals  
The struggle to find Dracula in a post-Brexit world.  
No End in Sight to the Brexit Madness: excellent New Yorker take on the catastrophe of Brexit  
Unionist parties should not rest until every potential Alliance voter sees the magnitude of the party's post Brexit plan to weaken Northern Ireland's place in the UK, writes Owen Polley @3000Versts 
The budget is hopeless. I can't sleep. My nose is blocked. Up in 5 hours for a white card meeting. Please forgive me if I'm a dickhead tomorrow. I really don't mean it. I just need a holiday. And another Referendum, so my country can redeem it's fucking stupid decision. Brexshit! 
.@JohnCassidy:  UK "still in the grip of Brexit madness, and, sadly, there is no relief in sight":  @NewYorker 
This is one of the people forming the views of the group Corbyn belongs to. If you hold out hope Corbyn will start opposing #brexit - find out about Milne - then have a good long think about it.#StopBrexit  
WATCH HOW DEMOCRACY IS BEING RAPED IN ANAMBRA IN BROAD DAYLIGHT SHAME ON NIGERIA #REFERENDUM FOR BIAFRA @EU @UN 
"What would it mean, Brain, if that coveted UK championship were held by Johnny Gargano?""Well for one thing, the UK wouldn't need Brexit. The rest of Europe would kick them out.""Give me a break!"#WWENXT 
Let’s ask Canadians in a referendum if we would be for or against this. 
The article is a month old, nevertheless it makes interesting observations, and Brexit doesn't own the future.  
I endorse this message.#Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
My loyalty is to the country before any political party. #Brexit is wrecking the country, therefore I will support any party that campaigns to stop it.  
In matters of Brexit there is no place for blind party loyalty and tribal politics, country must come above all else. I proudly stand with anyone of any party who stands with me to fight Brexit. I welcome anyone who voted leave but who now wishes to fight Brexit. #StopBrexit 
The advisory referendum was manipulated by the few to fool the many into relinquishing their rights and for no gain. ie you were used. #FBPE 
When #Brexit happens, the political elite will use that as an excuse to destroy and sell off what's left, then they will be free to squirrel even more money offshore. Democracy will truly end and you will be owned #NHS 
"If the government has no intention of using Brexit to undermine workers’ rights, why are ministers not willing to accept amendments making that explicit?" (Ken Clarke) 
Waiting for May, Brussels eyes December Brexit deal  
I hadn't heard of this book, but I share your disgust at what has happened to the UK. Every time I meet EU nationals, I confirm that, since the EU referendum, they now get abused in the street when they didn't before, and I express my sorrow and shame. 
Where Brexit hurts: The nurses and doctors leaving London. 
Defeating the referendum is critically important for Northern BC.If the NDP & Greens are successful in pushing through proportional representation, it will mean a dramatic reduction in representation for rural areas of our province.#BCLib18 #forallofBC 
After Brexit, Britain wants to choose its immigrants. But some immigrants are no longer choosing Britain.  
True, there is now no one within my family who would vote labour again. A few years ago it was a completely different story & almost heresy to vote any way but labour. However they are very complicit in tory brexit & with a leader who is all to familiar with voting with tories 
Pls sign and RT: Petition: Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU.  
Oh dear these terrible UK growth forecasts are based on a likely unobtainable Brexit deal, & if not obtained are likely to be much worse. 
The chemical and pharmaceutical businesses in the UK export £27 billion of manufactured products from raw materials imported from the EU. Brexit will hit their business and their trade. It's only time before they move out of the UK if we leave the single market. #StopBrexit 
The Irish border has emerged as an unexpectedly tough hurdle in U.K.’s Brexit talks  
The government has £3bn stashed away for Brexit . I would be grateful if the chancellor gives me £1bn that’s enough for me to home the homeless and change their lives . I don’t need a wage I will do it for free . 
Plus any Labour Gov won’t have a penny to do all the things they want. Extra tax money will go on Brexit impacts. 
Spanish Congress puts brakes on commission to investigate police attacks during referendum via @elnacionalcat 
We have already spent almost 700 Million pounds on Brexit preparations and I will be putting aside 3 Billion more.  - Philip HammondYou know what they say in business... "You've gotta spend money to lose money"#Budget2017 
NHS England needs £4bn to avoid crisis.Hammond decides we can only afford £1.6bnIn other news, we’re going to spend £3bn preparing for Brexit. 
European Doctors and Nurses leaving the UK, heading back to their home countries, some to Dubai and Canada. Lecturers and Teachers leaving as well. The skill shortage list will increase significantly. Brexit was a mistake, they’ll find out soon. 
And Labour should recognise that Brexit is a Trojan horse. More than simply leaving the EU, Brexit is a way of undermining all the values Labour stands for. Whatever else they are doing, the greater good right now will be served if Labour fights Brexit. 
Brexit Explained  
"But what do the youth *really* want?""No brexit"..."Give them £2,000 off a a house they'll never fucking own" 
Great story on Brexit's impact on the NHS European doctor and nurses https://t.co/24natlspBn?amp=1 
After listening to the Tory Brexit driven #Budget2017 the following lines sprang to mind." Our lives should not be sweated   From birth until life closes,   Hearts starve as well as bodies   Give us bread - but give us roses"(James Oppenheim) 
The only way to end austerity is to #stopbrexit. Brexit is turbo-austerity. The current Labour front bench including Starmer & Corbyn actively want #brexit. If you want the country to recover, or a fairer system, there has to be a healthy economy. 
Top politics expert says Britain has NO legal obligation to pay 'unpopular' Brexit bill  
Am told every day I am getting boring on Brexit. This is why it is important to continue banging on about it.  
‘Let’s spend £3 billion planning #Brexit !’What?!! Just the planning?‘Yup!’But the NHS is about to crumble...‘Oh, her? Yes, she’ll get £350m this winter’...Sounds like a funny way to take back control... #Budget2017 #brexitshambles 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
The Budget’s cruellest truth: more will be spent funding Brexit than the NHS.Help fund public services: #StopBrexit. 
In which case why is Labour not making more running on this? At what point is leadership going to accept that radical domestic agenda is irrelevant if Brexit crashes economy?  
#Brexit is crap at every hour of every day. Its proponents are idiots and rich elites. I want to see some fight about this. I want politicians, broadcasters and journalists to stop spouting crap they know to be crap and tell the fucking truth. Brexit will destroy the country. 
Yes @BarryGardiner, quitting the EU but staying in the Single Market would make the UK a rule taker. But you would prefer to capitulate to the lies of Murdoch, Dacre, Farage & the Tory Right rather than having the honesty & courage to say #Brexit is wrong and we must #StopBrexit. 
Where Brexit hurts: The nurses and doctors leaving London  
Let me get that straight. £3 Billion expenses for #Brexit and only £2.8 Billion for the NHS. Weren't we promised 350 Million a week?? Plus unicorns.Ok, we've all had a good laugh about how gullible we are, can we now stop the charade and #Remain please. 
Whereas you say you're an opposition but do the opposite. Your plan is for Stalinist Socialism In One Country and your strategy is vote for Tory brexit.  
Balls. Don’t think I’ve voted other than Conservative in 30yrs. But it you choose to flush our economy down the Brexit toilet, don’t be surprised if you follow. U-bend if you want to.  
British Brexit Corporation never challenged Brexit Lies in 2016 and now in denial on Brexit impact on economy and British standing worldwide  
ADD MY NAME - UK Government: Cancel Brexit and stay as Full Member of EU. - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
How Brexit looms over the Irish border: 'It's the Berlin Wall approaching us'  
Also asked if 1. May is strong leader? 2. Has clear Brexit strategy? 3. Has united capable team? ZERO ON ALL THREE. ZERO. Out of a thousand 
Speech to 1000 actuaries. Zero optimism Trump. 10% hands up for optimism for Brexit. < 1% think May stands next election 10% JC will be PM 
So we’re spending national war chest on Brexit, not giving the #NHS 350m a week because it never existed, and preparing for 2019 NHS cuts as tax revenues fall, the economy slides, and unemployment rises. When facts change, minds can change #BetterWithoutBrexit #StopBrexit 
The dog at the back, Grace, had puppies a few years ago. When one died she stood howling at me. That Brexit can make a British Gov can vote against #AnimalSentience sickens me. 
BBC's Laura K and Kamal A are hard-hitting on the terrible growth and living standard forecasts. But neither of them ONE WORD about how Brexit vote is largely responsible. How are people to know the truth? 
."British politicians have NOW got the message about how serious NI border issue is in Brexit talks after NOT listening carefully to the Irish side". 
The BBC's relentlessly negative coverage of the government and of Brexit is impacting our political stability. The government is not without fault but it is not the role of the BBC to bring it down or to inflict a leftist coup upon us. 
The question that Brexiters need to ask themselves is this: Do they think it is ok to spend £billions of taxpayers money on Brexit instead of the NHS? 
Amidst the realms of Brexit, of marriage equality smear campaigns, of impending North Korean instability and of Trump now having 280 characters on Twitter, the only thing that can bring us together in these dark times is the certainty that it will "do a bit early" at The Gabba. 
Irish Prime Minister Leo Varadkar "should know better" than to "play around" with Northern Ireland over Brexit, says @DUPleader 
Is Brexit taking our country down? 
Exclusively because of Brexit:  
A Medium sized company explains the Brexit issues ahead.  
Brexit could mean British cancer patients don't receive treatment in time, experts warn  
The true folly of Brexit: it commands all our attention when the country has other problems to solve  
Foreign & Commonwealth Office budget slashed by 40% today.Hammond has slammed another nail in our relations with the world. So much for Brexit as an opportunity to grow our trade with other countries. #FBPE 
On whether Irish border issue is fudged: Customs unions have borders. The problem cannot be solved. So either it is fudged or we have a no-deal Brexit. 
Brexit and the people who live on the Irish border: "It's the Berlin Wall approaching us'  
Thursday’s INDEPENDENT Digital: “Hammond’s dire warning for Brexit Britain” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
People feel frustrated about the main parties in England not reflecting their views on Brexit, and possibly other issues.If a new political movement was launched to do that, would you consider joining it ? 
Like I said, Thomas Shelby OBE can negotiate a better Brexit deal than our current Tory government #PeakyBlinders 
'Mugged by reality' just about sums up Brexit @D_Blanchflower 
Sarah Gordon: 'The chancellor insisted his Budget was about "much more than Brexit". But the slim pickings he provided for business were overshadowed by just that'  #Budget2017 
Calling all #Tories - if you like the Chancellor's Budget statement today, just think how turbo charged the U.K. economy would be if we simply reversed #Brexit. Plus we could spend the £3bn extra funding for Brexit on the NHS! Now that would be a plan! 
So we are going to spend another £3bn on Brexit preparations to add to the £750m we have already spent, taking the total to over £3.75bn. Then add in another £2.1bn on increased administrative cost in the civil services thanks to Brexit. Brexit is a waste of money. #StopBrexit 
Britain is now living a reality in which the chancellor has to commit £3bn worth of extra funds to Brexit planning and only £2.8bn extra to an NHS in crisis. Stick that on the side of a bus. 
Ireland is determined to hold firm on the demand for matching customs rules on both sides of the border after Brexit, the Taoiseach has said  
Have you had an accident in the voting booth? If so we can help! No Brexit, No Fee! Make your CLAIM TO REMAIN! #StopBrexit 
"Oh look, some relatively positive economic news, despite Brexit."Remainers: "WE HAVEN'T LEFT YET, YOU IDIOTS.""Oh look, some relatively worrying economic news."Remainers: "IT'S ALL BREXIT'S FAULT, YOU FOOLS."Repeat ad nauseam. 
The petition for Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal to include a Remain option has now hit 20,000 signatures, in just 5 days.Sign, RT and share to make it 100,000 for a debate in Parliament. Help #StopBrexit. 
@scarlettpeach - Just in case you’ve missed this.  Brexit makes PPI look lame!!  
"Just to be clear"... the Budget allocates £120 billion for NHS resources next year with another £5.6 billion in health capital spending. So £126 billion total Vs £3.7 billion for Brexit contingency planning that may never even be spent. But hey... #FakeNews 
RETWEET if you Love the UK and BREXIT and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Hammond gives NHS £350 million for entire winter. If you voted Brexit, they told you they’d give £350 million PER WEEK. Feel cheated? 
I'm sure Brexit will fix everything and definitely not make matters even worse  
Maybe they can’t cancel Brexit because the entire wall of gammon would end up in hospital at once. 
Strange isn't it that these Brexit "winners" still act like fucking losers.  
Brexit ‘negotiations’ now a national humiliation. We need the buccaneering spirit of Francis Drake instead we have spirit of Charlie Drake. 
Germany's most-read newspaper: "The Brits of all people should know what a real crisis is. Next to their list of problems the FDP's Jamaica exit looks harmless. The Brexit negotiations are faltering, the UK's future is more uncertain than ever."  
Superb speakers on a Ireland, Brexit and Europe. Fri, 24 Nov, Royal Irish Academy, Dublin.All welcome. @JolyonMaugham @PeterKGeoghegan @Feorlean @ClaireHanna on Brexit@IDAIRELAND @enterpriseire @IFAmedia @dfatirl @IrishTimesPol @irishexaminer @Bordbia 
#Leave has become a farce. Spending more on #Brexit than the #NHS - where did that come from? Who voted for that? Nobody I know who's sane and willing to stick their head above the parapet. 
People moaning about the £3 billion being set aside for Brexit - it's equivalent to roughly 2 days of Govt's annual spending. and less than one month's debt interest 
How Brexit looms over the Irish border: 'It's the Berlin Wall approaching us'  
Now I Am Uninsurable.(I'm Beginning To Think) Brexit May Never Happen.After A Troubled Year.Something More Dismal.I Made A Mistake In Trusting In A Reporter (It Won't Happen Again).Distant Barbecue.I've Got Some More Complaints To Add.Don’t Put Yourself Out.  
Philip Hammond just revealed he’s spending more on Brexit than the NHS #Budget2017 
What was that about a ‘green Brexit’ again?  
Join our Fringe event "Can Brexit be Stopped" at London Regional Labour Party Conference, this Saturday 25th at 1pm.Join us with Mary Honeyball MEP, Heidi Alexander MP, Seema Malhotra MP and Ivana Bartoletti, Vice Chair at LME.Register here:   
Why didn’t anyone tell me this before the referendum?! If I’d known we might sell more peas, I would have voted for Brexit!  
Thought so you xenophobic, racist moron! You are a typical example of the scum being supported by this brexit fanatical Government supported by yellow bellied MP's more interested in their wallets than their country! You are a disgrace! 
Amidst all the froth about the budget, this from @IanDunt goes to the core issue, that we're going to have to pay a hell of a lot for Brexit - and if anything understates it.  
That Brexit Plan In Full:1. Tell foreigners where to get off.2. Wait for them to fall into line.3. Er ...4. That’s it. 
God I hope I'm wrong but just as Brexit has seen a rise in racist attacks, the voting against animal sentience will see a rise in animal cruelty. 
“I am optimistic about our future. About the success we can make of Brexit, the well-paid jobs that will be created and the homes we will build. That's @Conservatives - building a Britain fit for the future.”- @Theresa_May #TeamTory #PMQs #Budget2017 
To be fair, you shouldn't hold a #Brexit referendum if you haven't made any plans beforehand (unless the plan was to have no plan... ) 
Thanks to @Edward__Burke, @caoilfhionnanna and @carolynquinncq for a riveting and timely discussion of Brexit, NI & British-Irish relations.  
Rising alarm in Britain over Russian meddling in Brexit vote  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
If/When Brexit Britain goes belly up I’m putting myself up for adoption by a nice Italian family. It’s a plan.  
So, the country goes to bed knowing that #Brexit is ruining our country, the drain on resources confirmed today by Hammond. Maybe we’ll come to our senses overnight. 
You are an absolute disgrace, as are your fellow Tories. You know fine well it is reserved and here you are once again spreading blatant lies. Some viceroy, eh. #useless and selling Scotland down the Tory chute and not just on Brexit obviously. 
The NHS has been given £350m to last it through the winter. (A weekly allowance according to the Brexit bus)  
The budget shows the bleak reality of Brexit:- Growth below 2% every year for first time in living memory- Wages squeezed, investment deterred & productivity hit- No surplus until 2031, 16 years behind scheduleStop the disaster. #StopBrexit. #Budget17 
Brexit Explained  
Inconvenient truth of Brexit laid bare in #budget17 that the Telegraph won’t go big on. Two years ago, long term growth rate 2.5%. Now 1.6%. 
Yet Labour are doing nothing that would even mitigate effects indeed your party are now backing the Tories hard Brexit position. 
Just been with a multi-millionaire businessman involved in manufacturing.  He is now helping a Luxembourg company, 2 German, and a Swiss co. relocate to the #UK for manufacturing because they believe opportunities will be greater here after #Brexit because of our worldwide links. 
Some in the #Conservative gov’t apparently saying “we can’t start preparations [for #BREXIT] on the basis of ‘No Deal’ as that would undermine our obligation of ‘sincere co-operation’ with the EU. @_HenryBolton says “If you don’t, you are undermining our country! Sort it out!” 
I've had a mere 2 phonecalls about renewing Labour membership. My Brexit reason was met with a knowing sigh.  
It was clear to see the damage that Brexit doing to the UK economy from the Budget today. The outlook for Britain just goes from bad to worse thanks to the vote to leave the EU. The best course of action is to take back control and #StopBrexit 
£3 billion to pay to make real the wet dream of a handful of Tory/UKIP obsessives, and the people who were duped into voting for it. #Brexit 
Brexit is simply not affordable. It was supposed to save us money, instead it's costing more. #stopbrexit for the sake of our country. 
Article by Mike Small for @bellacaledonia based on @ShaunGDavey's FoI campaign on the Brexit studies  
How worse does it have to get before Leave voters admit they were taken in by snake oil merchants and make some noise? 
Take note everyone. The #Treasury expects the UK to go on paying into the #EU #budget after #Brexit. There is only one 100% pro-Brexit party - #UKIP 
Growth slows while the rest of the world booms @jonsnowC4 on #C4News Only @LibDems offer an #ExitfromBrexit to remove the shadow of Brexit from our economy. #Budget2017 
People who have spent their whole careers moaning about 'wasteful public spending' are cheering the extra £3bn to be spent preparing for Brexit. #Budget2017 
We’re about to spend another £3bn on Brexit.Let’s #StopBrexit and fund the NHS instead. 
I'm getting steadily angrier that Brexit is costing us £billions for nothing whilst NHS, police and social care are starved because Brexit is giving us the worst growth since 1983. The Tories have a lot to answer for. 
Cueing up my sad Brexit pic...  
One thing is for certain Britain needs another General election, before brexit. #budget2017 
So, in last General Election many  voted @UKLabour to avoid a hard #BrexitNow what?#StopBrexit  but how? 
Wages are being pressured up in the UK because post-Brexit employers can't import endless foreign workers. Hmmm. Maybe this supply-and-demand thing explains why U.S. employers & investors oppose pro-American immigration reforms.  
POOR: UKIP's @JonathanArnott thinks Philip Hammond's budget lacks ambition for post-Brexit Britain, wants gov't to start negotiating trade deals around the world. 
One of (many) reasons why OBR revised down UK forecast while revising up global growth forecasts: slower growth in UK export markets from 2019 onwards, compounding Brexit decline in EU market share assumed by OBR.  
Please remind her that almost 70% of Brits are happy to be in the EU. She has no mandate for #Brexit. 
HA! IMO #Budget2017 was a Brexit driven Budget So batten DOWN the hatches folks Things are gonna get a whole lot WORSE. 
I welcome that @PhilipHammondUK recognises opportunities for post-Brexit economy & £3bn set aside for Brexit prep. Still following pessimistic @OBR_UK growth forecast. Meeting optimistic businessmen around UK confirms @Econs4FreeTrade 2% growth forecast, rising to 3% by 2025. 
The #Chancellor has slashed the Foreign Office #budget by nearly half, from £2bn to £1.2bn A massive cut to a capability that is crucial to the UK’s global reputation and success through #Brexit and beyond - loopy! Support #UKIP 
Hooray for Brexit  
Bild front page: "Brexit-Brits are making nasty jokes about Merkel ... as if they didn't have problems of their own"  
Anyone still think austerity and Brexit were good ideas? Though not  
Is the Jeremy Corbyn who says he'd vote Remain in a 2nd referendum the same Jeremy Corbyn who built his reputation on being principled? And if so might he please fight for that 2nd referendum? Thanks  
“There is no pot of gold under the Brexit rainbow.”Treasury Select Committee chair Nicky Morgan says there will be no Brexit-induced windfall.  
OBR report indicates they’ve not seen anything on Brexit that’s not in public domain.Ie they haven’t seen the 58 sectoral impact assessments.@JolyonMaugham#Budget2017 See p4 of Foreword () 1/2 
4/ Government devoid of ambition because they know what risks they taking with hard Brexit plan. None will still be around to take blame 
Here's a grander truth: if we hadn't embarked on this Brexit madness, we'd be able to spend all of that money on NHS, affordable housing, schools, investment across the board to make our lives better. Instead, we are all barrelling towards oblivion. 
The Tories have found £3bn to spend on Brexit, but nothing for our police or social care. This Budget was meant to save Hammond's career, but it's fallen apart before the day is even over #Budget2017 
Before Brexit we were the 5th largest economy in the world.The UK Chancellor just admitted we've dropped to 6th place since Brexit.So much for the Brexit boom.#StopBrexit 
“Did Vote Leave commit a crime over its funding? Democracy demands to know”Brilliant work by .@JolyonMaugham#Brexit 
British banks will leave single market after Brexit, European Commission vice president says  
Budget - five years of suppressed growth, rising debt, public service strangulation on the way. That's *before* the hard Brexit slump /1 
#Budget2017 lets down patients. More cash given to Brexit than the NHS. Health bosses & GPs already warning patient care will suffer. Still can’t trust the Tories with the NHS  
Labour MP Jonathan Reynolds says #Budget2017 shows the government “spending more freezing alcohol duty than fixing universal credit, and more on #Brexit than on the NHS”  
So far #Brexit has cost us £700m.#PhillipHammond is expecting it to cost another £3bn.WHERE IS THAT MONEY FOR THE #NHS?#Leave campaign was funded by tax dodgers because the #EU was clamping down on #tax havens.#Brexit is the BIGGEST CON ever perpetrated on the British public. 
They did indeed, in 1975 the wartime generation voted 66% to join the EU. They would never have understood Brexit abandoning our allies in Europe  
Are you baffled by Corbyn's stance on #Brexit? You should look at Corbyn's stance on Putin's aggression in Ukraine, his silence about Assad & Putin's war crimes in Syria & his appearances on Russian ally Iran's TV.Then ask again why he supports Brexit.#StopBrexit. 
No £350m extra per week for the NHS over the forecast period (up to 2021/2022) which continues well beyond the scheduled #Brexit date. £2.8bn for the NHS but £3bn for Brexit. #NewBrexitFacts 
Today's #Budget2017 showed the cost Brexit is already having. Growth, Earnings, + Productivity all revised down in every year forecasted.  
The complete exclusion of the Scottish Govt from Brexit has been exposed by this FOI   
Very well said in @EveningStandard just now. Leaving Single Market & Customs Union was not ordered by the referendum. Brexit has transformed UK from fast to slow-growing and gives Hammond no room to manoeuvre.  
Indications in the Budget that Hammond is at least now thinking about the possible upside to Brexit are welcome, writes David Paton of @Econs4FreeTrade on #Budget2017  
This is a great spot - red book seems to suggest we'll be paying more than 3 billion every year to EU after Brexit and after transition, Treasury haven't yet answered the q as to what its for  
'Brexit is already wrecking our economy, and the Budget is the proof'  
The #Budget2017 in emojis:Cutting stamp duty for first time buyersTackling plastic pollutionCheaper boozeInvesting in clean transportMore money for smooth Brexit transitionIncrease in National Living WageBoost tech & maths skillsA £220m Clean Air Fund 
Are the government deliberately concealing the 58 #Brexit impact assessments until this weeks round of votes are in the bag? That would have to be some form of offence surely @JolyonMaugham 
this, at root, was a budget framed by three interlocking factors: the political weakness of the government; the detrimental long-term impact of the financial crisis; and the imminence of Brexit. Spot on from Larry Elliott  
May’s decision to leave Customs Union, jurisdiction of ECJ, and trigger Article 50 prematurely all done to please her political base and Brexit press without understanding of implications. No preparation, just playing to the Brexit crowd. Now the Govt’s floundering. 
This sums up that attitude to a t, doesn't it? Long-standing poverty, inequality, uncertainty is 'lol boring' while Brexit is unconscionable.  
You want to half the number of tech businesses founded in the UK? Doing a good job of it with Brexit  
.@ChukaUmunna on #skynews: The driver of poor economic news in the budget is #Brexit...There is no sign of the promised £350 million a week for the NHS. Brexit is going to cost money, when the leavers told us it would save money 
The Budget's cruellest truth is more will be spent on Brexit than the NHS - @Open_Britain blogs  
Secret doc FCO 30/1048 kept truth about #EU from British for 30 yrs.Govt kept British public in dark about what EEC membership means predicting would take 30 yrs for voters to realise what was happening & then too late to leave.Never too late #Brexit 
Looking forward to seeing the big red bus reading "Brexit is costing us £1.5bn a year. Let's fund our NHS instead".  
False @carolecadwalla - Robert Mercer has been under investigation by MI5 and MI6 for his role in #Brexit since late 2015.  
Government prepares to spend a further £3 billion on Brexit over next two years... we think this would be much better spent if we avoid exiting the EU altogether. #Budget2017 
It's a blog. By me. I don’t remember seeing a big red bus with the slogan ‘Vote Leave for less NHS spending, because we’ll have to blow it all on Brexit’. 
With 79% of the UK's GDP being derived from the service sector, the madness of the Brexit gamble, which both the Tories and Labour are prepared to take the country into, is confirmed by Michel Barnier along with all those 'project fear' warnings....  
Dear Theresa, Five words that will boost the pound, slash food prices and make us all loads better off…WE WERE JOKING ABOUT BREXIT 
Remain voters destroyed Tories’ majority by flocking to Labour as 'best bet' to stop hard Brexit, huge election study finds  
If you want an illustration of the austerity that #Brexit will create - just look at the Treasury’s own figures predicting a collapse in revenues available for our public services. We can still prevent this!  
A clean #Brexit means returning- The Supreme Court to London, not Luxembourg under the ECJ- Full control over our own borders so WE can decide whom we let in- The power to negotiate our own trade treaties with #EU and beyond& all that means having to leave the Customs Union. 
Debt falling, income inequality at lowest level in 30years, help for first-time buyers, frozen fuel duty, £2.8bn extra investment in our NHS, tax gap closing & £3bn allocated for Brexit preparations. @hmtreasury #Budget2017 
We send Brexit £3 BILLION per budget. Let's fund our NHS instead. 
Missed #Budget2017? Here are the key announcements:  £3bn to prepare for #Brexit £2.8bn for the NHS in England, including £350m now  Stamp duty scrapped for some first-time buyers  £500m for AI, 5G and broadbandRead more:  
FFS! The Florence speech appears to be the sole UKGov source of post-Brexit planning. The Whitehall Moronathon just doesn't stop.  
German Business Leaders Push to Stop Brexit, Admit EU Open Borders Need Reform   
Think a lot of us had figured this out by now 'We were lied to ...'#Brexit 
We're sure Brexit will help with that...   
#Brexit will benefit a few billionaire tax avoiders. Rest of us will be worse off in every conceivable way. Can't put it plainer than that. 
In Thursday's newspaper: PUTIN THE BOOT IN - Why Russia is working so hard for a Hard Brexit. Subscribe to receive it straight to your door every week and save 50%:  
Leo Varadkar also insists at this "historic moment" Ireland will stand firm on its current #Brexit position even it means isolation from rest of EU "we will hold to this line" #Brexit 
Rather than ploughing billions into the Brexit chaos we should be investing in our struggling schools. #Budget2017 
Brexit: discussing the Irish border issue separate from that of EU/UK trade makes as much sense as discussing nuclear disarmament at a fisheries convention. 
While economic growth accelerates across the EU, it is falling in the UK. When will most Leavers realise they've been lied to and cheated by the greedy lying Brexit leaders who are thinking only of their #Brexit tax haven!#StopBrexit. 
How Brexit threatens London - and through London, the U.K. The New York Times on the city that is (was?) ‘Capital of the World’ and ‘Banker to the Planet.’Will London Fall?  
There are people in politics daft enough to think that the worse they allow things to get over Brexit, the more compelling the case against it becomes. Trouble with this is we're reaching a tipping point where there'll be nothing left to save. 
We're ready to quit Brexit talks without a deal, warns Davis. @DavidDavisMP has threatened EU bosses, that Britain will walk away from talks if they don't progress to trade talks. A former MP David Jones has urged the government to stop flogging a dead horse + to walk away now. 
Jeremy Corbyn: budget shows Tories are unfit for office.Trouble is, with his support for the Tory #Brexit policy, neither is he. Labour need a leader with a backbone to fight the madness.  
Good summary why sentience debate has so troubled #Brexit - @RSPCA_official happy to work with @DefraGovUK on way forward 
 Here's what @patrickharvie had to say on today's #Budget2017"...we know very well that our economy, and our society, are already being damaged by the UK government’s ‘hard Brexit’ obsession." 
Unsubscribe from Brexit by applying for an Irish Passport. Works for me.  
Here’s the core point: Brexit is a black hole, devouring everything around it. Nothing else matters and we are close to the Event Horizon.  
The Tory rebels missed the opportunity to inflict a defeat on the Government that would have strengthened their hand. Instead they went all weak at the knees and gave in based on a promise of cabinet that is full of Brexit supporters that we know can't be trusted. #StopBrexit 
BOLTON: The UK diplomatic service budget has been cut from £2bn to £1.2bn. A massive cut to a capability that is crucial to the UK's global reputation and success through Brexit and beyond - loopy! pic.twitter.com/DfBDM8KnFE 
When will people wake up to truth #Brexit is about sweeping away all rights & protections standing in way of profit?  
There are those saying that #PhilipHammond is spending more money on #Brexit than the #NHS.#Labour, what did you expect?This catastrophe is sucking all the air out of the room.#budgetday2017#Budget2017pic.twitter.com/WI8eY043XA 
You’ve got to hand it to the super rich and the racists. They pulled a blinder with convincing the Brits  to vote for Brexit. The future is theirs. 
Wouldn’t it be great if we’d a Chancellor with the chutzpah to say ‘hey, I found a way to raise the growth forecasts. Let’s ditch Brexit.’ 
The outstanding FoI work by @ShaunGDavey uncovered this utterly outrageous fact. The @scotgov has not been consulted or asked to contribute in any way to the Brexit studies, or been given access to them, despite formal requests.  
BUDGET REACTION: "We are now living a reality in which the chancellor has to commit £3bn worth of extra funds to Brexit planning and only £2.8bn extra to an NHS in crisis. Stick that on the side of a bus." 
European research and innovation has been incredibly successful over the years, but what might this look like after #Brexit?@royalsociety & @wellcometrust want your ideas on the future of research collaboration between the UK and EU!  
Jeremy Corbyn asked Theresa May a simple question about Brexit. She couldn’t even answer that. [VIDEO] #PMQs #Budget2017 
Brexit Impact Gradually Mounting for UK Corporates #Fitchwire  
DUP attempting to mislead public over Brexit trade proposals - @M_AndersonSF 
Murdoch always has a plan " B " & while Labour supports brexit nothing too critical in press about Corbyn for months now  
The only people empowered to genuinely talk down the economy are May, Davis, Rees-Mogg, Redwood & BoJo with their unnerving fantasies about Brexit. 
Just saw three red buses go down my road ... Bus 1 "£40bn to settle our EU bill." Bus 2 "£3bn to prepare for Brexit". Bus 3 "£1bn for the DUP to vote Brexit through" - where did that NHS bus go? #charlatans 
Govt cluelessness and opacity means the OBR has no more idea of Govt’s post-Brexit plans than the average newspaper reader. Stupefying slackness and complacency. Again.  
The NHS now has just £350 million to see it through the winter, rather than the £350 million a week it was promised by the Leave campaign  #Brexit #Budget #NHS 
The Tories are destroying this country with Brexit but Corbyn  even mentioning it at PMQ’s is headline news. Labour should be 20 pts ahead. His faction are backing him even if he costs the country Brexit and a functioning opposition. 
“That’s what post-Brexit Britain is going to look like, dropping to the bottom of G7 growth league, a shredding of growth forecasts, a threat to the wages, living standards and prospects of people up and down the UK": @IanBlackfordMP #Budget2017 
£3 billion allocated in @GovUk Budget for “every possible” outcome re Brexit.  Chancellor could therefore save £3 billion by going for the undoubtedly possible outcome of staying in EU…. #justathought 
As for me, I don't intend on voting Labour because I feel betrayed & abandoned by them.It's not even a case of "why bother" - if I didn't care that much about Brexit, I'd vote Labour over Tory any day.But I will NOT vote for any party with an extreme Brexit agenda.  
I don’t understand how you can oppose austerity and support Brexit. It’s a moronic position. 
Latest Brexit bus revealed. #Budget2017 
Yes, but think about all those lovely Blue Passports and the ability to weigh bananas in shillings, or whatever the Hell The Brexit lot wanted.  
Duncan Morrow, a man who more than almost anyone to encourage reconciliation in N Ireland, issues a very serious warning about #Brexit and Good Friday https://t.co/jFuKwI1uB3?amp=1 
We're spending at least £3bn on Brexit, let's take that money and spend it on the NHS...  
The Trump administration is now a referendum on Treason and Child Molestation. 
I wish this didn't still matter: How Brexit threatens our human rights, by me, for @89_up 
What a waste! Brexit soaks up £1.5bn of extra spending in 2019 (when NHS only gets £1bn more). Sadly that’s just the start of it. If ever there’s an example of throwing good money after bad, there it is. 
Anyone disappointed by the NHS budget pledge should get a big bus emblazoned with: "We're spending £3.7bn on Brexit preparations. Let's fund our NHS instead." 
“Tories spend more on preparing for Brexit than they spend on giving extra cash for the NHS - put that on a bus.”#budget2017 
So: the independent Office for Budget Responsibility asked for the government's plans for Brexit, for its forecasts.  The government pointed the OBR to Theresa May's Florence speech – and gave them *nothing else*.  So today's dismal forecasts include no Brexit impact.  
I don't want to pick a fight with anyone, but this is a terrible idea. Referendums gave us Brexit. People in Illinois voting in referendums gutted their own fire departments. Direct democracy by referendum works badly.  
Forget the UK paying off it's deficit by 2019, as Osborne promised, it wont now be paid off until 2022..and that's without BREXIT (IFS) 
To all my many Irish chums.Block BREXIT so we can leave without writing a cheque.Block it now, so we can switch our £1 billion monthly subscription to some useful.Come on Paddy, I'll buy you a large Jameson's.  
No British judge on world court for first time in its 71-year history. London loses EU agencies to Paris and Amsterdam. Britain has become a zombie state. The consensus is clear: there is no upside to a nuclear Brexit. #VeryBritishHeadlines 
Corbyn clear that the Govts Brexit plans are in disarray. So when is he going to reach the logical conclusion and OPPOSE BREXIT 
Philip Hammond has announced that the government will spend more on preparing for Brexit (£3 billion) than on extra cash for the NHS (£2.8 billion). "Tories spend more on preparing for Brexit than they spend on giving extra cash for the NHS" - put that on a bus. #budget2017 
"My next project will be a new album with The Good, The Bad & The Queen, and it will be about the Brexit. Although I have already written a kind of Brexit album with Parklife. Twenty years too early, though. I should have released it last year. (laughs)" - Damon Albarn 
We've spent almost £6bn on Brexit so far. Just imagine if that money was spent on the NHS, or on schooling, or on policing? When are we going to get a bus that says "Brexit has cost the NHS £6bn"? #Budget2017 
The government refuses to talk about it, but this #Budget2017 shows the real economic cost Brexit is having on households. The public have a right to be informed, government must release their #Brexit impact assessments. 5/5 
Ireland threatens to veto progress on a Brexit deal. So can 26 other EU Member States. Judge Schliemann says Brexit could be challenged in the ECJ.  The ECJ, for heaven’s sake! Time to walk away. 
NHS trusts given extra £350m for entire winter, despite Brexit bus promising £350m a week!  
I am optimistic about our future. About the success we can make of Brexit, the well-paid jobs that will be created and the homes we will build. That's @Conservatives - building a Britain fit for the future. #PMQs #Budget2017 
The Chancellor was like King Canute, waving his budget speech at the approaching Brexit tide.  This was his chance to confirm he'll keep us in the Single Market and Customs Union, the two measures most certain to boost the UK economy and productivity.  Instead he remained silent. 
Yup - and this is what’s meant by “Brexit at any cost”  
Brexit. £700m spent already, another £3bn announced today. That’s in addition to £2.1bn for extra civil service resource. £5.8bn so far folks 
What a mess. Analysis here from @OBR_UK - weak economy, Govt spending cuts, Brexit uncertainty hitting growth. UK poorer thanks to Tory Gov't  
Chancellor announced more extra cash for Brexit prep than extra for NHS; winter funding falls short of £500 million I called for in Sept; he's pushing ahead with fire sale of NHS assets; nothing for social care & still no details on a pay rise for NHS staff #Budget2017 
"£3 billion of taxpayers' money is disappearing down a Brexit black hole." - @VinceCable  
Given these levels of growth, by my maths UK total nominal GDP will drop not only below #France but by 2022 also below #India as well. In other words from the start of #brexit it wil go from being the 5th biggest economy to the 7th.  
Budget fully funded pay award Good, £10 billion capital Ok £2.8 billion baseline ? Poor ironically less than spending on brexit ) £350 million winter very bad too late to spend it so it’ll go straight to bottmline and will allow govt to blame nhs if things go badly wrong #blame 
New Counsel General for #Wales says Labour want as much influence as poss for Wales in #Brexit deal..... whilst all but 1 Labour MPs refuse to back @Plaid_Cymru amendment that would give Wales more influence! #Labourshambles 
Why can’t we give all the money we spend on Brexit to the NHS instead? 
£3.7bn set aside for #Brexit shocking. Will @BorisJohnson paint that on the side of a bus? #exitfrombrexit #budget2017 
Hammond’s #Budget2017 confirms poor post-Brexit economic performance. Downgraded growth means each person set to be £687 per year worse off. 
It says everything you need to know about this government's priorities that more funding has been found for Brexit than for our struggling NHS, schools and police #Budget2017 
Actually @IanBlackfordMP nails it: “What we are seeing is the UK falling to the bottom of G7 growth league. That is what post-Brexit Britain is going to look like, a shredding of growth forecasts, a threat to the wages, living standards and prospects of people up and down the UK" 
So Hammond is spending more on Brexit preparations (£3bn) than on the NHS (£2.8bn resource cash). That wasn't on Boris's bus. #budget2017 
It’s 2097. The 78th year of the Brexit transition. National debt is now 2990% of GDP. There’s one GP and one nurse left in the UK and we’re now the 189th richest nation in the world. They blame the Great Labour recession of 2008.#Budget2017 
“There’s no pot of gold under the Brexit rainbow”  Well said @NickyMorgan01 ... Making it absolutely clear that there is no ‘dividend’ coming in a complex, v costly Brexit... and saying so only damages public perception of politicians. #Budget2017 
IDEA: homeopathic Brexit. Diluted to the point where there’s no trace of Brexit left, but plenty of clueless believers will buy it anyway. 
Interesting question. If the Tories could solve, (or ameliorate) the housing crisis, how much would 'young people' continue to care about food-banks, Saudi arms, Brexit, etc? 
Like the pound going down, growth going down can be directly linked to the Brexit madness. An act of economic self-harm #Budget2017 
OBR says its short-term forecasts of the impact of Brexit on the economy (lower migration, higher inflation, reduced investment, boost to net trade) have been broadly correct, although impact (even) worse than expected 
So £3bn to prepare for Brexit and £2.8bn for the NHS - this is what should have been plastered on the Leave campaign bus! 
Also we need an attitude shift. Bashing Brexit is fine... but not bashing Leaver voters or showing incredulity at the reasons for their vote. Those who voted Leave and now are concerned are those who hold balance of power- we need to welcome them into discussions of ‘what now’. 
Just to be clear then, government planning to spend more on brexit than the NHS - £3bn to £2.8bn. Look forward to seeing the bus with that on driving around... #brexithaos #budget17 
The Government is planning to spend £3bn on Brexit in the next 2 years - that's more than the £2.8bn funding for the NHS. #Budget2017 
Spot on from @NickyMorgan01 "there is no pot of gold under the Brexit rainbow" (...though thunderstorm perhaps a better Brexit metaphor) 
Budget red book. Extra resource spending for NHS in 2019-20 = £1bn. Money set aside for Brexit preparations in 2019-20 = £1.5bn. #Budget2017 
Here are the key points from the UK Budget:- £3bn now set aside to prepare for Brexit;- growth forecasts cut sharply;- stamp duty abolished for first-time buyers on properties worth up to £300,000;- tax-free personal allowance raised to £11,850. 
To put #budget2017  in perspective, £2.32bn for NHS in 2018/19, £1.5bn to prepare for Brexit, £840m fuel duty freeze, £560m for stamp duty relief for first time buyers, £300m for softening impact of universal credit, £225m alcohol duties freeze. Are these your priorities? 
imagine what a weapon Brexit would be for Corbyn atm if he didn't personally support the bloody thing 
Are you optimistic or pessimistic about when the UK leave the European Union? @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn #PMQs #brexit RETWEET & VOTE  #YourVoiceMatters 
So the biggish politics of this #Budget2017 is that there will be £6bn stimulus in year before Brexit and £10bn in year after Brexit - to support growth expected to be lacklustre 
Government avoids defeat after MPs vote against retaining EU Charter of Fundamental Rights in UK law after Brexit  
Hi @LyleSheltonI'm confused.You said the survey was a referendum on Safe Schools & now that you lost the referendum, you're worried Safe Schools will be implemented...Kenny x  
Money for Brexit prep is around the same as the extra cash for the NHS 
The OBR is learning Newspeak. It's not Brexit that's bad for the economy but "Brexit-related uncertainty."  
£2.8bn for #NHS over 3 years. So govt spending more on #Brexit no deal prep (£3bn) than NHS; and that’s b4 we get onto divorce bill 
Without a clear policy on Brexit, all Corbyn has left is wind and self-righteousness 
Why spend £3bn in taxpayers money for #Brexit when we could stay in #EU for nothing?Madness.  Won't bother millionaires or tax cheats though#StopBrexitNow#Budget17 #Conservatives@Labour4EU @nickreeves9876 
The UK gets €3.4 billion net from the EU research & development budget - equal to more than a year of funds from the seven research councils. #Brexit puts it all at risk  #brexitshambles 
Here it is in black and white from the #Budget2017 red book - the BILLIONS being spent on #Brexit and preparing for no deal. @Open_Britain 
After Brexit, Britain wants to choose its immigrants. But some immigrants are no longer choosing Britain.  
We are pleased that the Chancellor has, for the first time, acknowledged that Britain can thrive because of Brexit - Patrick Minford #Budget2017 
#Budget2017 key points: - £3bn for Brexit preparations- £2.8bn for NHS in England including £350m now- £1.5bn to address Universal Credit concerns- £500m for broadband, 5G and AI- Stamp duty abolished for first-time buyers on properties up to £300,000 
NHS given £350m for entire winter, despite Brexit vow of £350m a week  
UK domestic law, which includes the #AnimalWelfareAct, does not mention #AnimalSentience, it does not cover animal sentience, and it does not protect animal sentience. Rejecting to enshrine animal sentience into UK law would be a backward step for #AnimalWelfare in post-Brexit UK  
Corbyn can’t say real wages are falling because of Brexit because he supports Brexit 
Joking aside, would like to see a politician seriously explain how UK will make back the £3bn a year Brexit will cost - plus the possible £40bn divorce bill - in new trade agreements and other Brexit benefits. Not platitudes about patriotism, just actual numbers. Anyone? 
It says everything you need to know about this government's priorities that more money is being spent in the next two years preparing for Brexit (£3bn) than on the NHS (£2.8bn) #Budget2017 
£34m to retrain construction workers is not nearly enough given the challenges - we have a gutted workforce & Brexit/ falling £ knocking out EU recruitment #Budget2017 
The very same children who would be forced into a lifetime of low paid unskilled jobs were it not for Brexit.  
#Blog In light of the ongoing #AnimalSentience debate, our Sr VP @RavetzGudrun explains why it's vital for sentience to be enshrined in UK law post #Brexit - and what you can do to help #AnimalWelfare #Article13  
So @PhilipHammondUK is promising just £3Bn extra for the NHS; so much for the extra £15Bn a year for the NHS that the charlatan and national embarrassment @BorisJohnson had emblazoned on the side of his Brexit propaganda bus. #Budget2017 
Alabama is a referendum on a sexual predator and Republican women will decide   
So @BorisJohnson, @PhilipHammondUK just completed the NHS part of his #Budget statement - no £350m extra per week for the NHS over the forecast period (upto 2021/2022) which continues well beyond the scheduled #Brexit date.  You need to explain why or apologise. RT  
Instead of £350m a week for the NHS the Chancellor's spending more the next few years on Brexit planning(£3bn) than extra cash for NHS(£2.8bn). Well done, Brextremists 
Chancellor has admitted today that #Brexit will already cost the UK £3 billion. That wasn't on the side of any bus. Costs still growing. 
Hammond promising extra £10bn for NHS over next 5 years, with extra £7.5 over next 2 years. Good. NHS is buggered without more cash.Just the fallen £ since Brexit vote costs the NHS about £1bn extra a year in purchases (half come from outside UK) #Budget2017 
Chancellor dodges ending public sector pay freeze and fully funding a public sector pay rise. Remember, this decade the worst in 210 years for wage growth. Coupled of course with increasing household costs from #brexit inflation. 
One German estimate of #CostOfBrexit is 2.98pc of UK GDP. That’s roughly £60bn. Chancellor today putting aside £3bn (plus £700m). Not only could we put that money to better use elsewhere, it doesn’t come anywhere close to what Brexit will cost us. #Budget2017 
Most of us don’t want a good deal on Brexit Jeremy. We want Brexit to be stopped. 
Well worth reading by anyone outside Northern Ireland who wonders how #Brexit could wreck much of what the Good Friday Agreement achieved, and why facile talk about electronic monitoring of goods etc avoids a deeply serious problem.  
Tories say one thing on Brexit, then do the opposite. They have no plan, no strategy and no energy to achieve a good deal for Britain. #PMQs 
The freezing of duty on alcohol means that it'll be cheaper to get drunk and ignore #brexit in 2019#Budget2017 
The government's back of a fag packet Brexit negotiation strategy is revealed.#Budget2017 
What is clear from today's #budget is that Brexit is going to mean the UK is going to lag far behind EU on growth in the future 
Certainly no game for us when @Kirstene4Angus who is (a) MP for RM Condor and (b) MP at core of soft fruit sector ran away from debates on (a) amphibious capacity & (b) Seasonal Workers Agricultural Scheme as - like deciding how to vote in EU Referendum - just #toohard #dithers 
Huge change indeed. So where is the Brexit boom?  
Chancellor admits have already spent £700m on Brexit preparations and will set aside £3.7bn more. That’s more than enough to properly fund our police being set aside to cover the cost of the mess David Davis making... #Budget17 
Still no mentionof NHS in #budget2017 - shows priorities when our national healthcare is about to collapse this winter... exacerbated by Brexit effects (EU nurses drop, fallen £ causing purchasing problems for NHS, EMA leaving) 
This is what the OBR downgrade means: £44bn knocked off the UK economy by 2021 #Budget2017 @Channel4News Basically, equal to the current Brexit divorce bill 
Whilst I welcome any money going into schools it’s totally out of touch with what the issues are facing our education system. It doesn’t even paper over the cracks. Where is the bold plan for Britain post #brexit 
Maybe Hammond should start promoting maths lessons for his Conservative colleagues, who are still pushing for a hard Brexit that will blow a hole in the public finances #Budget2017 
After Brexit there will be nothing to protect public services WITH. Our economy will tank, nobody will lend us a penny.  Labour won’t be able to implement its social programs.This is what the whole “Brexit is NOT the big issue when austerity etc etc” crowd are missing. 
The Brexit damage is becoming more and more obvious  
Growth forecasts. Down, down, down. Yet the Govnt still pursue the reckless hard Brexit that they lost any mandate for on June 8th #Budget2017 
Chancellor forced to squirrel away another £3BILLION to guard against costs of Brexit. Don't remember seeing that on the bus. 
Growth revised down for the next 5 years. Astonishing that as Britain slowly recovers from the crash we've sabotaged it with Brexit. #Budget2017 
If the intention is to strengthen then vote in EU protocol to law as a foundation and build on it. Voting against it makes me extremely suspicious of the govts intentions and motives post Brexit. 
The dashboard is flashing red and the government wants us to ignore it #Brexit  
Terrible GDP forecasts reflect UK's dismal productivity - a problem made worse by Brexit. #Budget17 
Thats #Brexit for you  
You are fundamentally asking people to trust the govt that they will strengthen rights rather than reduce them after Brexit but considering the quotes of people like Fox and Patel I don’t trust the govt to improve rights at all. I see it as a plan to reduce regulations and rights 
This petition got 100k signatures in one day. Now about to crack 200k. Please sign it and RT because the govt are using brexit to con YOU, remainers and leavers alike  
Next year, due to Brexit, they will be revised downwards again. I'll lay money on it. 
A year ago today, Iain Duncan Smith accused the OBR of "utter doom and gloom." Economists for Brexit group predicted more "humiliating U-turns" for the OBR. John Redwood said: "Their [GDP growth] forecast probably is too low."  
#Budget2017: £700 million spent on Brexit preparations, another £3 billion lined up. Government must be ready to walk away with No Deal!  
Will truly bleak GDP forecasts finally persuade politicians that the boring, technical issue of dismal UK productivity is actually the biggest challenge of our times? And, yes, I mean bigger than Brexit.  #Budget2017 
You could drive a bus through the gap between (lowered) growth forecasts & the rhetoric about how great Brexit’s going to be 
BREAKING: Britain's economic growth forecasts are cut in #Budget20172017: 1.5%2018: 1.4%2019: 1.3%2020: 1.3%2021: 1.5%2022: 1.6% 
An extra £3bn for Brexit. Wonder how hard they had to shake the magic tree to get that? #Budget2017 
Wow. Hammond sets aside an extra £3bn for Brexit preparation. A few weeks ago he implied it would be a waste of money. #Budget2017 
UK Chancellor @PhilipHammondUK announces a further £3bn for #Brexit preparations over the next two years #Budget2017  
Gov set to invest 3bn pounds in Brexit preparations, including no deal scenario. The right thing to do #Budget2017 
Hammond just said he'd spent £700m on Brexit preparations, would spend £3bn more... and then is prepared to spend MORE on Brexit... to show "resolve"#ThrowingGoodMoneyAfterBad#Budget2017 
Chancellor throwing money down #Brexit shaped hole when should be investing in the economy & our public services #budget2017 
Govt has set aside £700m for #Brexit And another £3bn allocated.-That wasn't on the side of the bus#Budget2017 
Chancellor confirms £3bn more to be spent on Brexit.  On top of the £40bn agreed by Cabinet yesterday.  They’re going to need a bigger bus. 
Hammond announces 3 billion to prepare for Brexit. Money that could be spent on our schools, hospitals and infrastructure is instead going to pay for a Tory hard Brexit 
Cost of Brexit planning up another £3bn on top of £700m already spent, says Philip Hammond. Well done, Brextremists 
“We have already invested almost £700m in Brexit preparations and today I am setting aside over the next 2 years a further £3bn” #Budget2017 
Hammond knows full well that the best way to protect jobs, businesses and investment is to stay in single market and customs union. But still insists on pursuing a damaging extreme Brexit #Budget2017 
 @IanBlackfordMP lets @Theresa_May know just how catastrophic her extreme Tory Brexit has become. #PMQs 
Tories esp Andrew Bowie MP terrified of the Scottish people getting to choose their future in light of UK changed status with Brexit. #pmqs 
Geez, another one of Theresa's Scottish Tories at PMQs. Talking about a 2nd independence referendum obsession. Looking at all their election materials this year it's them that's obsessed. 
This is what bothers me most about the handling of Brexit... there seem to be repeated moves by the Tories to make a bad situation worse. If it has *anything* to do with the EU, it must be dropped, just to satisfy a small group of extremists 
Full Times headline furiously tweeted by Tory MPs pre Budget strategically covers up last six words... “.. since Brexit cut value of pound”  
.@IanBlackfordMP is unhappy with the PM's answer about job losses after 2 EU agencies relocate before #Brexit #PMQs  
Theresa May shakes her head vigorously when  @IanBlackfordMP quotes the Bank of England on #Brexit job losses. More pesky experts intruding into Brexit la la land.....  #PMQs 
Jeremy Corbyn slammed the government's progress on Brexit at #PMQs, saying they have delivered very little in the 17 months since the vote 
Real disappointment is that felt by people & businesses of #Angus when you - despite being major MP for soft fruit sector - no-showed at WH debate on Seasonal Agricultural Workers Scheme - core industry of our local economy. Was it #toohard like voting in EU Referendum?  #dithers 
The utter hypocrisy of Corbyn raising #brexit at PMQs when he whipped his benches to vote for it is breathtaking! #Hypocrisy #Brexishambles 
PM: Week in and week out Corbyn comes in and talks down our country and is pessimistic about our future. I am optimistic about our future, about the success we can make of Brexit, of the jobs we can make and of the homes we can build #PMQs 
Well, we just saw why Corbyn never goes on Brexit. 
Corbyn actually raises Brexit at PMQs The self deluding cluelessness also applies to Labour with additional flip floppery. #PMQs 
Corbyn backs the Tories all the way on Brexit in every vote so he has no moral authority to moan to them about it at #PMQs 
.@Theresa_May and @JeremyCorbyn trade accusations over protecting rights for foreign workers after #Brexit #PMQs  
Why is Jeremy Corbyn arguing for freedom of movement post-Brexit when his manifesto said Labour would end freedom of movement? #PMQs 
I genuinely don't believe @jeremycorbyn lives on this planet... Criticises Tories on Brexit plan when half his Parliamentary Party voted against him this week!! #PMQs 
Punchiest Corbyn assault on May's negotiating tactics since he ceased for some barmy reason last year attacking a "chaotic Tory Brexit" at #PMQs 
“When it comes to Brexit this Government is a shambles” says Corbyn... Government front bench laughs at him... 
Simply havent heard Corbyn attacking PM on conduct of Brexit negotiations like this - will get lost in Budget - but v interesting development 
In his opening question at #PMQs Jeremy Corbyn gives Brit PM opportunity to clarify #Brexit position on Border in Ireland - she absolutely fluffs about once again with no substance 
It's actually weird even hearing Corbyn use the word 'Brexit'. It's like my mum talking about Grand Theft Auto. 
Incredible ! For the first time in a year Jeremy Corbyn asks Theresa May about something to do with Brexit at Prime Minister's Question Time !! #PMQs 
Holy shit Corbyn has asked a question about Brexit 
Theresa May's Top policy chief George Freeman quits after stark warning over the Tories' future“A narrow party of nostalgia, hard Brexit, public sector austerity and lazy privilege"“The defenders of a broken system”#budget2017 #PMQs 
NI being used as a bargaining chip was a certainty. That's why I couldn't figure out why the DUP voted for Brexit. Anyone who believed that Brexit would strengthen the union is either naive, daft or incompetent.  
#Brexit Britain needs #languages expertise more than ever, yet new @BritishCouncil report shows our "language deficit appears to be growing". Nearly 70% of Brits can't hold a basic conversation in another language (p.11). @UCML @LLASCentre  
THREAD: This thread documents my conclusions from my FoI requests regarding the 58 studies on the impact of Brexit. All of the following points take the FoI responses at face value in terms of their veracity. /01 
I am ashamed of the weakness of the British Government in these Brexit talks . They are humiliating us at what should be a moment of national pride 
#Brexit means more austerity @jeremycorbyn. Quitting the Customs Union & Single Market will hit the many & mean having to offer generous tax incentives to business & the rich to attract investment. Tory heaven, Labour hell!  Stop siding with Murdoch & Dacre #StopBrexit!#Brexit  
A blog on the situation we are entering in NI over a hard border.  My issue is not violence it is reconciliation- brexit is destroying our basis for working together 
On visit to Belfast, @simoncoveney rejects suggestions Ireland/EU trying to exploit NI uncertainty in Brexit talks. Claims UK “failing to provide credible answers to hard questions” on Irish border. @PA 
If Remainers respect Brexit, why are they still trying to tie Britain closer to the EU?  via @telegraphnews 
.@M_AndersonSF discussing Brexit and special status with EU Commissioner @CorinaCretuEU in Brussels and presenting her with a copy of the independent legal advice on special status 
English media casting Leo Varardkar as some sort of firebrand Irish nationalist is the funniest #Brexit development yet. 
British banks will leave single market after Brexit, European Commission vice president says  
“The lies and deceit of the Brexit campaign for Leave have been called out – never again will the public trust the Conservatives."   
Nigel Farage argues that the Brexit BETRAYAL has begun. 
Brexit deal in THREE WEEKS? Brussels warming to settlement as May prepares new offer  
Brexit has left Britain exposed to the sort of mockery and pity we once reserved for other countries.  
Irish ForMin speaking in Belfast about Brexit 'We're asking the hard questions and unfortunately we're not getting credible answers which is why I think some people seem to be uncomfortable.' (via @BBCGarethG ) 
Tory MPs all tweeting a cropped Times headline which says "Factory orders keep booming since Brexit"Actual headline: "Factory orders keep booming since Brexit cut value of pound"  
Thanks to Parliament's vote to scrap the #EUCharter, these rights are not guaranteed after #Brexit:- Privacy- Freedom of expression- Fair working conditions- Fair trial- Access to legal representation- Protection of personal dataBrexit. The gift that keeps on giving. 
Sinn Féin MPs are holding a public meeting in London alongside @M_AndersonSF to discuss the full impact of Brexit on the people of Ireland,  north and south.Come along to hear the case for Designated Special Status for the north within the EU.  
Govt has no majority, so can't take risks. It is stuck in a Schrodinger austerity web. And Brexit makes any spending lunacy anyway. 
6 times Hammond’s hands have already been tied by Brexit:£900m fall in Stamp Duty land tax receipts£517m to relocate European Medicines Agency£500m increase in deficit£412m to set up DExEU & DIT£250m no deal prep£1m to fight Miller case 
"Psychologically Brexit has had a huge impact," a doctor said. "You feel rejected as a group."  
Theresa May's Top policy chief George Freeman quits after stark warning over the Tories' future“A narrow party of nostalgia, hard Brexit, public sector austerity and lazy privilege"“The defenders of a broken system”#budget2017 
A view from our friends across the pond: “The slow motion self-immolation that is Brexit continues...”   
READ | @Arron_Banks’ interview with @bbcrussian: “For 25 years I was an opponent of the European Union. I joined the Brexit campaign because I wanted to see Britain again as a free and independent state. I believe in the idea of ​​a nation-state.” 
Brexit affects almost every aspect of our lives - including our universities, which 'face disaster within weeks' without clear Brexit plan  
Working in planning & specialising in housing supply issues, I can confirm @vincecable is right this is a critical issue.There's a significant mismatch between Govt's stated desire to increase house building & its desire to #brexit  
As @AdamRamsay and I have reported before, Brexit minister Steve Baker said Leave could create as many shell campaign groups as needed to spent £700k each  
Chancellor has a unique opportunity. With Brexit ahead of us, no matter how much remainers try to stop it, if we take the global route, make Britain more competitive - we’ll create long term prosperity for all 
UK universities 'face disaster within weeks' without clear Brexit plan  
#brexit #budget #honest #reliable #realistic #debtadvice #debthelp #moneyadvice #IVA #freedebtadvice #wednesdaywisdom #help #financialfreedom #debt #cycle #govt interest shooting to a record as Brexit vote hits  
This - in full - is the eyebrow raising leaked Steve Baker memo about referendum campaign spending we wrote about today. See bit in red  
You'd think @UKLabour would be running away in the polls like an interstellar rocket. Why do you suppose they are not? Looks to me like we will be having hung parliaments and bungs for the forseeable unless @UKLabour stands against BrexitChart courtesy of  
I must say I disagree with this. In my experience most Brexit voters have no desire for a "Singapore on steroids" approach and neither do I. Just a sensible, proud, self-governing country with control of its own borders please.  
"The slow-motion self-immolation that is Brexit continues for the U.K".   
So Brexit really is a sectarian, imperialist cargo cult? Are there any sensible leavers with a view on this?  
“Factory orders keep booming since Brexit vote”  #Headlines #EconomicGoodNews #Budget2017 
This is the worst government in my lifetime. Labour should be so far ahead they are worried about voter complacency. Stop backing brexit. 
More good news: factories have reported their biggest monthly boom in orders in almost three decades...'despite Brexit'  
Is this a visual metaphor for the Brexit negotiations?  
Ah #brexit. .. the only election result in history whereby the winners demand that the losers provide all the solutions to the problems caused by the winners. 
The New Yorker calls it "Brexit Madness"... WTF has happened to my country?  
Scottish ministers still haven’t had any information from the UK Government about the impact of Brexit on Scotland. It’s great fun being in this “United” Kingdom. 
"despite knowing that Vote Leave appeared to have contemplated acting unlawfully, the Electoral Commission went ahead and designated it as the official leave campaign"#BRExit #theresa_may 
Did Vote Leave commit a crime over its funding?@Jolyon Maugham outlines his court case focused on an dubious wheeze cooked up by Steve Baker, who was rewarded with a job in the Brexit Department 
Animal rights are important, however, are you asking yourself why their curtailment through Brexit is causing more outrage than the loss of rights of 3 million disenfranchised EU27 citizens in the UK?!?  
Expect a #Budget2017 that pays lip service to the marvellous opportunities of #Brexit - the reality is an unfolding economic calamity, says @MollyMEP 
Ian Blackford: The majority of Scots voted to remain in the EU. Extreme Tory Brexit is already having a damaging impact on UK before we’ve even left - we’re already losing jobs and investment. Vital to protect our place in single market & customs union. @bloombergtv #budget2017 
Why it’s not too late to step back from the Brexit brink | Jessica Simor  
The great Brexit betrayal gathers pace. What happened to the ‘red lines’?  
Brexit was promised as a way to help Britain's National Health Service. But the opposite may be true @kbennhold  
If Vote Leave cheated in the referendum, why should MPs feel bound by the outcome? Potentially very important work by the tireless @JolyonMaugham. 
The Irish Gov seems very principled over #Brexit. Not the sort to be ordered around. Unless, of course, your people vote against the Nice Treaty & Lisbon Treaty and the EU orders you to vote again. And they did. Twice. That principled. 
SDLP Leader @ColumEastwood makes clear that we have a duty to protect people and the economy here. That means remaining in the customs union and the single market. We didn’t ask for Brexit but we won’t stand by as it hurts people and communities here.  
Many conservatives want us to crash out with a hard Brexit. Most of Labour want us to crash out with a hard Brexit. God save us all. 
Latest Kantar poll (yesterday): Tories 42%, Labour 38%. Time for Labour to eject Corbyn & McDonnel Tory-Arslikhan dinosaurs & STOP BREXIT. 
All aspects of government work, including #Budget2017, heavily over-shadowed by Brexit. This particularly hurts industries that need long-term planning, like construction and infrastructure #CNSummit 
The best way to 'seize opportunities' from Brexit, Chancellor, is to make a clean break with the protectionist bloc and pursue global free trade    
Why doesn't Philip Hammond have the money to really boost our schools, hospitals and infrastructure. Because #Brexit has left him with less money to spend  
Maybots out on Budget Day in anti austerity protest amidst Brexit chaos!   @HueschH 
And also yet another Brexit issue not mentioned during the Referendum campaign  
The current political faultlines will last for years, no matter what happens with Brexit  
Easyjet looks to force UK shareholders to sell their shares because of Brexit. Once the UK leaves the EU, airlines must be majority-owned by EU nationals. 
The bittersweet fruit of the Brexit Elite riding roughshod over British democracy is that it is them that killed Brexit the moment they cheated voters. It's a Brexicide. #LeaveGate #Remain #RemainersNow 
Corbyn would not campaign with Tories for Remain, but voted with them for Brexit. His true colours. 
The darkest and most ignorant face of Brexit. Ashamed of our government. They are unfit for office, backward looking, inhuman.  
Where Brexit hurts: The nurses and doctors leaving London  
The so-called pre-referendum 'project fear' appears uncomfortably on track today...... 
Hammond will not tell us the most important thing about the public finances: #Brexit is going to trash them. Here’s why: #StopBrexit 
New post-Brexit solution for Northern Ireland: NI resides within the UK then the Republic takes it to stay in the EU every other weekend. 
A lot of Brexiteers - and some UK journos - buying into idea that Irish gov have some cunning United Ireland plan after Brexit. They don’t. They mean what they say.  
Brexit is not the fault of Labour, it is fair and squarely down to a Tory party who honestly thought the vote would be for remain. Johnson even went into hiding the day after. Put the blame where it needs to be. THE TORIES 
Because he hates the EU and wants to create some socialist la la land — which he envisages to work after Brexit crashes and burns the UK.  
No End in Sight to the Brexit Madness  
SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP: 'As Brexit bites, we need a budget for people and prosperity.' #Budget2017 pic.twitter.com/uUqGHXLoAq 
Brexit is clearly a hugely damaging thing for our country and yet Corbyn is blindly following the conservative’s lead...  
Brexit headlines, border red lines and a boy's dream holiday turns into a nightmare. Check out Wednesday's papers:  
More glorious #Brexit news. Bloomberg reports that production of Airbus wings here in the UK may be shifted to China. All going, well. 
My take-away from a day of meetings in Brussels: The issue of the Irish border is much more likely to scupper a deal on Brexit in December than money or citizens' rights. 'Thereis no solution that can satisfy IRE and UK', says one EU ambassador. @CER_EUDirector, CER 
18 months on and the penny is finally dropping: #Brexit does NOT mean "Slash immigration and keep everything else the same". It doesn't even mean "Slash immigration". It's simply a big balls-up. #StopBrexitNow. 
BREXIT: German push to stop UK’s EU exit. They should be more focused on telling EU negotiators to get on with it!  
First students arrive to 2017 EU Mock Council to discuss the impact of #Brexit on #Erasmusplus and citizens’ rights. 
Brexit update: 1. Divorce deal looks odds-on in Dec. Joint text being drafted.2. Dec 4-8 breakthrough week. Timing tight.3. Probs: Ireland + Brexit bill (EU reject divorce € tie to trade)4. Deal choreography there. Execution risk still significant 
Now, what was it the UK sister paper said.... "Irish Prime Minister should shut his gob & grow up on Brexit"  
Fighting Brexit is becoming increasingly like fighting ISIS: how do you defend against an opponent who is willing to blow his own brains out? #StopBrexit #FBPE 
How many years have the Tories been in government in WM to correct the VAT issue?Why the change now?Is it because Scotland after voting remain is to be dragged into the abyss with WM hard Brexit agenda? 
Documentary on #1Oct self-determination referendum in #Catalonia, with subtitles in #English, Spanish and French.#français#español@assemblea_int @VilaWeb_EN 
don’t forget their driving objective is to break up the UK, which would be an order of magnitude more damaging than Brexit 
Fundamental issue seems some UK politicos still don’t grasp is on one sense irish border is v straightforward- Post Brexit Ireland will be in one jurisdiction (EU) and one in another (non EU). That will require some form of custom control (as does everywhere in world) 
Brexit will have the greatest effect on the adults who voted 73% against it.Does that sound OK to you?#OFOC 
What for? You’re supporting Brexit. None of this really matters in light of your overall position.  
I don't see how Labour supporters can claim Corbyn is fighting Murdoch and Dacre, when he stands shoulder to shoulder with them in support of a #Brexit which will benefit the few while harming the many. #StopBrexit 
Good morning to all the ordinary decent people who voted in the best interests of our country, how are you feeling about Brexit today? Is it turning out how you thought it would? Are you happy with what is happening to the NHS, EMA, Aerospace & Motor industry already? 
UK budget day - test for UK Govt to end austerity, stop roll out of Universal Credit and end the uncertainty Brexit is causing. VAT rebate for police & fire falls a long way short of DUP £1bn payout 
Lord Kerr, who drafted Article 50, & many leading EU politicians say Article 50 is revocable. We can change our minds on #Brexit, or delay our Exit if we fail to reach a deal before March 2019. 
When is @AndrewRTDavies going up to Broughton to explain his theory of the £0.5bn / year Brexit dividend? #chancer 
Good morning to our amazing and fabulous  National Health Service and all the amazing people from near or far who work in it, how are you feeling about Brexit? Is it turning out for you how some of your colleagues, family and friends who voted for it thought it would? 
Some good Brexit news today? Nope!   
."The issue of the Irish border is much more likely to scupper a deal on Brexit in December than money or citizens’ rights.”. 
Why did UK lose its judge at the ICJ? @thetimes explains:1- global south wanted to stick it to a permanent member of the security council2- UK candidate associated w controversial dispute over Chagos islands3- anti-UK sentiment fuelled by Brexit/Boris.  
Finally! The intellectual justification for Brexit is eloquently set out by one of its leading proponents.  
Last night the Tories voted against my new clause 79 which sought to safeguard family friendly employment rights & gender equality post Brexit. Grateful to the 295 MPs who voted for it, especially those that added their name to the clause & that helped me navigate the process.  
MPs vote against retaining EU Charter of Fundamental Rights in UK law after Brexit Oh, only one Tory mutineer... I thought there were more. 
"Miserable CBI Forced To Announce Buoyant UK Manufacturing" - We slam CBI for doom and gloom. Their own report shows great #Brexit news :  
The Irish border is becoming the Kobayashi Maru of Brexit. 
Every day, a new (negative) complication for Brexit hitherto unknown to me hoves into view  
The tortuousness of Brexit negotiations will create big headaches for Theresa May in 2018  
Hard Brexit  
The enemy is not the EU or anti-Brexit MPs, the enemy is fear - An open letter from the Managing Director of REIDSteel 
Brexit minister dragged into Vote Leave spending row 
‘@Vince Cable said Davis’s suggestion the UK could keep the agencies showed just how little grasp the government has of the potential consequences of Brexit.’  
Hang on. I'm not done yet. And how do you justify sacrificing your promise to Labour voters of a "jobs first" Brexit at the altar of your impression of what the 52% wanted? /4 
Clear, insightful thought @dirktherabbitBrilliant Brexit trade threads @GuitarMoogGreat anti-Brexit snark @markpalexanderOn-the-money memetics @Dogtrouser_PI & @Remainia1Love em all Plus - they’re all verifiably REAL people   
Where is the *evidence* that they wanted this despite the fact it would make them worse off? Because the evidence is that only 11% of Leavers thought Brexit would make them worse off?  /3 
Here's the Shadow Trade Secretary on why he wants a Hard Brexit. A few thoughts... () 
I have started a UKGov Petition to ask that British people are shown a detailed breakdown of Brexit money to be paid to the EU, since legally we are not obliged to pay anything. I need 5 supporters before it can go live  
Ok, this Brexit thing has gone way beyond a joke now. Brexiters, mistakes are forgivable, if one has the courage to admit them. 
Former Brexit ministers STERN warning: UK shouldn't cough up cash UNTIL EU offers deal. You don’t pay a restaurant bill until you have seen the menu!  
Meat coming from slaughterhouses which do not follow EU regulations on Animal Welfare after Brexit will not be able to be exported to the EU  
Tories are up to their necks in it - nobody thinks May is good - and still they are 4% ahead. Reason? No point in Labour as long as they toe Tory line on biggest issue of the day - Brexit  
Brexit.  
‘Every single thing we export goes into the EU – we don’t export anywhere else’ Katherine Bennett of Airbus in Wales. Vital exports threatened by #Brexit 
BREXIT:Four decades in the EU have made us incapable of independent thought & action. We've lost our vision & ambition. We fear what the EU might do to us. We've truly become a European province; dependent on decisions made in Brussels & Berlin.  
Tories voted to strip Charter of Fundamental Rights from post-Brexit UK. Civic orgs warned rights to privacy,equality, freedom of expression,fair working conditions, a fair trial, access to a lawyer and the protection of personal data are all in jeopardy. #BrexitShambles #r4today 
The governments determination pushing this ahead is the same destructive determination pushing #Brexit Hinkley Point will 'hit the poorest hardest', say MPshttp://www.bbc.co.uk/news/business-42065837 
Cheap foreign labour has ruined our productivity. After Brexit, that will finally change 
Inch by inch, the Conservatives are surrendering every one of their Brexit red lines 
Airbus boss says Brexit risks losing UK aviation's 'crown jewels' to China    
Animals Today,The Poor Tomorrow.☟The Tories have voted that animals can't feel pain as part of the EU bill, marking the beginning of our anti-science Brexit  
To be alone against your enemies in 1940 was heroic. To be alone among your friends in 2018 would be absurd. #Brexit #UncoolBritannia @TheEconomist «The World in 2018» 
Johnny Marr has revealed that much of his upcoming 3rd solo album is about 'dislocation', having drawn inspiration from Trump and Brexit. Stating that he imagined an 'alternative society' in order to not let 'those fuckwits impede on creative process'. pic.twitter.com/bnzmjUSKd9 
‘It would have been better if Britain had not voted to leave the European Union in the first place’ @guardian editorial. Agreed, but it would be better if people were given the opportunity to vote again once they see the reality of #Brexit. 
After Brexit, Britain wants to choose its immigrants. But some immigrants are no longer choosing Britain.  
They still don’t get it... #Brexit is about stopping the slow motion EU coup d’tat of the United Kingdom. Control over immigration is a very small part of that. 
Losing London: Where Brexit Hurts: The Nurses and Doctors Leaving London  
Looking forward to hosting the #Brexit event this morning here in North Belfast. Wide ranging audience, all keen to hear our guest speaker Minister @simoncoveney 
Cambridge Analytica: involved in Brexit, Trump, Kenya and many elections in other countries. Fake news goes ranpant where ever they go *and* hate-mongering, racial division.  Psy ops. 
It’s not a political statement this but a simple question of why wouldn’t @Number10gov pay 17m to Manchester for the MEN arena bomb costs ( not much in the grand swing of things considering we are paying 40bn for Brexit ) and remove a huge ongoing headache from her lap. 
A weakened Merkel with less influence in Brussels will damage Macron and possibly hopes for a smooth Brexit, too  
Brexit is not a 'divorce' as the establishment like to portray it. The UK does not owe a penny.  
How many of yours @billshortenmp? How many of yours @TurnbullMalcolm?There was never a referendum to allow LAFHA to override the constitution. #TheProjectTV #abc730 #thedrum 
one of the biggest and most distressing things to come from Brexit is the NHS staff shortage:“The number of nurses from other European Union countries registering to practice in Britain has dropped by almost 90%.”  
Britain has 40,000 nursing vacancies: a tale of Brexit, broken promises and struggling hospitals  
US banker who worked 20 years in #London recommends #Frankfurt over #Paris  #Brexit #London @efc_global @eFC_UK @efc_de #Fintech 
I did my civic duty and buried @realDonaldTrump EVERY NIGHT to thousands of JUGGALOS across the United Kingdom  over the PA system! Maybe we just cancel Brexit and Cheeto's sad presidency & hit the reset button. #SprayTheUK 
We need truth about Russian subversion of EU referendum 
For those who voted for #brexit because they thought it would loosen the grip of the Tories.......We are now heading for a total dictatorshipWell done.Oh and don't get sick, become disabled or lose your job as they come for you first. 
No evidence of Russian meddling in Brexit votes: Johnson  
The world wakes up! US Governor says country stands side by side with UK as he blasts EU - A US Governor launched a tirade against European Union chiefs for issuing a Brexit “ransom bill” on Britain. @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP @realDonaldTrump 
Stoke-on-Trent joins Cornwall and Grimsby as latest Brexit stronghold to demand exemption for itself from Brexit.#JawdroppingBrexiterHypocrisy 
Puigdemont attributes losing European agency to Spain's violence on referendum day  
Paid close attention to the rise of Trump and Brexit's Leave campaign, the key is hitting the issues that most concern average people & presenting a positive future where those issues have gone away. Brexit's Project Fear and HRC's anti-Trump attacks were both losers with voters. 
Morrissey’s Brexit love affair makes him the last true rock’n’roll rebel  
Seeing a lot of people more angry than ever before in my life. Brexit and Trump has shown us that ordinary people, acting together, make one helluva difference when we use the ballot box. Our voting motherlode is reaching out to mobilize those the progressives have marginalized 
Brexit talks. #ChinaDailyCartoon 
Passportless Canary Wharf is sitting on a Brexit time bomb  via @LondonEconomic 
Bringing it home - Brexit is a major threat to the prosperity of North Herts #Hitchin #Stevenage. This relates directly to two of the biggest local employers  @StevenageLibDem @WelHatLibDems 
Join us as we co-host @kinsellawarren for a special morning lecture, “Rise of the Far Right in the Trump/Brexit Era: Lessons for Political Communication”. Nov 30th, 8:30-10am, Fenn Lounge. Only 5 spots left!  
Ciao Millenials,We're really sorry we've given you £50k student debt, Brexit chaos, falling wages, dreadful productivity, unachievable house ownership & increasing pollution.Here's a railcard that'll save you a few quid, shall we call it even?Love Theresa and Phil#Budget2017 
Just FYI, the Italian constitution forbids holding a referendum to decide issues such as membership of the European Union, leaving it exclusively to elected law-makers.Controversial, but:  
40bn bill just the start...how can we begin to quantify the lost revenues over the decades to come...& that pales into insignificance, as will the UK, when compared to the lost prestige & influence...#Brexit shames us & most MPs now represent the worst in us...#StopBrexit. 
Is a Stormont debate on Brexit really too much to ask?  
UK firms 'excluded' from space contracts by BrexitWell what's the point of playing an important role in such programmes; most #Brexit supporters can't see beyond the White Cliffs let alone into Space..Binding #FinalSay Ref in 2018 + #StopBrexit & #Remain  
Labour leadership is in denial. I would only vote Labour if it commits to stop Brexit, whose  impact is being ignored.Labour must: 
My Alabama people, unfortunately the #ALSen race has turned into a referendum on YOU! Vote for @GDouglasJones & show America who you really are! #ProWomen #AntiRacist #ProFriedFish& if you aren't an Alabamian then spread the word or donate to ! Thank YOU! 
We agree, and that’s why we’re fighting unequivocally to stop Brexit - and for our Party to be true to its internationalist values.Vast majority of Labour supporters and members oppose Brexit - our voices need to be heard! 
Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn thinks we will forget how he propped up the Tories and helped drive the UK to the Brexit cliff edge. I won't forget, I won't forgive.#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
The Corbynite @UKLabour has betrayed not only the millions of progressive people who opposed #BrexitBut the millions who voted for leave but now feel betrayed by the false promises of the Brexiteers. 
Brexit supporters are polite and quiet.We don’t waste a ton of time arguing with arrogant remoaners/protest on the streets,value then mock democracy/we quietly enter into our local voting booths,cast our votes and victory/Very simple.We don't have to shout in faces 2 be heard! 
Beset by internal divisions and other problems, Theresa May’s government has barely made any progress in negotiating the terms of Brexit.  
Still waiting for them 58 Brexit reports @DavidDavisMP... 
FuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexitFuckBrexit#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
Davis is still holding onto/ frantically editing the 58 Brexit studies. He was ordered to hand them over immediately...  
Regrettably, I think @johnharris1969 called it:“The only way [Brexit] delusions will fade is if they are finally tested in the real world and found wanting, whereupon this country may at last be ready to humbly engage with modernity”  
PM avoids humiliating Commons defeat on Brexit after buying off Tory rebels  
Slanted intro to @bbclaurak piece which presents lines from DUP alone as credible & growing questions. DUP on wrong side of NI referendum votes for GFA & against Brexit. Let's not 'over-egg' their credibility or retail sneers about well-founded misgivings of democratic Ireland.  
Thing is, if Labour came out for Remain they WOULDN’T win. The wheels are coming off this government. Labour are propping it up.Right now LABOUR - NOT the Tories - are the party that’s making Brexit happen. 
More people need to see this video...  #Brexit #StopBrexit 
What is most shameful is he must know Brexit will hit the poorest the hardest.His position is morally reprehensible.  
SDLP Brexit Spokesperson @ClaireHanna has hit out at the DUP and Sinn Fein on their failure to protect the Charter of Fundamental Rights in a crucial vote in Westminster #BrexitBillDUP and Sinn Fein are handing Theresa May Brexit on a plate.Read here:  
The brilliant "Brexitlandia Updates" from @37payday are becoming required Brexit reading!  
The EU Charter of Fundamental Rights protects:DignityEqualitySolidarityCitizens' rightsJusticeThe May government says it is copying all EU laws into UK law for Brexit.But not this one. 
Britain's delusional, rose-tinted view of its old imperial 'glories' provides the emotional underpinning for entire Brexit disaster 
The EU protocol on animals being sentient beings allows bullfighting, veal farming, foie gras ‘production’, live exports for slaughter and cruel fur product imports. British animal welfare laws are the highest globally and on Brexit we’ll be free to strengthen them further still. 
I’ve just discovered you’re the numpty who encouraged The Economist’s Berlin corrrespondent to start a new anti-Brexit centrist party. From Berlin! Closed down in hours. But you want me to take you seriously!  
You Brexit folk keep finding new and wonderful ways to get around saying "You voted Brexit because you were concerned about globalisation, so we're going to accelerate it. That's what you wanted, right?" 
Britain was duped by this man.#Brexit  
"In terms of Brexit we have a voice at the table through our MEPS. The solution is designated special status" #ViewFromStormont .@newbelfast 
The most depressing thing about all the Labour supporting Brexit-apologists is the knowledge that if Jeremy Corbyn suddenly came out for Remain, every damn one of them would be a staunch Remainer by this time tomorrow. 
I’m a lifelong Labour supporter, voter and member. I’m close to jacking it all in due to your Brexit stance. The stance of labour is doing nothing but enabling the Tories. 
"Brexit of course we know is a calamity. It is a threat not only to our economy but to the Good Friday Agreement" .@newbelfast #ViewFromStormont 
#BrexitShamblesDavid Davis stumbles off stage as he flees Brexit speech after dodging questions 
.@RichardHaass says NI politicians who supported #Brexit made an "historic mistake"  
Slowly and surely we are losing our place in the world. Yesterday we lost two EU agencies and add to that losing our seat in the UN court after 71 years. It won't be long before we are thrown off the UN Security Council. Brexit Britain is a weaker Britain. #StopBrexit 
An article that I have written on the historical context and causes of #Brexit.   
To give this story correct context ... EU's Galilee project, which UK are still paying for (2nd largest EU net contributor), has stopped funding UK projects, while EU demands ever more Brexit blood-money on dubious grounds. Taking the p*ss.  
“Oh, shut up, Paul! Corbyn wants the best for the country and its people! He’s playing the long game! He’s a master of strategy! In 2029 he will oppose the government on Brexit and then you’ll see how amazing his strategy is!”*head meet desk*  
We did warn you this was exactly what Brexit would mean.Corbyn wanted this, and he is your party leader.  
Who knew that Brexit would mean a loss of so many jobs? Oh, really? Everyone? Everyone knew? Are you sure? But... oh, I see.  
 No such thing as "Hard Brexit".Just Brexit.No such thing as "opposing Brexit".Just opposing democracy.No such thing as a Britain "supporting the EU".Just opposing Britain.Get a fucking grip, recognise your own nation and get behind it! #BrexitMeansBrexit 
All this brexit shit going on and all problems around the world And we still haven’t called the A teamWhere’s Hannibal,face ,Murdock and BA when you need them 
You can get my Brexit negotiation update information here - my way of keeping you informed & being your voice in Europe click on the link  
A government that truly cared about the prosperity and wellbeing of the many would stop Brexit by any means necessary. By tacitly supporting it you are helping the 0.1% of tax dodgers. 
Over 80 civic organisations are trying to fight for our rights, but tonight they lost the vote to the Government. These are rights that some of the Brexit Tories would rather we didn't have. The best way of protecting those rights now is to #StopBrexit 
You Said: You’re angry about tuition fees, debt, lack of graduate jobs and affordable housing, Brexit.We Did: We’re raising the age limit on a Young Person’s Railcard to 30.#YouSaidWeDid 
This is so unbearably sad. The Britain I loved and I lived in so long has succumbed to conquest by opportunists, dumbarses and dolts.#brexit  
Meddling European court could DELAY Brexit for a year, warns EU judge   
People saying #Brexit will jeopardise the peace process in Northern Ireland need to stop being so reckless. Life is goin on as normal here "despite brexit" & issues at Stormont. Northern Irish folk have had to handle lots down the years, scaremongering over our peace isnt welcome 
Steve Bell on the state of the Brexit negotiations – cartoon  
This ain't goodAirbus boss says Brexit risks losing UK aviation's 'crown jewels' to China 
Tory minister: Now 'no guarantee' UK will keep free trade deals with more than 65 countries after Brexit...So: “Global Britain”“Trade deals done on day one”All false. Stop the deceit. #StopBrexit. 
‘We ARE leaving the EU’David Davis: “The department I run, Dexeu, isn’t called Department for ‘getting a deal come what may’, it is called Department for EXITING THE EU & whatever happens we are leaving the #EU on instructions of British people”#Brexit 
Great speech by @SimonClarkeMP this evening on how Human rights are protected in UK law & how the #EUWithdrawalBill creates certainty during Brexit 
There is no free press when it is dominated by a coterie of tax-dodging billionaires all peddling the same hard-right pro-#Brexit propaganda. #StopBrexit. 
Many moderate, sensible Tories are horrified at what's happening to our country. #Brexit isn't Conservatism, its ideological dogma dressed up as democracy. Our years of industrial progress are at risk - millions of jobs on the line. British ppl were lied to, time for the truth 
We look forward to seeing government proposals on protecting EU charter rights. These fundamental rights are essential to what kind of country Britain will be outside the EU. #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
The people of Zimbabwe are partying in the street. Now, cancel #Brexit and the British people can do the same! 
Full implementation of Good Friday Agreement will not be possible if there is regulatory divergence with NI after Brexit -Coveney 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Budget 2017: Hammond to 'seize opportunities' from Brexit  
MPs blocked Labour's move to keep the Charter of Fundamental Rights after Brexit by 311 votes to 301. "The Charter...guarantees everything from data protection to freedom from slavery and torture."  
Any normal working man or woman who voted for #Brexit;you were conned.It’s not about taking back control for the people it’s about putting us all back in chains.  
Double your money, Theresa May – the true Brexit bill will be £80bn | Hugo Dixon  
Voting late in the House of Commons to secure the EU Withdrawal Bill at Committee Stage - so far winning every vote to deliver BREXIT for all the people of our United Kingdom!  
Brexit Diary: A “reality check” for RemainersNew post at Jack of Kent:  
Philippa Stroud, CEO of Legatum Institute was Special Adviser to Iain Duncan Smith from 2010-15. Gove, Paterson, Lilley and Jenkin have been involved with the Institute. Does the lunacy of a hard Brexit have another dimension for some...a more personal one? @ThatTimWalker 
My take-away from a day of meetings in Brussels: The issue of the Irish border is much more likely to scupper a deal on Brexit in December than money or citizens' rights. 'There is no solution that can satisfy IRE and UK', says one EU ambassador. @CER_EU 
MPs vote against retaining EU Charter of Fundamental Rights in UK law after Brexit  
Tories have just prevented the Charter of Fundamental Rights being transferred into UK law post-Brexit. Imagine what they must have planned... #EUWithdrawalBill 
#Tories voted that #animals can't feel pain and aren't #SentientBeings.  My response.#Brexit #StopBrexit #Brexitshambles #AnimalSentience #animalsfeelpain #AnimalsAreSentient #FBPE 
Clem Atlee @RupaHuq and I send our fraternal greetings to  Ealing Momentum where we were due to speak tonight but we were detained in the House for the Brexit votes  
I've been Labour all my life, been a member since the 80s, stuck with it through the Blair aberration, voted for Corbyn twice but will not vote for him or Labour again if they don't change their stance on Brexit. 
Britain's aerospace industry needs seamless movement of parts and people if it is to survive brexit. Both Conservative and Labour are intent on policies that will effectively abolish the industry in the UK.  
It really is quite staggering that to date I've not heard one Remoaner or Remain endorsing outlet complain about the clouds of uncertainty gathering over Germany and at the very heart of Europe but never stopped banging on about them when it came to #Brexit, selective remoaning. 
,@theSNP open letter to @jeremycorbyn asking why he is supporting the Tory brexit ?#FBPE #StopBrexit #exitfrombrexit #remain 
Very good article, not least for the reminder that a Canada Style deal is what used to be, and still should be, called a Hard Brexit. A No Deal Brexit should properly be termed "Kamikaze Brexit".  
UPDATE: MPs have voted DOWN Labour's amendment to the Brexit bill which was to keep the EU Charter of Fundamental RightsVote was 311 to 301 - the smallest margin for this bill so far. 
Siemens (aren't they a GERMAN company?) investing in post Brexit Britain too!  
I quit my @UKLabour membership after #GE2017 Like so many, we were fooled. @LibDems tactically voted Labour and so did many others thinking that Labour would go #SoftBrexit Now, my whole family won't vote Labour over #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Priti Patel's recent article in The Telegraph on how fantastic #Brexit will be for us plebs is best summed up via the following photo:  
The government wins a crucial vote on removing the EU's Charter of Fundamental Rights after Brexit Ayes - 301Noes - 311Majority - 10  
Brexit means....950,000 job losses. Average household £3,700 worse off by 2020.£400 billion loss to the UK economy by 2030.We're taking back control...We've got our country back...Just think of those lovely blue passports...FFS. 
Can we just have @antanddec on telly non-stop until Brexit is over.... and Trump has been booted out. The world would be such a happier place. #ImACeleb 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Hilarious. So this is Zimbabwe [formerly Rhodesia] a country that was originally formed on UDI. In fact it invented the term Unilateral Declaration of Independence? Yet Catalonia UDI (via a referendum) does not seem to be OK with the EU..but hey a coup d'état is perfectly cool. 
Barring a major Brexit breakthrough, Britain's banks will begin moving staff in early 2018  
The plan all along, Legatum called for it minutes after the result...that would be the result of the ADVISORY referendum!!!  
UN says referendum issue is resolved, urges KRG to accept court ruling  
Hartley-Brewer TEARS into Lib Dem MP after he tries to justify €40bn Brexit divorce bill   
Foreigners could be deported after Brexit if appeal for settlement is not heard in time  
Brexit needs to be defined by bravery and boldness by the UK, Owen Paterson says  
Brexit minister says that Art. 50 can be reversed.  
Why is Labour colluding with the Tory Right to push Britain into a hard #Brexit after which Britain would have no choice but to make a trade deal in which the USA would force the privatisation of much of the #NHS?#StopBrexit 
HEY, IRELAND…! Daily Mail readers would like you to get your treacherous, Guiness-swilling, IRA-sympathising, peasant noses out of their utopian Brexit or they’ll put a minefield on your precious border, ban your products and force you back together with NI.That cool? Cheers.  
Well that's it. Coming up to 8 hours debating Brexit & human rights. Looks like Tory rebels are running away. Glad at least I got on record. 
Catalonia referendum - It's illegal says the EU.Zimbabwe coup d'état - hey that's cool with the EU.  
The #Tories have voted that #animals can't feel pain as part of the EU bill on #Brexit. Animals want us to use every word we have to describe this  My go!Political masturbation superseding sanity to deny #animal suffering! They  deserve only contempt!RT if you agree! pic.twitter.com/fvIpW9ZDWW 
Exclusive image of the May cabinet meeting to agree the BREXIT 'divorce" settlement,  
“Who needs space anyway? We’ll be happy on our own little Brexit island, pretending it’s the 1950s, before space even existed!” 
With @duponline Westminster team and @BorisJohnson discussing Brexit at the House of Commons.  Ensuring the Government delivers the best outcome for Northern Ireland as an integral part of the United Kingdom. #noborderintheIrishSea #nohardborder 
Fair enough. But be honest then @BarryGardiner You’re after a Brexit that puts politics before jobs and the economy. And essentially the same Brexit the Tories want.   
UK: MPs vote on #Brexit Bill undermines animal welfare. Does not recognise that animals feel pain & emotion. This defies scientific knowledge. SHAMEFUL!  @peta @PETAUK @thebuav @NAVS_UK @captiveanimals @AnimalDefenders @ScottishSPCA @RSPCA_official 
Brexit: Banks to start shifting jobs from London in months and there’s little Theresa May can do about it 
Think we are getting Treeza rattledCaught her coming out of Downing Street tonight with flags and Bernie’s big bollocks to Brexit bannerPolice came and had a word2nd time in 1week#StopBrexit@No10Vigil @RemainerAction @EUflagmafia 
If you believe in multiverses, it's comforting to know that alongside ours there exists one in which Remain won the referendum, the £ hasn't collapsed, the UK economy has improved along with EU's, inflation is under 1%, & UK hasn't become the worst-performing developed economy. 
BREXIT GLOOM: B&Q and John Lewis warn of tough market as inflation and Brexit bite / #Brexit #StopBrexit  
Irish warn May: £40bn can’t buy you Brexit talks.Irish PM threatens to veto Brexit talks unless border stays open.“Taking back control”#StopBrexit 
'The EU is holding up Brexit!' Top law professor BLAMES EU for causing Brexit DEADLOCK  
A lot of reputations will suffer when  Brexit crashes and is a failure. That might help explain the desperate acts of those trying to shove it through. #RemainerNow #LeaveGate 
Would 52% have voted for Brexit if they had been told at the outset that we would be leaving customs union and the single market and there would be no trade deal and the NHS would be completely deconstucted. Brexiteers are mostly idiots, but almost no-one could be that stupid. 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
As a paid-up, card carrying member of the bleeding heart, metropolitan, broadsheet-reading, liberal elite, I'd just like to point out that you're all insane. Especially the fascists, Islamophobes, bigots, racists, Brexit headbangers & those who sit in more than one of those camps 
Still Not Enough: Brussels Not Happy With Doubled Brexit 'Divorce Bill' Offer  
Highlights of lastnight's @imacelebrity have to be:- Toff and Stan talking brexit and Boris- Jack explaining vlogging to Stan... Just couldn't write it man - Poor Jenny talking about her little one and getting upset! She's just such a lovely normal Mam!!!  
How does one reduce a Brexit bill? Asking for a friend. #Martinlewis 
Noticeable during the EU Withdrawal Bill debate no one is saying any of the EU laws being taken onto our statute book are bad laws or an example of why #Brexit is necessary. General agreement they are good laws, not surprising as we had a hand in making them! 
The media keep telling us that Brexit is bad but the facts keeping knocking them out of the park!   
Taking into account the present progress with Brexit negotiations,  Should Scotland Be An Independent Country ???Retweet for a wider audience too. 
Have you been mis-sold Brexit? Make your claim to remain TODAY! #StopBrexit #JoinUs 
So, to sum up: there is literally no right, no job, no home, no family, no life that Lilico would not happily destroy in pursuit of Brexit.  
Sounds like govt folding on amendment in Commons to avoid defeat on Brexit bill tonight on human rights amendment - Tory rebels claiming important concession 
This is extremely disgraceful and cheap of the #UN to do. The referendum was an expression of popular will of Kurdish people. The court in question itself has very weak, perhaps no, legal & constitutional standing, largely follows the will of executive branch in Baghdad.  
"IRELAND & BREXIT: The Case for Special Status" - Public Briefing next week in London - 19:00, TUESDAY 28/11/2017, Grimond Room, Portcullis House, Westminster - Speakers: @M_AndersonSF MEP, @ChrisHazzardSF MP, @GildernewM MPAll WELCOME. PLEASE SHARE. 
And we're seeing pertinent examples of this behaviour right now, on both sides of the Atlantic. #Brexit #Trump 
The UK sends £250m a week to the EU (not £350m). UK population: 65m.The average each person pays the EU per week: 250m ÷ 65m = 3.84 - so approx £3.84 per week.The average household is ALREADY £7.75 worse off per week since Brexit.  That will just keep rising. 
Reading @ShippersUnbound account of how shabby broadcasters at ITV tried to fix the EU referendum debates with Downing St. Awful people 
watched not-reporting Scotland for the first time in months. Honestly that is exactly what the format is. Nothing serious which is in remit of WM.  Just local stories - the equivalent of a local paper. Nothing about how brexit will affect Scotland, nothing about Arctic Conference 
See how the goalposts have moved to the right. It began as a choice between Remaining or Leaving, then moved to one between soft or hard Brexit and now it's between deal or no deal. What next after the govt opts for no deal? 
Earlier I made a speech, highlighting the importance of copying the EU Fundamental Rights Charter into British Law. If Brexit ever does happen, we have loopholes in our law that this legislation needs to fill.  
Reality is beginning to dawn on some Tory Ministers!#Brexit will make the UK more insular, more protectionist and less wealthy!We need to #exitfrombrexit 
Not unexpected, Gove causes chaos everywhere, then departs leaving others to clear up the mess. 
"Being Brexit Minister is very much like making love to a beautiful woman. . ."  
My colleague @Rory_Palmer looks into the consequences of losing the European Medicines Agency due to #Brexit : 
Expect a budget that pays lip service to the marvellous opportunities of #Brexit - the reality is an unfolding economic calamity. My thoughts on #Budget2017 for @HuffPost  #Budget2017 #BrexitReality 
It is just staggering. Brexit: The Russian Job  
To those who say we have to plow on because to do otherwise ignores the yawning gap in our society: Brexit will make it worse, and the victims will not thank you for it. Let’s all strive for real answers - not Johnson & May’s magic beans.  
Seems @realDonaldTrump is looking out for America whilst @theresa_may is screwing #Brexit and the UK! Oh for a strong leader instead we have an appeaser in May. 
After losing a referendum to extend his powers, Mugabe invaded farms, which were then distributed to the ZANU elite, not ordinary citizens 
A thought about Tory Brexiter MPs. Many are not rich enough to make effective use of tax havens. They envy those who can. So they dream of a Britain in which the averagely rich can enjoy the tax privileges of the super-rich.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
My lecture at King's College, London - on Brexit & Intermarium, 15 Nov 2017  
Sums up the cult of Brexit very well, they don’t know why they want it but they want it at literally all costs.  These people shouldn’t be indulged, post enlightenment, people like this should be ignored and ridiculed, otherwise you end up wrecking the country on a whim. #Brexit  
#Labour are whipping their MPs to vote for a hard Brexit. If you ever harboured any thought that #Labour would come to its senses, forget it! The #Corbyn 'phenomenon' is a chimera. #BrexitLabour is the only Labour. Britain desperately needs a new party. 
I’m wondering why UK citizens aren’t demonstrating on the streets by nowIt’s not just #BrexitIt’s the sheer incompetence and outright lies of @Conservatives Government/@UKLabour opposition & media alike We’re “embarrassed” by itWhy aren’t we raging mad? 
Labour can forget getting anywhere near number 10 now. The remainers took a punt on them but next time round that vote will go elsewhere. Had their chance, backed Brexit and blew it. Think JC thought it was him who was popular! Very misguided. 
I am a “remainer”. He appeals to me. You don’t speak for me. I want Brexit stopped but @jeremycorbyn made it quite clear at the GE that @UKLabour accepted the referendum result. @LibDems offered a 2nd referendum, why didn’t they do better?  
Barnier warns any future trade deal could be blocked if the UK indicated it was planning to move away from EU standards of regulation on issues like food safety, workplace protections and the environment #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Airbus boss says #Brexit risks losing UK aviation's 'crown jewels' to ChinaUK operations chief tells MPs trade barriers and restricted movement for staff will put thousands of jobs in Wales at risk#StopBrexit 
This would be a disaster. Govt must protect British travellers & businesses by securing a Brexit deal that allows for proper transition to ensure there’s no disruption to travel plans. 
I despair at the #UK gov & @theresa_may. They've had since 24 June 2016 to get  this right. Massive support behind them if they'd done so, which they didn't. You do not waver publicly in the face of an opponent. But they have not merely wavered, they've capitulated! #BBC #BREXIT  
The sort of secrecy surrounding Brexit is on par with what we might criticise in Erdogan’s Turkey or Putin’s Russia.  
The Electoral Commission has opened an investigation into Vote Leave's spend during the EU referendum.  
Delighted to be publishing this piece by @BenPBradshaw who has been tirelessly campaigning to unearth facts about Russian interference in Brexit referendum  
In tonight’s @standardnews, @Keir_Starmer warns that the Tories will use Brexit to roll back fundamental rights.  
EU diplomats: £40 billion Brexit bill not enough  
What's the point in voting labour? You get Brexit economic suicide cake with a nationalisation cherry on the top.  
Never forget. This man created #Brexit chaos because of an internal Tory party feud. He then knighted all his mates (and f***ed off)  
Any politician with any guts would say: “Brexit is a huge mistake. I cannot impoverish my children and grandchildren. We must think again.” 
Rule of law in UK at risk after Brexit, says former supreme court president  
D Davis, who claimed German car makers would ensure UK-EU free trade deal, greeted with confusion and derision by business leaders in Berlin. Foundations of so much of Brexit turning out to be false. 
So, the most important aspect of 'brexit' for you, is the 'Running Away' aspect, is it ? 
Forget the DUP. We are ruled at the moment by a Brexit coalition of Tories and Labour.A plague on both their houses!#StopBrexit 
Isn't it clear, now, Labour supporters.  Corbyn votes with the Govt. Wants Brexit as much as they do. Time to desert the party that is not an effective opposition. MPs need to speak up now. @chukaUmunna @Keir_Starmer @labour4EU #stopbrexitnow Vote tactically @anyonebuttheTor ies 
.@guardian covering @IanBlackfordMP's letter to Jeremy Corbyn asking why his front bench abstained on one of his MPs own amendments, which would have helped protect the UK's place in the customs union. #Brexit  
If there is a hard Brexit Britain's asset values will tank. The wealthy will make BILLIONS buying up Britain on the cheap. Is true motivation of hard Brexiters to become mindbogglingly wealthy - at your expense? Why would any intelligent person support Britain's economic suicide?  
NHS England might lose all EU nurses by June 2021. Read more about my research here @The3Million #Brexit #nhs 
Thread to watch:Some benefits of Brexit are soon to be unveiled. Watch and RT this thread and they will be added in real time as they appear. 
Brexiteer  Julia Hartley-Brewer @JuliaHB1 TEARS into Treacherous  Remain Lib Dem MP @thomasbrake after he tries to justify €40bn Brexit divorce bill   
#Exclusive: Bill Bragg talks to TLE about politics, patriotism, socialism, Brexit and the reality of life in 2017  @billybragg 
And the betrayal continues New Brexit row looms as Immigration Minister says European court jurisdiction 'part of negotiations'' | via @telegraph 
‘EU is trying to cause panic on streets of Britain – we should scrap Brexit talks and go’  
Airbus boss says Brexit is putting the “crown jewels” of Britain’s aviation industry at risk.7,000 aviation manufacturing jobs in Wales could move to China as a result of Brexit. Stop the job losses. #StopBrexit. 
Does anyone know if its legal for Govt to hand over taxes raised in UK to a foreign Govt without any concrete independent verification that the monies are owed? #UKIP #Brexit #Leave 
Remainer-Level Economics Exam Question 1. "If Britain is going to be very, very, terribly awful and dreadful post Brexit why are Deutsche Bank, Apple, Amazon and Google all building great big office blocks in the UK right now? 
£5bn to settle legally binding obligations, possibly £10bn when all said & done. But £40bn? Without any justification for doing so, other than to feed the FAILING #EU so we can talk about post-#Brexit #FreeTRADE? The #PM @theresa_may is fleecing the #UK #taxpayer to pay a BRIBE! 
If Robert Mugabe is looking for some work now that he has retired I’m sure there are some Brexit-voting white farmers here in Britain he could torture. 
The Sun has called Irish PM Leo Varadkar a "#Brexit buffoon" and told him to "shut his gob". A sure sign he's put together a shrewd argument against Brexit. 
EXCLUSIVE - A devastating Brexit impact unveiledA student just did the maths on Brexit and the NHS that the government won't. The situation is dire. [EXCLUSIVE] 
It was a pleasure to meet representatives from @BritishInEurope and @The3Million. The European Parliament will not compromise on citizen's rights in the Brexit negotiations!  
If you think that a foreign court having jurisdiction in the UK is what we voted for post Brexit Mr Lewis, you're an idiot.  
£5bn to settle legally binding obligations, possibly £10bn when all said and done. But £40bn? Without any justification for doing so, other than to feed the greed of EU bureaucrats so we can talk about post-Brexit free TRADE? The UK govt is fleecing the UK taxpayer to pay a bribe 
Just been invited to hear @MichaelGove appear at a London conference on the "Opportunities of Brexit" hosted by the Italian Chamber of Commerce, only to be told that he doesn't want any journalists there so we should wait outside until he leaves. Something to hide minister? 
A student just did the maths on #Brexit and #NHS staffing that the government won’t do. The situation is dire. My #exclusive - must-read and please share. 
Thinking of starting a twitter feed called @whowontheeureferendum. To tweet the same thing once a day: "Leave won the EU referendum." 
You voted for the UK to commit economic suicide by hard-wiring an even harder Brexit than the one the Tories are plotting (ensuring UK can't impose tariffs & quotas on goods from anywhere in the world, while the rest of the world can apply them on UK) Shocking economic illiteracy  
I live in Northern Ireland and Brexit has in no way destabilised it. I would feel a lot safer if you left Northern Ireland out of your rants. The last rant you went on about another country, Iraq, didn't end too well. 
If we had never been members of the #EU and there were a referendum to join, would Britain vote ‘Yes, Please!’?I think not.  
Such a perfect summary, I had to do a gif. #Brexit #CarefulNow 
If you missed this earlier, David Davis gave the perfect visual metaphor for Brexit by falling off the stage -  
Both education and health are devolved to Scotland. It’s not Brexit that’s the problem, it’s the Scottish Government.  
The fact every single pupil in this school thinks #Brexit is a bad idea just proves how biased our Pro #EU indoctrinated #schools are & how they brainwash #British children on a daily basis into thinking that #BRITAIN simply is not good ENOUGH! SAD! You are Shameful @ChukaUmunna! 
You know there's still a part of me that doesn't really believe the UK will be so fucking stupid as to actually go ahead with #Brexit 
Me for @Telegraph: Inch by inch, the Conservatives are surrendering every one of their Brexit red lines.  
A hard Brexit is becoming increasingly inevitable. The Tories want it. Labour wants it. The only way to stop this madness is in Parliament. Only the pro EU MPs can block a hard Brexit. But this takes courage. Something I fear they don’t have. 
Good luck to Robert Mugabe in his new job as UK's Brexit negotiator. 
In 24 hours we’ve lost the EU banking & medical regulators and our seat on the International Criminal Court. If this happened under any other govt. the deluded Brexit cabal would throw the shitfit to end all shitfits. But apparently we’re just #TakingBackControl. #StopBrexit 
Just one aspect of Brexit... out of thousands... please can we stop saying we knew what we were voting for? And that we have to do it this way by this Gvmt?  
Spot on by @ConHome's @wallaceme in iNews on so-called Brexit "divorce bill":" . . countries which claim not to understand why the UK is leaving the EU are notably very unwilling to inherit our role of actually paying for it . ." 
Yes, you dare say it. We should all have the courage to resist intimidation by the government and the Brextremists. If Brexit is damaging our country we should all say so.  
Anyone who thinks Corbyn's Labour Party will save us from Brexit is a full-on moron. It's a conniving two-faced party trying to be all things to all people - in other words phoney. If you believe in Europe, no hope lies with Labour 
Voters “weren’t told how much Brexit is really going to cost & how much the loss of access to the EU’s vast single market is going to clobber the public finances so we will struggle even harder to get cash for the NHS schools, homes & vital infrastructure”  
Parliament spends another day polishing the Brexit turd. #stopbrexit 
We drop off the first Brexit cliff edge in just six weeks  
Germany was never going to ride to Britain’s rescue in the Brexit talks, as David Cameron found to his cost in the renegotiation that is not how Merkel rolls, writes @JGForsyth 
Michael Skapinker: These are the top 10 languages Brexit Britons should learn — here's why  
Brexit: "London is gambling the health of all its trading & geopolitical relationships on the dubious claims of a bunch of serially disproven political hucksters & is drifting into territory that no-one, said hucksters included, seem to have a clue how to navigate." The Economist 
Brexit gets real for drugmakers as regulator moves to Amsterdam  
BBC News - UK firms 'excluded' from space contracts by Brexit  
This pair were among the few who knew precisely what it was they wanted out of Brexit & sod everyone else.   
Theresa May warned British public will 'go bananas' if she offers EU £40bn to settle Brexit divorce bill 
This article by @OwenPaterson is bang on. Singapore, an island with no natural resources used to be poorer than us. Now it’s people live to 85 and are twice as rich. We can be the next Singapore #Brexit #nodeal 
Grilled Academic was on the menu today at Belfast City Council. Presented (& was questioned!) at special council mtg on Brexit & the implications for Belfast. @QPolAtQueens @QUBSSESW 
There are 3 options on brexit, not 2#FBPE #exitfrombrexit #stopbrexit #Remain 
Let it never be said that Brexit is founded in stubborn opposition to something Brexiters dislike for reasons they cannot articulate.  
Made friends w/ a new German consular official (yer boy’s balls deep in the  Edin consul now) who had been, in his words: “wondering around London in a daze after Brexit”. The Germans still cnt believe the stupidity. The notion that the coalition mess changes this is nonsense 
Despite Brexit...  
45% of EU Doctors considering quitting NHS over Tory-led Brexit, and 100s already have plans to leave  
What hypocrisy of Corbyn ordering the whipping of Labour MP’s to support the Tories on #Brexit , this from a pitiful man who voted against the Blair Labour government over 530 Times. He has no credibility whatsoever. We need shut ASAP. 
Brexit Secretary last year: "Trade deals with non-EU countries would stay in place until either side wanted to renegotiate"Trade Minister today: "Of course there isn’t a guarantee we’re going to get all 40-plus of these agreements transitioned"  
I can't believe this hyper-partisan rubbish from @CarolineLucas. Ian Murray's ridiculous amendment would have caused UK economic suicide under WTO rules. It would have made Tory hard Brexit even worse! It needed to be killed.It's a shame, you're usually so much better than this  
If we had had the balls to vote for independence in 2014. We would now be in the single market (at least) and all these businesses moving to Europe would be moving up here!! We would be looking at an absolutely booming economy due to Brexit. Aye thank you No voters  
If an author was holding a book launch for a tome on the election/Brexit, with comedy cocktail names, what should he call the cocktails? Do your worst, Twitter 
"Former Tory candidate who campaigned to leave the EU still thinks a Tory Brexit will be amazing."  
Electoral Commission investigates the people who brought you Brexit.   
Why should Parliament have a vote on post-#Brexit trade deals? @hhesterm explains in this brilliant piece  
"If Remainers respect Brexit, why are they still trying to tie Britain closer to the EU?" - Asa Bennett #premium 
Spot on. The UK media and their #Brexit puppets are focusing on the #Brexit divorce bill to wind up #Leave voters and retain their support. Ireland and the rights of EU citizens are the crunch issues, as member states' interests directly affected. 
Mate, you tried to make an argument about young people voting for @jeremycorbyn because he promised to stop Brexit. He did no such thing. You’re a liar & a hypocrite, @JamesCleverly! But why let the complete absence of fact get in the way of cheap political point scoring. 
It appears the sun is setting on the Brexiteers dream of Empire 2.0 before it has even risen as we hear the UK has lost its seat on the International Court of Justice for the first time since 1946 #FCO #Brexit  
.@simoncoveney:  ‘There are a lot of things that Britain aspires to, in the context of Brexit, which I don’t believe to be compatible with the realities of the situation we’re facing.’ Yup, just about sums #fantasyBrexiteers  
Here’s a thought: if politicians are in denial of demonstrable facts & most political journalism is dedicated to reporting, not analysing, what they say then, er, really bad stuff can happen. Saw it it with Trump, seeing it with Brexit. 
BBC News - Irish PM should know better over Brexit, says Arlene Foster  
David Davis just tripped off stage and it's a perfect metaphor for how Brexit is going  
It is not only the farmers that will be hit by a Canada-style trade agreement with the EU, it is all British businesses that trade with the EU. The knock on effect will hit the economy and jobs. Brexit is already hurting Britain, but there is one solution, just #StopBrexit 
BREXIT GLOOM: Airbus boss says Brexit risks losing UK aviation's 'crown jewels' to China / #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Private equity firms in City told by investors no more than 30% of funds to be invested in UK over #Brexit fears. Before ref we were a safe bet. 
I voted Labour as an anti-Tory vote but Corbyn has been a let-down against Brexit and he hasn't taken advantage of May's ineptitude.  LibDem next time for me. 
Brexit is in the safest hands.   
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
“Another” expert at #AFCO committee in Brussels Antonio Fernández Tomás concludes that Irish Unity is a good solution for Ireland to prevent Brexit damage - Sense prevailing in the EU Parliament! Report after Report, analysis after analysis all state same - #ItMakesSenseUknow 
As Brexit begins to bite, Britain's economic future is not the only thing in question. In 2018, Britain could lose its "street cred" pic.twitter.com/ndzYwH9puM 
“The Charter has added a lot. Why are we getting rid of something that has done no harm?” - Ken Clarke MP asks the Government to protect our rights after #Brexit  
No Brexit deal if UK slashes taxes and regulation - Michel Barnier  
ps This does not mean that Brexit is inevitable.  It is just that the Article 50 notification triggered a hard formal legal process which will continue to its end, *unless* something exceptional happens.  UK out of EU on 29 March 2019 is the firm, fixed default. 
If you want someone who understands #Brexit even less than David Davis, let me introduce you to Arlene Foster... 
Our Brexit negotiators are utterly devoid of cunning.  
Dear @jeremycorbyn: why did Labour not oppose the Tories on a key Brexit vote last night? 
MUST-READ: The Government’s Brexit policy will mean less trade deals, not more.  
Brexit:"a much bigger issue than trade"Safe to say, we now have a proper crisis. 
English should become the main official language of the EU after Brexit, former Italian prime minister says   
Of course PM May's £36bn offer is not enough. The aim is to humiliate the UK, and scare others so they do not leave EU. Therefore, no reasonable amount will be accepted. #Brexit 
The latest figure we have on the Brexit 'divorce bill' is £40bn. Why is this kind of money being talked about and what will it be used for?  
Brexiteer's brutal assault on 'inward-looking' EU makes ROUSING point about Brexit. Tory MPs to warn Mrs May she needs to quit the talks & prepare for WTO rules which will hurt EU more than Britain & mean Brussels “will not get a penny” from Britain.   
Thank you @mikefarb1 for your tenacious insistance on truth.The current attacks on democracy are unbearable.Stay strong, we're behind you. #unhackthevote The #Brexit referendum was hacked, too.We need a world of #Resistance 
From August. Still true☟Remain voters destroyed Tory majority by flocking to Labour as 'best bet' to stop a hard Brexit, finds study  
Trade Minister @GregHands: 'No guarantee' UK will keep trade deals with over 65 countries after Brexit  
Hey fishermen & farmers of Moray, Douglas Ross (Con MP) voted against staying in the Customs Union last night. He's the guy you voted to replace @AngusRobertson. Unreal. #Brexit 
No end in sight to the Brexit madnessBeset by internal divisions and other problems, Theresa May’s government has barely made any progress in negotiating its terms 
Another article highlighting why animal sentience cannot be dismissed from the Brexit Bill! Animals DO feel pain and joy - we cannot let this happen... @ciwf  
This is the first budget for decades where the Chancellor, if he seizes an opportunity created by Brexit, can boost Britain's long-term growth rate - @LilleyPeter  
UK firms are being 'excluded' from space contracts because of Brexit.Although the European Space Agency is not an EU body, many of the contracts, including Galileo, are EU funded and so require EU membership.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
I've seen a lot of LibDem "you see, Corbyn really is Eurosceptic, ahhhhh" takes, but no "this is how the LibDems could actually stop Brexit" takes 
BBC News - UK firms 'excluded' from space contracts by Brexit . The misery continues today. Another loss. #FBPE 
Everyone agrees to quietly forget Brexit thing ever happened 
Brexit: Key Leave ministers appear to back £40bn EU divorce bill. Really? Some closed shop funniosity there!  
Naturally what UK does after #Brexit is of interest to EU, if UK wants to trade with EU. That means UK must respect EU trading rules. If UK wants to be a low regulation, low wage, low standards partner there will be no deal. Simple really. Nothing to do with Hitler either  
.@matthewherbert has responded to tabloid criticism of his Brexit Big Band project  
#StorepBrexit #BrexitPoll:Do you believe that without ECJ jurisdiction, the rights and status of EU nationals in the UK would be safeguarded? 
Brexit means bravery and boldness. Let Singapore be our model.  
The Brexit Financial Settlement  
Airbus warns China trying to use Brexit to lure wing production from its Broughton plant in North Wales. One of crown jewels of UK manufacturing. #ThanksBrexiters 
#Brexit excludes British companies from bidding for space contracts - It’s a requirement that the companies that participate and get funding for their contracts are part of an EU country. More self inflicted damage!  
a) In case you didn't notice, this country recently voted Brexit, as backed by the right-wing press. b) I wouldn't swing online click dicks with @DailyMail... we're the No1 English-speaking online paper in the world. 
EU mocks the 'English sense of humour' after Davis calls for Brexit compromise  
If someone owed me a tenner, but they offered me a fiver to settle the debt, before going on to offer me the tenner, I'd wonder why they were taking the piss if they had the tenner in the first place. I know what I mean anyway. #Brexit 
Brexit summary  
Next up, blue passport makers tell us that while they still support Brexit, they would also like an exemption, please and thank you.  
David Davis warns of no Brexit deal, then falls off stage  
Some neck; DUP/David Davis accusing @campaignforleo & @MichelBarnier of "bargaining chip" stance on border etc. Davis wants to play Ireland concerns in wider trade talks! Not "reckless" for Taoiseach to assert key GFA tenets in face of reckless Brexit staggers from Tories/DUP. 
The Brexit ‘divorce bill”. How much should the UK pay to the EU? 
David Davis and his Department for Exiting EU have been on a crash course for 'No Deal' since he was given the gig. Brexit was always built on unrealistic expectations - it is going to disappoint even the Brexit zealots - yet they'll blame the EU not UK Government's incompetence  
Tweets the man who has tweeted four times about Brexit (40%) in the last 24 hours.  
After the Brexit vote, 'inflation in the UK rose from 0.4 percent in June 2016 to 3.0 percent in October 2017' @CEP_LSE 
The wonders of deodorant, the return of Kiosk Keith and it's breakfast not Brexit... take a look at the things we learnt from Day 2  #ImACeleb 
So long as nobody else upsets him by posting this every time he dares tweet about #Brexit...  
The government is trying to conceal the economic impacts of #Brexit from the public. #BrexitStudies should be released publicly and in full.  
This is fucking sickening, no money for mental health/disabled/public sector/ i could go on, but there's £1.5bn for a DUP bung and a staggering £40bn for Brexit deal, but there's no magic money tree, unless it helps the deceitful lying tory party, #JC4PM 
"This is Germany's Brexit moment": Political crisis in Berlin jeopardizes Merkel rule and raises fears of further European instability. @meddynyt @kbennhold 
EU law will no longer apply in the UK in 2019. With 80 % of current animal welfare legislation coming from EU, #Brexit could be a backwards step for animal welfare. Crueller conditions may apply to farmed animals. PETITION to stop this now: @RSPCA_official 
All across Europe Brexit has led to Brussels-bashers dropping their Frexit, Nexit, Polexit lines as leaving EU is now seen as walking, talking economic and geo-political disaster  
Double your money, Theresa May – the true Brexit bill will be £80bn | Hugo Dixon  
after years of financial crises, Brexit, etc, it looked like Europe was finally moving in the right direction with Macron's victory. But now German political uncertainty weakens France's natural partner and Europe's most important country and leader. frustrating and worrisome. 
Stop BLACKMAILING Britain! ’Reckless’ Brussels and Dublin blasted over Brexit demands  
EU Brexit impact studies have been publicly available online for a while now  
BBC News - Irish PM should know better over Brexit, says Arlene Foster  Well said #ArleneFoster. Practicality before politics.  
Walk! : EU diplomats: £40 billion Brexit bill not enough  
It’s amazing how quickly Scotland’s oil reserves can regenerate when there isn’t an Independence referendum and the Chancellor needs good news to include in his budget. 
There's a joint Press Release from Molly Scott Cato MEP and me on @GoodLawProject's attempt to get the Secret Brexit Studies here.  
Brexit means decks-itDavid Davis stumbles off stage as he flees speech then hides in a room to avoid questions 
Brussels issues Brexit slap down: May's £36bn offer NOT ENOUGH to kickstart talks. Bullies! Let’s have an itemised bill!  
Johnny Marr reveals how Brexit and Donald Trump will influence his new album  
WLE has 3000 followers!Thank you so much for all your support #Brexit #Stopbrexit #FBPE #ActOnClimate #vegan #HumanRights #FashRev #AnimalRights 
Northern Ireland at a crisis point, the result of poor leadership, Brexit, & a failure to deal with the past. agree that the current impasse likely to lead to restructuring of its politics and/or push for Irish unification. hoping it does not lead to any resumption of violence. 
One stunning but simple example of how #TrumpRussia #Brexit works Billionaire Robert Mercer is using Putin's lawyers to try to silence the Guardian  
Boris Johnson & Michael Gove's 'Vote Leave' are under investigation for electoral fraud during the EU referendum. There are reasonable grounds to suspect significant financial cheating. #BrexitShambles #BorisOut #GoveOut #ToriesOut 
We cannot accept further attempts by Chancellor Hammond and Brexit Minister Davis to conceal the economic impacts...  
David Davis just fell off stage and it's a perfect metaphor for Brexit  
"IEA proposes 'free pint for all students'." Sun: "Beer's up." FT: "Anything to dull, even a little, the pain of Brexit." Vince Cable: "This is just a copy of my "free pint for all" proposal of 1987." Independent: "Who funds you?" TheGoodRight: "Libertarians promote alcoholism."  
You stand for BrexitYou stand for London rule of ScotlandYou stand, hand in hand, with the Tories  
WALK AWAY: Tory poll shows nearly half want Theresa May to declare NO DEAL on Brexit 
#Tory Brexiters are urging @Theresa_May ‘to exploit #Merkel’s crisis.’ They don’t get it. The #EU27 are resolved in their handling of #Brexit. That’s not going to change whoever is the government of #Germany. Share @Jon_Danzig’s report:  
We've begun legal proceedings against the govt. Everyone has a right to see the #Brexit impact studies - in their entirety.  
We urgently need trade transparency: “Trade affects every area of our lives - that’s why this campaign is so important,” says @CarolineLucas #TradeBill #Brexit  
BANKS: 'Theresa May is prostituting Britain's national pride with £40bn EU Brexit Bill offer. She's sold Britain out.' Spot on @Arron_banks. 
"Arsenal will improve when Özil and Alexis leave and we sign committed players" = "Brexit will help the UK improve its global standing on its own" 
People like Nicky Morgan need praise for making sure there is a real debate on Brexit in parliament. Let's just hope there is a meaningful vote on Brexit that includes the option to remain in the EU or to take the decision back to the people. #StopBrexit 
To be clear, I don’t oppose Labour’s hard-#Brexit policy because it’s too left wing. I oppose it because it’s fundamentally right wing. 
The stuff of dreams! To sleep, perchance to dream, not suffer torment in my wakeful slumberAccursed BrexitOut, out, damn'd Brexit! out, I say!Out! Away!#FBPE #revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
Our politicians must not be allowed to pay the bribes demanded by Brussels  #Brexit 
Data shows that trade with the South is more important for the North's workforce (167,175 employees) than trade with Britain for the norths workforce (150,791 employees) #UnitedIrelandEconomy#Brexit#UnityRef 
2. Foster suggests no way border issues will be solved until next phase of Brexit talks - that’s ‘cart before the horse’ 
A new dark age of Post-Brexit animal abuse as Brexextremists deny animal sentience and plan exports on the hoof not the hook. 
Brexit doesn't seem to be going very well for the Tories right now...  
Unless those unhappy with Brexit can convert the very real problems into the political and formal action of an extension, suspension or revocation of some kind, then UK leaves EU on 29 March 2019.And today, cannot see how those dots can be joined./ends 
Dick Turpin & his motley crew will never give UK a fair deal so for goodness sake May, get some spine & leave - now, immediately, forthwith, directly! Brussels issues Brexit slap down: May's £36bn offer NOT ENOUGH to kickstart talks  
oops David Davis shows us #brexit BY TRIPPING off the stage #janeygodleyvoiceover 
There is no general election due.The Tories-DUP have an overall majority.Labour front bench support Tory government on Brexit in principle."Brace, brace."/3 
Owen Paterson piece in Tel for deregulation/lower taxes post Brexit (Singapore model) is honest about driving force for a no of Brexiter MPs.   
.@theresa_may  Mrs May finds more and more money for uncertain Brexit but not a penny for own #PensionlessPensioners #Waspi #NHS #Schools the list is an endless catastrophie the UK declines All so Heartbreaking 
Planes with British components could be grounded if May fails to get a Brexit deal, industry chiefs warn.  
Aerospace industry cannot guarantee planes will be able to take off after 29 March 2019 if there is a no-deal, hard Brexit.  
David Davis said neither the Medicines or Banking Agencies would leave London... More Brexit "promises" broken. #brexitshambles 
David Davis fell off stage and it was the perfect metaphor for Brexit  
As a STAUNCH *remainer* I reluctantly accepted the results of #EuRef.I have TRIED to take a mature & balanced approach.BUT I have yet to hear a coherent & EVIDENCED argument in favour of #Brexit.Just confusion-chaos & mayhem ! 
Brexit savaging British prestige, losing jobs and for what? A Tory vanity project. #RemainersNow #LeaveGate  
Gina Miller took the Gov to court over Brexit, a democratically voted for process.Why isn't the taxpayer taking the Gov to court over agreeing to this EU Divorce bill that isnt even law? HM Treasury should be doing just that.Any one willing to take up the challenge? BEWARE N0 10 
This is outrageous! MPS have quietly voted that 'animals cannot feel pain or emotions' into the Brexit bill. It really beggars belief that in this day and age our government does not recognise the sentience of animals. #tuesdaythoughts @Independent 
The German political system is *not* going into meltdown. The British media are merely reporting that it is because that's what they *want* to happen. Brexit means reporting what Brexiteers wish the news was, rather than what the news actually is. 
Very sad to hear that after Brexit the Tower of London will be moving back to Normandy. 
'Brexit: the moment when English nationalism was uncorked'   ... another good reason to set up your local YesCymru group. 
Brexit Secretary David Davis provides the visual metaphor of the day  
David Davis just fell off stage after #Brexit speech & it's a perfect metaphor for this Governments #EU negotiations. 
There is a bigger issue today than student fees!!   In 1939 there was 1 issue. Stop the Nazis. Today its stop Brexit. Im an ex Tory voter. There is a lot I disagree with LDs on but Im backing them now. Think strategically, not in the weeds. Labour back Brexit. 
7 years of lethal austerity Real terms pay cuts for millions EU Referendum to fix internal party squabbling Obsession with a hard Brexit Planned tax haven for the 1% Don’t insult us by pretending you care about the cost of living for ordinary working people. 
Brexit ate my wages.....  
Here's why a "Canadian-style" Brexit would be economically ruinous  
It’s almost like David Davis’s stumble after his Brexit speech is a metaphor for something.  
So... I’m late to this. To summarize, Mercer to Trump to Brexit to Russia? 
Mind that Brexit cliff edge, @DavidDavisMP 
And now we quite literally go live to Brexit  
UK patients amongst 1st to benefit from new drugs bcos we had European Medicines Agency. Move to Amsterdam means pharma investment at risk, slower access to innovative medicines, & loss of 1000 high quality jobs #Brexit  
The first parts of the Brexit cliff edge emerge in just six weeks  
I'm with you as well. At the next General Election the @LibDems will be the only UK wide anti-Brexit party. On that basis I'm happy to give them my vote. Tactical voting won't go with @UKLabour again as it did this year. The @LibDems could go from zero to heroes. #StopBrexit 
Brexit Britain. 
Thank you @MichelBarnier for listening to the citizens of Europe. Brexit should not alter our lives. We will continue to work with @EU_Commission and @DExEUgov to protect the rights of the 4.2 million EU citizens in the UK and British citizens in Europe 
Folks, listen up.After Brexit, the UK government is planning to strip all animals of their rights. They will effectively be reclassified as ‘objects’.If this disturbs you - please sign this petition to stop it from happening.  
UK #Brexit minister Davis: It is possible we won't get a deal with the EU. More:  
Untold thousands are complaining to the BBC about its pro-EU bias in the reporting of Brexit.   via @TheConWom 
Brexit Secretary David Davis says reaching a deal with the European Union is the "most likely and best outcome" but "it is possible we will not get a deal" 
"In touching distance of an overarching agreement" - #Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP at 'Deal or no deal' conference  
Hi! Article 13 doesn't just recognise animal sentience, it also requires the Government to pay “full regard” to this when formulating and implementing policies. No domestic UK law does this. It's vital that this is maintained post-Brexit. 
Jeremy Corbyn and Theresa May have voted together again for a disastrous hard Brexit. Only the @LibDems fight to keep Britain in the EU. 
And here’s our editorial @EveningStandard on the stark choice now facing Brexit Britain - turns out we can’t have our cake and eat it  
And still @theresa_may @Jeremy_Hunt say mental health is a priority. It is not. Brexit is their only priority   
Brexit is like buying a house without ever seeing it and ending up living in a house with rising damp, huge mortgage, negative equity and stuck in the middle of nowhere while missing the old neighbours. 
In 2016, David Davis assured us all that the European Medicines Agency and the European Banking Authority would remain in UK. They are moving to the Netherlands and France - along with a large amount of jobs and associated business. Brexit will ruin UK #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles 
If we're going to set an amount for the #Brexit #divorcebill we need to tie in our terms at the same time, that's what negotiations are all about....we're not just paying for the chance to have a chat ! 
As a #vegan If #brexit #britain does not accord animals their deserved status as sentient beings and takes away their rights, I no longer want to live in this cruel and heartless nation. Me and my beautiful Alba both FEEL disgusted. 
Thank you @MichelBarnier for meeting with @The3Million and @BritishInEurope to discuss how we can truly safeguard #CitizensRights at this crunch time in the #Brexit negotiations  
Over 16.3 million voted for the United Kingdom to Remain in the European Union. What do you do? You vote with the Tories to impose a toxic hard Brexit. Resign man. You’re nothing but a Tory Brexiter. #CorbynResign 
BBC News - Brexit: UK 'ready to pay more to the EU'  No we are not. Only the traitors in Parliament want that. WALK NO MORE TALK. 
GREEDY: EU diplomats are already saying Theresa May's £40bn Brexit Bill offer isn't enough. How predictable. In reality, Britain doesn't owe them a penny. 
Predictably, EU tries to further constrain UK post Brexit. Time to walk away.  
This is hyperbolic rubbish from a guy who is desperate for Germany to be in crisis because he thinks it would be good for Brexit.In reality Brexit is Britain's biggest crisis since the 40s, while Germany only had a political party walk out of coalition government talks.  
Ignore Merkel And Brexit: According To Bill Blain, A New Threat Can Bring Europe Crashing Down  
German business wants us to exit from Brexit. Many Britain's now regret the vote to leave the EU. Isn't it time the government listened common sense and reversed Brexit? It is damaging Britain and it is no longer the "will of the people". Let's work together to #StopBrexit 
@Arron_banks filming @bbcrussian interview on Brexit/Russia allegations suggest you watch @ElectoralCommUK 
Except @UKLabour didn’t run an election campaign saying they would stop Brexit, so, your faux outrage is rather misguided & wrong. Get your own house in order. Hypocrite.  
Brexit. Taking back control etc.....  
Friendly advice to @Andrew_Adonis: stick to infrastructure, there's plenty to do! Close relationship between govt + oppos is exactly what we DO want, this should be national project not partisan one. Use yr talents to shape best possible Brexit not utopian project of reversing it  
Important article on the risks of leaving Euroatom 'The consensus is clear: there is no upside to a nuclear Brexit' by Clare Moody  
Although this is nonsense, @JamesCleverly, & shows just how out of touch/deluded @Conservatives are.Brexit ref. happened BEFORE GE. @UKLabour ran on a clear message of SUPPORTING the referendum result NOT stopping #Brexit.I voted Corbyn for many reasons. Tories don’t get it!  
Yes. That’s absolutely correct. The Labour leadership are as keen on a hard Brexit, as the Toriest of Tories. People still vote for them, thinking they’re the party of the working class, but they’re #JustToriesWithRedTies#ScotRef #Vote_YES  
EU trade agreements have protected Scotch whisky, but now the damaging realities of Brexit are beginning to bite. Hope the @ScotchWhiskySWA are onto this. #scotch 
A small island, largely irrelevant in international affairs with massive immigration and authoritarian leadership is apparently Paterson's view for the UK after Brexit - I'm sure that's what Leave voters voted for...........  
Surely he should have crossed out the “Christmas”, rather than the “Happy”? What is “Brexit Christmas” supposed to mean? 
May sobbing in her cornflakes every day is not what we need. Give us an educated brexit MP and lets get the job done as per the vote. 
During the Scottish Independence referendum campaign we talked of our desire to reach out to the world. #Brexit is becoming about UK closing doors to the rest of the world #contrast 
Theresa May's cabinet agrees to pay more to break Brexit deadlock  
In yesterday's debate in the Commons on staying in the European Customs Union, Keir Starmer, reportedly Labour's Brexit spokesman, neither spoke nor voted. If doing the job is too much trouble, because he has to make up his mind, best to give it to someone with a backbone 
Brexit is happening – and we'll be fighting every step of the way to ensure that doesn't mean we lose any of our hard-won rights.  
Don't listen to the terrified Europeans. The Singapore model is our Brexit opportunity. Read my article in full here:  
So we have leave EU & vote leave under investigation, apparent Russian interference in the Brexit campaign & complete lies told in the first place by Gove, Johnson, Farage, Leadsom etc. Why is the UK proceeding with this? If the UK was a business it would be an insane decision. 
Labour just voted with the Tories to leave the single market and the customs unon.Cue the Corbynista trolls, insisting it never happened.Same old same old on the Corbyn Brexit Express. 
Keir Starmer has argued for remaining in the customs union. Many Labour Remainers point to this a proof that Labour is rally playing a "long game".Well, Corbyn's Labour just voted WITH THE TORIES to leave the single market and customs union.Labour ARE for Hard Brexit. 
Tell me again about the Labour "long game".☟Brexit: John McDonnell joins Tories in voting down Labour MP's amendment to protect customs union  
The British state is a petrol engine. The referendum filled it with diesel. We've been stuck on the roadside ever since 
When you successfully agree your fourth sale of the morning and feel like you could tackle Brexit  
Excellent from @IanDunt demolishing the fringe left arguments for a hard #Brexit  
Britain needs a leader unsullied by Brexit compromise. A leader who can argue his case.  
Watch @AeroSociety, @Airbus and @ADSgroupUK giving evidence on #Brexit's effect on the #aerospaceindustry, web-streamed live at:  
May told to exploit Merkel crisis to reduce Brexit bill: The Times 
#LBC Turn LBC on James the plank O’ Brien bashing Brexit & Daily Mail !!!!!!!! Same thing everyday with this idiot. Worst presenter ever. 
Land agents Fisher German advising landowners to expect a 50% cut in farm subsidies post-Brexit  @dpcarrington @BawdenTom 
In your dreams you loon. We voted #Brexit, we want #Brexit, so stop making UKs position more difficult and get behind the country instead of yourself.  
How Brexit works: Leavers reject the inevitable and then accept it. - Article 50 vote- Non-parallel trade talks- Two-year transition period- €40bn divorce bill 
"Britain's banks will start moving staff abroad early next year because of #Brexit"-@BrexitWeird that eurosceptic  #Tories, who've been pushing for an exit for 4 decades, have no Plan in place.Just like GOPs in the USA. 
Before the referendum I was continually lectured by leavers like Hannan on the UK's immense 'soft power' & international prestige. They are flushing It down the drain.  
The public are becoming aware of Putin's intervention on #Brexit vote. But just as important, probably more important, is the role of Trump backer, Breitbart and Cambridge Analytica owner, hedge fund billionaire Robert MercerAnother blow to national sovereignty  
Err... Post-Brexit UK just voted to say that "animals cannot feel pain or emotions"... I can only guess that includes their MPs?  
Magazine of CSU - Merkel's sister party - warns Brussels is botching Brexit talks & urges her to intervene. Says Germany has 'much to lose' from no deal. Not mainstream thinking by any means, but a reminder that approval of EU stance not totally universal.  
c). I have exhausted every avenue apart from @A50Challenge. If that doesn't work it's a case of sitting round waiting for the wheels to come off & for public opinion to change. That's it, But I'm not interested in campaigning for a Labour Brexit or any other kind of Brexit. 
Really disappointed to see Midlothian MP @DaniRowley abstain on this crucial #brexit amendment in customs union. Not representative of how Midlothian voted.  
Sex scandals might accomplish what Donald Trump and Brexit couldn’t: draining the swamp  
 “What we learned about Brexit yesterday” 
My prediction is that we’ll crash out of the EU with a hard Brexit, people will suddenly see the catastrophe they voted for, and we’ll rejoin, but on the worst terms imaginable. The only consolation is that Nigel Farage will be in prison. 
Wish us good luck! Together with @BritishInEurope, we are meeting @MichelBarnier this morning to ensure the EU put #peopleB4politics and protect our lives from Brexit  
Tory MP Robert Halfon is a REMAINER and even he thinks the govt is offering too much for a Brexit trade deal!  
When you have blown yourself out attacking Labour this morning be sure to explaina) who you want to manage Brexitb) if the answer to ‘a’ is no one...c) how you plan to stop Brexit 
What "massive job losses"?Unemployment has fallen EVERY month since Brexit vote.You are merely cherry-picking to suit your non-argument.  
Once the rights over the protection of "Scotch Whisky" have been destroyed post Brexit, what will that mean for Scottish distilleries? 
Important day of EU Withdrawal Bill amendments today. We will be standing up for human rights and the EU Charter of Fundamental Rights - these rights must be enshrined in UK law. Brexit must not be an excuse to roll back hard-won rights.  
Brexit "is like a political ebola virus insinuating itself into every cell of the British body politic."  
Remarkable 27 governments show more cohesion than our government in Brexit negotiations - being exploited in every round of talks #PrivateEquityForum 
Big Thank You to @BBCRadioFoyle & @BBCgmu for having me on this am to talk about the Bordering on Brexit report for @europe_icban.  #BrexitBorder is so much more than a customs & trade issue. @QUBSSESW  
In other words never, ever trust a Tory. To the @Ukip voters who supported them in good faith at the election, come back to us and help Save Brexit  
The government went into Brexit talks naively, now hiring enormous numbers of lawyers to cope #PrivateEquityForum 
Here's the video of the scene Carole is explaining at the beginning of her article.... 
YOUR COMMENTS: I almost feel sorry for them; promised impossible things by a dubiously funded Leave campaign, lied to by their press and politicians… and now the reality of #Brexit is hitting home, Mail readers have nowhere else to turn with their impotent rage.  
Amsterdam and Paris win post-Brexit EU agencies in lucky dip.  
Quite extraordinary that Barnier should insist that to get an EU/UK trade deal, the UK would have to abide by EU rules — when a key Brexit objective is to get out from under those rules. Plus the EU has dozens of FTAs which do not require those rules. 
Very interesting report on #Brexit from a left Eurosceptic position 
Theresa May is pushing Brexit through even though she doesn't believe in it. Jeremy Corbyn is quietly helping it happen because he secretly believes in it. The Lib Dems, meanwhile, are about as likely to save Britain as Fireman Sam. Have a good day. 
Brexit weekly briefing: kicking and screaming toward the cheque book  
Unilever's Remain Ultra CEO Threatens to Drop London Listing Worth noting that none of Unilever’s 7,500 UK jobs would be affected if they drop their London listing. Still, gets a good anti-Brexit headline… via @GuidoFawkes 
Britain ready to walk away with no deal on #BrexitUK loses its EU financial passportEuropean Banking Authority is moving to ParisHow pathetic is that?#stopbrexit #FBPE 
Yesterday was a wake up call to anyone placing their faith in a Brexit that leaves the UK as it is. Also for anyone thinking Labour will save you. 
Brexit is sucking life out of government, so ministers and civil servants can’t focus on crucial long-term issues from NHS funding to infrastructure investment #PrivateEquityForum 
The excuses from the Corbynista over another Corbyn acquiescence to the Tories simply don’t wash anymore. Corbyn wants a hard Brexit no matter the cost. 
I and other MEPs fighting for citizens’ rights of EU27 in UK an UK in EU27 met with @MichelBarnier this morning. Crucial we get an agreement that protects people’s livelihoods and honours referendum commitments that they would be protected.  
.@IanMurrayMP tells the inside story on efforts to thwart the Tories’ hard Brexit in the @HouseofCommons last night 
Just 12% of MPs Vote to Stay In Customs Union. Staying in the EU Customs Union is not #Brexit.It’s good to see an overwhelming Commons majority now agrees. #Remoaners are forever demanding Parliament has its say – well Parliament has spoken… 
Brexit has played a large part in bringing the debate into focus. After all, it’s now plain for all to see that a border arrangement on the island if Ireland is entirely unworkable. 
Such a shame that Labour continues to vote with the Tories on damaging hard Brexit. Oh Jeremy Corbyn!  
My hunch is that it's all going to end really really well for MPs ripping the piss out of the nation's youth for being anti-Brexit.  
I voted Remain but believe the Brexit disaster is 100% with the incompetent Tories. A LAB Brexit negotiation would have worked with the EU to obtain a mutually beneficial arrangement.The Tories triggered Brexit to heal splits in the party NOT LAB & they must take the criticism. 
Is #Brexit to blame? UK loses spot at international court for first time in history  
In this week's Dose of Daniel, Mr Hannan postulates that Remainers are actually opposing Brexit because they're scared of it being a success.I'm scared of a lot of things Daniel...but that's not one of them.  
Young voter? Voted Labour? Thought they were going to stop Brexit? You've been played!  
The Brexit-voting UK regions now seeking special help to cope with the economic hit of, er, Brexit  
Civil servants bordering on clueless over Brexit | John Crace  
You don't need to be a strict vegan or animal rights activist to know that animals are sentient beings capable of feeling pain. The @Conservatives just voted against recognising this fact after Brexit. I guess fox-hunting is back on the cards...  
My heart goes out to all those young people who voted for Corbyn the messiah, sent down from above to stop Brexit.  
Nobody on the Leave campaign said there would be a £40bn Brexit divorce bill - as new facts come to light, it's crucial the British people keep an open mind:  
Labour leadership once again flexes its muscles on hard Brexit. Here are the Lexit arguments, given proper scrutiny  
UK: MPs have voted in #Brexit Bill 'that animals cannot feel pain or emotions' This defies scientific knowledge & gives legal legitimacy to the abuse of animals in circuses, farms, sport, zoos & medical laboratories. SHAMEFUL!  @AnimalAid @AnimalEquality 
"Yes minister"Jim Hacker calls an old friend to tell him what he should think about Brexit #r4today 
Our political system is broken. The will of a minority being pressed onto the whole, with no clear plan (still witing for impact reports). brexit is failing and we need to cut our losses. An anti brexit party or alliance would gain a massisve popular vote #StopBrexit 
So when @BenPBradshaw @ChrisLeslieMP are the majority of Labour MPs going to do something about the front-bench position on #brexit ?If you can't change it or even influence it, leave on mass & remove Corbyn's status as leader of the opposition.  
£40 BILLION BREXIT BETRAYAL  
The European Medicines Agency, the European Union's drugs regulatory body, will leave London for Amsterdam because of the UK's Brexit plans  
#Brexit Can we get some politicians with a BACKBONE sort out Brexit!!! Absolutely useless all of them Conservatives & Labour. Pathetic.   
BREXIT. If we make a deal with the EU on trade it cannot shackle us to EU systems and regulations. The UK must be 100% FREE to set it's own rules outside its relationship with the EU. EU rules designed designed to govern our activities OUTSIDE THE EU are not acceptable! 
EU diplomats say €40billion would not be enough to unlock Brexit talks.  
Brexit negotiations seems nothing other than an opportunity for the EU to tell us what we can do following brexit and what we must do prior to it. No border control, no individual legal system just more of the globalist trashing of our country. 
Can't wait for Glastonbury so Jeremy can explain to young people why Labour is voting for hard Brexit. 
Not again! The same confirmation bias as with Catalonia. Always in UK the desperate need to believe that the EU is in a huge crisis, things about to implode, so as to avoid confronting the Brexit reality: UK is making a huge mistake  
Brits who think that trouble forming a majority in Germany is anywhere near as stupid and calamitous as #Brexit are wrong. Lots of parties having to negotiate and compromise is how representative democracy works. FPTP systems generate dumb results, repeatedly. 
There is no such thing as a “jobs first” #Brexit outside the Single Market & the Customs Union.  
No, fear of immigration, stoked by a terrible right wing media is what led to Brexit. This is just a bit of a howl of despair after seeing a horrendous racist tweet. 
I said it once, I've said it twice and I'll say it again. @theresa_may will give much more away to the EU. I guarantee it. #Brexit #WalkAwayMay 
No surprise insular Britain is losing its standing in world human rights:1. Our prime minister is 1st to support withdraw from European Convention on Human Rights2. We have cozied up to Donald Trump3. Brexit shows real disregard for international system  
Gisele Stuart: the 2 agencies were always going to leave.Me: No...not if we hadn't put the #Brexit gun to our head & pulled the bloody trigger!! StopBrexit soon or it's going to get worse. Binding #FinalSay Ref in 2018 + #StopBrexit & #Remain option 2 save current Best Deal 
My dogs feel pain. And happiness. Yet MPs voted ‘that animals cannot feel pain or emotions’ during Brexit debate. #Remain4Dogs #AnimalSentience 
How Labour approach Brexit. So determined are their front bench to support a Tory hard Brexit they tell their MPs to go home. Wes should have looked at his order paper though...  
In last 2 elections in the north the DUP received 28% & 36% share of the vote56% of voters in the north voted to remain-against the DUP Brexit positionArlene Fosters is a minority view-shes no right 2 assume 2 speak 4 ppl here, & no right 2 dictate terms 
A few hours after the EU Referendum result last year, our editor made the following predictions on his FB page.  Nigel Farage is nothing if not predictable.  
No British judge on world court for first time in its 71-year history. EU Banking Agency, EU Medicines Agency relocate to Europe as Britain steadily looses its international standing. Brexit means a race to the bottom for us.   
!!! German population doesn’t care about Brexit. When will UK commentariat see that…? 
We might find it incredible in the bubble, but lots of ordinary voters are sick of hearing about Brexit.  
A sign of #Brexit #Britain ‘s waning influence in the world.... 
Securing #Brexit that meets needs of British economy is more important than some pseudo intellectual ideological game played out on Twitter.  
The billionaires who bought #Brexit must be cock-a-hoop at how easy and cheap it is to play our system. 
There is no 'jobs first Brexit' outside the single market and customs union. We have a responsibility to be honest with voters and robust in opposition. 
My Brexiteer friends think 'it will be alright on the night' is sufficient planning for Brexit. What's scary is that we now know that's also the civil service approach 
Class Act, just like their fraternal @LiberalAus cousins >> UK Tories have voted that animals can't feel pain as part of the EU bill, marking the beginning of UK's anti-science #Brexit #auspol #ukpol 
Farage on top form: I didn't campaign for a Brexit divorce bill or a transitional arrangement. 
In year since EU referendum inward foreign direct investment flows almost doubled from £80.8bn to £158.4bn compared to previous 12 months 
We now go live to Brexit  
However blind your Brexit enthusiasm might be, if you’re seriously greeting political instability in Germany as somehow good for the UK, you should probably have a bit of a think about things. 
Britain's banks will start moving staff abroad early next year because of Brexit  
A real shocker. How can this possibly be consistent with a Brexit that is good for jobs? Think of the thousands of jobs in manufacturing and agriculture destroyed by this decision. What are Labour thinking of?  
Last month: ‘Strong Merkel will help UK & Brexit’Now: ‘Weak Merkel helps UK & Brexit’In Brexit Britain everything is great & glorious regardless. Also: how propaganda works. 
Those who suggest this- don't know how Germany works,- don't know how the EU works,- don't know how #Brexit works,(to be fair on last point: nor do I). 
Maintaining a tariff-free Europe is vital to protect jobs and living standards - and Labour should be defending this. There were more Labour MPs voting pro-Customs Union last night than those who voted with Government. #Brexit  
There goes the EU again, with its unreasonable meddling. Let's have this in our #Brexit plan, Theresa!  
A more appropriate fine would be £40bn. Hand the #Brexit divorce bill to Vote Leave's billionaire backers. 
UK insists EU to have custody of Farage at weekends in Brexit divorce settlement 
Your regular reminder that Labour is a hard Brexit party.  
UK position on #Brexit divorce bill:-Go whistle-We'll meet obligations-£18bn-£40bnNext bid?  
The consensus is clear: there is no upside to a nuclear Brexit | Clare Moody  
Britain's Budget is announced on Wednesday and Brexit is bringing big challenges  
THIS IS THE REALITY OF BREXIT.  #StopBrexit #NoConfidence 
Those who voted Labour partially to kick against Brexit once again getting shafted.  
 Brand new episode of #Unfiltered ready to go...@krishgm talks to @mrjamesob about Brexit, the role of the media and showdowns with Jeremy Corbyn, Robert Downey Jr & Quentin Tarantino  
Take the anti #Brexit pledge: I pledge that I will vote only for those candidates who demonstrate a clear and unwavering commitment to keeping the UK a full member of the EU, and that I will work actively to support such candidates wherever and whenever I can.  
Tory Brexit minister Lord Callanan today apologised for claiming judges had ruled that the Brexit trigger clause, #Article50, could not be reversed. It can be stopped! #StopBrexit 
Brexit means Brexit, that's all there is.  No sugar coated Brexit, no smooth orderly Brexit, just damaging extreme Brexit where the British people are the losers. #revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
Unfortunately, she’s not a leader. She’s trying to please everybody, and she’s letting us all down. The #EU is negotiating in bad faith. They want to make #Brexit as difficult as possible as an example to others. We should call their bluff and walk away.  
You know when people should have come up with solutions? Before the referendum. You won, you deal with it. Own it. Embrace it. It’s all yours.  
I see David Davis has arrived for more Brexit talks  
#Brexit feels like death by a thousand cuts at the moment  
Revealing sign of diminished post-Brexit status: No UK judge on world court for first time in its 71-year history   
Brexit: Key Leave ministers appear to back £40 EU divorce bill, but want to know what the UK gets for the cash. Um, just like paying off your mortgage, you get a receipt for settling the bill. Nowt else, it's not a bribe.   
Yes, many voted for Brexit. But many voted against. The majority was only a third of Labour's in 1997. The people changed their minds about Labour and they can about Brexit.  
During yesterday’s debate on Brexit and trade, it was quite something to hear @IanMurrayMP sticking it to the Tories for ideologically “wrapping themselves in the Union Jack”...  
The Electoral Commission has opened an investigation into EU referendum spending by the Vote Leave campaign. 
BREXIT:At what point will Remainers stop fighting for a second EU Referendum and channel their energies into thinking of solutions & success for our country rather than just sneering at Brexiteers.  
London loses EU agencies to Paris and Amsterdam in Brexit relocation  
"Brexit means Brexit, everywhere": @MichelBarnier. Wishful thinking isn't a plan @DExEUgov. 
Brexit isn't a micro issue, it's macro, it's an all consuming thing which is damaging the country from every angle and yet the facts and evidence are dismissed in favour of opinion and optimism.....7/n 
Britain's Gravest Economic Challenge Isn't Brexit  
Brexit is already costing every UK household over £400 a year. Higher inflation with real wages down is causing a major disparity...and Brexit hasn't started properly yet #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles 
Lord Adonis: #Brexit a national tragedy  
#1 Lost European Medicines Agency to Amsterdam#2 Lost European Banking Agency to Paris#3 Lost representation at International Court of Justice#Brexit: Taking back control. 
For most people Brexit delays have been mainly caused by a British election, the absence of a Brexit plan, unrealistic expectations, incompetence and disagreements within the Tory party.  
Brexit can be a catalyst for signalling that Britain is open for business 
May told to exploit Merkel crisis to reduce Brexit bill: call me over-sensitive if you like, but my hunch is this will make it a tad harder to build that ‘close and special partnership’. #TheyCanReadEnglish #TheyHaveTheInternet 
Ppl voted for Brexit & now moaning it's going to cost us money  make your bloody minds up what you want. 
The facts about latest Brexit vote.Very important but will be ignored by those who wish to make LAB the Brexit bogey man just at the time of the budget of a floundering, wounded government. Coincidence? No.The choice remains LAB or a disastrous Tories. 
On the contrary, the biggest whoppers during the #EUref were told by #Remain: remember the Brexit budget, £4000 poorer, instant DIY recession and even war.Remain also spent 45years deceiving the people as EU treaties gave away control of the UK to Brussels  
If Corbyn & Momentum had "adopted Corbyn-style campaign" & got off their arses in EU Referendum we wouldn't have Brexit or 2016 challenge to his leadership  
Useful @FT explainer of the UK & EU debate over the financial bill for Brexit  
Shame you didn’t back Customs Union last night. @uklabour helping deliver Tory-led hard Brexit. Embarrassing. 
UK influence is waning..this is the reality of Brexit , @BBCJLandale is right 
We experienced 45years of lies and deceit as treaty after treaty of the #GreatDeception project was railroaded through parliament without the consequences understood and with poor debate. #Brexit  
UK could pay a bigger ‘divorce bill’ in return for starting trade talks next month.The BBC understands the move was approved at a meeting of senior cabinet ministers.  #Brexit 
On Friday, @AlanBrownSNP, came along to meet the Mossgiel Girls and chat about our plans for the future of Local Food and Brexit.  Of course Farmer Bryce dressed in his best Sunday clothes for the visit - look at the state of him!!!! #DirtyFarmer #FamilyFarming #MossgielFarm 
Milder than the Labour leadership opposition to Brexit here in North Yorkshire this morning. 
It's been a very long week in Brexit and it's only Tuesday. #StopBrexit#Remain 
Brexit Basics: What is Legatum & The Legatum Institute?  
Of course Goldman Sachs will look elsewhere.Legal consequence of #Brexit means UK financial service providers lose EU passport which allows them to offer their services to a market of 500 million consumers and 22 million businesses.#StopBrexit 
Sad evidence of Britain’s declining international influence. Brexit will diminish us further  
Paris and Amsterdam have been chosen as the new homes for two prized EU agencies after Brexit. Brussels resorted to picking names from a hat to decide  
Brexit Basics: What is Cambridge Analytica?  
At the height of it's campaign to push Brexit Russia was deploying upwards of 200,000 bots a day in the UK.Though the final numbers for the United States are not yet known one can imagine the numbers to have been substantially higher. Think about that. 
Paris and Amsterdam win Brexit races for London-based EU agencies  
When Brexit drags us all down into the economic, moral & political abyss, be sure that May, Brexit Clown Central, Dacre, Murdoch er al have the: “EU is to Blame!” headline excuses.  Be ready for them, and ridicule each one, as they try to insult our intelligence - and they will! 
The idea that Brexit will cause unemployment is being exposed as a fiction  via @telegraphnews 
ArseholesThe Tories have voted that animals can't feel pain as part of the EU bill, marking the beginning of our anti-science Brexit  
LDs made a U Turn on one aspect of the campaign, apologised and explaining why they had to change it. 8 years later we have two "Brexit whatever the cost" parties because people cant get over it. 
Everything Everything on rejecting technology and writing in a post-Brexit world  
And we’ll call the new, beautiful union, the Union of Craic. Honestly though, you have no idea how beautiful an irony it is that the result of Brexit might very realistically be accidental Irish reunification.  
MUST WATCH VIDEO FROM @RedpillShark! Very #NewRight #EU army is here and it belongs to #Germany, Good luck #BREXIT!@Nigel_Farage @BBC @UKIP #UKIP 
Trump may be a political novice but his GOP Congress are not. And likewise Brexit may have been engineered by rogue forces but most of the Tories are now behind it. The problem isn’t who, it’s what; it’s trying to make far-right fever dreams reality. It’ll always be a disaster. 
Dividing existing alliances and reducing cooperation between Western democracies is a Kremlin goal. These tweets related to Brexit and NATO are consistent with that aim.  
Monday night saw what looked like attempts by the Establishment to stir outrage against a Labour leadership they’ve been unable to touch by legitimate means – with a side-order of distracting from Tory chaos over Brexit & the Budget for good measure.  
It doesn't imply that at all. Quite the opposite in fact - a no-deal Brexit is precisely part of what Labour is staving off by ignoring such an idiotic amendment - one designed to cause confusion & distraction. Please don't fall for it. 
It seems that the @Conservatives are interested in "Disaster Capitalism" via their support for #HardBrexit whilst @UKLabour are interested in "Disaster Socialism" via their support for #HardBrexit The UK will lose so many jobs due to #Brexit #ScrewTheManyNotTheFew#StopBrexit 
May meets senior ministers to discuss Brexit divorce bill offer  
Been a long night in the studio gettin the beginnings of my next #newsingle laid down. Watch this space people and keep the faith  #Brexit #Brexshit #StopBrexit #Remain #Telecaster #Piano #Elvis pic.twitter.com/oLZIFQr2el 
The referendum was not responsible for those 300,000. They would have been created anyway. The 900 high skilled high paying (highly taxed) job loss is due entirely to Brexit and is symptomatic of a more general loss in funding for our scientific sector.Brexit is bad for science. 
I have been a lifetime Labour voter. I resigned my party membership over the Article 50 vote, and this shows me I was right to. The leadership of the Labour Party are either cowards afraid of Murdoch or traitors to the working class. Supporting Brexit will kill the Labour Party. 
Er, speaking as someone who worked on the EU budget for 10 years, no. No it isn't. It is payments due after Brexit day on commitments made before it. 
Labour yet again pathetic on Brexit, betraying the wc voters it was established to defend. To not even bring itself to support membership of CU staggering.This is as much Corbyn's Brexit as May's. 
Now more than 87,000 nursing vacancies as a result of people leaving the country because of Brexit. How much longer do we have to put up with the ruination of our country before a halt is called and the traitors like Farage held to account? 
Allow me to translateLabour has just f*cked over the people that thought they'd save them from a hard Brexit  
There's no causal relationship between job growth and referendum whereas there IS one for the loss of the 900 jobs and the ref. Even then, job growth has actually almost halved in the 17 months since ref. compared to 17 months prior to ref. (≈600k new jobs from Feb15 to Jun 16) 
Brexit will stop as soon as there is political opposition to it. The fact it hasn't stopped yet is entirely due to the fact there is no opposition yet. 
Give human rights the strongest protection by fighting to abandon Brexit altogether. 
Scotland is in a position today where our reasons for voting no to independence in 2014 have evaporated, but we now have a chance to stop the suicide of Brexit. Vote #Yes #ScotRef 2018 
Arlene Foster accuses Dublin & Brussels of "Brexit blackmail."She would know all about that wouldn't she?? #FBPE 
No End in Sight to the Brexit Madness  
Speaking to yer da there. Good brexit boy. 
Life long Labour voter, am so disenchanted. You are providing zero opposition. You need to oppose Brexit now that the shady funding & media manipulation is becoming clear. 
Hang on - we're all animals aren't we?Brexit fantasies are really spinning out of control. #FBPE 
As an Irish citizen, Brexit is a complete disaster for my country, a disaster we had no say in or vote in, the arrogance of the Leave side to try and treat Irish concerns over the border as a non issue is particularly hard to take given our 2 countries shared history. 
I tried looking for anything to support that, I really did. Nothing... anywhere says 300,000 jobs created since the referendum (only seeing reference to a prediction from before)I know I shouldn't expect you to be above Fake News, but I want to believe you did not just try that. 
Just for the record, The @michaelgove @BorisJohnson Brexit campaign is now under as much scrutiny as @Arron_banks and Farage's Oh. And both used Cambridge Analytica, under investigation by the FBI 
If you’re Tweeting about the relocation of 900 jobs as the European Medicines Agency moves, but have had nothing to say about the 300,000 jobs gained since the referendum, you need to look at your priorities. 
I wonder if any Russian maggots will be found in the rotten open wound of Britain’s Brexit vote. 
Tonight I voted to keep Britain in the customs union. I was joined by several brave Labour MPs who defied their whips. Labour's front bench shamefully voted with the Tories for hard Brexit, lost jobs and higher prices. 
Top 4 stories, R4 00.00 news;-  £40bn bill sign off- Barnier City threat- Vote Leave probed- UK loses ICJ judgeBrexit going well then. 
This is infinitely worse than the Liberal Democrats pledge u-turn on Tuition Fees. This is about Corbyn masquerading as pro-remain but doing everything he can to push the country towards a hard Brexit. This will not be forgotten. 
Absolutely brilliant video (depressingly so) @mikegalsworthy. The simple truth is that UK was a great friend and ally of Ireland in the EU and Ireland do NOT want UK to #Brexit. #Brexit is NOT being seen as an opportunity in Ireland, but as a threat to stability & security. 
One of the most bewildering and painful things about brexit, for me, has been Labour's failure to stand up for us. For some reason I expected better. 
Britain without a judge on the International Court of Justice for first time since 1946And so it begins..#Brexit the biggest self-harm since we lost America! Explain this one away Brexiters..we R losing our status day by day! via @telegraphnews 
Latest "storm" around LAB Brexit vote explained by @BarryGardiner who I believe knows far more of the intricate nuances of the legislation than those stirring the next storm. 
Funny that Leavers complain that the EU Parliament can't propose legislation (even though it can amend and veto it), but scream blue murder when our Parliament shows signs of wanting to amend #Brexit legislation.#StopBrexit 
“No one had the faintest idea about Brexit. So everyone had to make the assumption that everything was going to be fine, because the moment you got a grip on reality and realised the assumption was almost certainly false, then you had to face the possibility Brexit wasn’t doable”  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Professions boosted by brexit: Insolvency practitioners, food banks, tabloid newspaper bosses, veg seed producers, riot police....any more?  
Owen Paterson: Don't listen to the terrified Europeans. The Singapore model is our Brexit opportunity #premium 
For those @UKLabour remainers who tonight are declaring your intention to leave the party, following front bench support for hard #Brexit ... The clues were there all along! #TheCorbynCon #LabourLies 
Ian Murray (a Labour MP) raised an amendment which would have kept us in the customs union. The Labour leadership whipped their members not to vote for it. Labour actively pursuing a hard Brexit 
Another loss for Brexit. David Davis told us we’d keep it. The clock is ticking for Brexit. Deliver what was promised or Brexit’s off.  
Households are more than £400 worse off after Brexit  
Can anyone point to a single statement by David Davis about the brexit negotiations which has turned out to be true? 
Cabinet members have to face the reality of the challenges ahead. You get to dance around on the Fringes, completely out of the path of reality.They have to compromise based on the practical; You get to preach Brexit fundamentalism. 
Anglo-Irish relations are suffering fast due to a selfish & bullying attitude from Brexit enthusiasts. And for what?  
Very sad to see almost every Labour MP, including Manchester’s, voting with Tory Government to enable a hard, destructive Brexit. #LabourLetDown #Labour #Manchester #LabSummer 
Brexit can be stopped. Article 50 can be revoked. A Brexit minister was forced to apologise to Parliament today for claiming that the Supreme Court had ruled that Article 50 was irreversible. Simply not true. Keep fighting to #StopBrexit. 
Quite amazing that #Newsnight brought on a Murdoch hack to have a hissy fit at @StopFundingHate for ages but didn't have a report on Vote Leave in trouble with the Electoral Commission for breaking finance rules (allegedly) during its lying campaign to manipulate Brexit  
Welcome to banana republic BritainBrexit has left Britain exposed to the sort of mockery and pity they once reserved for other countries, just a laughing stock 
By voting to leave the customs union, Labour have effectively endorsed a peace-process-wrecking hard border in Ireland. Shambles. #Brexit 
After Labour voting against single market and customs union; proving beyond any doubt that they're as deluded on Brexit as the Conservatives, surely there is a renewed case for the creation of a new party including remain MPs from both parties with the purpose of stopping Brexit? 
So much for the Independent judgment & conscience of MPs, and the interests of the country. Corbyn & McDonnel are Tory Brexiter lackeys, stupidly thinking that the Tories will effect Brexit so that then their antediluvian version of Labour can restore us to the 70s.  
Brexodus begins as 1,000 jobs go The European Banking Authority (EBA) is to be moved from London to Paris after Brexit, a boost to its bid to get banks to shift operations from London 
I would happily retweet this without comment, but for one word - *extreme*. Why do @LibDems and @vincecable persist in diluting their message with that irritating word, as if Soft Brexit is the answer or is even meaningful?  
It appears @UKLabour is for Brexit whatever the cost and screw all the Remain members. Brexit, for the few, screw you.#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
I’m sure those 1,000+ workers who work at these agencies and whose are jobs are moving to Paris/Amsterdam as a direct result of #Brexit will find that very reassuring.  
You betray my family and millions of others when you vote with the Tories for a hard Brexit. You ally with far-right disaster capitalists and tax evaders & foreign press barons against working people who need decent funding for public services. Shame. 
Hmm. Here's Gisela Stuart's AfD-loving "expert" on German industry and Brexit a) making false statements about EU27 citizens in the UK and b) unable to grasp the difference between a single market and a free trade area.  
Yes, Tory MP Owen Paterson would like the Singapore model. There's no capital gains tax, a top income tax rate of 22%, immensely long working hours, A paradise for the rich!And there's a very high immigration rate. #StopBrexit #Brexit#TaxHavenBrexit 
'They’re giving us NOTHING!' Farage destroys EU's Brexit divorce bill 'ransom demands'  
Also even if Germany *were* in paralysis as Brexiteers claim (it isn’t), how does that help Brexiteer case?Germany’s position is UK pays €60bn plus. If paralysed Germany can’t move from that position…#Brexit 
The big question is why the UK failed to secure Britain’s seat on the ICJ? Poor diplomacy? The waning influence of the P5? The rising power of the GA? The lack of respect for Boris Johnson? Or, dare I say it, Brexit? #tinhaton 
1/3Amendment would have stopped Treasury from applying any tariffs or quotas to goods in or out of EU after Brexit. It did NOT keep us in Customs Union as EU could still impose tariffs on us!  
“Europe and Germany are in paralysis”Would actually be funny if Brexiteers were not believing their own ridiculous spin, and having Newsnight swallow it whole.Repeat after me.All. The. German. Parties. Except. AfD. Have. The. Same. Brexit. Line.  
It is bizarre that some Leavers think that the EU should do anything other than negotiate in the interests of the EU27. Instead having claimed or believed that Britain held all the cards, they now wail that the EU is punishing Britain.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Tonight Corbyn's Labour confirmed they are the same type of party as Tories when it come to hard Brexit.. no Single Market and no Customs Union. 
I shared this last week, and told all you remainers that underneath the mask of @jeremycorbyn he despises the EU. Now @uklabour are shocked after voting in favour of a key #Brexit matter tonight.Hate to say it, but told you so!#LabourFail ☭ 
Shocking behaviour from the Labour leadership, showing themselves incapable of providing leadership and protecting the UK from the catastrophe of a hard Brexit. Tory hard Brexiters will be gleeful at the supine behaviour of the Labour Party.  
‘EU has treated Brits as SECOND CLASS’ AfD leader BLASTS calls for second Brexit vote  
The EU is now teaching a Britain with an over-inflated estimation of its own power a similar lesson to that which the USA taught Britain during the Suez crisis of 1956. Leavers and their leaders have learned nothing!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Honest to god, so many people keep being shocked by Corbyn whipping in favour of hard Brexit. Pennies dropping faster than the pound. 
Corbyn aiding Boris Johnson, Gove, Fox and Theresa May with their hard brexit plans. Time Jeremy came clean and just admitted he always wanted Brexit. What a pathetic 'opposition' they are!  
PMs policy chief George Freeman quits. Warns Tories will be known for "nostalgia, hard Brexit, austerity& lazy privilege."  
Even death does not get a day off under Jeremy Hunt The silent assassin He should be fighting for a bit of the 40 billion brexit cashNo guts no sense Let’s the people dieShocking 
Your hard left leadership support Brexit - they always have. EU membership wld hv prevented their nationalisation & state aid plans  
Someone needs to develop a Brexit app that detects when your blood pressure is getting dangerously high, and then cuts off twitter and access to news websites. And on that note, I am self diagnosing. Goodnight.  
Out of these 4 #Brexit scenarios, what would you rather have: 
Overwhelmed by the sheer volume of bad takes today. Size of Brexit bill has got absolutely nothing to do with Germany's coalition struggles  
Brexit is a lose-lose situation for Britain. And all this only to satisfy some dodgy millionaires, some inept politicians, and a cohort of dinosaurs.  
Labour supporters need to wake up and realise that Corbyn and his followers support the Tories in their desire to take us over the Brexit cliff edge. We must @stopbrexitnow @UKLabour @Labour4 @ChukaUmunna 
Some days when I read the  from people who are supposed to be ’s top journalists about  that I want to say, look, , f**k off and see how you suffer.Then I recall the economic and personal pain #Brexit will inflict.And it’s back to determined opposition. 
THE TIMES FRONT PAGE: 'May told to exploit Merkel crisis to reduce Brexit bill' #skypapers 
Just when we thought no one could make a dog’s dinner out of #Brexit better than the Tories, enter Arlene and the DUP  
."Labour splits over Brexit burst INTO THE OPEN after party's frontbench ORDERED MPs to vote AGAINST a bid to keep UK in SM & CU". 
"Paris and Amsterdam in Brexit"#EuropeanMedicinesAgency#europeanbankingauthorityMe next....#EUsupergirlIf we can't #exitBrexit I will #ExitBrexitBritain 
London has lost the European Banking Authority to Paris and the European Medicines Agency to Amsterdam, but no doubt our knuckle-dragging, flag-waving Brexit 'patriots' will think that's okay. 
Tuesday's Times: "May told to exploit Merkel crisis to reduce Brexit bill" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @hendopolis) 
Jobs goneReputation goneCredibility goneDecency goneRespect goneTrust goneBrexit be gone#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
To be clear: I never said EU was worth spit. I’ve said from day-1, the problem with Brexit is - you’re giving even more of your country away to shameless twats in charge now. Welcome to Hell.  
Today: a weak German government/Merkel will help Brexit10 weeks ago: a strong German Government/Merkel will help Brexit  
The safety net against a ‘no deal brexit’ is simple: NO BREXIT.  #RevokeA50. 
It’s been a bad day for #Brexiters it’s been a worse day for #Britain 1) we lose #EMA 2) we lose #EBA 3) we lose our seat on the #ICJ 4) #Labour votes with #Brexit tories to take the #UK out of customs union 5) which makes the #Irish problem intractable. We are screwed  
Poll Tax on Steroids ...Theresa May facing a MASSIVE REBELLION with resignations from her government if she tries to push through a £36 BILLION EU Leaving fee.Pitchforks at the ready ...#Brexit #EU 
Brexit - A tale in two parts:  
It's difficult to be shocked with Labour, yet the Remainers who voted them in are now seeing what is in store for them. We did try to say. We asked you to check Corbyns manifesto. It was always very clear the Labour Party are forwarding #brexit 
In today’s episode of #StuckInBrexitGetMeOutOfHere : 1,000+ jobs move from UK to Paris and Amsterdam; evidence of higher household costs and falling real terms incomes published; hard Brexit Ministers stop the PM making a specific cash offer so negotiations can progress to trade 
Why is a weak Merkel supposed to be good for Brexit? How does that even make sense? 
When are fellow Remainers going to wake up to the fact that Corbyn and Labour are not on our side? They are facilitating May's extreme Brexit.  
Please don't let those who are trying to bully people about this issue win- this is a policy debate the labour movement needs to have and we are stronger for a wider range of voices in it. Now is the time to speak up against hard brexit, not stand aside!  
THE TIMES: May told to exploit Merkel crisis to reduce Brexit bill #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Up until tonight, I agreed with you - please keep fighting to at least stop the worst Brexit possible, but I will now do so outside the Labour party - I'm resigning as a member because of this stupidity. Whatever happens next has been enabled by Labour. Madness 
I genuinely thought the Labour Party still had some principles. Turns out I was wrong. As the impact of Brexit hits folk will be asking why the opposition did not oppose this.  
It was not that long ago when Kier Starmer announced it was Labour policy to stay in the Customs Union and Single Market.How can anyone trust Labour on Brexit when they've cynically changed their position on this more times than I've had cups of tea? 
#brexit is stumbling in the dark looking for a cliff to fall over. 
For a party that attracted a lot of Remain voters, Lab sure does a good impression of being dead keen on a hard Brexit. 
Jeremy Corbyn and Theresa May have voted together again for a hard Brexit  
Bus: "after Brexit there will be no plastic bags."  
Labour's principled Brexit consistency on show again. Don't know how many positions they've had but got a sneaking suspicion this isn't their last one....  
Just spoke in #Customs debate vs govt’s power grab over customs duties. Voted vs well-intentioned but badly-drafted amendment, which could’ve risked ‘no holds barred’ Economists-for-Brexit style removal of tariffs for ALL countries trading w UK (not just EU). 
Can I just say… Fuck Brexit. 
The Labour Leadership are not acting in the best interests of the country. It’s time the grown-ups in the PLP started rebelling, and putting the brakes on Brexit.  
When the general election produced a hung parliament the pundits all said this meant softest of Brexits or even no Brexit. Which didn’t account for Jereny Corbyn and his three line whips. 
#Brexit has become like someone who booked an appointment at Dignitas, is then told by a doctor that they are actually fit and healthy and their diagnosis was in fact a deliberate lie, but they decide to still go ahead with euthanasia anyway because decisions can't be changed 
Did the 52% & 48% know what the single market or customs union was on brexit day? I seriously doubt it, the general public is learning more about implications and intricacies of Brexit every day whether you supported it or not 
.Hey all you over a million Scots, with the biggest % being SNP, who voted Brexit your FM is having a go  
Theresa May and the Tory party is betraying the British people on Brexit? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
Fear this sketch is unfair.Civil servants cannot be blamed for the lack of direction from ministers.  If it were not for some civil servants, we could be in an even bigger mess over Brexit.  
MPs vote 'that animals cannot feel pain or emotions' into the Brexit bill  
It’s starting to happen folks... Labour has finally had to choose a side publicly and its support will start to implode #Brexit #LabourShambles 
It’s like the loony Right and the loony Left have both gone around the bend and bumped into each other. #Brexit#StopBrexit 
A reminder: In April 2017, David Davis @DExEUgov said Brexit did not mean medicine or banking agency would have to leave London. #EMA #EBA 
Quick tip for Labour voters. Read the manifesto next time.It was for Brexit, no freedom of movement (which automatically rules out the Single market) and avoided any commitment to the Customs Union.  
Brexit:• Won the referendum• Won the subsequent election• Is the policy of the 2 main parties• Dominates the cabinet• Leads EU negotiations• Is backed by 4/5 of press• Is the will of the peopleBut a few powerless losers are making it fail. Sure we are. Sure.  
What is in the best interests of the UK? To remain in the EU. What is the duty of an MP? To act in the best interests of constituents & the country. Why are MPs betraying our country by not stopping Brexit outright? The Party system (‘whipping’) and the pusillanimity it promotes. 
The Vote Leave Tory cartel have sold out in the least surprising revelation of the century.The Brexit betrayal continues.  
People might get the idea the Labour leadership are in favour of Brexit. That would never do.  
Nonsense Robert!@Peston.We voted against an amendment that would have taken away any safety net against a No Deal Brexit.Under WTO rules UK would have been unable to impose ANY tariff on goods from ANY country in the world.Amendment was illiterate.  
From London to Amsterdam #EMA & Paris #EBA, voted. @MichelBarnier briefed #EU27 ministers on #Brexit negotiations  
We all knew that the Brexit camp was based on a deluded view of the world, but sadly, this does indicate a new low for Britain.   
If @Peston is right, the great Brexit betrayal gathers pace.  
Incredibly @TheSun appears not to have reported yet what actually happened next. Readers blissfully in the dark as Brexit becomes reality.  
I voted to keep Britain in the Customs Union tonight. Hard Brexit will cause gridlock in Bristol due to delays at the Port. #BrexitShambles 
Cum see this tight pussy CUM now at   #blackfridayfeeling #TWD #AMAs2017 #Brexit pic.twitter.com/m0bRICLfOY 
For the inevitable leftists going “Uhhhh the Mail is pro Brexit!” please learn your media environment...  
First they came for Breitbart...Now the left is telling advertisers to stop utilising the Mail on Sunday. By the way, one of the most anti-UKIP/Brexit papers around (diff editorial than Daily Mail). Both sad and hilarious.  
And over 1000 jobs leave UK - what a dire and unforgivable waste... #Brexit  
Labour won't win the next GE with @jeremycorbyn whipping votes to back Tory Brexit. Hard to see what choice UK has with both parties willing to wreck our economy. Corbyn should resign. #StopBrexit 
There would be no divorce bill of £billions if there were No Brexit. (Consider the reality: one billion pounds, £1,000,000,000, is huge: the ‘bill’ - what we legitimately owe in the circumstances: paying back what we benefited from - would be 50 or even 80 times that.) 
Just voted against Tory plans to stop us staying in the Customs Union - crucial for our jobs and economy. #Brexit 
Fuck that. Brexit is national self-mutilation.  It’s pointless self-harm fuelled by bigotry, greed and deluded fantasies of lost empire.It hasn’t happened yet. Until it does we’ll try to stop it. If it happens we’ll try to reverse it.The Brexidiots need to accept THAT.  
Eurotunnel renamed #Getlink. It's a wonderful Brexit metaphor - turning an elegant, sophisticated and latinate thing of glory into something simplistic, Anglo-Saxon, brutal - and ugly.  
Labour just whipped its MPs to vote against @IanMurrayMP Brexit amendment to keep current EU customs duties. Some Tory MPs, SNP, LDs + Lab votes with him 
As a former @UKLabour member I cannot comprehend how Labour can be Pro Brexit regardless of how Labour voting constituencies voted. 
Just voted against government and its move to take us out of the customs union.  Putting the national interest first. #Brexit 
This, right here. This is what I’m talking about. This is the level of sheer, reality-denying INSANITY that Brexit is reducing us to.There’s no sane way to knowingly pursue the impossible. This country is driving itself crazy.Enough. Stop the madness.  
I wasn’t making a point about overall employment rates in UK, I was observing that 1,067 jobs will be lost in UK as a direct result Brexit. (Skilled jobs btw - the type Chancellor wants)  
So today in #Brexit news:EU Medicine Agency is leaving for AmsterdamEU Banking Authority is leaving for ParisUK has withdrawn it's candidate for the UN Court of Justice. 1st time no UK judge since 1946.Brexit is closing doors not opening them. 
So UK withdraws judge from UN international court due to lack of support. Formally loses EBA and EMA. Acknowledges 'Brexit bill' is at least twice as high. And then this.  
Following the loss of the EMA & EBA, now the UK fails to get its judge onto the International Court of Justice (ICJ) for the first time. An extraordinary day of loss of British influence. #Brexit #infamy 
It’s long past time for the Brexit lunacy to stop. #article50challenge 
Losing the EBA/EMA are inevitable Brexit damage. Losing our ICJ judge is an extraordinary, sad illustration how we are shrivelling on the world stage.  
This would be welcome news for us and @BritishInEurope. These 16 months since the referendum have been a roller-coaster of emotions.  
Of no concern to 99.99 % of UK population, but UN voting to remove a UK judge at International Court of Justice punctures the post-Brexit brand Global Britain.  Losing sovereignty by the day.  
Can’t believe it.  Labour - with some honourable exceptions - have just voted to effectively leave the EU customs union #Brexit 
Brexit: Broad agreement to pay more as UK leaves, the BBC understands  
MPs voted ‘that animals cannot feel pain or emotions’ during Brexit debate  
Dan Hannan: The Republicans' astonishing, Orwellian change of heart on PutinBy a fellow #Brexit supporter who is a patriot and, like me, honors @Russia but despises @PutinRF  via @dcexaminer 
Which would you rather: that Brexit takes the UK back 50 years, or that stopping Brexit breaks the political order that brought us Brexit? - A no-brainer. 
Peter Bone MP - "The truth of the matter is we are going to be billions of pounds better off, we are going to do trade deals with countries around the world and we’ll prosper." #Brexit  
No medical base, no banking passports, and now no say on the main international court this brexit is going swanningly isnt it 
#Brexit: UK banks will lose 'passporting rights' after Britain leaves EU, Michel Barnier says  
Puigdemont attributes losing European agency to Spain's violence on referendum day via @Elnacionalcaten 
While gracious thing to do, UK decision to withdraw ICJ candidate shows an acceptance of its decline in influence, esp post-Brexit. Criticism will follow for May govt in UK  
It’s called a ‘Jobs first’ Brexit because jobs are the first thing to go, followed by tax income, social services, NHS funding, workers rights, etc 
German businessman Markus Krall - "I believe the free trade, free market and democratic and less bureaucratic approach the UK has chosen as the path into the future, is a role model for Europe." #Brexit  
Paris and Amsterdam win Brexit races for London-based EU agencies  
The idiocy of #Brexit: The transfer of the European Medicines Agency (EMA) from London to Amsterdam is just one example of the many, many damaging consequences which will snowball in the coming years  
Nigel Farage - "The EU are asking us to commit to £53 billion and in return for which, they’re guaranteeing us nothing, but that we’ll be able to talk about trade."“It’s almost like a ransom demand, isn’t it?” #Brexit  
Theresa May said she wanted a red, white and blue  Brexit. Today the UK lost hundreds of EU agency jobs to France and the Netherlands.#Brexit 
The #brexit negotiations are an embarrassing omnishambles. We don’t have to do this. Most of us don’t want to do this. We shouldn’t do this. Halting and reversing the brexit process would be the best thing Britain could do for itself and the world. 
Morrissey: Brexit is “the greatest democratic victory in British politics in many, many years.  
It's up to "those who wanted Brexit" to solve the Irish border issue, Michel Barnier says  
The point being that Brexit is, by and large, for old people and Conservatives. Keep making this point, so people can see how toxic the Brexit brand really is.  
.@theresa_may I must apologise: when you said nearly a year ago that what we “should be looking for is a red, white and blue Brexit” I commented that that was total rubbish. Turns out you were spot on.   
Morrissey’s love affair with Brexit makes him the last true rock’n’roll rebel, says Brendan O'Neill   
David Davis... telling us we wouldn't lose Medicine and Banking bodies in #Brexit. We just did  
To find £2bn for social care is peanuts, UK is about to piss away £40bn+ to the EU as a #Brexit bribe. #Dispatches 
Brexit: We have begun hearing clear reports from small and medium importers and exporters that they are facing closure if there is no deal keeping the UK in the single market and customs union.Anyone else? 
Anyone still think we shouldn't ask questions of Brexit. This wasn't going to happen according to David Davis in April.  
Some have links to Legatum, others to newspaper proprietors, but are they all complicit in the Big Brexit Steal? What other reason cld there be for backing Britain's economic suicide than financial gain. Oh to feast on the carcass when Britains asset values tank! @ThatTimWalker 
Theresa May called an election in the middle of Brexit negotiations and lost her majority. They pay you for this? 
Has there ever been a time in human history when so many stupid people simultaneously wielded such power? #brexit #trump 
Who can we sue for the #Brexit debacle? How did we sleep walk into this mess? What was Cameron thinking off ? 
US Governor @PhilBryantMS hits out at the EU’s demands for a Brexit “ransom” during his interview with @Nigel_Farage 
After Brexit when asset prices crash, hedge funds &investment opportunists will make BILLIONS picking up valuable British assets for nothing. Are Brexiter politicians in on the act? What other reason cld there be for helping the country to commit economic suicide? @ThatTimWalker 
Moving to #Paris? Don't worry! Nobody's heard of #ParisBrexiters will downplay this move but it is really another nail in the coffin for the idea that Britain will prosper from #Brexit #ThinkAgain 
Amsterdam, Paris win post-Brexit EU agencies in lucky dip  
Currently, 27 other countries pay us to test their medicines and manage their banks. Thanks to Brexit, they won't any more - and we'll now have to pay for all the same medicines testing by ourselves.Jobs leaving Britain, costs rising. Well done, Brexit.  
London loses 2 EU agencies (Medicine & Banking) to Paris and Amsterdam in Brexit relocation; Davis said they wouldnt leave,& be part of negotiations. 1050 jobs lost, & tourist industry loses 36,000 scientist visits per year... #StopBrexit NOW!!  
Siri, how do we reverse Brexit?  
Brexit bill mustn't be considered a "fine" for Britain, Italy's ex-PM Mario Monti says  
The UK's loss is France and the Netherlands' gain as EU banking and medicines agencies' post-Brexit headquarters are chosen  
Brexit - the act of allowing the Dutch to take control of pharmaceutical regulation. Funny if not so seriously damaging to land of Breexiteers. 
You can read my article 'Don't listen to the terrified Europeans. The Singapore model is our Brexit opportunity' in the @Telegraph here: 
The UK loses the European Medicines Agency to Amsterdam and the Banking Agency to Paris. Another  catastrophic effect of bonkers #Brexit. 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Your regular reminder that her Majesty’s opposition has exactly the same Brexit goal as the government. 
IDS, Gove, Redwood, Paterson, Davis, Lilley, Jenkin & Legatum, a link exists. Legatum speciality is moving into markets at times of crisis where assets are mispriced and making a killing. They want a harsh Brexit, for Britain to tank. Are the above helping them? @ThatTimWalker 
Tomorrow in Brussels: debate on the European impact of the Catalan referendum.  
Stop Brexit from happening, German business leaders tell the EU 
The choice of Paris for the location of the European Banking Authority is the recognition of the qualities of Paris as a financial marketplace and of its potentialities after #Brexit. 
If @theresa_may pays the EU  ransom demand then that will be complete betrayal. Back benchers will then have to put a demand in for her resignation . We cannot let this remain PM destroy Brexit. @Conservatives @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @DavidDavisMP @PeterBoneUK 
Sad and ironic that if Scotland had voted Yes to Independence in 2014 we could have been attracting these agencies. #Brexit #Indyref2 
Project Fear? Project Fact. David Davis claimed the European Medicines Authority and the European Banking Authority could stay in the UK. Because of Brexit, both are now leaving the UK along with thousands of jobs.Stop the damage. Stop the job losses. #StopBrexit. 
...and there goes the EBA. Our loss = France's gain. Let's just remind ourselves how #DavidDavis claimed that we would NOT have to lose these EU agencies after #Brexit.  
.@ChrisLeslieMP says position of his own front bench is “nonsense”. “A jobs first Brexit is like saying a books first library closure.” 
Even if he hoodwinks them again (or even if he gets done properly) it won’t change anything. But it’s right to ensure history records the Brexit campaign for what it was - not the great patriotic democratic moment they’re so desperate to portray.  
‘In the age of Brexit & Trump we need to make a better case for human rights to a wider audience.’ Our inspiring colleague @mephamd is up for challenges facing @hrw 
So, David Davis, when you said there would be no downside to Brexit...? 
The first significant International agencies to leave the UK because of Brexit have announced they will locate to Paris and Amsterdam, respectively.  
Brexit that Better Together dragged us into and Labour support? That Brexit? 
Vote LEAVE WON so they: Investigate Leave Campaign Harrass individuals who supported the Brexit campaign Accuse people of being Russian Bots Flat out accuse RussiaALL BECAUSE they are pathetic privileged rat-bags who can’t accept that the people voted AGAINST them. 
You’re absolutely right @M_AndersonSF, children in border areas already suffer higher levels of poverty, #Brexit will exacerbate this exponentially. We must achieve designated special status in the north of Ireland.  
Their analysis also shows that there was a clear socio-geographical gradient to the EU referendum vote, from thriving Remainer cities and university towns to left-behind coastal and ex-industrial towns voting Leave  
Is it just me or does anyone else think that the Republic of Ireland is absolutely crapping itself over the UK #Brexit deal? 
Not sure if anyone has noticed, but I’m a bit pissed off today. Brexit overload. Apologies. 
The Brexit vote happened because we've been hooked on a false and arrogant self-image of imperial superiority.As a country, we now have to face and accept our own inadequacies in order to overcome them, and move forward. 
European Medicines Agency is just the beginning. If Brexit goes ahead there will be a massive brain drain from the UK. Brexshitters might be happy as they HATE experts, until they need a doctor, lawyer, dentist, teacher for their kids etc etc etc 
More jobs lost because of Brexit. #StopBrexit 
At a stroke thousands of jobs just transferred out of London as a direct result of #BREXIT Tory / DUP fairytales & flights of fancy won’t save us from this disaster #SpecialStatusNow 
Said this before and will say it again. Many will only accept that #Brexit was a bad idea when it bites them *personally* in the arse. Likewise Scottish "No" voters. And the teeth are getting sharper and closer. pic.twitter.com/iWkkCvTADH 
Macron: “Paris will host the European banking authority. It is recognition of the attractiveness and European commitment of France. Happy and proud for our country.”May: “Brexit means Brexit”Brexiters: “Good! Go on, f**k off, experts! We’ll just catch more fish!”  
Another thousand jobs gone, with a couple of thousand more in support services with them. 'Jobs First Brexit' sounding more hollow by the day. Time to Bin Brexit for the prosperity of the country. 
Brexiteers in DUP ‘People Before Profit accuses me of scare mongering Well Today it was confirmed that the EU banking and medicines agencies will move from Britain to Amsterdam and Paris. SF Project Fact #Brexit  
It is perfectly consistent to love your country while at the same time abhoring Brexit, the Tories and the harm they are both inflicting on the nation 
Yet another fake 'think tank' on my telly. This time Open Britain saying we need to 'move on' to the sunny #Brexit uplands. Of course he's got no research to back up his points, as these 'think tanks' don't do research. 
The loss of the #EMA is real. We’re diminished as a nation in so many ways. #Brexit is really a piece of shit. 
If you want a Twitter feed with some great insight and wisdom on #Brexit - please follow @SamGhib. He really knows his stuff. One of the best anti-Brexit Twitter feeds out there. 
London loses EU agencies to Paris and Amsterdam in Brexit relocation  
genuinely baffled by people who can see that some policy matters are better managed at an EU level, but can’t see why post-Brexit those same policy matters wouldn’t be better controlled at a UK level (rather than devolved) 
A Brexit minister was forced to apologise in Parliament for today for incorrectly saying Supreme Court had ruled Article 50 was irreversible. #ExitBrexit 
Stop Brexit, German business leaders tell the EU. Clearly worried as UK is their largest market in the EU @telegraph 
*Brexit Explained*  
A new report says so far #Brexit has increased average household costs by £404 pa, and cut real terms pay by £448 pa  
Outrageous that Johnson/Gove now asking others to figure out details of Brexit trade proposal. Shows they and other Brexiteers clearly lied when said Brexit had any real meaning. 
David Davis, Brexit Secretary, Secretary, April 2017: “No decisions have been taken about the location of the European Banking Authority or the European Medicines Agency — these will be subject to the exit negotiations”  
David Davis: "There will be no downside to Brexit, only a considerable upside."  
It's about time we remoainers posted the good news about #brexit, so I've decided to make a list of positives so far, which is shown below:  
God how it galls when the Tory MPs in government talk of “the establishment”. They *are* the establishment... looking to deny the public any further input into Brexit choices- while they tug it down their own route. #AnimalFarm 
#brexit future: Unless we cancel, we lose. No other outcome. Pride comes before the fall. 
Following on from #brexit voting Grimsby wanting to save itself with "EU Freeport status" for its fishing industry, brexit voting Stoke now demanding EU trade protection from "Chinese dumping". Slowly the penny is dropping....  
How ironic that Burnley are in with a real shout of qualifying for Europe when the town voted overwhelmingly for Brexit. #mnf 
Catalonia: Over 2,000 businesses relocate to Spain.Brexit: Some businesses relocate to EU.Indyref:"it's scaremongering to suggest businesses will leave iScot"  
New elections in Germany on the cards. That means Chancellor #Merkel will be playing hard. She won’t want to tell the German people they’ve got to make up the shortfall in the EU budget post #BREXIT. So she’ll try to squeeze the UK for every penny she can. 
Yes. As Barnier said today: Brexit means Brexit. Everywhere.He's laughing at us, they all are. And they're right to. We have delivered such a blow to our own country. It's inconceivable how a powerful, successful nation can wilfully inflict so much damage onto itself #StopBrexit 
Amsterdam, Paris win post-Brexit EU agencies in lucky dip thrillers  
Was Brexit really the ‘democratic will of the people’, or was it a Kremlin fix?Lets stop Brexit until we know.  
Just in: European Banking Authority will move to Paris from London after #Brexit. 
Britain just lost two major EU agencies employing 1,000 people because of Brexit  
So just to summarise, today we've had:EU Medicines Agency leaves LondonEU Banking Agency leaves LondonConfirmation no financial services passporting rights post BrexitNo plans to prevent disruptions to air travel post Brexitand STILL it goes on. #StopBrexit 
So Great Britain, how's that Brexit going? Taking Back Control?  
Brexit-100s of jobs lost. Fin services contribute £71bn in taxes and are 25% of UK exports to EU. How many jobs will follow?  
OMG Ian Murray MP just said in the Commons debate that during a UK trade delegation to Peru last week, Peruvian Trade Ministers said they wanted the right to bottle and label "Scotch" whisky as part of any trade deal with #Brexit Britain... 
UK's third most important export: pharmaceuticals: $32.6 billion a year.It was important having the European Medicines Agency in London.The EU has just decided that because of Brexit it's moving to Amsterdam.Now the real damage begins. 
Well played @DanielJHannan @BorisJohnson @michaelgove @KateHoeyMP What tremendous results Brexit has brought the UK.#SayanoraLondon 
Govt could not guarantee in Lords today that there won’t be disruption in air travel as a result of Brexit in March 2019:  
European Medicines Agency (EMA) and the European Banking Authority (EBA) from London to Amsterdam and Paris. The relocation of the two EU Agencies is a direct consequence and first visible result of #Brexit 
That’s another 167 jobs in addition to the 900 from the European Medical Agency. So, 1,067 jobs losses in UK as a direct result of #Brexit vote  
Another Agency leaves. #EuropeanBankingAgency-Who else affected:  drivers; small local businesses; local bankers who can't/won't relocate; security guards; pubs; gyms ; taxi drivers;  beauty salons; restaurants; ...#Brexit  
First visible result of #Brexit: #EU27 agree on relocation of #EMA and #EBA from London to #Amsterdam and #Paris respectively. @EU_Commission welcomes agreement:  
EU picks Paris as new host for EBA after Brexit, sources say  
Today the EU Medicines Agency was relocated from the UK to Amsterdam, and the European Banking Authority was relocated from the UK to Paris.Another Brexit claim bites the dust. pic.twitter.com/OjVCuAw75N 
Confirmed - education budgets taking a hit for brexit this financial year. The ministers must now urgently explain what is being ‘reprioritised’ and what this means for our schools - please share to ask your MP to join me demanding answers! #brexithaos #schoolcuts 
This is the disastrous reality of #brexit. The EU, utterly ruthless, has already moved on. The UK, utterly clueless, has no idea where it’s going.  
Idly wondering whether in light of Brexit there's any chance of relocating the University of Leeds to Amsterdam or Milan too 
Fantastic outcome #EMA. Good for the Netherlands and above all good for EU citizens who can continue to count on high-quality medicines & proper supervision. It shows we can tackle effects of Brexit with resolve. 
The European Union has voted to move the European Banking Authority to Paris, & the European Medicines Agency to Amsterdam. Both leaving London due to Brexit.  
BREAKING:EU Brexit decisions just announced, European Banking Authority moves from London to Paris, and the European Medicines Agency moves from London to Amsterdam. Both have been hubs for large amounts of related business in London.  
The British people, at the end of this #Brexit negotiation, have the choice whether to proceed with a hard Brexit or not. Art 50 is revocable and there’s nothing inevitable about this process - as the Government has conceded in Parliament today   
 #BREAKING - Paris wins right to host EU's banking authority after Brexit  
“Taking back control”?Brexit means the UK just lost the European Banking Authority to Paris, and the European Medicines Authority to the Netherlands. What a mess. Stop the damage to critical industries. #StopBrexit. 
As Britain struggles to come up with a coherent #Brexit, two important EU agencies it hosted are being relocated:- European Medicines Agency to Amsterdam- European Banking Authority to ParisTotal: nearly 1,000 jobs 
How dare the EU try to dictate to us what kind of an economy and society we will be when we’ve left. We will decide that, thank you. At least, if this government finds some gumption, we will. #Brexit 
So London loses the European Medicines Agency to Amsterdam and the European Banking Authority to Paris.  A lot of jobs have just gone.  Brexit getting real. 
European Medicines Agency (EMA) leaves London, goes to AmsterdamUK loses:-900 jobs-€322m budget (89% from fees & charges, 5% from EU)-Health industry setting up nearby-40,000 business visits a year#Brexit pic.twitter.com/LNH86YwtFr 
Vote Leave is being investigated over their Brexit campaign spending  
If Vote Leave is found to have bought #Brexit through unlawful spending, the maximum penalty is a £20,000 fine. That's the cost of screwing an entire nation.  
And another decision of preparedness for #Brexit taken: EU27 vote for Paris for EBA  
Britain loses two major agencies to France and Netherlands after Brexit  
MPs vote 'that animals cannot feel pain or emotions' into the Brexit bill  
Michel Barnier uses clearest language yet to say Brexit banks will lose single-market access  
There goes the banking agency.... to Paris #Brexit  
In case anyone is in any doubt of the tangible effects of Brexit, here is another example. European Medecines Agency (EMA) to leave London and move to Amsterdam because of #Brexit. Significant loss to the UK and diminishes its role in regulating medicines.  
#BREAKING Paris to host EU banking agency after Brexit: EU presidency 
BREAKING: The EBA will leave London for Paris after Brexit  
Brexit does not need to mean Brexit if the British people don’t want it to. This process is not inevitable unless we want it to be.  
900 jobs, ~£300m in budget, attendant industry and 40,000 business visitis annually wing their way from London to Amsterdam.The relocation of the European Banking Authority will be determined later tonight. David Davis said in April we’d lose neither.This is Brexit.  
Well. Didn’t see this on the side of the bus. Let’s #StopBrexit and fund the NHS instead.Brexit: Eurozone economy set for best year in a decade as UK registers worst living standards squeeze since 1815.  
A watchdog is investigating whether the official Brexit campaign broke the law  
Another #brexit "success". 900 UK jobs go to Netherlands. And UK will either have to set up own medicines regulatory agency at extra cost, or accept EMA decisions anyway.  
The Govt will struggle to build enough support in the Lords to get any Brexit legislation through with this guy in charge. Was hard enough already, but attempting to mislead peers on a key legal issue & then refusing for a week to correct yourself seems a fairly stupid own goal  
Has the price of prime real estate in London’s financial district fallen? Check the #Brexit tracker data.  
Irish taxi humour: Great if we get that banking agency. We’ll be so broke after Brexit, but at least they’ll be able to tell us exactly how broke we are. #eba #eurovision #relocation 
#Brexodus"Amsterdam has been chosen as the city where an EU agency based in London for 22 years will relocate to after Brexit". 
The Govt whip who tried to demand names of professors teaching on Brexit is being investigated. The MP Code of Conduct states that their use of public resources must be in support of their parliamentary duties. It’s hard to see how this round-up of names would support that.  
London loses European Medicines Agency in Brexit relocation  
It’s the sneakiness of so many of the individuals & outfits who pushed for Brexit I most resent. Their interests, not the national interest. 
Brexit: Electoral Commission reopens probe into Vote Leave - BBC News  
Michael Gove engineered a post-Brexit redefinition of animal sentience. Animals will no longer be deemed to experience emotion and pain. A step forward in his plan to cut animal rights - for profit. Tories voted this through. A nation of animal lovers? #BrexitShambles #NastyParty 
Here is the Brexit News:Fuck all good news yesterdayFuck all good news todayFuck all good news tomorrowGet the idea? There is fuck all good news from Brexit any fucking day of the fucking week.Fuck BrexitFuck itFuck#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
Legatum are the great #rascals of #brexit. We who voted Remain have been lectured for a year about not getting people's struggle, while they have been working for a hard, crashing and therefore deregulation #brexit  
Whether or not you shop at Paperchase, the first company ever to be politicised over a Christmas wrapping discount offer, is now another part of the ongoing Brexit-related culture war.  
This is a bitter Brexit blow to UK science and our world-leading pharmaceutical sector. This loss of jobs and prestige will sadly only continue if the government insists on dragging Britain towards a damaging extreme Brexit.  
London loses European Medicines Agency in Brexit relocation  
Puigdemont attributes losing European agency to Spain's violence on referendum day  
It's Frankfurt … and Paris: Goldman Sachs names post-Brexit hubs  
Brexit is beginning to bite: 900 EU jobs currently based in Britain are moving to the Netherlands  pic.twitter.com/Bpk28FX4Tu 
It's not looking so rosy in the EU, is it Brussels?Britain: BrexitGermany: Collapse of German 'Jamaica' coalition talksHungary: Objection to Brussels edictsItaly: Ongoing migrant and bank crisesPoland: Rising objection to dominance of EUSpain: Catalonia constrained 
People like you have got no idea what harm Brexit will do to this country. Focus on the idea of the EU being undemocratic then give unlimited powers to tax the dodging Tory elite- utter madness!! Say bye bye to the nhs, workers rights and many other things! 
Okay so I saw this 'Brexit Border Paradox' thing (via @JeanneBartram) and thought, I wonder how Brexiters plan to resolve this? Turns out if you think like a Brexiter, it's pretty easy. 
“Well, we dont want them experts anyway. With there science, there reeserch, there facts and there medicuns. Wotz wrong with getting cancer and just putting you’re faith in Brexit to cure it?”  
London loses 900 jobs in a 'sad reminder of the concrete consequences of Brexit'  
Uk's loss, Amsterdam's gain.Brexit.  All because UK rich elite want UK out of EU ahead of EU Tax Avoidance Crackdown 2019. across all member states.#WeWereConned 
#EMA to move to Netherlands post-#Brexit. Now Amsterdam is really the drug capital of Europe. #Brexitspoils 
900 high class UK jobs sacrificed on the alter of Brexit. The UK still has no idea how it is going to respond. Typical of the whole endeavour.  
No doubt someone in my timeline will explain to me how shipping out a thousand well paid, highly skilled jobs is a good thing. That's what is happening with the EMA because of Brexit.  
Well done Brexiteers - some of the first fruits of Brexit - loss of c900 posts (many of them medics, pharmacists, scientists, etc) from London to Amsterdam. Rarely has there been such a concerted attempt by a country to reduce its international influence. #Brexit 
In 12 months since EU referendum inward foreign direct investment flows almost doubled from £80.8bn to £158.4bn compared to previous 12 months 
Amsterdam will be the new location of the European Medicines Agency (formally based in London). The #Brexit exodus has started. #Brexiteers told us it wouldn't happen. 
Confirmed new location for 900 strong European Medicines Agency EU-wide regulator is Amsterdam, relocated from London because of Brexit  
Brexit Opportunities...  
Time to congratulate Amsterdam . It wins the European Medicines Agency from Brexit Britain.And Brexit Britain will need it’s own little Medicines Agency to approve drugs as safe. Government hasn’t done anything about it.Don’t get ill.  
The European Medicines Agency will relocate from London to Amsterdam after #Brexit losing 1000 well-paid jobs. Post-Brexit we will either have to pay for our own medicines agency without the help of 27 other countries, or accept the rulings of the EMA.#Brexinsanity!#StopBrexit 
I'm sure the leave campaign would never do anything suspect.It's not like while I was campaigning, I met an elderly woman who'd been given leaflets about how the Bible supported Brexit. Manipulating the faith of older citizens.... Models of integrity."Electoral Commission" 
After three rounds of votes and a tiebreaker, the EMA will relocate to the Netherlands after Brexit  
European Medicines Agency relocates from London to Amsterdam in first Brexit shift  
No.  Cornwall, Grimsby, Stoke - you voted for this.  Your hubris outweighed your reason.No special deals.  Either man up, admit you were wrong, and campaign against Brexit; or own the consequences of your own folly. 
Whenever it comes to drugs, Amsterdam is usually the favourite destination. #EMA #Brexit 
Breaking | Amsterdam wint met #EMA grote brexit-buit  
First major casualty of Brexit. The UK has just lost almost a 1000 highly skilled jobs to the Netherlands. We voted for that right? #EMA 
We officially just lost the European Medicines Agency and hundreds of jobs along with it. We have nothing to replace it nor staff it. We are going to see UK patients put at risk. It's a scandal. #Brexit 
#BREAKING Amsterdam chosen to host EU medicines agency after Brexit, according to EU presidency 
No self-respecting independent country could accept this."We cannot have a race to the bottom" means "we demand you hobble your post-Brexit economy with the same high-tax over-regulation that is causing us to be sclerotically uncompetitive".#WalkAwayMay 
BREAKING: The EMA will leave London for Amsterdam after Brexit  
For leavers potential Brexit holdup because of German elex is more evidence of why we voted Out- UKs interests tangled up with other countries’ election cycles 
Softening us up for a £30 billion hit.See my BREXIT pod cast£30 billion is a whole heap of nurses, doctors, MRI scan machines, policemen, pothole removal or better still tax cuts . 
Marvellous.  Didn’t see that on the side of a bus.“Brexit: Eurozone economy set for best year in a decade as UK registers worst living standards squeeze since 1815”.  
Illegal overspending, Russian involvement, the reality falling short of what Vote Leave promised: all of these things weaken the mandate for Brexit.  
Will there be a mass exodus of jobs from London’s financial district post-Brexit? Check the data - #Brexit tracker:  
The Electoral Commission has launched an investigation into Vote Leave, saying it has reasonable grounds to suspect an offence has been committed.If Vote Leave broke campaign finance rules, there was the risk of "causing harm to voters’ confidence in the referendum”, it says. 
Via @Coastguard North and Sunderland Marine Ship Insurers announce Ireland move due to Brexit! 
Theresa May's under pressure to justify paying a higher Brexit divorce bill. Is a £40 billion divorce bill acceptable to you?  
Another investigation into aspects of the Leave campaign broke campaign rules.No doubt someone will be arguing that Brexit be paused until investigations complete  
This poll has now had 664 votes, only 55 of which are 'No' to Scottish independence in another referendum. 
Told you so.And in return?Barnier in effect demands #EU controls, or has veto over, UK post-#Brexit tax, environmental & business-regulation policy.Enough. Time to withdraw all offers made to date, cease discussions, & prepare for No-Deal exit. 
Brexit minister apologises for incorrectly saying Supreme Court had ruled Article 50 was irreversible:  
Been saying since the beginning of this #Brexit shambles that a united Ireland is inevitable!  Also been saying the same about an independent Scotland. It is inevitable! 
Goldman Sachs confirms Frankfurt and Paris hubs after Brexit  
Eurotunnel renamed Getlink in preparation for post-Brexit era  
Vote Leave was amongst the most misleading campaigns in the history of British politics. How can #Brexit in any way be called democratic? I’m still waiting for millions of Turkish migrants to flood into my street now Turkey has joined the #EU. We must have a 2nd ref. 
I sponsored this - some of the best money I've spent! and a great idea - crowd funding justice. I hope this is the start of seeing whose fingers were all over Brexit. leave.eu and Farage  
Vote Leave under investigation for breaking electoral law during EU referendum  @BrexitBin @nawtydad @VladimirFarage @BritainStays @smburningham1 @dontbrexitfixit @dorsetnative @EUCADMalta @HealthierIn @Scientists4EU @UKIPNFKN @RCorbettMEP @julie4nw 
This stinks. the corruption of the Leave campaign is surfacing. People need to be prosecuted and the whole Brexit vote investigated by a Royal Commission. #StopBrexit 
Have written a lot of stories on Vote Leave, Darren Grimes and other aspects of Brexit. Electoral Commission now re-opening its investigation into Leave Campaign.  
Thats not what the Leave Campaign said. British banks 'will lose access to the EU' after Brexit  
It is increasingly clear that Brexit was obtained illegally, using lies, threats and dirty money #ExitBrexit  
Electoral Commission launches inquiry into Brexit leave campaign funding, saying it has ‘reasonable grounds to suspect offence was committed’  
Ahead of #Budget2017 @DerekMackaySNP has called on the UK Government to ensure Scotland gets its fair share of funding to meet the pressures our publicservices are facing as a result #Brexit economic uncertainty.  
Darren Grimes was the 23-year old fashion designer who received £625,000 from Vote Leave before EU referendum  
Vote Leave to be investigated by Electoral Commission.'Questions over funding risks harm to voters' confidence in ref.'#Brexit 
Pay £60 billion for Brexit....for WHAT? Oh, so that we can be poorer, so that the #NHS is no longer viable, so that hegde funds and their Tory co-conspirators can pick over the carcass of Britain's devalued assets and make billions? Correct! I see, got it #StopBrexit 
Brexit: Electoral Commission reopens probe into Vote Leave  
WTF! So May going to pay them £40Bn to be further blackmailed - what a stitch up - Brexit it name only. #BrexitMeansBrexitMyAssMichel Barnier hints talks on a Brexit trade deal will collapse if the UK doesn't sign up to ALL European rules  
A prominent Brexiteer likened Brexit problems to the Millennium bug (dog that didn’t bark). The Y2K bug was headed off thru fixing millions of lines of code starting in the mid-90’s. Not thru denying the problem existed and sticking head in sand/up arse. 
As more information is available now, particularly with regards to the how much we’ll have to pay to leave the EU/what type of deal we’re likely to end up with, it’s hardly surprising brexiters don’t want another referendum. 
.@ElectoralCommUK -"new information has come to light" re: #VoteLeave...It is possible that during the course of the investigation, the Commission will identify potential contraventions.."#nullification#Brexit 
One thing Brexit is already doing is exposing how much media analysis is BS advocacy.  Media figures once deferred to will be despised  
He loves Brexit, hates PC, praises Israel, and thinks the sex-predator panic is overblown: Morrissey is in revolt against the chattering classes and it is wonderful, says Brendan O'Neill  
.@WestmonsterUK UKIP need good credible practical policies to appeal to the public. Brexit, border control, internal security, housing, healthcare, pensions 
It's Frankfurt … and Paris: Goldman Sachs names post-Brexit hubs  
Brexit minister apologises for incorrectly saying Supreme Court had ruled Article 50 was irreversible  
Morrissey: Brexit is “the greatest democratic victory in British politics in many, many years.”   
Did Vote Leave break spending limits? Is the referendum result void?Electoral Commission sued in High Court over EU Referendum. >>> £46,992 and counting.#STOPBrexit 
How much has Brexit cost UK households so far? £7.74 a week, or £404 a year acc to @CEP_LSE. All comes down to higher inflation. Ironically, arch-remainer London is least affected. Report:  
The Electoral Commission has launched a new investigation into spending at the EU referendum by Vote Leave, Darren Grimes and Veterans for Britain. Read our statement:  
Lord Callanan, Brexit Minister, today apologized to the House of Lords. He wrongly stated last week that in the Miller case, the Supreme Court ruled that Article 50 was irrevocable. It did no such thing. Good of him to apologize so quickly & clearly. 
So farewell then, George Freeman. He said last week that #Brexit could be “the moment we finally failed as a great nation”  
Only 18 per cent of Britons support a second referendum, and just 14 per cent want Brexit stopped. (Source: YouGov) #brexit #secondreferendum #2ndRef 
Belief that customs system will be ready for Brexit ‘borders on insanity’  
A register for #Leave voters, not a bad idea at all, and they would be levied with an extra #BrexitTax, and same thing for companies who are supporting and pushing for Brexit, like #Wetherspoons, #Dyson, Rupert #Murdoch's newspaper group etc. they should make up the shortfall. 
This was my thread on the false contention, promoted recently by Brexit supporters, that the Supreme Court decided that Article 50 was irrevocable.Today an apology in the Lords from one minister promoting this false view.  
This shows the #EU is a #CORRUPT #AntiDemocratic #Dictatorship! The #EuropeanUnion can not and should not be trusted they are trying to overturn your #BREXIT #VOTE through the backdoor with the help of the #TRAITOR #MPs in the #HouseofCommons! @Conservatives #BBC #SKY #UK #NEWS 
Brexit is costing the average worker 1 week of pay this year.  
The @IraqiGovt welcomes today’s ruling by Iraq’s Supreme Federal Court declaring the referendum held in Kurdistan region on 25 Sept 2017 unconstitutional, and the results of the vote as void 
The sorry spectacle of @DanielJHannan projecting his own egocentricity and disregard for the welfare of the British people onto Remainers. It will be no consolation for Remainers that we keep our reputations while #Brexit wrecks Britain. #StopBrexit 
Thank you to @markruskell who today lodged a motion in support of maintaining the principle that animals are sentient post-Brexit in Scotland #AnimalSentience 
Mr Barnier on Ireland and NI. Crisp, clear, open. “Those who wanted brexit must offer solutions.” Quite.  
Brexit minister apologises to peers for saying article 50 cannot be revoked - Politics live  
Um. Sorry to break it to you guys, but one of the things about Brexit is that, afterwards, you don't get to decide what laws & regulations we have. That's kind of the point.  
Favouring EU with vast sums of UK taxpayers’ money under the dubious guise of obligations post-Brexit while increasing domestic taxation going forward is stupefying, even if the allegation of treachery could be overlooked.   
But I thought we held all the Brexit cards?  
A very interesting, comprehensive and relevant legal opinion commissioned by @DoughtyStHSW on behalf of @GUENGL & @M_AndersonSF launched today in #Stormont on Designated Special Status for the north within the EU. #Brexit  
This account: @NewshubIreland tweets 350+ times a week. 40k followers, No website, Pro Trump, Pro Brexit, Anti Immigration. Has had several names: DublinRecruiter, McdonoughNews, CahilMcdonough. "Ireland's number one news source."  
Cost of living soaring thanks to #Brexit, with Wales hardest hit, according to new analysis  
Thanks for taking up this aspect of children's rights. @BritishInEurope and @The3Million have a lot of concerns about the rights of children in the #Brexit process and they need to be protected  
The EU's regulatory enthusiasm has cost the UK 6% of GDP - a clean Brexit would allow us to cut red tape that currently smothers enterprise.  
.@theSNP calls for a guarantee that Scotland’s public services won’t pay the price for the Tory gov’s spiralling Brexit bill.  
The Torus Hall at Culham @fusionenergy - a massively impressive piece of science that MUST be saved from a ‘no deal’ hard #Brexit the takes the UK out of Euratom - otherwise it’s lose-lose for the UK and the EU27.  
Brexit vote 'has made households £400 worse off'  
Government minister admits we can change our minds. Brexit does not necessarily mean Brexit! As it becomes clear that the cost is too great we should step back from the brink and #StopBrexit 
Top 5 global logistics company Ceva director: Belief that customs system will be ready for Brexit ‘borders on insanity’. "Arguably already too late"  
And this is why @UKLabour should be demanding a second referendum instead of enabling this total travesty 
BREXIT minister Ld Callanan has apologised to House of Lords for falsely claiming that Supreme Court said art. 50 notice of leaving EU could not be withdrawn. Now HMG realises it can withdraw art 50 notice it should do so until it has a viable policy. 
Guardian readers living in Northern Ireland and the Republic say what they make of Brexit negotiations, how concerned they are about the lack of progress, and what they think should be done about the border question.  
What truth? Which elites? Brexit was engineered by privileged old white guys who went to Boarding school and oxbridge, who no doubt stand to gain incredible wealth from its effects. That’s about as much of an elitist deception as you can get. 
Rather than take regular flights like a peasant, David Davies demanded an RAF plane that cost five times as much. And May caved. Our futures are in the hands of this vainglorious whopper. #Brexit  
BREAKING: The Brexit Minister Lord Callanan has just given a personal statement in the House of Lords to correct himself on the revocability of Art 50 having wrongly claimed in the Lords last week that the UK could not legally revoke Art 50 1/2 
Brexit is going to mean a hard border between the UK and Northern Ireland. That literally is the only viable option.Which means, DUP withdraw their support.Which means, Tories lose their majority.Which means...  Gosh. Loving this. 
I see the Brexit talks are going well  
Theresa May is intent on betraying Britain & paying tens of billions of pounds to the EU for a brexit bill. Don't let her get away with it. Sign the petition to leave the EU immediately. Over 55,000 have signed. At 100,000 it goes to parliament  
Morrissey’s Brexit love affair makes him the last true rock’n’roll rebel  
Brexit meaning Brexit looks like it will haunt the UK.  
Brussels' chief Brexit negotiator has made the case for Northern Ireland remaining in the European Union customs union after Britain leaves the EU  
And, remember, David Davis said Brexit did not mean the EMA having to leave UK: . Yet another example of Brexiters dismissing as Project Fear things which turn out to be all too true. 
Sinn Féin MEP @M_AndersonSF has launched a report at Stormont, containing independent legal opinion on how Northern Ireland could be legally given special status in Brexit  
Has there been one positive utterance made by the EU since the start of these so called “negotiations”? I didn’t think so! : Europe will reject UK trade deal if Britain cuts EU red tape after Brexit, warns Michel Barnier 
Barnier affirms clearly what the UK politicians were hiding from the public for over a year'The legal consequence of Brexit is that UK financial service providers lose their EU financial passport'#StopBrexit #FBPE 
#InCaseYouMissedIt Scared about your human rights after Brexit? You (bloody well) should be !!!  Schona Jolly  
READ: Barnier has warned that British banks will lose "passporting rights" to do business in the EU after Brexit - affecting thousands of jobs across the UK  
Remain-backing @halfon4harlowMP warns public would ‘go bananas’ if Brexit bill hits £40 billion  
There seems to be a mental block on the Corbyn ‘left’ - they don’t quite understand that Brexit, no matter the party implementing it, will cost hundreds of billions 
++Big blow to Rothschild control of EU.  "This is unprecedented and equal on par with Trump's election and Brexit"#followthewhiterabbit#Breadcrumbs#QAnon 
Bone: £1 Brexit bill would be too much  
Brexit Secretary reportedly insisted on flying to European capitals on a private RAF plane - costing up to five times more than a commercial flight  
F@%k Brexit. I am sick of people’s blind faith that UK will be just fine - it won’t! And we’re not being bullied by EU, we’re just really  at negotiating as we know we’re in such a dire situation. No plan, no deals, only pain for years. 
However #Brexit pans out, we'll be fighting against the roll-back of our rights every step on the way.  
Stoke-on-Trent, ceramics industry centre, voted 69.4% for #Brexit. British Ceramic Confederation is pressing for barrier-free trade with the EU and protection against "Chinese dumping". Duh .... 
May gathers Brexit 'war Cabinet' to sign off £40bn divorce bill offer. Yes, we have gone bananas! EU NEED to trade with us!  
Michel Barnier is demolishing the wishful thinking (& wilful distortions) of both Tory and Labour front benches on #Brexit How long will both May and Corbyn continue to mislead Brits that the UK can have its cake and eat it?We need to #exitfrombrexit 
Say it with me Daily Mail, “brexit means brexit”   
Nick Clegg: MPs deserve a vote on the final plan for Brexit  
London is losing the European Banking Authority (EBA) and the European Medicines Agency (EMA) because of the UK's decision to leave the European Union. Another self inflicted wound. End #Brexit!  
Very annoying to hear Brexiteers complain about the cost of #Brexit.  Shows how much they believed their own propaganda. None of this is necessary, we should #Remain and tackle the real issues that confront us. 
Angela Merkel on the brink, ballooning Brexit bill and European disunion. Join @Michael_Heaver & @PatrickChristys at 14:00 here:  
If @theresa_may offers a £40bn #Brexitbill, it will be the single biggest act of  #treachery since #TonyBlair sent our soldiers to war on a barefaced lie. #Labour & #Tories, deceiving #voters for as long as we can remember!  @Conservatives #BBC #BREXIT #SKY 
Interesting speech by Michel Barnier, succinctly laying out position and possibilities. I'd summarise as "if the UK stops playing the arse and recognises the realities, the EU will do its best to help achieve a Brexit that won't be a complete calamity" 
I started calling her Tupperware Teereza Mugabe because 1. Geoff Boycott got her Tupperware and 2. Because of undemocratic corrupt Henry Viii Brexit laws and stitch up on parliament committees giving Tories an undemocratic majority 
26 per cent of people who voted to leave the European Union said the campaign for Brexit was either “mostly” or “completely” misleading, according to Opinium. 7% of leavers are #remainernow & 1% wouldn’t vote #stopbrexit 
We’ve got a Brexit plan for you called ‘F**k Off’, suggests Europe 
With inflation at a five-year high and the fact we're the only EU economy with negative wage growth, Brexit spells a disastrous insult to an already desperately overstretched budget.  
#Brexit will benefit a few billionaire tax avoiders. Rest of us will be worse off in every conceivable way. Can't put it plainer than that 
Due to high demand, further tickets available!Public lecture by @AdamRamsay "The Dark Money That Funded Brexit: The secret financiers of the right’s revolution." Nov 28th, 7pm @CardiffJomec @CardiffPolitics. Please RT widely! Free tickets here:  
Eurotunnel has rebranded itself as Getlink. Probably no. 25,632 on the list of awful consequences of Brexit. But still on the list 
1. A final deal referendum is a totally different thing to a replay of the 2016 referendum. No one has voted on, or even knows the final reality of #Brexit. 2. Leavers like Farage & Raab were already calling for a repeat referendum if #Remain gained a narrow victory.#StopBrexit 
I wonder who can explain how people are better off as a result of #Brexit? Haven't heard any reality about improved lives. Paying huge sums to get out and our jobs going abroad, while weak pound pushes up infln. Come on everyone please note the reality not the rhetoric 
British banks 'will lose access to the EU' after Brexit; and Britain will lose billions in tax revenue. Maybe we should try and find a mechanism which is such that the people who voted for Brexit should also be paying for it. #ExitFromBrexit #StopBrexit 
Before the referendum @nick_clegg said the idea of an EU army was a 'dangerous fantasy'. Today @MichelBarnier says EU needs 'a truly common foreign policy and European defence' 
Fascinating presentation on #Brexit by @M_AndersonSF in Stormont. Urgent requirement on British Government to guarantee rights of 1.8m people in North who are citizens of Ireland & of EU. Thnx @guyverhofstadt for standing up for Good Friday Agreement. 
Someone who still doesn’t get it. #Brexit is the correct long-term choice because 27 nations on different political cycles and with their shifting coalitions will always struggle to be as nimble as our fast moving world requires  
Actual effects, not predictions, & Brexit itself has not even happened yet."The impact of the referendum is equivalent to a £448 cut in annual pay for the average worker. Put another way, the Brexit vote has cost the average worker almost one week’s wages due to higher prices."  
“The fear that Brexit might not happen is causing some Tory MPs to become ‘unhinged’, former attorney general Dominic Grieve has said.”Well, they’ve only themselves to blame. Won by an inch, took a mile, piled too much on their plate and get angry when Brexit collapses.  
This and his brexit comment cements me onto team Liam  
'An absolute shambles': readers on the Irish border and Brexit  
The EU's top Brexit negotiator has called on Britain to provide a proposal to avoid imposing a physical border in Ireland. 'Those who want Brexit must offer solutions,' Michel Barnier said  
Major sectors for British industry and business keep warning about the dangers of Brexit. It is time that parliament listened? UK businesses don't want Brexit and the people are changing their minds. It's time to reverse Brexit. #StopBrexit 
A blinkered approach to Brexit? TUC boss @francesogrady tells @bbcnickrobinson where the Remain campaign went wrong. Subscribe on iTunes:  
There is no “success of it”.  It’s failure in and of itself. Brexit is pointless self-harm. We’re gonna do everything we can to avert it, and if it happens we’re gonna do everything we can to reverse and/or minimise it. What we WON’T do is collaborate in our own humiliation.  
Here is a brilliant portrayal of the Brexit negotiations:  
The price that @SPD will likely demand in return for another GroKo is that Merkel goes. That would be a non-starter for CDU (right now.) So it's minority gov't or new elections. Unlikely that we will have new German gov't until well into 2018. Bad news for Brexit. 
@MichelBarnier statement today referring to Irish issues in Brexit negotiations - strongly supportive of consistent Irish Govt position.  
The idea that Brexit will cause unemployment is being exposed as a fiction - The Telegraph  
No Brexit deal if UK slashes taxes and regulation - Michel Barnier  via @PoliticsHome 
The liars cannot lie forever!They all knew that passporting rights will be gone with #Brexit! But they took their people for idiots instead. 
Most troll accounts appear to be unionist. All are pro brexit with union jack, armed forces and poppy avatars 
New host city for European Medicines Agency (Milan is a frontrunner) will be decided today... and then European Banking Authority (Frankfurt is the favourite) tomorrow - both lost from the UK due to #Brexit.   
"Climate change is much greater threat to Britain than Brexit and it'll dominate politics for decades to come"  
Households are more than £400 worse off after Brexit  
#Brexit Can you stop putting these 4  on TV . Trying to derail Brexit FFS. Owen Jones, Kevin Maguire, James O’ Brien & Alastair Campbell.  
CIEEM publishes leaflet on our three key #brexit messages #environment #biodiversity #CIEEMpolicy  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
'Brits HAVE to budge!' Germany explodes over Brexit bill as Belgium issues no deal warning. I would go hungry before being robbed. This bullshit from the EU is an outrage and we should just get on with leaving.  
Brexit has cost the average worker a week's pay in higher inflation and lower real wages according to economists @lsenews 
Thread closing headlines:1 Not one shred of Brexit benefit has ever been offered2 Disbenefits mount daily3 Huge disruption & costs of leaving being ignored4 Unplanned approach will cause widespread chaos5 Denial is not a river in Egypt, it's a mind blight affecting millions 
For those of us who've been watching Brexit unfurl, the latest developments are no surprise. The EU has been said EXACTLY THE SAME THING since day one, and the UK government has doggedly refused to believe them. 
“If Brexit goes ahead” - quite. At the moment it’s collapsing under the weight of its own contradictions.Brexit could have been done successfully with move into EEA & CU (keep Euratom) & take steps from there. Govt’s hard line has prob buggered any chance of success already.  
John Bruton, former Taioseach, on possible UK backlash if Ireland blocks Brexit talks over border: "It may be necessary for the British public to go through a moment of anger before coming to a point of self-realisation" 
Even if you're sceptical of the Charter of Fundamental Rights, taking it away from everyone in the UK is an important policy decision that should not be shoe-horned into the #Brexit Withdrawal Bill - @marthaspurrier 
Brexit vote 'has made households £400-a-year worse off'  
Bye, Bye London☞ Brexit: UK banks will lose 'passporting rights' after Britain leaves EU, Brussels says  
EU says Northern Ireland could opt out of big parts of Brexit  
Their view clouded by Remainiacs in the media, I think EU officials risk misjudging the mood in the UK over Brexit. 
Oh look, you can complete the “official” survey to determine what happens to “Brexit traitor” Anna Soubry MP (@Anna_Soubry)Alternatively, you can send Anna your support & visit the Reignite Facebook page to ask them exactly what kind of Britain they are trying to reignite. 
Final decision on relocation of The European Medicines Agency (#EMA @EMA_News) post-#Brexit will be made this evening (20th Nov). For more on the cities competing & their bids, see @PJOnline_News infographic:  @Scientists4EU @EU_Commission @JunckerEU 
.@mrjamesob explains why the Irish border is so significant to Brexit  
While Brexit is a non-issue in Germany, the Brexiteers who are now celebrating Merkel‘s weakness misread their own situation. As always.  
Tory David Davis 'fell out with top official' after demanding private planes for Brexit talks 
those Brexit negotiations in full  
Michel Barnier sets out a series of Brexit red lines on passporting and Irish border  
#KRG PM @PMBarzani:* Federal Court ruling is bilateral, no KRG representative was present* If Constitution fully implemented, we have no issues with Baghdad* Non adherence to the Constitution, led #Kurdistan R. to hold referendum* We don't talk about cancelling referendum  
As so often, Theresa May’s words are biting her in the bum. ‘Brexit means Brexit, even for banks’ says Barnier...  
As a British EU negotiator, I can tell you that Brexit is going to be far worse than anyone could have guessed  - Thanks Steve Bullock! Had to be said! 
2. My people in a state where INEC/Nigeria Govt said they has 2,680,000 registered voters and only 322,598 voted is this not a total boycott of an election? IPOB really won our referendum is nextRespect IPOB,They represents the people. #Biafra_Or_Nothing#BiafraReferendumNow 
The EU's chief negotiator just warned British banks will lose access to the EU after Brexit  
Brexit Britiain: we are paralysed by the "will of the people". We have a weak and ineffective government that is failing to condemn the bullying. We have a weak and ineffective opposition that is failing to condemn the bullying. All in the name of the "will of the people".  Why?  
John Bruton, former Irish taoiseach. We have no problem with UK referendum, we have prob w/ UKG's ill-considered decision to quit single market and customs union. "Quite remarkable" that French, German pols taking GFA more seriously than UK. 
Today we find out which European city has won the European Medicines Agency. But what a loss for the UK: 900 jobs, €322m budget (89% from fees & charges, 5% from EU), health industry setting up nearby & 40,000 business visits a year. Gone from London. Thanks to #Brexit.  
Some quick thoughts on @MichelBarnier speech to CER on #Brexit. 1. He began with the stick and ended with the carrot of an ambitious free trade deal (but the carrot has strings.) 1/ 
"Brexit means Britain's banks will lose EU passporting rights" -Michel Barnier EU not F'ing around any longer- This huge blow to U.K. #brexit 
When the government shuts you down for talking about a negative Brexit @ITV @thismorning 
#Barnier now: “It’s up to those who wanted #Brexit to come up with the solution” 
Gove and Johnson’s Brexit letter to PM demanded she ‘underline her resolve’ and end transition by 30 June 2021. May then tries to enshrine a leave date in law. Govt. source says they refer to May as ‘Downing Street Hostage.’ This govt. is a farce, and May a PM in name only. 
Polish and other eastern European drivers are leaving UK in huge numbers because of Brexit, says head of one of world's largest logistics companies. "We cannot recruit at the speed we are losing them" - Pomlett 3/4 
Only workable model for Brexit is to move the border into the Irish Sea - author of independent legal advice on special status tells Stormont launch @M_AndersonSF 
EU will be ready to offer UK most ambitious Free Trade Agreement approach if Brexit divorce issues are settled, says @MichelBarnier 
No special deal for the City after #Brexit warns Barnier. Brexit means Brexit including in financial services. 
Theresa May 'set to raise Brexit divorce bill to £40 billion': Government could make fresh offer ahead of next EU summit  
Brexit victory? EU finally admit bloated budget WILL collapse without huge UK contribution  
Has anyone sent in this helpful graphic yet this hour?@mrjamesob @LBC #Brexit  
Michel Barnier pulling no punches this morning >>On Northern Ireland: "Those who wanted Brexit must offer solutions"On the SM: "Those who say Britain can enjoy parts of the single market must stop this contradiction... The integrity of the SM is non-negotiable" 
Brexit means Brexit, as the UK government used to say.  
Barnier, speaking at #CERFutureEU, says Northern Ireland needs a separate status to rest of UK to prevent a hard border on the island after #Brexit. He notes that the territory already has rules different from rest of UK. 
Brexit is the biggest redistribution of wealth - from the working classes to the super rich - of my lifetime.  
Brexit is incompatible with the Good Friday Agreement - @M_AndersonSF tells launch of @GUENGL legal advice on special status carried out by Doughty Street Chambers 
This is very good by @anandMenon1: the Brexit talks are going precisely as expected  
A new economic study has revealed the average household is already paying £404 a year extra due to price inflation due to Brexit.  
Morning Note: 1. Bitcoin flying through 8k. 2. UK preparing improved Brexit bill. 3. No German government -> market doesn't care  
Great to hear @mrjamesob on LBC actually talking about how Brexit is affecting a tricky situation in Northern Ireland and Ireland. 
The absolute hypocrisy of Jeremy Corbyn. We are only getting this disaster of a Brexit because you whipped the PLP to hand the Tories an unopposed Art50. You are simply lying to us (again) #BrexitCrisis 
Analysis of why Food Brexit is rising political concern: prices, standards, public in the dark. Hear Tim Lang and FT correspondents discussion in today's Financial Times podcast:  
If May offers a £40bn Brexit bill, it will be the single biggest act of treachery since Tony Blair sent our soldiers to war on a barefaced lie. Labour and Tories, deceiving voters for as long as we can remember.  
It's not in the gift of remainers to conduct a national, democratic debate on the brexit referendum result. Plead with our government and MPs to start a democratic consultation process.  
To Brexiters crowing about German govt instability: Merkel's weakness makes German compromise on Brexit less likely, not more. Also, grow up 
When did anyone last see a good piece on any TV news prog on how the UK Govt is faring with plans to use Brexit to cut net immigration? 
Why are Tory Remainers so hypnotized by a 37% vote in an advisory referendum! The Tories won't allow a public sector strike on anything less than 40%. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Another casualty of Brexit- another standard that we’re crashing out of...Parliament just voted down amendment to Withdrawal Bill that would keep EU law notion that animals are sentient & so must have high level of protection. 
UK aerospace industry issues warning over lack of Brexit trade deal  
So the Andrew Lillico definition of Brexit success is moving from participation in the world's largest & most compehensive free trade arrangement to a position of splendid isolation.  Brilliant, when the children ask for bread you can tell them to suck on a faded union jack! 
This study shows Brexit has already damaged our economy. The average household simply can't afford to lose £404 a year when many have still not recovered from the financial crisis  
All part of the madness of Brexit  
With Angela Merkel even weaker than Theresa May (who at least has a government) what chances of a timely Brexit deal?   
"If you think a strong Merkel government will help May with Brexit, you don't understand Europe."Same voices today:"If you think May can make Brexit progress without a strong Merkel government, you don't understand Europe." 
Vice-chancellors, add your voices to the call for a second EU referendum | Nick Hillman  
Five-a-day eating targets 'will be unaffordable for millions after Brexit'  
How Brexit has affected us already. The first detailed analysis  
#LBC First day of the week Brexit bashing already. From James O’ Brien.!! Never shuts up about Brexit. 17 million voted leave understand. 
Anna Soubry receives 13 death threats after the Telegraph mutineer headlines. This, by the government's definition, is terrorism. The climate of terrorism has been cynically whipped up by #Brexit politicians & the right-wing press. #StopBrexit 
Six reasons why Labour's support of Brexit makes no political sense.RT if you agree.  
FACT:The referendum on Electoral Reform was binding.The referendum on Leaving the EU was NOT binding.Cameron and Parliament had the power to make it binding, but they chose not to. No promise on an election leaflet can change that.#StopBrexit 
If confirmed, then the Brexit referendum was won by the KGB, using the far right as a proxy, backed up by bots.  
Daily Mail bullying leads to transgender woman suicide Daily Telegraph bullying  leads to anti Brexit MP death threats. How long will we let their billionaire proprietors get away with this? #HopeNotHate 
The EU is fighting to keep money earned in our countries in our tax base. Contrast that with Brexit Gov vote just last Tuesday to help the mega rich avoid paying tax. #LeaveGate 
From London to EU countriesselect the future locations for EU agencies after #Brexit. See which countries applied:  
#Quitlings, there are countless intellectuals, economists and honest big business leaders who are against #Brexit. There a handful of right wing press barons, a few businessmen using tax loopholes and a number of exnophobic MPs in favour. When will the penny drop? 
"Brexit divorce deal"? Harsh of today's Times when Betty and her Greek-born hubby are celebrating their 70th wedding anniversary  
Love this analogy from D Milliband: "It's a very British thing to think that if you order a meal & then don't like it, you've got to eat it. I've lived in NYC for 4 years & frankly if you order a meal here & it looks a bit rancid, you send it back"#Brexit 
People deserve to know what Brexit is costing them. Government must come clean and stop stalling by releasing their Brexit impact assessments. 
Thread: A new report out today has estimated that the Brexit vote is already costing the average household hundreds of pounds a year.  
I'm told Keir Starmer far too close to David Davis. They discuss tactics on the Withdrawal Bill, etc. Friendly advice to Keir: Brexit is a revolution that devours its children. DD will not survive it. On Brexit, 'opposition' means OPPOSITION 
We're one of 80 organisations calling on MPs to change the Withdrawal Bill tomorrow to protect our rights. If the Government wants to get on with a smooth and orderly #Brexit, now is not the time for arguments over rights  
Today we find out which European city has won the European Medicines Agency (EMA).But what a loss for the UK: 900 jobs, €322m budget (89% from fees & charges, 5% from EU), health industry setting up nearby & 40,000 business visits a year. Gone from London. Thanks to #Brexit.  
The UK exports millions of tonnes of waste to the EU. What impact will #Brexit have? Watch live on Wednesday at 10.30 (GMT) to hear a range of experts give their view:  
This isn't Brexit, this isn't Trump. Merkel is weakened but not out. It will take some time, but Germany will eventually get a sane government. Any schadenfreude is misplaced. 
A brief reminder that this Brexit sub-committee meeting today does not include the NI secretary. 
Me to Germany's Minister for EU Affairs Michael Roth: Do you want more money from the UK to move the Brexit talks forward?Him: Ja 
Perhaps the single most sensible thing yet tweeted about Brexit.  
Perhaps we need to seriously examine the motives of main players in Brexit. Brexit is such lunacy, it's economic suicide. This is obvious to the stupidest of people. Makes the motivation of the hard Brexit players highly suspect. Time toto wake up! @JolyonMaugham @jonsnowC4 
We know! #brexit 
Impeccable, wise thread on Brexit.  
As Theresa May commits £40bn () to a Brexit bill, don't forget that we can change our minds on Brexit. pls RT:  
Should the UK pay double for the #Brexit divorce of around £40 billion up from a proposed £20 billion? @PhilipHammondUK puts @theresa_may under pressure to pay more for Brexit divorce bill'   RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
First, it is important to understand that this isn't a zero-sum game. Something being terrible for "them" doesn't automatically make it great for "us". It's the wrong starting point. #Brexit is capable of being economically harmful (or beneficial, for that matter) to both sides. 
Be honest. Not one meeting was held before the EU referendum by our myopic, flag-waving Brexiteers about what might happen to the Irish border and the Good Friday Agreement was it? Not one. 
The argument that we can't stop Brexit because it will unleash a right wing backlash is somewhat undermined by the fact that Brexit has already unleashed a right wing orgy of hate. At present we have both the pending economic disaster and the fascist thuggery.  
Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU: sign the petition  
Dear Tory #Brexit rebel MPs, Do you want a Labour gov, led by a terrorist-loving, Marxist liar? Then keep on doing what you're doing, as that's how we'll end up with a Labour gov, led by a terrorist-loving, Marxist liar. 
Reminder. "Why did you vote to leave the EU?" Because I didn't want to be in the EU any more. "What did you hope to gain by leaving the EU?" I hoped to gain not being in the EU any more. "What defines whether Brexit succeeds?" Whether, at the end of the process, we've left the EU 
New data says Brexit has cost us already a weeks wages thanks to higher inflation. This is not acceptable, we were promised £350m a week to the NHS. Time to told the Brexiteers to account.  
Today a country whose economy depends to a large extent on banks and pharmaceutical companies is set to lose the two most important agencies that regulate banks and pharmaceutical companies.#Brexit #EBA #EMA 
“If”If you can create calamity, where once there was stability.If you can rubbish our country, and take away national pride.If you can divide our union, and sow seeds of hatred.Yours is Brexit, and all the nonsense in it.And - which is more - you’ll be a Brexiter, my son!  
Strabane and Lifford linked by a bridge.. listen to Patsy on Brexit and possibility of a border  
Just arrived in Brussels - another NB council meeting on BREXIT, today also voting on where European Banking Authority and EMA will be relocated to from UK. Dublin will b competitive for EBA - thanks to our EMA and EBA project teams. 
The collapse of coalition talks in Germany makes a ‘no deal’ Brexit a little more likely - my take on last night’s developments  
No strategy. No plan. No progress. Voters aren’t stupid Andrew. Brexit is a car crash. Your Brexit blabber will only get you so far. #RemainersNow 
Never in the field of Economic Theory has so much shit & lies been written by someone so intellectually challenged before.Next time just keep her away from the crayons & paper.#PritiPatel#Brexitvia @telegraph 
#BREAKING Iraq's Supreme Federal Court rules that a referendum held on Kurdish independence on Sept. 25 was unconstitutional  
UK government expected to (rightly) double Brexit ‘divorce bill’ offer. How times have changed for the @Conservatives. David Cameron has so very much to answer for.  
Misses the point.No way there was going to be a govt in Germany before December summit anyway. And there was no disagreement in coalition talks about #Brexit.UK *still* needs to get its own act together before seeing problems elsewhere.#Sondierungen 
Theresa May has shown her inability to control her cabinet, win an election, negotiate Brexit, care about the vulnerable and stop tax havens. Time to go. #TheresaOut 
Now what were we told about the effects of Brexit about making us poorer during the lead up to referendum and Brexit hasn't even happened? It is time to face up to the truth that Brexit is bad for Britain. #StopBrexit 
Germany’s mess is bad news for Brexit. No10, perhaps inexplicably, is still holding out for Merkel’s help - but she’ll be weak and indecisive for many months now. 
Hard to stomach that what we considered a decent, tolerant, fair, pragmatic country could even contemplate such a destructive, obnoxious idea as #Brexit. #StopTheMadness #StopBrexit 
ANGELA MERKEL, GERMANY, AND BREXIT - With Germany becoming ungovernable last night, what next? The best, original #Brexit daily research and writing is at  
Post-Brexit border checks could add 1.5 billion pounds to UK aerospace costs.  
MUST-READ: top thinktank calculates that the Brexit squeeze means average households are paying £404 a year extra due to price inflation  
The German People Hit Back At Merkel over mass immigration. She may even go. There are implications for the euro, the EU and Brexit. "YOU HAVE TWO WEEKS TO SORT THIS OUT"  
Why is the #Brexit divorce bill such a sensitive issue for Boris, Fox, Gove & co? Because payment of it will make the £350million extra per week they promised for the NHS impossible - it simply won’t happen. Doubt, had there been no Brexit bill,they would have delivered it either  
I’m currently worried about many things. Being left with egg on my face after a triumphantly successful Brexit isn’t one of them. 
Brexit is predicated on dozens of major public sector projects all coming together on time and without complications by B-Day.Those of us who've worked in the public sector can easily predict what will happen. Expect more of this sort of thing. 
‘Brexit Inner Cabinet’. Sounds like a twat accessory. 
David Davis could be 'on the brink of resigning' over the secret letter sent to Theresa May by Boris Johnson & Michae Gove. They have a 'desire to turn post-Brexit Britain into a Singapore in Europe' tax haven'. For the rich not the many. #BrexitShambles #r4today 
A list things which you can’t have at the same time.1. Brexit and the NHS2. Brexit and a workable solution to North Ireland3. No freedom of movement and single market benefits 4. No deal Brexit and tariff free trade with Europe5. Brexit and a future for your kids 
Sums it up. #Merkel in trouble so the EU grinds to a halt.Not a dictatorship though #Brexit 
Brexit is already costing us more every year and we haven’t even left yet #NewBrexitFacts 
This is the case.Brexit, if done properly, would take a long slog of over a decade.By pretending it is easy, Brexit supporters are making it all the more problematic.  
When I hear Philip Hammond say #Brexit could give us chance to explore “regulatory innovation”, my blood chills as reflect on what horrors his terrible euphemism obscures from view#r4Today 
Ideological Brextremists fail to realise that the harder the Brexit, the swifter a campaign builds to rejoin EU:  
If you want Brexit, Dan, fair enough. It’s ripping away part of my identity & insisting I must take sides against myself that grates.  
This is from 23rd June 2016☞ Is the EU referendum legally binding?  
Hard hitting editorial in 'The Guardian' says UK's attitude to Irish question "is a national disgrace for Britain" and #Brexit is "a gratuitous act of hostility towards the Irish economy".   
Brexit victory? EU finally admit bloated budget WILL collapse without huge UK contribution  
Remainers of all parties are planning to keep the UK in the EU, and they believe they will win. @georgeeaton on the plot to stop Brexit: 
.@NoelGallagher would you meet up so @Mcr4EU can share why we oppose Brexit & don’t agree with fascists like Nigel here? Genuine offer.  
Theresa May 'set to raise Brexit divorce bill to £40bn'WHY? Let’s see the bill! Money will never be enough! £70bn Trade Deficit, they should be paying us!  
.@halfon4harlowMP on upping the Brexit bill:“If we start saying that we’re going to give £40-50bn to the EU the public will go bananas, absolutely spare...I cannot believe the public would accept such a huge amount when we need money for our schools, our hospitals, our housing" 
Dozens of organisations join forces to issue ‘save our EU rights’ plea ahead of Brexit Bill battle  
My approach has consistently been that Brexit is more complex than most of its supporters (including HMG) admit, and that it is probably more trouble than it is worth.But @DanielJHannan does not want to hear that, and so falsely alleges outright opposition to Brexit instead. 
I have argued against a further referendum I have even, at @FT of all places(!), set out in detail how Brexit should be done Am not opposed to Brexit in principle.@DanielJHannan knows all this, but he falsely alleges otherwise. 
This month, the world learns whether U.K. banks could survive a cliff-edge Brexit  via @BV 
Home Office admits it is struggling to recruit staff to prepare for Brexit and may have recruit EU migrants to register EU nationals  
The Guardian view on Brexit and the Irish border: Britain’s shameful dereliction  
Five-a-day eating targets 'will be unaffordable for millions after Brexit'  
So, with Germany in political chaos for the foreseeable future, time to play it long on Brexit.Ignore their 2 week 'deadline'. Don't offer the bastards a penny piece more. 
Households are more than £800 worse off after Brexit, study says - The Independent  
Spiegel is taking the news well, calls the failure of the Jamaica talks the German Brexit or Trump moment. “The crisis of western parliamentary democracy has reached Germany”  
Merkel always gets what she wants. If no coalition -> call new elections If Brexit -> take time, call new Brexit vote 
David Davis demanded the right to use a private RAF plane instead of commercial flights to get around Europe for Brexit talks  
Cons x2 Brexit divorce offer to £40bn backed by Johnson-Gove-Fox. Don’t recall them mentioning that during referendum. Discussing on @GMB in a mo 
"The quintessentially superficial Brexiteer Boris Johnson told us that Brexit will bring Britain and Ireland closer. By definition this cannot be true." - Chris Johns, The Irish Times, Monday 20 Nov.#StopBrexit #BrexitReality #Ireland #IrishBorder 
If you are angry about the lies, despondent about the impact of Brexit, then harness your #MondayMotivation & sign up to this!#StopBrexit #BrexityGif #EUWithdrawalBill #BrexitLies @TheNewEuropean @16MillionRising @LibDemNewbiesUK Please RT 
What a joke! Watching TV now especially English made news, it's 99% about events and people in south and when it comes to Brexit, Sky,BBC, Channel4, ITV follow UKGov instructions of continuing to pretend there isn't a voice for Scotland. Rarely any SNP guests,Scots don't exist  
May under pressure to justify paying higher Brexit divorce bill on Monday at a meeting of her cabinet committee to break the deadlock in Brexit negotiations.Good luck with that.#StopBrexit #ProEuro #EuropeTogether 
Payments to farmers should be like a reverse Ebay auction after Brexit says @EamonnIves 
In a process only half-jokingly compared to the Eurovision Song Contest,  EU ministers are to vote on where to relocate the European Medicines Agency and European Banking Authority after Brexit  
Edward Heath in 1972 understood Britain was joining much more than a common market. He said its aim was to improve the quality of life of the peoples of a Europe. It was and it has. Let’s not throw it away. Fight #Brexit!  
If Ireland uses its veto at the December EU summit, something has gone very wrong. Even threatening to use it brings risks. Great piece by @danobrien20 on Irish diplomacy and the strategic nightmare of Brexit.  
New report In the @guardian Five-a-day eating targets 'will be unaffordable for millions after Brexit'  
'Brexit has become a HOSTAGE CRISIS!' US Brexiteer in scathing attack on EU threats  
Commentary: Britain’s gravest economic challenge isn’t Brexit  
Post-Brexit border checks could add 1.5 billion pounds to UK aerospace costs  
UK commits billions to 'industries of future' to ward off Brexit shocks  
Oh fuck off. Nobody - remain or leave - paid attention to Northern Ireland during the referendum period, and it’s dishonest for remain-leaning outlets to pretend they did. pic.twitter.com/XFq9lyzHbS 
So we pay £60bn to get either a bad Pay & Obey with No Say #Brexit or a Worse than Bad ruinous WTO cliff-edge No Deal..when we could pay a lot less to stay put & have a stronger economy & richer future..Well that makes a lot of sense. 
Over 80 organisations join forces in bid to 'save our EU rights' ahead of Brexit battle in Commons  
So much for Global Britain..they can't even see our near neighbours as friends anymore...perhaps he should have gone to Specsavers.As #Brexit backers realise they're losing ground & seeing their narrow-minded coup beginning to fail they're acting like cornered beasts.#StopBrexit 
Frankly I don't give a fig whether the words come from New Lab, Old Lab, Socialist Lab, LibDem, Tory, Green or SNP just so long as the words finally come. #Brexit's a national debacle & we can #StopBrexit democratically & no one has the right to say we can't now change our minds! 
Brexit: when the spectator sees more of the game, it is unsurprising that the Dutch are seeing "flabbergasting complacency" where nothing of its kind is being acknowledged this side of the Channel.  #Brexit.  
Another warning that will fall on deaf Brexiteer ears. It's like telling them you get green if you mix blue & yellow paint - they won't believe it until Nigel tells them...and he'll say red!!!! 
We've all seen the "Spending the Kids' Inheritance" sticker on the kick ass motorhome? How about 'Brexit, squandering our childrens' future'?#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
Twenty years from now:  an aged Daniel Hannan is the only unrepentant Brexiteer willing to be interviewed for BBC's 'Brexit-what was that all about?' commemorative documentary.  
Brexiters cackle away not realising that1. A weak German government will find it more difficult to make Brexit compromises2. Any German government without the FDP or AFD will be more pro-EU integration3. The French and Italians now have more space to shape EU integration 
Toby, re those uppity Paddies: You share an invisible border w/that ‘foreign power’ & Brexit shafts ppl on either side of it hence the anger  
Your support for Brexit will ensure a massive change throughout the UKThere will be no UKRegardsScotland x  
Brussels to "put decisions on hold" due to Merkel's 'paralysed' coalition talks.'The EU cannot move without Germany'EU will be "damaged" if Mrs Merkel, the mother of Europe, fails to form a coalition government.#Brexit #EU 
Read the comments from Labour supporters, Starmer. They are all telling you to stop pissing in the wind and to dump Brexit.  
Five-a-day eating targets 'will be unaffordable for millions after Brexit'  
Poor old economic knownothing @michaelgove mugged by reality again"The impact of the referendum is equivalent to a £448 cut in annual pay for the average worker. Put another way, the Brexit vote has cost the average worker almost one week’s wages due to higher prices." duh  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
UK aerospace industry issues warning over lack of Brexit trade deal  
Database of 365 videos showing exactly how Spanish police acted in #Catalonia on the day of the referendum 1 Oct. Draw your own conclusions:  
Let's just look at what we need to make a Brexit a success:  
A lot of reputations will suffer if Brexit goes ahead and is a success. That might help explain the desperate tone of those trying to stop it.  
May now set to offer more than £40bn to settle the Brexit bill. Let’s #StopBrexit and fund the NHS instead. #FBPE. 
Jeremy Corbyn says Brexit pushed through by in-fighting Tories is 'biggest risk' to Britain  
This - from one of those awful experts, a former permanent secretary at the department for international trade - powerfully sets out why #Brexit, and leaving the #SingleMarket is an an economic disaster that’s already started  
Remainers spend most of their time attacking a straw man Brexiter stereotype which, to a large extent, doesn't really exist outside the bubble. This is why they come over as petulant supercilious twats - and would lose a second referendum as well.   #Brexit 
Yes, but the worse things this country has been through were imposed upon us by enemies or circumstance.Brexit is something we are CHOOSING TO DO TO OURSELVES. And could still choose NOT to do to ourselves.  
You need some more gifs mate. EU membership is worth so much more than we put into it. Brexit is a shell game by tax-avoiding billionaires intent on avoiding 2019 Eu Tax-Avoidance reforms. The rest of us just get poorer on purpose. #StopBrexit #FinalSay 
Best Law Examiners Report 2017 won by @OxfordLawFac, h/t @TimesDiary #Brexit  
Says the coward who, with your mate Blair, promised the British people a referendum on Lisbon Treaty which you then ran away from when you realised you were going to get your arse kicked?  
Obviously, Germany not being able to form a government is just another European anti-Brexit plot. 
Problem is, there is no mainstream anti-Brexit influence, in or out of parlia. Campaign is just on the social media. If we do change the course of history it will be extraordinary. Far from social media being the source of alt facts in this case it's the underground for the truth 
May under pressure to justify paying higher Brexit divorce bill  
Come on people - get this petition up to 10,000 by the end of Sunday ....Petition: Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU.  
Brexit: The willingness to destroy the UK to achieve nonsensical short-term goals.Trump: The willingness to destroy the USA to achieve nonsensical short-term goals.Climate change denial: The willingness to destroy the planet to achieve nonsensical short-term goals. 
Understanding how Brexit tricked millions of people means understanding how #BrexitDarkMoney #Legatum #Russia conduct day to day business. It feels like the stuff of spy novels, yet is what’s played out on our social media feeds for 24months #democracy #ExitFromBrexit #StopBrexit 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
How long can the farce go on that she is leader of the Tory party and that she is leading the country. She is just the Brexit extremists puppet and they are pulling all the strings. The sooner she is gone the better for the country. #StopBrexit 
I stand with @Anna_Soubry Ok, be a Brexiteer if you want but never be an abuser.I’m going to say this in no uncertain terms, Brexit isn’t freedom but a slide towards Fascism.  The abuse & intimidation of politicians, of whatever party, has got to stop. Full stop.  
A significant part in Northern Ireland’s tragedy was mistaking “democracy” for “majoritarianism”. Unfortunately, the post-#Brexit UK as a whole seems hell bent on repeating this very mistake. The irresponsibility of this defies belief. 
Do you wonder why Catalonia had to organise a referendum unilaterally instead of having a deal with Madrid?This short video explains how all proposals from Catalonia have been rejected by Rajoy since 2003!Check it out yourself  
Monster rally in Bilbao to Stop Spanish Nationalist attack and for the right of a Referendum  
Brexiteer repsonses to my remoaning take two broad forms:1. Shut up, traitor; and2. Why not work for a better Brexit? 1/n 
As Brexit begins to bite, Britain's economic future is not the only thing in question. In 2018, Britain could lose its "street cred" pic.twitter.com/VAVebm4poK 
Brexit is the consequence of this man's idiocy. He ran scared when faced with a smooth talking con artist, leader of a party that had no MPs. He divided our nation. If one was to be charitable the best that cld be said of this most awful of prime ministers was that he was a fool.  
Brexit is our Mugabe. 
The man who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can still be stopped  
If the HO can’t recruit enough staff now how on earth are we going to staff all the duplicate agencies and admin functions from Brexit? 
One newspaper headline and 13 death threats. The far right have been given a mandate to threaten and intimidate through the Brexit vote and it's not just individuals as we have seen in the press and on Twitter this week. #StopTheHate #StopBrexit 
So in short, it is beyond me how @daily_politics thought it was a good idea to send someone like Stuart to make sure a report.Balance is one thing, but distorting the German view on #Brexit is quite another!12/12 
To make it clear, *this* is what Germany’s equivalent of The CBI actually really thinks of #Brexit10/12 
I've been searching for a benefit of Brexit since the referendum. I can't even find one tiny benefit, one vaguely humorous benefit, one smidge of a benefit. There is no reason, good or bad, to leave the EU. Bring back the continental land link of 7000 years ago  
The list of MPs who voted against the NC30 for animals to have Sentient Being status after Brexit is at the bottom of this web-page:I have just spent the last few hours naming each MP in individual tweets (313 of them!)Pls RT.  
Home Office officials have privately admitted the department is having problems increasing its immigration staffing levels as part of its Brexit preparations and may have to recruit Polish and other eastern Europeans to help register the 3 million EU nationals in Britain.   
When Brexit happens, it will take Burnage a generation to 'f------ get over' it @NoelGallagher. We're campaigning to Remain, "that’s democracy. F------ get over it" 
If a writer tried to use this hook for a drama about Brexit, we'd say it's too on-the-nose.  
Driverless Cars for a Leaderless Country. Only in Brexit Britain! 
Could Dominic Grieve and his fellow Brexit rebels ("mutineers" says the Telegraph) form the nucleus of a new Parliamentary grouping of representatives with the courage of their convictions?Is that why Leave is so rattled, suddenly spending thousands to attack them on Facebook? 
On Tuesday at 18.30h I will have the pleasure to participate in this debate on the European impact of the Catalan Referendum. Don't miss it!  
Frequently find myself recalling this @JananGanesh column from 2015: "The referendum is not a fork in the road. It is a roundabout with no exits."  
Remainers, please help ensure that Tory-linked tax-haven funded 'charity' think-tank #Legatum is not allowed to keep on driving the government towards the most destructive possible #Brexit out of the public gaze.#LegatumInstitute #StopBrexit #Brexit  
The Guardian view on Brexit and the Irish border: Britain’s shameful dereliction > powerful   
This is priceless. #Brexit #citizensrights 
MPs on all sides of House who oppose Brexit put country before careers & risk abuse or worse. Show me, meanwhile, the poor leading Brexiteer 
#Brexit exists to protect the tax-dodging rich from EU anti-tax avoidance measures, which is why Farage and the tax-dodging press barons are so fanatically promoting it. Nov 2016 article by @NolanJazim #StopBrexit#TaxHavenBrexit 
Jeremy Corbyn says Brexit pushed through by in-fighting Tories is 'biggest risk' to Britain  
Theresa May's Britain Is Headed for a Brexit Train Wreck  
Other pundits disagree and stress A50 was what EU27 wanted, and so on. So it is matter of opinion.But in my view, a properly negotiated treaty covering exit and future relationship, at a sensible pace, would answer many of the problems of Brexit. 
We need clarity on Brexit jobs by the start of January, Deutsche Bank says  
Brexit could have been by treaty: for what is done by treaty can be undone by treaty.A50 not the sole legal route out of EU, just the only unilateral way.And yes, a treaty would need EU27 unanimity. But so will a post-Brexit trade agreement, so let's cut to the chase.  
It's over 2 years, of course. So the Budget hole in the EU budget if UK did not make its contributions post-Brexit for 2019-20 is a grand total of 0.102% of EU27 GDP. 14/ 
'To much of Europe, Brexit appears to be an exercise in British self-harm, which it is. But in Ireland Brexit is potentially lethal too.'  
Something abhorrently dehumanising has happened to our politics. No policy - let alone Brexit - is worth this.  
#Tory #Brexit rebel #MPs are being #bullied GOOD! Meanwhile 17,410,742 #Leavers have been called old, stupid, gullible, misinformed, uneducated,  xenophobic & racists! So, #AnnaSoubry spare us your pitiful #victimhood! @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #BBC #SKY #UK #EU #NEWS 
Listen to this: Arch Tory, Lord Archer, says what we all know. May is washed out, Corbyn will be PM. The only question is when. The sooner the better to stop the carnage against our public services and the worst Brexit possible...  
When I hear Philip Hammond say #Brexit could give us chance to explore “regulatory innovation”, my blood chills as reflect on what horrors his terrible euphemism obscures from view 
The total size of the projected EU budget from Brexit day to end 2020 is €274bn. The UK contribution post-rebate is +/-13% of this. That's €35.63bn 7/ 
Bernadette Devlin never lost it. Her typical clear, incisive analysis on how Britain has landed Ireland - North and South - in deep Brexit. #Brexit #brexitshambles 
Jacob Rees-Mogg pulls apart the Customs Union in a historic speech – ‘IT’S A RACKET’  via @Your Brexit 
Gisela on top form: Parliament voted to implement a democratic EU referendum result. Campbell is undermining the Brexit deal, is creating myths and he wants a bad deal to prove himself right.  
Sorry DUP but #Brexit is about exploiting English nationalism to win a tax haven. Northern Ireland simply doesn't come into it. My bet is the Tory Brexiters would gladly cast NI adrift if doing so gained them their tax haven. #StopBrexit 
The Guardian view on Brexit and the Irish border: Britain’s shameful dereliction | Editorial  
Home Office having to recruit EU citizens to process ... EU citizens' applications. That is the lunacy that is #Brexit. 
In this week’s Brexit: You Couldn’t Make It Up, Home Office may have to recruit Polish and other EU immigrants to register Polish and other EU immigrants.  
The shock of winning in picture form...  #Brexit #StopBrexit #exitfrombrexit #brexitshambles #FBPE 
6. They'll need scapegoats for the failure (because it's not possible) to deliver on the sunlit uplands - and those will be anyone who isn't with them.KILL THE BEAST. CUT HIS THROAT. SPILL HIS BLOOD.There's no one to challenge the posh boys of Brexit & their big money backers 
 “#KennethClarke #MP the Ultimate #British #TRAITOR!” has spent his entire political career undermining the #SOVEREIGNTY of #BRITAIN and selling the #UK off to the #CORRUPT #EU! SCUMBAG!  #BBC #SKY #NEWS #BREXIT #UK #EU @Conservatives #Conservatives 
3. So now - in a kind of Lord Of The Flies scenario - the Brexit headbangers find there is no one actually in charge. No responsible adult.KILL THE PIG. CUT HER THROAT. SPILL ITS BLOOD.Hence the clear threats to female Conservative MPs who aren't headbangers. 
As delusional rhetoric goes that was almost on a par with our own leaders saying Brexit is going like a dream - #Mugabe 
.“British government is unambiguously the sole cause of a MASSIVELY hostile act against Ireland, north & south, in the form of a hard Brexit". 
BFE: Join the grassroots voice of opposition to ALL form of Brexit, fight for our place in Europe and speak out against xenophobia and lies. Join Britain for Europe and connect with a local group near you today!  #StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/InuQfjVZEy 
2. They have tested the boundaries of normal discourse ('Enemies of the People', 'Brexit Mutineers', death threats for Gina Miller etc) and found nobody with any influence policing them.That was Theresa May's job but she, of course, focuses on party - not country. 
The Guardian view on Brexit and the Irish border: Britain’s shameful dereliction | Editorial  
An exemplary example of why Remainers are not getting anywhere with how they think and talk about the referendum  'How much longer can it take for the stupid spoilt children to realise we were right all along?' 
365 Videos of the Repression lived in Catalonia by the Spanish Police in the Referendum of October 1, 2017  
Voter Consultancy Ltd, owned by Thomas Borwick, who has been bullying Tory Brexit rebels on Facebook, is a registered "third party" with the Electoral Commission. This gives it free and total access to the electoral register. What has Borwick been doing with these data? 
The man who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can still be stopped  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Supporting #Brexit v7ERGEDLAfDAKPBNPDUPUKIPFarageBanksHoeyAssangeTrumpKKKPutinISISFNPFFCamb. AnalyticaLegatumMurdochDacreHopkinsHartley-BrewerMoggGoveFoxRedwoodBorisDavisJenkinDuncan-SmithMayCorbynGisela StewartDysonMartin#StopBrexit #FBPE 
I wonder if Mugabe could be prevailed upon - now he has some time & assuming Davis is off - to take over as Brexit Secretary. Obvious choice 
Make no mistake #Brexit was won on a lie but only because for 30 years before the EU Referendum they sold you the lie that neo liberalism could bring you prosperity without a well funded welfare state. 
Agreed. Irish people forget that we have a one-way mirror into both UK and US. Current Brexit/border "shock" on part of British media/pols is genuine because they ignore Ireland (including North) almost all the time.  
Tory Brexit MPs including Liam Fox, Dominic Raab, Lizz Truss and Priti Patel want a bonfire of workplace rights and Asian style working practices and low taxes.#StopBrexit#TaxHavenBrexit 
Rees-Mogg wants environmental and safety standards to be slashed after Brexit. The real reason for Brexit - A low tax, low regulation, low safety, low welfare paradise for the rich. #StopBrexit#TaxHavenBrexit 
Pre #EURef - @sarahwollaston LYING #Tory #MP for #Totnes is a RABID #Remoaner who was planted in #Leave to switch sides at the last minute and promised a Job by #DavidCameron! #SarahWollaston is working for the #EU! #BBC #SKY #NEWS #BREXIT #UK #EU @Conservatives #Conservatives 
Sir Martin Donnelly, ex permanent secretary at the department for international trade & everything we need to know about #brexit  
365 Videos of the Repression lived in Catalonia by the Spanish Police in the Referendum of October 1, 2017 #Share #RT Check the web site:  
#Brexit will create 8000 jobs in the Civil Service trying to deal with the costly headache of the unnecessary decision that will damage the UK's economy.Meanwhile... The UK is losing REAL jobs because the EMA and EBA are relocating within the EU.JUST.STOP.BREXSHIT.NOW. pic.twitter.com/s0eC29WyDP 
As my calls for the benefits of Brexit have fallen on deaf ears (@BorisJohnson @DavidDavisMP @johnredwood @andrealeadsom @LiamFox @CCHQPress etc.) I am hoping you can RT this, so we might discover even one single benefit!#StopBrexit #FBPE #NoConfidence @mrjamesob @BoyGeorge 
If you're a Labour MP and you're keeping your head down on Brexit, you must raise it before our jobs, our rights & our protections are swept away.Please stand up and represent your constituents.#StopBrexit 
If the UK agrees to pay the EU all it owes; and if the UK accedes to all demands on EU citizens rights, there's still the unsolvable Irish border problem. So whatever way you look at it, #Brexit can't be delivered. No wonder Davis wants to chuck the towel in. 
Even the Eurocats get it. We say NO to Brexit #StopBrexit #BrexityGIF .@spaceangel1964 @MollyMEP @ChelsClive 
Why can’t we have a referendum where People decide whether Kashmir should be with India or PakistanThose who vote for Pakistan, simply send them to Pakistan... over  
touching how Remain MPs want to delay & derail Brexit after 40 + years of rubber stamping EU legislation in parliament without a glance.  
Please sign and RT this. Brexit damages jobs, communities and well being across the country, @jeremycorbyn and our MPs must resist.#StopBrexit 
'You should have seen the press conference. Boris Johnson was so badly prepared. He must think we're idiots,' my MOTHER on Johnson's Irish visit. #Brexit 
anybody buying the SNP’s “Westminster power grab” rhetoric around the Brexit bill really should read this - the logic is pretty compelling 
So we will, as Abraham Lincoln did before us, stand up and we will mock. Not the Leave voters, but that spoilt Brexit child. 
Another thing they forgot to mention on that big red bus before the referendum...  
There is little support for Brexit now from real people. Help your MP to realise that they don’t have to listen to the zealots. #StopBrexit 
What a bunch of incompetent idiots the Tories are! I bet @DavidDavisMP is thinking of resigning because the penny's finally dropped and he's accepted that Brexit is impossible to deliver. This is just a pretext.  
This is in stark contrast to the Brexit sovereignty argument. They want sovereignty, but can’t necessarily say for what. 
A Tory MP has labelled the Government's attempts to write the Brexit date into UK law as "madness"  
Opinion: For Brexit to succeed the UK will end up becoming more European. But without Brexit, this would probably never have happened.  
This article claims that Robert Mercer's Rentec company has been laundering money for Putin. If true it links Putin to the Trump-Mercer-Bannon-Cambridge Analytica-Brexit network  #StopBrexit #Brexit (diagram by @carolecadwalla) 
The govt's Brexit strategy is bad enough without these two Brexit freelancers making things worse.  
Sneering @Theresa_May in 2017,  to a distraught nurse whose income has fallen for seven years: "There's no magic money tree!!!"Philip Hammond at #Budget2017: "I'm spending £70,000,000,000 on this groovy driverless car and a leather jacket so we are ready for Brexit"  
But wait I thought everyone voted for Trump and Brexit based on a few Russian Twitter bot accounts!?!?   
Referendum on 8th Amendment to be held next year affects some 60,000 women and girls every year. The 8th denies all pregnant women and girls the freedom to refuse unnecessary and harmful medical intervention during pregnancy, labour and birth. We urge you to REGISTER FOR REPEAL 
this is the same man who tries & tries to stop brexit to no avail,then states that he hopes EU will punish us, just so he can say 'I warned you' & be proved right,how selfish & perverse he is #  
Those are not cheers you can hear, @DanielJHannan That is the sound of Brexit crashing into the walls of reality.  
The notion that self driving vehicles is going to save the UK from a post-Brexit recession is ludicrous. Unless the plan is to make cabbies and lorry drivers do back-breaking agricultural work. 
The Customs Union is a racket that defends producers in rich countries against producers in poor countries, to the cost of the poorest consumers in the rich countries.#Brexit#MoggMentum 
There something seriously wrong with the small group of people that are setting the direction of the country with their Brexit fantasy when one of their own party calls the "unhinged" and "paranoid". It is time to end the Brexit madness and #StopBrexit 
Tory MP says his colleagues are becoming 'unhinged' over Brexit  
How social scientists can respond to the challenges of inequality & populism. Introductory thoughts by me, @nigelbdodd  & @mlamont6 to preface the Introduction to @BJSociology special issue on Trump & Brexit. @LSEInequalities  
The @UKGovernment must reconsider their commitment to lowering animal welfare standards post-Brexit. Reducing the status of animals is a huge backward step for animal welfare.  
Chapter by chapter, piece by piece, over the coming weeks and months you are going to be shown Russia, Brexit, Trump, and #AlternativeWar as it's never been seen before.Just the first half of one chapter in the @Byline_Media story looks like this... 
'Why don't we work together?': Stuart to Campbell over Brexit deal  
#Brexit continues to damage our body politic. Even when Brexit is defeated it will take years to recover.  
"A source of national pride, established in a post-war era of appreciation of what actually matters most in life, the NHS is in no state to withstand the grievous blows which Brexit will deliver."  
Andy Burnham demands English regions have say in Brexit talks  
Did Banks 'facilitate' donations from foreign sources? Could they be Russian? Maybe his motivation is the same as hedge funds and wealthy Tories, to engineer a hard Brexit and when asset prices tank move in and clean up? @carolecadwalla @mrjamesob #StopBrexit 
FRONT PAGE EDITORIAL in 3 of Alabama’s biggest papers urging voter to reject Roy Moore: “This election has become a referendum on whether we will accept this kind of behavior from our leaders."  
Iain Dale - "Isn’t it lovely dealing with these people?"It actually confirms my view. I voted Leave and nothing I have seen since has persuaded me that was a bad decision." #Brexit  
Decisions to make. Dads passport needs renewed. Do we spend money and do it now, then find out we need another after Brexit...or wait until the Indy Scotland passport is issued... 
No one is unemployed. The super-rich do not dodge billions of pounds of tax. Brexit negotiations are going really well. The government is strong and stable. #Marr 
UTTER LIAR & #TRAITOR #SarahWollaston @sarahwollaston #Tory #MP for #Totnes is a RABID #Remoaner she wants to keep us in the #SingleMarket, #CustomsUnion & to keep #Britain under the jurisdiction of the #EuropeanCourt! #BBC #SKY #NEWS #BREXIT #UK #EU @Conservatives #Conservatives 
For Britain's pharma industry, the prospect of a no-deal Brexit is causing queasiness  
BREXIT: That's right, it's more "how difficult can it be?" Brexit insights, featuring metaphors so tortured Amnesty International are preparing to step in.  
Hugely important article on #Brexit debate Why staying in #SingleMarket vital to UK jobs & prosperity @RCorbettMEP @derekvaughan @mcashmanCBE @Open_Britain @LadyBasildon @ChukaUmunna? 
It seems investors have already made their minds up about Brexit  
Scotland/Northern Ireland voted #RemainBut #Brexit moves on with demands for a ‘hard’ Brexit clearly driven by English Nationalism which has to be placatedI look forward to an Independent Scotland & a United Ireland inside #EU 
US columnist Janet Daley - "These aren’t #Brexit negotiations anymore, this is a hostage crisis, and the conditions under which the prisoner is released won’t be discussed until the money is on the table."  
Thomas Borwick @TBorwick accuses Tory rebel Nicky Morgan MP @NickyMorgan01 of "Brexit betrayal" because her constituency voted 50.3% Leave.He is surely not the son of Lady Borwick, Kensington MP to 2017, who continued to back Brexit despite 69% of her electorate voting Remain? pic.twitter.com/b49fQVEMN6 
Marvin Zeegelaar has been in the Prem for 30 seconds and has already felt the hard Brexit thrust of an Andy Carroll elbow. Love it 
Anna Soubry blames threats on 'Brexit mutineers' headline  
Kezia in the jungle, Ruth on the Bake Off ... What's that Nicola Sturgeon doing? Oh - just saving 1400 jobs at BiFab, trying to protect the country from Brexit - and all that other boring type of government stuff... #TheDayJob 
1. Those supporting #Brexit can no longer claim 2B true patriots when it's quite evident it's failing & will harm the UK on a scale unseen in decades. The case 4 it is discredited & patriotism can't stem from a blind ideological pursuit of it at any cost. #StopBrexit 
Those Brexit Impact Reports #BrexityGif 
Essential reading as we consider the ominous possibility that poor handling of Brexit by the likes of Gove may well restart the Troubles.  
The deadline for the completion date for Phase 1 of Brexit is just around the corner, but is it time to bin Brexit?We'll be speaking to long-standing Brexit supporter, @PeterBoneUKHave your say... 0345 60 60 973 84850 @LBC#SalmondOnSunday 
Good idea from @AndyBurnhamGM There is a danger that Tory Brexit will prioritise the needs of the City of London over those of the English regions.  
More bad news for animals. The UK voted to reject a post-Brexit law recognizing animals as sentient, like the EU does. If you live in the UK, please consider sharing this news and fighting back against the post-Brexit attack on animal welfare.  
The only meaningful vote on the Brexit deal should have the option to remain inside the EU, even if a condition is attached to go back to the people. This important to mess up for the generations to come. #StopBrexit 
Alastair Campbell is a sociopath.Iraq proved that, I wonder why MSM interview him.Great they do, helps the BREXIT cause no end.  
.@FalahMustafa at #HISF2017 - In 1992, the world told us not to hold elections in Kurdistan. In 2017, we were told the same with the Referendum. Why do you preach democracy but then tell us it's not the right time?  
Splash in @mailonsunday on mainly #ToryParty #Brexit MP's who defy will of the people in their #Remain constituencies. 
Coming up on #SalmondOnSunday, 3pm @LBC- Is it time to bin Brexit?- Minimum pricing on alcohol- Autumn Budget 2017 0345 60 60 973 84850 @LBC 
The EU 27 are by no means blameless for the slowness of Brexit talks. But Britain is the bigger culprit  
BBC News - Brexit: Gisela Stuart meets German business leaders  
There are lots of things that are more important than Scottish Labour infighting over trips to the jungle & this is one of them...MPs call for clarity over devolved powers after Brexit - BBC News  
Ireland’s hand in the Brexit fiasco is fundamentally weak. Overplaying it comes with big downsides. Today’s column.  
Pleasure to speak at the biggest ever #LabEast17 Conference earlier today. Spoke on Brexit, the Tory lack of leadership and austerity.  
Voting in a Democratically held Referendum is now called 'imposing an agenda' Seek help Mr Campbell  
I campaigned against Gisela as a UKIP candidate in Birmingham, what I learned was she is an absolutely sound advocate of #Brexit. Fearless, she is honest, direct & a true embodiment of what Labour once stood for. Best wishes Gisela   
Alastair, what is so extreme about Brexit? Do the prospects of self-government, independence, border control etc. terrify you?  
Philip #Hammond, the Chancellor of the Exchequer.#Marr #Brexit #StopBrexit #ToriesOut #Brexitshambles #PhilipHammond #FBPE 
There's also no in-work poverty, no foodbank use, no homelessness & no risks to the UK from Brexit in Hammond-world. Oh, and no clue.  
The euro-area economy is in line for its best growth in years  
I am convinced that as the people are turning on #Mugabe now, so too the Brits will turn on those who are executing or enabling Brexit. I don't know when but it will happen & will include MPs who, while not liking Brexit, did too little & too late to stop its progress #StopBrexit 
This is not only a referendum on Roy Moore, it's a referendum on the people of Alabama. Hoping decency prevails here.  
Proud to be a mutinous saboteur, defying the will of the tax dodging press barons, the UKIP xenophobes and the forces of intolerance here and abroad. Fight #Brexit! 
How UTTERLY pathetic that the *winning* side of the EU referendum continues to BLAME the *losing* side for the fact that the thing they “won” has turned out to be precisely the towering bonfire of shit that we tried to warn them it would be. PATHETIC. 
#Brexit is an act of supreme economic sense that gives our country the opportunity to go in a BETTER direction - @patel4witham:  via @Telegraph 
Brexit isn't working out well for the Borwick family: mum managed to lose pro Remain Kensington for the Tories by banging on about the joys of leaving in her election literature  
Conservative MP Dominic Grieve, who got called a "mutineer" this week, told me some of his colleagues are "unhinged" when it comes to Brexit.  
Jeremy Corbyn has again refused to say how much Labour would offer the European Union for the so-called Brexit “divorce” bill to unlock trade talks  
#JacobReesMogg: "It is a matter of choice for the govt - they will have to choose  whether to give lots of money to the #EU or spend money on necessary UK public services.  @theresa_may @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #BBC #SKY #NEWS #TORY #UK #BREXIT 
the Brexit vote might be the final break up of the disunited kingdom Bernadette Devlin McAliskey  
For 'hard right', read massively wealthy people aiming to protect their wealth from fair taxation by exploiting disadvantaged and struggling working class people with the fraudulent claim that #Brexit will make their lives better.  
Funnily enough, the only one of these “average Bavarian businessmen” who speaks favorably of #Brexit is a frequent retweeter of Breitbart & Westmonster & AfD propaganda. Due dilligence please, @BBCNews @GiselaStuart . 
Philip Hammond on  names as #brexit benefit the divergence of regulation. Have fun outside the Single Market.  
If you’re not already tweeting arguments that Brexit can be stopped, please consider doing so.UK is on a cliff edge. 
Shocked, shocked to think that Gisela Stuart - who supported a unilateral guarantee for EU27 citizens but then knifed them in the back - would say anything misleading about German business and Brexit...  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Tony Blair, Alastair Campbell, Bob Geldorf, Eddie Izzard, what a fantastic line up for BREXIT.  
Well I have to say I'm not surprised that this firehose of hyper partisan Brexity content for people to share on Fakebook etc isn't so...transparent.Why is Brexit promotion always such a...secretive...endeavour   
Would that be the Tories and Labour then, as they both stood on a Brexit manifesto in the last GE?    
But Japan isn't in the EU!Japanese car manufacturers’ success in the European market is WITHOUT a bilateral trade deal between Tokyo & Brussels.“I think we can leave the customs union & the single market on Monday."#Brexit #EU 
In Scotland whether your pro EU or against One Thing is certainBrexit will be a disaster for Scotland staying in the UKWhere do You think the Brits will get their exports from?And Keep the Billions of revenue in London No other choice in Scotland is to leave the UKSaor Alba 
Why is Leave.EU not prosecuted for this clear threat of violence against @carolecadwalla? Is there one rule for Brexiters threatening terrorist violence and another for the rest of us! #StopBrexit #Brexit  
“Three simple reasons Brexit is failing” by Tobias Stone  
Mrs May @theresa_may is driving forward with the "will of the people".Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn is driving forward with "for the many, not the few. I didn't vote for Brexit, so it's not my will and it appears I am not one of the many either.I'm trapped in an undemocratic void. 
Andy Burnham: give English regions a 'seat at table' in Brexit talks  
Someone please give him the job. He’d do it well (and it would give us all a month off from the nonsense he spouts about Brexit).  
For hard right read people like you Comrade Bankski who used référendum to impose agenda elections would not accept   
This, from Lord Cashman @mcashmanCBE on the matter of the Brexit Impact Assessments.  Many thanks as always for your wisdom and courage in standing up and fighting for all things that matter.  
Siri - show me a metaphor for #Brexit.  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Traitor definition: “person who betrays his country” synonyms “back stabber, double-dealer, viper, quisling, fifth columnist” @campbellclaret Huge numbers believe they apply to you over #Brexit and referendum? Find it to disagree with them.  
Geoffrey Servante, 98, who fought Franco, said he was so appalled by police violence during the referendum in Catalonia on October 1 that he will be voting for Carles Puigdemont’s pro-independence coalition on December 21. #21D #Llibertat 
Change Britain's @GiselaStuart takes on continuity Remain campaigner @campbellclaret over Brexit. "You want a bad deal to prove you're 'right'?!" #bbcsp 
* 2,680, 000 registered voters * 322,578 (inflated) casted votes* 88% boycott success * IPOB only wanted 60% boycott If this was a referendum it would be a smashing defeat to one Nigeria supporters. 
JACOB REES-MOGG: Britain's Brexit negotiating position is strong, don't give in to EU financial demands, spend money on UK infrastructure. 
So predictable but so unedifying to see Sun editor @tonygallagher try to pin Brexit chaos on Leo Varadkar while shilling for his Conference jogging partner Boris Johnson.But I’m sure he’s only following orders. 
SIU supporters out in Northfield, Aberdeen yesterday, leafleting and knocking on doors.Our team got a great reception, even the people who said they voted yes were happy to see us, and many who voted yes in 2014 are either not sure or will vote no if there is another referendum  
If David Miliband became @UKLabour leader I would rejoin as a member, vote for the party and stand as a candidate again. Please get #Corbyn out and give Labour a chance of winning again. #Brexit #Marr 
Still the most accurate #Brexit forecast I've seen.  
How about we redefine 'Hard Brexit' as staying in the EU and being really grumpy? 
"Democracy cannot be allowed to die on the referendum day" - there's still a way out from the #Brexit madness. Time to #StopBrexit. 
UK Government votes that “#animals can’t feel pain or emotions” How disgusting and ignorant are these people? #Marr #Brexit@Protect_Wldlife@HSIUKorg@rickygervais@Ivy_Middleton@PeterEgan6@marcthevet@DrBrianMay via @LondonEconomic 
The world watched @guyverhofstadt #referendum #Catalonia #1OCT Spanish repression, citizens beaten and watched your hypocrisy and witnessed the EU silent complicity! Why is it so hard to really defend human rights EVERYWHERE and ALWAYS?? 
NEWS! UK Brexit team furious as EU threatens to keep British people dangerously well-informed  
Here's what Dominic Grieve MP said to me this morning about some Conservative MPs becoming "unhinged" over Brexit:  
False claims about the NHS helped tip the referendum. But as the threat from Brexit to the health service becomes clearer, it must now be the battleground on which the argument is finally won.  
Labour are in denial. They haven’t quite realised that to pay for a nationalisation programme you need a healthy economy, and that the Brexit both them & the Tories advocate will crash the economy #Marr 
Rees-Mogg: UK’s negotiating position much stronger than EU’s'If we say we are NOT contributing without a deal to last 21 months... then EU has a huge hole in its budget.#EU has no legal ability to borrow & is effectively insolvent for that period#Brexit 
So much for regaining Sovereignty and taking back control. A hard #Brexit Britain will have to take orders from Washington. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
The real traitors are the hard right ideologues who have used a referendum to impose agenda no election would elect   
Having debated with @Nigel_Farage now off to share Bbc Sunday Politics studio with @GiselaStuart - never stop calling out Brexit bullshit 
WATCH | @Nigel_Farage calls out @campbellclaret for his traitorous comments this week: "You were encouraging a foreign government in these neogitations to 'play hard ball'. Surely, whether you like Brexit or not, you should be on our side, no their side!"  
EU WORRIED about No Deal'I don’t think Macron wants 40% tariffs on French cheeses or 12% on French wine.Now getting into situation where EU is beginning to panic like Germans are about size of UK market.We’re their 2nd largest export market'#Brexit #EU 
I've wrecked the UK Economy, Lost AAA Rating, Caused Race Hatred, and now off to live in France ... Thanks Moronic #BREXIT Idiots  
Cabinet Minister Sajid Javid said ‘selfish baby boomers stop new housing’ - Would they be the same selfish Tory-voting baby-boomers who want to rob others of their EU citizenship and Freedom of Movement!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Sky: "Andy Burnham says he's worried about a "London-centric approach to Brexit"". Tomorrow: "Andy Burnham expresses concern about the London-centric nature of Dick Whittington, Mary Poppins and the Arsenal/Spurs game". 
Solidarity with the brave & brilliant @carolecadwalla who’s done more to expose the truth about #Brexit, Russia & dark money than anyone   
Tory economy £76bn tax breaks for millionaires 120,000 deaths, homeless epidemic, nurses at Foodbanks, 5yr old kids looking in bins for food, wages lower than 10yrs ago, basket case Brexit schools can’t afford glue sticks #marr 
Fecking great to see so many Irish riding into the Brexit debate on Twitter.  Brexiters now seeing British Remainers have 4m allies joining flank with fresh perspective. 
'Brexit has become a HOSTAGE CRISIS!' US Brexiteer in scathing attack on EU threats  
Seems that if Brit Govt is to move to next stage of Brexit negotiations it has to accept conclusions of Irish Govt/EU Brexit Task Force - no border and All-Ireland economy. Who'll tell Arlene?  
"This is all part of the general hysteria which seems to be developing around Brexit" says Dominic Grieve MP"I do sometimes think that some of my colleagues have become unhinged actually..." 
So, Leave voters of Cornwall. And Wales. And the NorthEast. Will you NOW admit you voted Leave without realising what it really meant?Cornwall asks for Government funding after Brexit, doesn't get it  
Manchester Mayor @AndyBurnhamGM says he's worried about a "London-centric approach to Brexit", with no thought of the UK's regions #Paterson 
Exactly. Brexit is the biggest misselling scam that we've ever seen, and extraordinarily the actor is the government itself.(Misselling is a deliberate, reckless, or negligent sale of a product or service that is misrepresented and/or unsuitable for customer's needs).  
It's 17 months since referendum. 17 months to polish an argument. Here was one of its key cheerleaders. Is this really it? It's really it. 
A Priti Patel Telegraph piece. Headlined 'Brexit is act of supreme economic sense'. Or, possibly, a list of supremely meaningless buzzwords  
Since the referendum it has become clear Europe is changing, Britain has to keep #Brexit options open - says @DMiliband  
Follow this thread. It looks like @LegatumInst is the classic confluence of US leaning, Russian Oligarch connected dark money that invested heavily in the #Brexit vote.  
The majority of MPs who oppose a hard #Brexit must assert themselves & stop this hard right coup  
A raft of MPs with serious legal nous are organizing themselves to push for a more cautious approach to Brexit  
'My grandparents emigrated from Ireland in the 50s. As Irish Catholics, they faced lots of prejudice. 2 months ago, I applied for an Irish passport. Post-Brexit everyone wants to be Irish!' One of the #migrationmoments left by an exhibition visitor. Visit today & tell us yours. 
.“A bunch of ideological Brexit clowns have perpetrated a coup on the British govt & the majority of the British people". 
Will David Davis and his team meet the December Brexit deadline? @adamboultonSKY shares his thoughts at 10am. #FarageOnLBC 
Brexit is testing Anglo-Irish relations.Regardless of being in/out of EU, surely people can see that breaking us away from EEA & CU - and being in a rabid rush to do so - is threatening to the fabric of our shared isles. 
Driverless cars are clearer a priority for Hammond. Can anyone think of anything slightly more important? Ya know, like homelessness, child poverty, underfunded public services, shambolic Brexit negotiations, fracking...... 
Kezia: I'm off to the jungle!Ruth: I'm off to bake on TV!Nicola: I'm staying here to save BiFab and stop the insanity of Brexit! Willie: WILLIE RENNIE! 
Shocking how seldom the question of Freedom of Movement is couched in terms of the loss of our Right to live & work in 31 countries.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Three common #Brexit delusions in one tweet. 1. As ever, basic premise wrong.UK much more dependent on EU trade (c. 45%) than Ireland on UK (19%) - so *UK* much more “badly affected”.2. EU all about *economy*.It isn’t!3. Somehow *others* responsible for *UK* actions...  
May has unnecessarily restricted UK options to a myopic channel that is now stuck. Time extentions, EEA & Customs Union - or revoking Brexit are all real options on the wider table.  
In Catalonia in just 60 daysThe regional Parlamient’s regulations has been violated The highest autonomy law has been violated The Constitution has been violated An illegal referendum has been calledThe reason of apply Article 155 of our Constitucion. The law.  
The uncomfortable truth is that a bunch of ideological Brexit clowns have perpetrated a coup on the British government and the majority of the British people. But clowns with a purpose? To get stonkingly wealthy buying up assets when hard Brexit bites and Britain tanks. 
Brexit was not a Russian plot, it was the result of concern over immigration | my piece for Sunday Telegraph  #Marr 
We can't complain about poor, shoddy journalism and then look the other way whilst a good, honest journalist is subjected to abuse as she searches for the truth we all desire. Show these cowards we're united; when they attack one they attack us all. 
So #Brexit is the second time in 8 years that spread betting hedgies and tech gurus made a fortune out of the impoverishment of the UK  
This amateurish hard right Brexit/Murdoch/Putin/Legatum/Uncle Tom Cobley coup is falling apart before our eyes.  
Alan rioting in the streets when Brexit is cancelled.  #BrexityGIF 
John Prescott: "Climate change is much greater threat to Britain than Brexit and it'll dominate politics for decades to come"  
This is what Brexit looks like to the rest of the world. #BrexityGif @nickynoo007 
The Govt says the #EUWithdrawalBill is a copy-and-paste job – but they’re making the Charter of Fundamental Rights the only law they leave behind. Tell your MP to back amendments 8 and 10 so we bring all our rights home after #Brexit  #BringHomeOurRights 
Time for sensible Ministers to take back control of #Brexit & put Michael & Boris on the back seat   via @MailOnline 
In today's Brexit news: Brexiteers call on Theresa May to settle final deal before EU bill | Remainer rebels accused of plotting to ‘torpedo Brexit’ | Priti Patel: Brexit is an act of supreme economic sense  
Did you know:The "Posted Workers" directive which both Farage and Corbyn cited as a reason to leave the EU is currently being reformed. So that's another reason for Brexit gone. 
Pretty heavy hint from one of the UK’s top Brexit people that @tconnellyRTE’s account of the last fortnight is right! 
2/2 Ppl are fed up w #Brexit squabbles. PM must see off #HardBrexiteers and build a consensus to secure Norwegian type 3rd option 
Wanted for Brexit - a leader for the Remainers  Today’s Observer column 
1/2 Wake up Britain! Hard Brexiteers who led & conned ppl #Leave want to drive us over #Brexit cliff  via @MailOnline 
Many CEOs want a second Brexit referendum, says Lloyd Blankfein of Goldman Sachs  
Brexit lacks credibility – but Remainers lack leadership | William Keegan  
#Brexit will benefit a few billionaire tax avoiders. Rest of us will be worse off in every conceivable way. Can't put it plainer than that. 
Bennelong is a Federal by=election  and therefore Kristina is perfectly correct in saying that this is a referendum on the Turnbull Coalition Government. you will never get a better time to send a clear message to turnbull 
Hopefully the Scottish Affairs Committee report can help break the impasse between the Scottish and UK Governments on the Brexit bill.  
You campaigned for brexit on a platform of taking back control of our borders. It is not the Irish or the EU or even the government you have to blame, but yourself and your good friend @Nigel_Farage for this mess. Own it. 
UK newspaper says 'naive, young' Leo Varadkar should 'shut gob' on Brexit  
A Brexit Guide to the Single Market  
They've given up defending Brexit. Their focus now is shifting the blame.  
I'm not *getting behind Brexit* now or ever. I think it is the most stupid thing the UK has ever done. And it's not like there isn't competition. 
The plot to stop #Brexit  
Brexit lacks credibility – but Remainers lack leadership But we are loud and proud to demand #stopbrexit. #EuropeTogether #bettertogether 
"It's easier to fool people than to convince them that they have been fooled" - Mark Twain #Brexit  
JCB's Lord Bamford reignites CBI row claiming Brexit-businesses are not represented by big trade bodies.  
Lets think about The Tory economy 120,000 austerity deaths, a homeless epidemic, nurses at Foodbanks, 5yr old kids looking in bins for food, wages lower than 10years ago a basket case Brexit housing crisis, schools can’t afford a glue stick  
Brexit Explained  
Tory peer says Brexit("The Undefined being negotiatedby the Unprepared in order to getthe Unspecified for the Uninformed")is good because young people will be able to work longer hoursThose pesky EU Rules tut tut 
Kristina Keneally says Bennelong by​election a referendum on Turnbull government  
Tory Brexit rebels risk letting Marxists into power warns Lord Tebbit  Tory quisling scum are working for the EU not the UK, so rather than us leave EU they would welcome Labour into power 
The potential harm to the UK from Brexit is staggering. For the last 25 years, we've moulded and adapted our economy to fit perfectly into the EU and Single Market. Leaving it without good reason is insane!#StopBrexit 
4. In fact, because of the professionalism of Gen. Wilson Boinnet, he allowed, once again, the 2005 Referendum to stand, after being WON by the “No Side”. 
It's not just Ireland that will suffer through an EU/UK border after Brexit. Think about Gibraltar, Jersey and Guernsey, the Virgin Islands, the Isle of Man, Anguilla ...None of this was talked about before the Brexit vote. 
Brexiteers:• won the referendum• won the subsequent election• lead the Brexit negotiations• dominate in cabinet• run 4/5 biggest print media (by sales)• is the policy of the 2 biggest partiesYet Brexit's failings are somehow the fault of losers with no power. Wow.  
I'm gonna go with YES YOU MARRIED A SPY:from: Bad Boys of Brexit  
Boris in Ireland - #Brexit lies finally have come to roost   
Well said @SebDance! I lived in Ireland for six years and my Irish friends are very concerned. Ireland will be greatly affected by Brexit and the peace process is at risk too. Why should they “shut up” and bow their heads? How arrogant is this?  
Yes Matt, in the US, UK and Australia #trump #brexit #lnp 
Brexit is a mess, and the "Ireland problem" is one of its messiest bits.  via @rte 
I was asked to write about how I feel about 'leaving Europe'. Well, #brexit makes me feel kind of angry and bitter, actually  
James O'Brien is droning on about how 'the Russians' influenced the Brexit vote by spreading propaganda on social media. But we're told that the elderly voted Leave and the young voted Remain. Which of those two groups is most likely to use social media? The guy is a tedious bore 
Nobody voted for 'No Deal', it wasn't on the bus or the ballot paper.Mrs May @theresa_may said "Brexit means Brexit and we will make a success of it". No deal is not a success of it, is it?Get a successful deal or call the whole thing off. #revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
I'm shocked you think a hard #Brexit, economic isolation and a border on the island of Ireland is in your national interest  
From someone who has worked with #RobertMueller-special counsel investigating #TrumpRussia."You’re going to see wire fraud...violations of the Foreign Agents Registration Act, ..other charges. " via @TIMEIt will reach here, too.#Brexit 
What this signally fails to take into account is:1. We will have lost the best deal with the greatest control & influence we'll ever get &2. The Govt is making such a pigs ear of the whole thing we face a No Deal ruinous WTO #Brexit or some form of perpetualPay & Obey +No Say 
Russia was behind at least 150,000 Twitter accounts that tweeted disinfo around #Brexit  
Failure to agree Brexit talks can move to stage 2 at Dec summit will lead many  companies to disinvest or not invest in UK costing country much more than any indicated increase in UK budget offer. 
This is from the Guardian's former Political Editor. Really @michaelwhite cant you see that with #Brexit & everything els the problem might be one version of the English & England?  
MPs call for clarity over devolved powers after Brexit  
Hard Brexit highly damaging, says former top civil servant  
GOLD !! @RossCameron4 'I am going to accept the result of the SSM in exactly the same way @abcnews have accepted the Trump & Brexit result'  #OUTSIDERS#AUSPOL #AGENDA LOL ..... OUCH !! #INSIDERS 
Did we have a referendum on PR, in 2011? No. Did the government decide to keep PR off the ballot paper? Yes. 
Brexiter Tory MPs are fuming because moderate Tory MPs are trying to protect citizens’ rights that the UK spent decades developing inside the EU. When will alarm bells ring with ‘normal’ Brexiters? Brexit isn’t FOR you, it’s AGAINST you.  
Worst part is that a referendum tomorrow delivering Remain would not put that genie back in the bottle. Pandora didn't run about with a net catching all the evils and cramming them back in the Box. Fin.  
How can any Labour politician stand in favour of #Brexit alongside scum like Arron Banks, Farage, Murdoch, Dacre, Desmond, Gove, Rees-Mogg, Redwood et al!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
David Davis just revealed how badly the Brexit talks are going  
Or perhaps David Davis doesn't care because he wants negotiations to crash, followed by a no-deal #Brexit offering great profits for #Legatum style disaster capitalists, culminating in a desperate UK being forced to become the low-regulation & welfare tax haven of Tory dreams. 
...This isn’t really addressed at Ireland. It’s addressed at English Sun readers. Its message: “Brexit is proving tough & going badly. But that’s not because you made a bad choice or because the UK govt is screwing it up! It’s all the foreigners’ fault!”   
Reading the brilliant book “What’s Left” by @NickCohen4. Corbyn & Brexit is textbook far left wing tactics. Support destructive, fascistic policies as long as it helps us achieve our aim. 
Hi, I'm Tim Farron. You may know me from my tweets about gay frogs. well, there's nothing "gay frogs" about stopping Brexit 
This is a useful archice: "365 Videos of the Repression lived in Catalonia by the Spanish Police in the Referendum of October 1, 2017". #Llibertat  
Reading literally any UK govt statement regarding Brexit.  
The Sun’s editorial insulting the Irish PM for standing up for his country’s interests, accusing him of “disrespecting” Leave voters & telling him to focus on “making Brexit work” is one of the most deranged & depressing things I’ve read this year. And that’s saying a lot.  
Priti Patel: Brexit is an act of supreme economic sense #Premium 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Government and corporate lobby groups are ignoring the millions of small businesses that form the backbone of Britain  #Brexit 
I am still shocked by the spectacle of acting public servants cheering on foreign powers who are intent on harming our national interest because they’re so obsessed by Brexit. I suppose I shouldn’t be by now.  
Jesus.... thanks to Brexit.  Ireland is now “the other side.” I fucking hate Brexit and it’s fake patriotism & xenophobic bullshit. 
Dearest Timothy,You @LibDems propped up that shower for 5 yrs, giving @David_Cameron chance to call referendum. You should be ashamed. K  
Spot on.  The EU didn't (and still don't) want #Brexit. The only ppl who really want that are either #LittleEnglanders of very wealthy.  Let's #TellJeremyStopBrexit >  
Oh dear Ben @benfogle! Our Britishness has been corrupted by Brexit, please don't encourage jingoism, this is not the time.  
My growing-ever-strong suspicion is that they're intentionally heading for a Hard Brexit -- because that will create the collapse conditions for Disaster Capitalism, leaving the UK wholly pwned by neoliberal powers.  
Scottish Affairs Committee calls for Brexit Bill to be changed to protect Scotland from power-grabFull story in tomorrow's paper 
Take 15 mins and read this superb rundown of Ireland’s key role in the Brexit negotiations. 
You couldn’t make it up: German friend who studied in Cambridge said his host family in Cambridge who are dependent on income from renting rooms to foreign students voted Brexit. 
There might have been one had your lot not spent 5 years attacking them for macroeconomic policies you backed prior to May 6 2010. Austerity laid the foundations for brexit and Corbyn and you not only signed up for it, you sang from the same hymn sheet as Osborne 
When things start going badly for Tories, I’m sure Labour will rocket. You know, if Tories have sex scandals, ministerial resignations, foreign affairs calamities, shambolic EU negotiations etc..... Oh. Well, maybe Labour should try shifting their Brexit policy?   
Perhaps we need to seriously examine the motives of the main players in Brexit. Brexit is such lunacy, it's economic suicide. This is obvious to the stupidest of people. This makes the motivation of the hard Brexit players highly suspect. We need to wake up! @carolecadwalla 
Tories in absolute meltdown, and Labour are only 2% ahead?  Just imagine if the official opposition wasn't a Maoist cult, we might actually have a chance of beating the blues and stopping Brexit.  
Let's imagine, for a moment, another Thomas Mair. And you setting up his targets.You know what you're doing and we do too. You are trying to silence opposition to hard Brexit by putting MPs in fear. And that's reprehensible behaviour.Also, voters isn't a proper noun. 
Percentage DROP in number of EU nurses coming to UK since #Brexit:96%Actually, that needs repeating:96%!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! 
Peta Credlin: Bennelong by-election is a referendum on Malcolm Turnbull. #BringBackAbbott #auspol 
MAIL ON SUNDAY: 'Drunk' Labour MP in berserk Brexit fracas #tomorrowspaperstoday 
So, this week we have learned:The headbangers of hard Brexit are mostly posh boys. If you aren't already, get across the work of @PeterKGeoghegan & @carolecadwalla as they root out who's upping the ante to deliver on 'the will of the people'. 
Please lobby any Lord you know (or can get the email address of) #sentience #brexit #animalwelfare 
Brexit financial dimension: Hedge funds - or their owners, have stupendous wealth. That wealth is being used to engineer a hard Brexit. Why? Because asset values will tank and they will pounce. They will make BILLIONS! #StopBrexit @mrjamesob 
Once there were journalists even on right wing papers who’d tell their bosses every now and again to ‘f— off.' Brexit happened because most of them had been sacked. 
I've stopped being shocked at leading Brexiters blaming others & making excuses for the failure of #Brexit They know it'll be a disaster.  
James Dyson declares Brexit will be a disaster for EUROPE as he predicts UK will WALK AWAY  
The Sun's comments about Leo Varadkar stink of the worst kind of arrogant, conceited English colonial attitude towards Ireland. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
It's so disappointing that whenever I ask questions about Brexit I lose followers as if it's just too taxing...don't agree so won't follow! 
Some Leavers need this reminder:David Davis: If a democracy can't change it's mind it ceases to be a democracy.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Japan isn't in the EU! Brexiteer makes BRILLIANT point on why UK SHOULDN'T pay Brexit bill  
Gerry Adams has told the Sinn Féin Ard Fhéis that Brexit is the single biggest threat to the Irish people in generations  
I’m afraid this is true for me too. Huge respect for many @UKLabour MPs who are fighting Brexit but the shadow cabinet needs to take a long, hard, honest look at itself. Country before ideology.  
Peter Kay *actually* said "Get on t'internet!" on an advert for his new tour. We deserve Brexit. 
You must read this piece to understand why the Irish are upping the ante against the UK Govt and its hard Brexit plans.  
Dear @sarahwollaston Please ignore the attempts at intimidation fomented by this "Voter Consultancy Limited" outfit. Stay true to yourself. Millions of us need you to help stop this disastrous Brexit 
Yes, respect to Tories Against Brexit from the Manchester #StopBrexit march. Good luck to you  
Irish prime minister compared Britain's Brexit strategy to a spouse seeking a divorce immediately followed by an open relationship  
In 2017, Alabama holds a referendum on a woman's right to choose versus a pedophile's right to molest children. 
How can it not have occurred to you that he thinks Brexit failing IS in our national interest? How? Are  you just pretending it hasn't? Or, really, hasn't it? Genuine question. 
I think there should be a Disaster Capitalist of the Year award, and I'd nominate John Redwood in view of his recent pronouncements about moving money out of the UK combined with his espousal of harmful #Brexit. 
So Thomas Borwick who is trying to intimidate the Tory 'mutineers' via adverts on Voter Consultancy Ltd is tied into the SCL/Cambridge Analytica AggregateIQ, Leave.EU, Farage, Bannon, Mercer, Trump network documented by @carolecadwalla#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Well done Evesham Journal for having courage to print what Brexit-supporting national papers have yet to say!  
David Davis is so far out of his depth on Brexit that he probably needs a deep sea submarine to rescue him. And he knows it. 
Important thread on UK government / pro Brexit media not grasping Irish / EU27 position on borders  
Abandon Brexit now & Govt could get NHS working, improve schools, build houses,create work, make life better for older persons & surprise us 
I wholeheartedly disagree with #Brexit Still if we do it and go on with it we must do so with virtue, reason, logic and common sense. We must have a strategy and do so following the values we hold so dear and not as an insult to intelligence. 
An IRA-sympathiser as leader, a Marxist as chancellor & a party split from top to bottom on Brexit, but still Labour are polling 42%.  
A QUARTER of people who voted Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign  via @LondonEconomic 
Spain’s state prosecutor José Manuel Maza has died whilst in Argentina. He was the individual who called for rebellion and sedition charges against Catalan leaders after 1st Oct independence referendum.  
What like Russia funnelling money to your fucking #Brexit campaign via the DUP? Aye, treachery seems like the right word.  
This is brilliant. The new Austin #Brexit. Take back control.  
The #Brexit negotiations in one gif.  
Keep hearing about the ‘will of the people’ re Brexit. I might have missed something but was the vote 70/30 in favour of leaving? 51.9 v 48.1 of a 72% turnout is no mandate for anything, let alone economic suicide 
ADD MY NAME - UK Government: Cancel Brexit and stay as Full Member of EU. - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange #StopBrexit #BrexitLies 
That mistake has led to all the other mistakes: treating Brexit as a matter to be decided by the PM and her coterie as the sole permitted interpreters of “the will of the people”; premature use of A50; attempts to sideline Parliament; the language calculated to enrage Remainers. 
If another EU referendum was to be held how you now vote leave or remain? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
Prior to Brexit, has there ever been a previous example of such a widespread & sustained attempt, from within UK academia, politics & the media, to undermine the British negotiating position? What would be an example that was even remotely close? 
Bumped into @reid6peter - agreeing we hate Dacre, Brexit, Johnson,  Gove and Farage. And love Dyche’s @BurnleyOfficial . And New Labour 
Well done. Carole , go after Brexit’s dark money ( it may not all be roubles) 
This is key issue. No one voted to leave single market nor customs union. Indeed leaver leaders specifically said we wouldn't do either. Ireland is reminding us of the referendum result and the Brexit deception. Don't bring back border: don't imperil peace.  
We see our great country being driven onto rocks by people who lied & were supported by foreign powers. It's patriotic to tell truth in face of Brexit bullying & to uphold views of our friends here & abroad. That's real public service in support of our nation  
'Stop talking down Brexit': Mark Carney told to focus on economic benefits of Brexit  
Great analysis of the well-flagged Dublin Brexit veto that astonishingly took UK government entirely by surprise.  
'Brexit has become a HOSTAGE CRISIS!' US Brexiteer in scathing attack on EU threats  
Brexit abhors logic,intelligence & free-spirits. If our principal parties continue to advocate it, ours will become a dysfunctional society. 
Guess who is telling porkies again and trying deflect the blame for the breakdown of negations on to the EU? The thing about the Tories is they will never take responsibility for the mess they have created though Brexit. It is never their fault. #StopBrexit 
Spain's quota of EU funds for current budget period is EUR 37bn. That's the kind of funding that's at risk after Britain leaves. No wonder, the EU has gone nuts over British money!#Brexit 
The plot thickens. Is the reason for some Tory Brexiters wanting a hard Brexit becoming clearer? Is stupendous personal financial gain behind their drive for Britain to commit financial suicide? @mrjamesob @carolecadwalla @acgrayling @campbellclaret #StopBrexit 
Why should anyone 'respect' the close result of a flawed referendum won with bare-faced lies, impossible promises, dodgy money and interference from a foreign power which wants to weaken the EU?  
Tomorrow's @Telegraph cartoon on the UK's EU rebate.#Brexit #TheresaMay #Thatcher 
Democrats just joined with Republicans in Maine to stop a ranked-choice voting referendum their constituents just passed. This would have eliminated spoilers and having to vote the "lesser" of two evils. But the two parties aren't the same. 
Here's a wee Brexit bonus for the Scottish economy.  Our right to call only whisky distilled in Scotland "Scotch" is about to be traded away...  
Corbyn writes pieces like this one recycling Kremlin propaganda on Ukraine  He says we need more evidence of Putin's interference. His Director of Communications shakes hands with Putin in Sochi. Putin wants #Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Man City the most Soft Brexit Remoaner nancyboys I've seen at Filbert Street for years. Diving all over the place and a Spanish manager who wears skinny trousers. After Granite Brexit they'll all get walloped! 
Thomas Borwick - son of ex Kensington Tory MP, worked for Cambridge Analytica then Vote Leave. His company Voter Consultancy now bullying Brexit MPs with Facebook dark posts. Why? Who’s paying?  
The Labour Party I would consider supporting at the ballot box MUST commit to stop Brexit, it is the single most destructive agenda in years.The potential true impact is either being hidden (secret impact assessments), ignored, or not fully understood. Either way Labour must: 
MPs voted this week to reject the inclusion of #AnimalSentience into UK Law post #brexit Here's how they voted #StopBrexit 
How foreign billionaires, and their British political hangers-on helped engineer #Brexit to bring about economic chaos which will bring handsome profits to those rich enough to employ the techniques of disaster capitalism #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Bizarre thing about this headline is that it's not Varadkar who won't accept that Brexit is happening, it's the Brexiters who won't accept (the consequences of) it happening  
Spotify is the latest tech company to commit to London after Brexit with fresh expansion plans  
I'm seeing it all over Brexit threads over the last few days, and the level of ignorance about Ireland (north & south),  nevermind the EU, is astounding. I (very happily) lived in England in the early 90s & never experienced this type of vitriol.  
Defra are seeking eight 'talented free thinkers' to shape post-Brexit farm policy. Could you be part of the team?  
I will share my gift of prophesy. Make a Brexit prediction based almost entirely on the ascendancy of casual xenophobia, ignorance, stubbornness and increasingly desperate scapegoating. It will come true.  
Pls RT - this **MUST NOT** happen!MPs voted this week to reject the inclusion of animal sentience into UK Law post #brexit @Number10cat @TreasuryMog 
David Miliband: Brexit is “the greatest giveaway of political power that a country has voluntarily ever done.”  
A disastrous week for the Tories in Westminster: coup plots, Brexit shambles and putting British citizens at risk. Watch how it unfolded ↓  
I just want to ask, if, in a General Election you vote for a party but it doesn't win, do you then get over it & get behind the policies of the party you didn't vote for & never vote for your party again? The fuck you do, because, that's democracy right?Brexit fucks democracy. 
ADD MY NAME - UK Government: Cancel Brexit and stay as Full Member of EU. - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
'Brexit has become a HOSTAGE CRISIS!' US Brexiteer Janet Daly in scathing attack on EU threats  
Arrogant, xenophobic and insulting.  Moreover hard to imagine anything more counterproductive in Dublin , or Brussels or any other European capital.  For #Brexit  , and the catastrophe it is creating,  it maybe the Sun wot lost it…  
MPs in cross-party group pile pressure on PM for NHS cash injectionSimple solution for the funding shortfall, cancel #Brexit and spend the divorce bill of £53,000,000,000 on the NHS instead. No need to write it on a bus either ! 
We had a referendum, we voted leave.So we leave, terribly straight forward.  
If you actually think planes won't fly in or out of the UK after Brexit you're a complete and utter moron. 
Hey @matthew_elliott, time to call in your goon @TBorwick (former CTO behind Vote Leave) behind this @JolyonMaugham @nick_clegg @campbellclaret@nickreeves9876 @brexit_sham @ThatTimWalker @acgrayling@andywigmore @George_Osborne @joswinson #FBPE 
There is no plan for Brexit, and everyone now knows this, even if the government and a dwindling percentage of the electorate are still furiously pretending otherwise.  
The Sun has called on Ireland's 'naive young prime minister' to 'shut his gob' and 'help make Brexit work for millions of his citizens'.  
Remainers will stop sneering when Leavers name one practical, tangible benefit of Brexit  
The Swiss bank UBS has admitted that the outlook for the UK is not as bad as it thought in the immediate aftermath of the European Union referendum  
Database of 365 videos showing how Spanish police acted in #Catalonia on the day of the referendum 1 Oct. Make your own conclusions   
It is becoming clearer and clearer that we can have Brexit or the NHS but we can’t have both.  
Hey guys, if you are so sure UK would reject the EU in a referendum for which the shape of Brexit would be known, what fear such a referendum?  
People voted for Brexit because they wanted to see politics change , they were rewarded by an even deeper swamp of uselessness!  
New Labour leftovers,Lib Dems et al:yr not even going to start to reverse Brexit unless yr seen to listen to ppl/places who voted for it. 
24hrs from now David Moyes will be in the dressing room shouting something unrecognisible in Scottish while Mark Noble and Joe Hart scream BREXIT at each other and Diafra Sakho just shrugs and checks for likes on his Instagram. 
Interesting. Ads against “Brexit sabotage” Tory MPs on Facebook have been placed sponsored by “Voter Consultancy Ltd”. Surely not the same company run by Vote Leave chief tech officer, also son of Boris Johnson’s Mayoral deputy...?  
One of most disturbing side-effects of Brexit is the significant lowering of what's considered acceptable conduct in public office.#Brexit  
What grates is right wing ideologues screwing country having lied to win referendum. Grates to see GFA screwed too  
Fascinating report with an inside view as to why the Irish government decided to play hardball with Davis and May over Brexit@davidallengreen @IanDunt @jonhenley 
Ah - the sole director is Thomas Borwick - presumably the same one who was Vote Leave’s chief technology officer? (Previously worked with SCL/Cambridge Analytica and AggregateIQ.) Also son of Victoria Borwick - who was hard brexit Tory MP until June.It all makes sense!! 
If you think the #Tories are simply following the 'will of the people, you're mistaken, they're rubbing their hands at being able to stage their Right-Wing Coup. Brexit = Tax breaks for the rich, but we'll pay for them. #StopBrexit Thanks to @badgerthecat @pplsassembly @UKLabour 
Baffled by Brexit battles ? This is pithiest sum up of the parliamentary impasse I’ve read (by Charles Moore in @Telegraph) 
PP, PSOE and C's to reject the creation of a special committee on the agressions by the Spanish police on the 1-O referendum in Catalonia. 1066 citizens were injured. Clearly fundamental rights are not a priority for unionist forces. 
I just wrote to my MP to ask "At what point does the Government's failure to release the Brexit impact studies constitute contempt of parliament". Please contact your MP with the same question.Please RT for wider coverage 
When Ireland has its abortion referendum next year, I wonder if people will pay half as much attention to the money flowing into weird Trad Catholic thinktanks as they currently do to Russian bots. 
#bbcaq What Brexit is really all about:-"If the government has no intention of using Brexit to undermine workers’ rights, why are ministers not willing to accept amendments making that explicit?" (Ken Clarke)  
Alastair Campbell guilty of ‘treachery’ for urging Irish PM to play hardball on Brexit  
Yer da's strongest twitter take on British/ Irish Brexit relations: 'Ireland should remember we have Trident'. 
The lies will never stop because they are using Brexit as a Right-Wing Coup. We need a huge turnout for the protest at HoC on 11/12 to #StopBrexit Need every #FBPE to sign up to this:  
If we'd lost the referendum.And voted to stay in the EU, under Mad Merkel's jackboot, would I have tweeted about hoping everything turns to shit?No, I wouldn't.Cos I ain't that much of a cunt.#CampbellTheRat  pic.twitter.com/KUIgDYZT7J 
With many sorts of #REMAINERS, #REMOANERS #REMAINIACS #WANKERS #BRITISHHATERS and all round #TRAITORS which one are YOU.? Answers on a postcard please an #EU one of course! #BBC #SKY #UK #NEWS @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #Labour #LabourParty #UKIP #LibDems #BREXIT #PM #MP 
BBC #R4Today editorial meetings. Daily.Most bodies speaking for business in the UK want a transition Eek! How can we balance this story? Easy Wheel out one of the usual famous 4 business people who love hard Brexit AND BE SURE TO GIVE THEM EQUAL AIR TIME   
Just remember folks that Richard Leonard would rather have a Conservative government than an SNP/Slab coalition and he's in favour of a hard Brexit. His policies are one thing but they mean nothing if he can't work with others. 
Every voter has a democratic right to answer the question posed in a referendum however he or she wishes.Winning does not confer a subsequent right on you to endlessly redefine *what the question was* in order to shape the whole future of a country according to your every whim. 
Brexit Britain is proving a big visitor attraction: a record number of tourists arrived in the UK in August and they splashed out £2.8bn, the highest monthly tourist spend ever  
Brextremist MPs keep talking about ‘economist’ Patrick Minford’s plan:‘It will bring a £135bn Brexit windfall’ - absolute nonsense.What isn’t nonsense is that it would -as he admits -wipe out British manufacturing. They never mention that bit#bbcaq 
FARAGE: Ridicules the idea that Russia was involved in the Brexit Referendum 
This is why investment has slowed in this country. Not #Brexit . Labour will wreck the country.  
Asking EU countries to play ‘hardball’ simply means a) hoping the UK taxpayer pays a bigger Brexit bill b) hoping for an arrangement whereby the UK is subject to EU rules without a say over them  
Yes, this is definitely the most important thing Scottish Labour should be discussing right now. Brexit and welfare cuts can wait till another day.  
How disrespectful. Ireland’s prime minister is doing the job he is elected to do for Ireland’s people. He owes Brexit uk absolutely nothing. 
There have been far too many Breaches of the Ministerial Code over #Brexit.  People deserve truth from the #MPs they elect & the Lords they pay for. 
So Ben, I don’t have a problem with expressions of Englishness - in fact, I wrote a book about people who did exactly that. But what you say about Brexit here is profoundly ill-judged. 1/  
The DUP seem to be having a collective meltdown over the last 24 hours at the "shock" revelation that Ireland fully intends to protect its national interest in EU Brexit talks. What did they expect? That Ireland would meekly follow the UK lemming-like over the cliff? 
Downing Street insists the Government will push ahead with plan to fix specific Brexit date and time  
Rejection of animal sentience from Brexit Bill risks UK short-fall on high animal welfare standards 
Another blow to the embattled Prime Minister Theresa May as her and the Brexit team lead by David Davis struggle to move the talks forward.  
You can be a passionate Remainer, you can be vigorously anti-Brexit, you can be ardently pro-EU but this is taking it to another level -deeply wrong to be encouraging another country to make things difficult for your home country.  
If another EU Referendum was to be held, how would you now vote, leave or remain?RETWEET & VOTE  #YourVoiceMatters 
Lots of my twitter replies these days seem to be Trump/Brexit bots. Maybe the hatred on social media is mostly fake and in fact Britain is full of nice real people - the kind I meet on the street everyday 
I’d only be interested if they actually scrapped #Brexit  
Superb piece by @rafaelbehr ... May's speeches on Britain's desire to be central to European & global collaboration show her soul desperately wrestling with the reality of Brexit.  
#Brexit is so sad. No one understands what it means and how it will effect us. Yet everyone has an opinion just like the bloke down the pub. The only net result so far is a divided country and a greater gap between rich and poor  
So I have been attacked for standing against #brexit for being a 'elite' snob (Dr.) I find it sad that people would base a character assessment, and intent, on such things. So, if I have a little money I can't care about the poor? #discussionswithdad 
EU threatens to STOP UK's £4 BILLION rebate payment unless we pay!Says The Brussels Club of Bullies and Extortionists...Who on earth would ever willingly join or be a member of such a club.So glad we're Leaving...#Brexit #EU 
Here's the proof that The Sun editorial is a win for Leo Varadkar. Type of press release you don't see very often from the Opposition benches. #Brexit  
Has the NHS really been losing EU nationals since the Brexit vote? Some facts and figures from this week’s @spectator 
US to fight UK at WTO if it adopts EU-style approach to crop protection rules: classic example of #Brexit as Trojan horse, in this case for undermining of precautionary principle and regulation of pesticides 
A QUARTER of people who voted Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign  via @LondonEconomic 
We must never, never forget the people who voted brexit to save the NHS. They were selfless and sincere and they were betrayed. The fight against brexit is the fight for the NHS and those who support it.  
The ever-growing chasm between the UK and Ireland on Brexit...It's increasingly clear that the 'hardball' stance of Coveney and Varadkar is really riling up Brexiteers.Still, an extraordinary comment on an Irish Taoiseach from British media.  
If twitter bots encouraging Brexit constitute "medling", what does it mean when the government spends millions to send pro-remain literature to every house in the UK?  
Writing in @BrexitCentral MEP William Dartmouth says that the UK could trade with the EU after Brexit on WTO terms like Australia.His claim is entirely false. Lying or ignorant, who knows? Either way, unfit to represent us!#LeaveLies #StopBrexit #Brexit 
I'm still shocked by a supposed Prime Minister who has so far made no comment on foreign interference in a referendum that puts the prosperity of the country and its citizens at risk.  Dereliction of her duty. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
The DUP where did the dark Money for Brexit come from and the Irish border deal breaker that ironically for the DUP could bring closer a United Ireland @mccleangreen 
You don't have to read! You just have to believe in Brexit so hard, you turn your poo into diamond 
Some moral madness has taken over.- BBC can be biased - so that makes RT or the Sun OK- Clinton wasn't a great candidate - blame her for Trump- Brexit is a disaster - that's the fault of Remain- Neoliberalism (?) is bad - let's junk all liberal values 
I am still shocked by the spectacle of well-paid brexit shill denouncing Ireland as a "foreign power ... intent on harming our national interest". I suppose I shouldn't be by now.  
Labour shouldn’t act this surprised. They gave the Tories a free hand on our Brexit negotiating positions by handing them an unopposed Art 50 activation. This is as much Labour’s fault as the Tories.  
Throwback to Leave.EU referendum campaign material that's more relevant than ever. Dumb liberal media love obsessing over tariff-free access to the EU, even though UK exports are dominated by services.  
“We want a deep and special relationship with our European friends after Brexit”The Sun:  
The Legatum Institute has only one sponsor a Dubai based hedge fund. It is involved in trying to get the hardest possible Brexit. Why? Because the hedge fund that backs it, and many others, will make a killing if it happens. There is real evil about! @mrjamesob #StopBrexit 
If we hadn’t joined the EU, there are 50+ legal protections which simply wouldn’t exist for women. We need to be talking about the gendered element of #Brexit  #FeministFutures 
#Remain hero @KenClarkeMP made the most pertinent comment this week: if #UKGov didn’t intend watering down workers’ rights after #Brexit, why wouldn’t they back @UKLabour’s amendment to protect those rights? Share @Jon_Danzig’s blog. Link:  
His column. Not a quote. Not third hand... What. He. Wrote. Brexit is such a massive con.  
True, but it is a pity so many newspapers are keeping away from this story of such vital national interest because of Brexit fever.  
.The Sun doesn't seem to like this new weaker Brexit Britain reality they helped bring about!#YouHaveReapedTheWhirlwind . 
More than a year on from this first appearing, situation grimmer than ever - Keith Baker (quoted) now says that all EU funded research applications on hold: Academics feel blight of Brexit – from cancer research to peat projects | Education | The Guardian  
Dear Lord Cashman @mcashmanCBE, can you please advise if the government are in contempt of Parliament with respect to releasing the Brexit Impact Assessments? If so, how will Parliament deal with this?Best wishes, Andrew Parnall 
Sorry Leavers, we Remainers will not lie down and let Britain be tricked and bullied into becoming the tax-haven of right-wing Tory dreams.You might want to let them dupe you. We will fight them!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
With its current Brexit stance, Dublin is annoying all the right people  
Good debunking of the latest misleading "no deal Brexit" argument  
Leavers don't understand that the EU27 will always put defending the EU Single Market above trade with the UK. Imagine the problem for their exporters if they had to export to 26 separate markets each with its own tariffs, regulations & product standards. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
."Irish officials were deeply unimpressed by UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson's grasp of the dangers posed by Brexit". 
In 2014 Richard Leonard fought to keep Tory David Cameron as PM of Scotland. He'll do the same with Theresay May or any other Tory PM next referendum.  
The town wanting to have its fishcake and eat it. @LUFCPromised visits Leave voting Grimsby to find out why locals are now seeking exemptions from Brexit for its seafood industry.  
Sharp as usual: @anandMenon1 on why the #Brexit negotiations are going as expected (via @CNN) 
What shocks me is those like you that simply don’t care about the impact Brexit is having on long standing allies. You’ve ditched over 300 years of UK national interest and for what? Please enlighten us. 
You do realise that other nations have their own “national interest” and for many of them Brexit is an unwarranted act of aggression? What’s your solution to the Irish border question or, like most of you, you simply don’t care? 
Ain't it the truth! #Brexit  
Just as well Irish politicians can’t read the UK press.... #brexit  
Opposing Brexit is fair enough. It’s cheering for the other side that grates.  
If, as rumoured, #DavidDavis throws in the towel, who should replace him?#Brexit 
Again - and this is important (and historic when it comes to Putin) - the main thrust of his #Brexit Bots was "fuelling anti-Muslim sentiment in the United Kingdom"   
Accusing the #BBC of “gloomy” #Brexit coverage is like blaming their weather reports for the crap weather outside. 
No.The rules the EU has for its external borders are clear. Britain is leaving and has to comply with those rules.#ireland #brexit  
TThe language from the Sun here today on the Irish Govt & Ireland is utterly indefensible, especially as its on #Brexit problems entirely of the UKs own making that UKgovt has dumped on the people of Ireland without any concern for their views @tnewtondunn 
Michael Gove, Liam Fox and Jeremy Hunt in the group of 6 who decide if the UK pays its EU commitments or if we plunge towards a catastrophic 'no deal' Brexit.You wouldn't trust them to decide the tip at Witherspoon's.#StopBrexit 
A free-trading Britain can prosper after Brexit. For the first time in more than 40 years, we will be able to set our own trade policy.      
The Sun in UK is calling Leo Varadkar  a 'Brexit Buffon' who is "too busy disrespecting 17.4million voters of a country whose billions stopped Ireland going bust". #Winning 
That horrible moment when you realise 'take back control' means for the 1st time in c800yrs Ireland can exercise power over England. #brexit  
ICYMI: Days into his new job, the latest #Brexit minister Martin Callanan was forced into an embarrassing correction in the House of Lords. 
Before we Brexit we should have a trial run. Divide the UK in two and one half can Brexit..the rest of us will wait and see how they do.  
A dozen or so miserable Kippers have turned up to rally for Brexit in Stroud. Pro-EU people already outnumbering them and of course, doing it all with good humour  
Who else pays for access to the single market?  ‘Canada hasn't paid anything!’ Andrew Neil makes BRILLIANT point over Brexit bill demands  
A very good question @hilarybennmp and one that no one in the Goverment's Brexit team can meaningfully answer. @RCorbettMEP @Labour4EU 
A Brexit settlement that disrupts the flow of medicines across the English Channel would be bad for patients  
Nothing to do with maintaining the New European newspaper which I'm sure you get paid for. The longer the Brexit process goes on for, the longer you can belch out crap in that so-called newspaper! 
“Echo chambers tend to rot the brain and Davis' echo chamber is no different.” @IanDunt on this week’s Brexit fiascos. 
If Murdoch takes control of Sky New Britain will no longer be a democracy. There can be no democracy when a pro-government clique can use most of the mass media as a propaganda vehicle. #StopBrexit #StopFundingHate #Brexit  
So it is @campaignforleo Taoiseach’s job to make Brexit work for Britain? @TheSun might want to catch up with last 100 years worth of Irish history. 
CLARIFICATION Telelgraph reporting that DDavis thinking of quitting a Brexit Sec because he's become so frustrated at being kept out of lookDD has form as a quitter. Resigned as shadow Home Sec in 2008 for reasons long since forgotten 
Really can't beat a Hard Brexit cup of Yorkshire Tea can you? We'll wallop the Man City spastics later. Up the city!  
In my view, the UK cannot afford David Davis quitting as Brexit Secretary. He is doing an excellent job in the face of a biased media and subterfuge by remoaner civil servants & MPs  via @telegraphnews 
Nice to bump into @brianmoore666 as he heads to Twickenham and I head to @BurnleyOfficial - the man is sound sound sound on Brexit 
"Pining for the past"? That "past" was only a year and a half ago. Not to mention the blistering hypocrisy- Brexit is very much about trying to reclaim a past viewed through rose-tinted glasses.  
Theresa May's husband works for investment management firm Capital Group, which reportedly used offshore-registered funds to make investments in a Bermuda-registered company. Tory Tax Haven #Brexit#StopBrexit 
'Crashing out' of the EU is a remoaner-peddled myth. We could leave the EU with no Brexit deal, move to WTO rules and then negotiate a no-cash deal with the EU.  
Brexit shenanigans re how many billions to pay, and clever clogs MPs thwarting things, help confirm voter suspicions about EU in first place 
Do you believe that Germany and France have been the issue with unreasonable negotiations going forward with #Brexit? @DavidDavisMP @MichelBarnier @eucopresident @theresa_may RETWEET & VOTE  #YourVoiceMatters 
And what about Brexit? Which you are supporting?Please stop ignoring your Remain members.Please stop ignoring those that voted for you tactically.Please stop ignoring those that would love to vote for you but can’t because of your support for this disaster called “Brexit”.  
This, not Brexit, is THE big economic story.  Third rate pundits chatter about much else.  But this really matters   
Ireland has raised the stakes in the Brexit negotiations - @tconnellyRTE looks at how, and why, this is the case  
Na so we take dey #SitAtHome #NoElectionInAnambra #AnambraDecides2017 #Referendum #Biafra #NnamdiKanu @nlitvin 
Exclusive: David Davis could quit because 'he is lazy as a toad and has no Brexit strategy' say civil servants  
61% of leave voters agree “significant damage to the British economy” is worth it for #Brexit. Asked would it be worth “you or members of your family" losing their jobs, 39% still thought Brexit worth it. The older the voter, the more they agreed! 
"In a worrying development, civil servants frequently had to clarify the Tory politician's statements during a series of meetings in Dublin"Irish officials unimpressed with Boris Johnson's grasp on dangers posed by Brexit#r4today 
The Brexit Veto: How and Why Ireland raised the Stakes via @RTENewsNow  
My thread on an absurd single week in Brexit Britain. And why we need to have a good look in the mirror, not the Looking Glass.  
More than 150,000 Russian-language Twitter accounts sent tens of thousands of tweets urging Brexit, researchers said  
So a man decides to leave his wife and move to Australia.She says, but what about seeing your kids?He says, good point. You and the kids have to move to Australia, too.#Brexitters' attitude to #Ireland, summed up.#Brexit #StopBrexit #Brexitshambles #EU #IrishBorder #FBPE 
I had dinner last night with a recently retired back bencher.Me "I smell BREXIT betrayal, am I right?"Answer " they will if they can get away with it, at the moment they don't think they can". 
“EU threatening to withhold £5 billion of Thatcher’s rebate as part of Brexit negotiations”. No problem, guys. We can offset it against the EU budget contributions due from the UK between now and March 2019. 
Save Tony and Alistair’s EU Pension!!! Poor old boys will struggle if Brexit happens..... 
Dear Brexidiots,If the EU is destined to collapse, why don't we postpone Brexit until that happens? 
Understatement of the year: “Sometimes it doesn’t seem like they have thought all this through” Leo Varadkar, Irish PM#Brexit  
9 - the Government still won't release their Brexit impact assessments in contempt of Parliament. Luckily the EU has published their own which are available on their website  
He is to Brexit what Nigel Lawson is to climate change.  
It’s that time again: time for @BBCr4today to spin the Brexit business owner commentator wheel. Who will it be today? Tim Martin or James Dyson?It’s Tim Martin!#r4today #FFS 
3 - Gov proposes legislating the day Brexit will happen even though it will happen in March 2019 automatically (unless UK & EU agree to extend it - but then UK may be stuck because legislating Brexit day may prevent the option of extending negotiations even if we want to do so) 
Almost all business leaders are against Brexit but in the name of balance #r4today gives equal time to crazy Tim Martin. It's not a problem for Wetherspoons he says, and car manufacturers are exaggerating!  
'Trump is the embodiment of evil' Twitter mutters "hi" as it clocks off for another day trudging wearily past 'Brexit is madness' twitter clocking on 
Brexit: The crunch is coming for Theresa May According to one source: "People have to decide if they really want to make progress and support this prime minister, or not."#stopbrexit #bremain #noconfidence 
What a bunch of absolute shysters!  : EU threat to withhold Britain's budget rebate in Brexit bill wrangle 
Speaking of British humour, the Wikipedia entry perhaps needs some post-Brexit updating.  /9  
Brexit Britain is proving a big visitor attraction: a record number of tourists arrived in the UK in August and they splashed out £2.8bn, the highest monthly tourist spend ever.  
Hold up the mirror next at @Telegraph & @DailyMailUK whose collaborator/mutineer headlines reflect the poison Brexit has brought Britain. /5 
Remaining would not be to sacrifice democracy as it was an Advisory Referendum and democracy isn't static 
Arron Banks demonstrates that Brexit is basically racism at a country level. “We’re superior to you, so we want a veto over your decisions, but you can’t have one over ours”.  Ireland getting a bit uppity, Arron?  
There’s an embarrassment of ‘riches’, catching up on this week’s Brexit news.A mirror in a thread. /1 
Despite #ParadisePapers, David Davis' #Brexit impact study idiocy, cabinet resignations, the calamity of #UC, multiple allegations of inappropriate sexual behaviour and a study implicating Tory policy in 120k deaths, Tories are narrowing polling gap. How? #weallknowhow #bentmedia 
EU threatens to STOP UK's £4BILLION rebate payment amid Brexit negotiations. Bully Boys!  
Independent ROI can deal a blow to Brexit  while Scotland can only look on as BritNat Tories drags it out of the EU  
Brexit has caused the European Medicines Agency to leave UK, with it will follow the industry. The knock on effects for UK will be dire...More expensive drugs hitting the NHS hard - it will take years to negotiate new 3rd party terms #StopBrexit #SaveOurNHS 
Labour are in denial; they're  relying on the Bonaparte principle of 'never interrupting your enemy when they are making a mistake' far too much. They're refusing to acknowledge and address the fact that they're 60 seats behind the Tories. 
Ireland may defy Brexit and hit full employment soon, finance minister says  
It’s not just Northern Ireland and money that are sticking points: the current positions on citizens’ rights are not ok for 3mn #EUinUK and 1.2mn #UKinEU. We’re not ‘within touching distance’ when it comes to the people who have to live with it #Brexit  
Grieve predicts post Brexit Britain will resemble Britain of his childhood - "a stagnating country, slowly declining with an inability to compete, unable to make ends meet and becoming rather tatty."  
Whoops ! The ultra Telegraph doesn't like Brexit Minister any more .....Rodents and sea-going vessels come to mind :) 
Unicorn flatulence seems to be the intoxicant of choice for brexit. They are a fact free bunch 
‘They are stubborn!' Racist Quisling Remainer Yasmin alibhai-brown@y_alibhai claims Brexiteers regret Brexit vote but WILL NOT admit it   
Brexit Latest: Andrew Neil makes impressive point on Brexit financial settlement |   
Davis Davis COULD QUIT as Brexit Secretary after ‘being frozen out of negotiations’ What a shambles!  
....there's no negotiations only one-sided EU demands, we don't want trade at any price, blackmail & threats proves we made right decision to Brexit, 70% of British people want PM to walk away from so called talks. 
.@EveshamJournal setting out the reasons for their change of heart on Brexit with clarity and dignity  
Corbyn and Labour has voted for Brexit FFS!Despite majority of labour members want to stay in the EU.How on earth Corbyn and his cronies are the the good guys?#StopBrexit 
EU funding was always propaganda #Brexit  
A fair analysis would probably say - Varadker is not playing a blinder right now. Remainers - your thinking that Brexit is unreasonable doesn't automatically make its critics reasonable. Poor UK govt performance doesn't entail EU magnificence. 
We’re not even sure the UK government, desperate for a post-Brexit trade deal won’t just sell Scotland.“Welcome to Glasgow International Airport, Scotland-brought-to-you-by-Walmart”  
Anybody think a UK government desperate for a post-Brexit trade deal will have any qualms about selling out Scottish whisky? 
I can understand opposing Brexit but I simply cannot understand this masochism from some (mostly celebrity) Remainers. Willing punishment to come raining down on us for making the “wrong” choice - it’s astounding, depressing, reprehensible.  
Here’s an idea: let’s have a referendum in NI on a special customs status.They could call it a Boundary Poll or something like that. 
Bad loser nationalists want 'real democracy', bcos a one person, one vote referendum with a huge turnout isn't democracy - bcos they LOST. 
@politico This week’s formerly pro Brexit Evesham Journal - from the heart of Tory England - says “Time for a rethink on Brexit”  
Currently in Singapore & every Singaporean I’ve spoken to (lots) think the UK is utterly barking mad contemplating Brexit 
'If that is what you want, why are you leaving?' Beautifully phrased, pertinent question by German journalist. #brexit is utter madness. 
Brussels will have to deal with the Catalan problem as well as Brexit  
If Ireland wants to block Brexit trade talks maybe it would like to see what will happen to its economy if UK leaves with no deal #selfharm 
Excellent overview by @RCorbettMEP. After Brexit, UK would need to replicate over 40 agencies - covering medicine, air travel, maritime, etc - costing hundreds of £ millions & taking a decade or more to set up. All for no tangible gain. Complete madness  
There is a very worrying and noticeable shift on the part of leavers over the past few days towards bullying, thuggery, abuse and worse. I get the feeling they have suddenly realised there's a chance that they might not get their precious Brexit after all. Fingers crossed! 
Wondering how govt gets from EU dressing down today to 'sufficient progress' in December? Crunch meeting of Brexit cabinet cttee on Monday that sources suggest will decide if we're ready to pay more to move on, or not, and risk all that entails 
A profound editorial from middle England’s Evesham Journal - formerly pro Brexit in Tory territory - now says “Time for a rethink over Brexit” @EveshamJournal @BBCNews @itvnews @SkyNews @Channel4News @AP @ReutersUK 
#Irish #PM: #Britain asking for too much on #Brexit. #LeoVaradkar says the #UK wants "a divorce and an open relationship the day after" which is a "very difficult position to accept". Question: #MrVaradkar: Who gave the #IrishRep a Bail out worth £20bn AGAIN????? #BBC #SKY #NEWS 
All the agencies which would have to be replicated if we leave:Brexit and EU Agencies  via @RCorbettMEP 
Who are they broadcasting on behalf? #BRITAIN or the corrupt #EU...? @BBC: '#Tusk gives #Brexit talks ultimatum'....? but I do suppose when you accept millions of #Euros of the EU you do have to toe the line #BBC! (#BRUSSELS #BROADCASTING #CORPORATION) #BBCNews #UK #NEWS 
I have no idea at all why anyone would think that the British government is in any way responsible for anything to do with Brexit. Such a mystery.  
This from the @EveshamJournal:A clear and elegant case for  a #Brexit rethink and a check- back with the electorate Thanks for this: @emcmillanscott#Evesham-“Omnia mutantur" "Everything changes,"-#Ovid 
Brexit turns the EU into our economic competitors.You can't declare war on your allies and then say "Look how mean they are now!" 
We have family and fiends all over the world, and many nationals from those nations here in the #UK. We're interconnected globally from #Canada to #NewZealand, from #SriLanka to #Trinidad & #Kenya to #SouthAfrica. We, all of us, have a brilliant future ahead of us. After #Brexit! pic.twitter.com/c61xgWbvW1 
BREAKING: pro-Brexit heart of England local paper Evesham Journal now says “Time for a rethink on Brexit” @HenryCPorter @euromove @Open_Britain @BestForBritain @eurelationsappg @InFactsOrg 
If you laid all the Quitteratti end to end, they still couldn't reach a decision on what the fuck Brexit means.#revokeA50forthwith#StopBrexit 
The weekend! Another chance to #FBPE #brexit Easy!! 1- Keep an eye out for #FBPE & #FollowBackProEU. 2- Add each other.3- Add these hashtags to your name so people know. 4- We are stronger together * Please feel free to copy this image & use it. 
I wish we could have a week that we just have a #Brexit and #Trump media blackout. I think we all need a break from the bull shit to be honest  
“High time for a rethink over #Brexit” says former pro-Brexit heart of England weekly Evesham Journal in Nov 16 edition. All-Tory territory!  
What we need is a speech from you opposing Brexit, no ifs no buts, that is as powerful as the one you made to support bombing ISIS in Syria.That was unpopular then but you carried the day. Big rebound in the £, confidence and fall in prices if you #StopBrexit wld convince Leavers 
The chief obstacles to Brexit do not come from its opponents, but from the incompetence of those trying to deliver it - @IanDunt 
Exclusive: David Davis could quit because 'he is being frozen out on Brexit strategy' by civil servants 
Brexiters still under the delusion of the Brexit domino effect:“If we leave, everyone will!” Except everyone in EU is now looking at us and saying “Wow. The UK is f**ked!”  
ANGER as Jeremy Corbyn believes those who support ISIS should NOT be prosecuted  via @Your Brexit 
Brexit: Goldman Sachs chief Lloyd Blankfein suggests second vote  
How can they? Brexiters told us that "We hold all the cards." and "They need us more than we need them." How can an entity with no power or leverage "bully" a country with all of it? Unless the Brexit campaign was lying when it made those statements. 
Only 1 in 4 want to overturn Brexit.  
Faisal old chap , at the end of the day we know you don't like Brexit. Of course, there are issues with a big change but you aren't balanced  
Theresa May playing Brexit whack a mole as Ireland throws a spanner in the works  
James Dyson declares Brexit will be a disaster for EUROPE as he predicts UK will WALK AWAY  
“High time for a rethink on Brexit” says previously pro-Brexit Evesham Journal in the heart of England@campbellclaret @acgrayling 
Are you planning to start soon @theresa_may ? #Brexit  
Brexit could turn Britain into an “old people’s home that can’t pay for itself”, @theresa_may's policy chief warns. 
The day Cameron backtracked on his referendum was when Tories lost their monopoly on Euroscepticism says @oflynnmep 
Its one thing to disagree with brexit, but you actually want a bad deal for us. You support the EU to the detriment of UK? Typical stance of most remainers I fear. 
Brussels blackmail: EU threatens to withhold Britain's budget rebate in Brexit bill wrangle  
In the heart of England, J B Priestley country, the Evesham Journal changes course and advocates a rethink on #Brexit  
Sorry, Sahil. Swiss ‘model’ crosses all govt’s Brexit red lines: it pays into EU budget, accepts EU rules without having a say, has little control on free movement. Plus EU doesn’t like Swiss model & wontvrepeat it. So if you come up a ‘counter argument’, make it a real one.  
Some idiot who backed #Brexit -- motto: TAKE CONTROL OF OUR BORDERS -- now thinks the EU should take control of our borders. Well done @KateHoeyMP  
David Davis laugh gets louder the less confident he seems about the Brexit shitshow 
'What are we paying FOR?' Tory MEP slates 'cash-strapped' EU for demanding Brexit bill  
Has anyone noticed people who claim to have voted #Remain but have time lines full of far-right material. This strikes me as a new brand of disinformation.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
EU threat to withhold Britain's budget rebate in Brexit bill wrangle Best just pay them the net £10bn then, and let them sue us. 
Don't be dense. Anyone working to terminally damage Brexit is, in a small way, a National hero. Let's hope it's the crashing disaster we all expect it to be. 
Wow. Animal sentience - animals can feel pain and emotion - is not to be carried over into UK law.Wrecks the notion that UK will maintain standards post-Brexit. 
‘You're not listening to voters' Treacherous Remoaner Ex Labour MP @DMiliband ROASTED during interview about Brexit  Treacherous deceitful Remainers working in the best interests of the EU not the UKs 
'No deal is looking appealing!' QT audience member tells UK to speed up Brexit process  
Brexiteer Tory MP John Baron  blasts Remoaner 'disaster' warnings and claims no deal Brexit would be a SUCCESS  
Not hard:Did employment numbers happen specifically because of Brexit? No. Is the EMA move happening specifically because of Brexit? Yes. 
Nige, mate, but the interference of the Russians in Brexit though..... 
FFS Politicians from all sides voted to give the people a choice over #Brexit. If those same MP's spouted untruths, or tried to use scare tactics, THEY are to blame for the outcome?  
Arron Banks calls Brendan Cox who lost his wife to fascist terrorism a fascist. Arron Banks spent around £7.5m trying to buy #Brexit. Spread this far and wide. Let Arron Banks' cause be killed by his own malice.#StopBrexit 
Britain 20 years ago was labelled "Cool Britannia". In the run-up to Brexit, will 2018 be the year the country becomes "Uncool Britannia"?  
Come on people, you know you want to!Petition: Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU.  
Organise, mobilise, fight back against Brexit and secure special status - @M_AndersonSF 
Thread in response to Kate Hoey's opinion on the Irish border/#Brexit   
Watch: David Miliband on refugees, Brexit and his family in World War Two (extended interview). 
If nothing else, at least Brexit has finally answered the Blur v Oasis debate once and for all  
The Establishment: 'Brexit has broken the political system.'People who voted Leave: 'Yep. That was our intention.' 
Brexit Latest: Must Read. Thread   
Where Andrew Neil makes an absolute crap point-Canada not leaving EU-Bill is not the price of a trading deal, it is the UK paying his duesTypical from the Brexit Broadcasting Conservatives main political honcho#StopBrexit 
313 separate Brexit projects are currently being worked on by Britain's government  
The UK news media is struggling with the reality that Simon Coveney's views matter far more to the fate of Brexit talks than Boris Johnson's manoeuvring 
.@columeastwood “The desperate and last minute attempts by the British Government to move on to Phase 2 of the Brexit negotiations without providing any clarity on the Irish border issue must be rejected in the strongest possible terms.” Read in full:  
With 75 % of young people voting remain no wonder Corbyn read Shelley at Glastonbury rather than talked about Brexit.  
Good meeting today - we didn't agree on everything - but there is a better understanding now of outstanding issues on Brexit. Friends speak honestly to each other - thanks @BorisJohnson 
#EUWithdrawalBill @jeremycorbyn . Why the hell aren't you fighting this undemocratic power grab? Workers' rights in the pan & you sit there, silent. Brexit will decimate industry, trade, finance, NHS, education,housebuilding, farming. AWOL @vincecable @ChukaUmunna @DavidLammy 
brexiters are not interested in taking responsibility. The more #chaos #brexit will bring, the more #privatisations of public services and #NHS, the wealthier the #tory party donors. The #tory gvt wants to trash the UK 
Should UK just walk away from #Brexit talks and let the EU chase for trade and future talks? - Brexit: EU gives May two weeks to act on divorce bill & Ireland  @eucopresident @MichelBarnier @theresa_may @DavidDavisMPRETWEET & VOTE  #YourVoiceMatters 
Good discussion of the EMA situation... just one challenge in the whole spaghetti mess of Brexit.Incidentally, the new location of the EMA (the lucky city!) will be announced on Monday. EU moved fast & efficiently on it. UK Govt still in hope & wishes land as clock runs out.  
##bbcaq People have "a right" to see the he Brexit impact studies.  … … I do not understand, if leaving the EU means more prosperity and jobs; why is it then, we are not allowed to see the good news? - Agree RT 
This country is getting like a John Buchan novel: asking anyone in the Establishment about the Legatum Institute and the part it played in EU Referendum is as perilous as asking about the thirty-nine steps. 
No, @OwenPaterson Remainers are not clamouring for you to “get on with Brexit”.  On the contrary we are clamouring for the UK to stay safely in the EU #bbcaq 
Irish leader on Brexit: "Sometimes it doesn’t seem like they’ve thought all this through.” When you look at the 165 non EU countries, it seems to me it's the Irish leader who hasn't thought this through. 
Corbyn Labour could unseat the Govt with all the lies leave Govt spout , but Corbyn is pro brexit so he fiddles while all Rome burns. We will not forget. #stopbrexit #FBPE 
Petition: Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU. #StopBrexit 
Don't forget while we look for Russian fake news affecting our politics, the vast majority of fake news is being spewed out daily in the #Brexit billionaire press. #StopBrexit 
The question of Russian interference in the Brexit referendum cuts to the heart of our democracy, says @BenPBradshaw  
Please sign and share. There must be an option to Remain when Parliament vote on the Brexit deal or no deal. #stopbrexit #exitfrombrexit #bremain 
UK is going down the pan & all because of Brexit. Why should everyone have to suffer because of a few ignorant leavers who only want UK to leave EU for the sake of it. There's no valid reason to leave the EU, it's just going to cost each and every citizen more money & that's fact 
I think world reaction on the subject of who might manage well after Brexit is fairly accurately reflected in currency movement. 
Trust me. Europeans are holding back. Wait for what happens after Brexit. The UK’s reputation and credit will be in tatters. #StopBrexit#FBPE 
Britain's negotiating team#Brexit  
So, @theresa_may , @DavidDavisMP , and the whole @Conservatives lot, where are the #BrexitReports ? John Bercow, as Speaker and thus protector of our Parliamentary #democracy , you demanded the publications, so now what?  #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE  
Michale Gove the Brexit fantasist, Environment Secretary and wannabee Chancellor as he really is. Slash safeguards, protections and rights in a race to the bottom Brexit that works for the rich.No thanks #StopBrexit 
."House of Lords Constitution Committee [warns that] 1st Brexit bill contains INAPPROPRIATELY broad powers for ministers". 
How are the Irish editions of the Mail-Dacre-Liemachine and other Brextremist rags (Express/Sun/Mutineergraph)covering Brexit shitshow? 
Interesting thought - lest they forget...#Brexit #EU 
Leo Varadkar far too kind in saying the UK government hasn’t thought Brexit through. They haven’t thought full stop. Play hardball Leo!! 
4,000 supporters on this petition in 4 days. "This vote must not over-ride the subsequent convincing evidence that Brexit would be a disaster for the UK economy, for jobs, health services, food production and working and human rights in the UK"  
Irish PM Leo Varadkar: Britain asking for too much in Brexit negotiations  
I don't wish to lecture Mr Starmer @Keir_Starmer but isn't it time you put the future prosperity of the UK before party and stop Brexit?#revokeA50forthwith#StopBrexit 
Soft Brexit will never happen and opposing only "hard Brexit" suggests it's viable when it's not. So let's call a hard spade a spade #a50challenge 
David Davis has blamed Germany and France for the deadlock in the Brexit talks. Would you support paying a bigger divorce bill if it broke this deadlock?  
Calling all Remainers! RT to show solidarity with The Brexit Mutineers! #StopBrexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
I think the government has got it's priorities wrong. Instead of engaging in a doomed to fail pissing contest, they should be directing their efforts and our taxes towards fixing the causes of Brexit, you know, poverty, education, that sort of stuff. Don't you? 
July 2014: Ed Miliband questions a £160k donation the Tories accepted from the wife of a former Russian finance minister.  #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Ireland reduce Brexit talks to a new low after likening Theresa May to a want-away wife who wants to sleep around:  
Boris rejects Irish Minister calls for Britain to STAY in EU five years after Brexit, saying the UK Government wants to get on with Brexit “as fast as possible”  
This fella talks a lot of sense: on Brexit and Russia etc etc where is Jeremy Corbyn?   
Treacherous Remoaners want to change the date for Brexit so that they can keep us in the EU by the back door.  
Stella is now selling beer in pint cans. Is this the start of the return of imperial measurements post-Brexit?  
This ignoramus:-played a central role in the lie campaign during the Brexit referendum - now seems to imply that it is Ireland causing a problem SHE caused-cannot seem to deal with what we old her would be the logical consequences of Brexit.  
Brexit, Budget & stressed Dads when I present a show on @LBC 7-10pm tonight. Switch on and call up. All views welcome. Keep it clean, keep it legal 
My business won't be hurt by #brexit says Chinese industrialist James Dyson  
Ireland threatens to block progress of Brexit talks over border issue  
Top tip. Dear migrants/refugees. Post Brexit  UK will be closing it's borders except the 1 with Ireland as this is not our responsibility. Feel free to enter the UK here.  
With the Brexit vote, the UK killed populist rage. The same can't be said in Europe. My @telegraph column:  
Neo-Francoist dictatorship in #Catalonia: Spanish Police arrests 3 Catalan citizens for Facebook & Twitter posts denouncing their violence during the independence #referendum  
Still no solution for Ireland - we CANNOT go back to border guards and checkpoints, but Brexit leaders have not thought it through and have no solutions.  
Hearing #Brexit Secretary, @DavidDavisMP, talk in Berlin yesterday it’s clear he is completely and utterly out of his depth. Please read and share @Jon_Danzig’s in-depth report. Link:  
David Davis must be joking if he wants EU to compromise on Brexit, European Council president says #stopbrexit #noconfidence #bresistance 
Weapons grade bollocks. Brexit has damaged, possibly irreparably, a close and precious relationship.  
Peter Schrank on the state of Brexit negotiations - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
These destructive, self deluding fantasists are administering this Brexit folly with all the dextrous guile of a clown encountering a banana skin. #yourbrexiteers 
Watching the coverage of #Brexit talks on the TV, it is clear that UK politicians are running round Europe like headless chickens trying to charm their way out of the hole they've dug for themselves. #Embarrassing 
David Davis sounds ridiculous to everyone but himself. The whole world is laughing at the UK's representatives. #BrexitHypocrisy #Brexit  
Dear Twitter followers,Feel free to follow me on Facebook. Anti Tories, Trump & Brexit solidarity required! 
It’s Norway or Canada. These are our Brexit *deal* options. The WTO alternative is completely unworkable. Norway, given its ability to escape third country status/better trading terms, and with the use of A112 at our disposal on FoM, is the better of the two. 
What would Ruth Davidson be saying if the SNP had won a referendum on Scottish independence, and 18 months later, the SNP still had no clue what to do next? 
Is that the same fishing industry now seeking an exemption from the trade implications of Brexit?  
Why is BBC reporting on Brexit negotiations entirely through the prism of what EU panjandrums say Britain must do?  #massivebias 
Please retweet if you are angry that our country is pursuing a disastrous   #Brexit, sold on lies & promoted by people like Arron Banks, Nigel Farage (and their fraudulent little helper, 'Posh George').  
The UK comprises England, Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland, a formidable single market in our own right: where goods, currency, people and services flow freely in a market driven by enterprise, ambition and a desire for global competitiveness. We will Brexit. We will succeed. 
A must read from @NicholaMallon "Sinn Féin however have effectively marched Northern politics into the cul de sac of Tory direct rule, controlled and directed by the DUP, and have now disempowered Irish nationalism completely and in the face of Brexit" pic.twitter.com/ITdDQaZKK8 
"British gov't has no interest whatever in seeing a hard border"@BorisJohnson visits Ireland to discuss future partnership after Brexit  
‘Respect the majority vote!' Michelle Dewberry launches FURIOUS rant over Brexit date  
It took anti-EU fanatics 40 yrs to squeeze Brexit across the line & they still needed to cheat. There are no good arguments for Brexit. 
'They're beginning to panic!' Tory MEP says EU is WORRIED about getting no Brexit deal  
Just a reminder:》Labour do not speak for Remain.》Labour are an anti-Remain party.》Labour support hard Brexit.》They support it AGAINST the wishes of the vast majority of their supporters and MPs.》Labour oppose a ref on the final deal.》Remainers owe Labour no loyalty. 
As usual David Davis' statement is directed only at British public opinion and seems designed to form part of a justification for Britain pulling out of the talks.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
The Brexit divorce bill: what is it, how much is it, and when’s the deadline to agree on it? @bbcchrismorris has the answers from both sides of the argument 
Labour would scrap Theresa May's Brexit red lines in negotiations if they won power 
“I can only tell you that I really appreciate Mr Davis’ English sense of humour”, Tusk says about Davis boasting that UK has been the one making compromises so far in Brexit talks. pic.twitter.com/9LRj8zJ9Hz 
How to solve the Irish border Brexit question. (Walter Ellis for Reaction thinks he has the answer. It might just work...)  
Brexit negotiations (the story so far):Mar 2017EU to UK: These are the rulesUK to EU: OKApr:UK to EU: Can we change the rules?EU to UK: NoJul:UK to EU: Please?EU to UK: NoSept:UK to EU: Please?EU to UK: NoNov:UK to EU: Please?EU to UK: No#bbcpm @LBC 
I vote for the UK to leave Brexit. It deserves better. 
MUST-WATCH: Lord Kerr's speech last Friday - we can change our minds on Brexit at any stage of the process. Please RT:  
Irish leader pretty incredulous about fact we are 18 months on from referendum with promises but no concrete UK plan for keeping border open  
EX Servicemen Should He House before Refugees 
Very interesting thread. There are so many unintended #brexit consequences. Irish border is obvious but some in Uk gov deny that. Imagine all the issues that are being completely ignored?  
Varadkar: “after 18 months, 18 months since the referendum, 10 years since people started agitating for it, and yet to see anything in b&w” 
Expecting Labour to lead on stopping Brexit is a mistake. If the public mood changes, it seems fairly likely the party will follow.  
Remainers of all parties are planning to keep the UK in the EU, and they believe they will win. @georgeeaton on the plot to stop Brexit: 
The UK government is starting to publicly accept what any observer of European politics has long known about Brexit, writes @anandMenon1 for @CNNopinion 
I used to dislike @RailaOdinga for no reason. However, in 2005 after the referendum, I got the time to understand this enigma. Since then,my love for him keeps growing.When you love him ,it's impossible to hate him. Charismatic 
Nick Clegg: MPs deserve a vote on the final plan for Brexit – not a vague sketch  
Minister @KrzysiekSzubert & @ArkadyRzegocki met with Lord Henley Parliamentary Under-Secretary of State at the Department for Business, Energy  & Industrial Strategy to discuss digital policies before & after Brexit and with students from the @imperialcollege in London 
Signs of Russian Meddling in Brexit Referendum  
Putting substance to one side ,is BREXIT the worst handled negotiation since Munich? I can only assume No10 has a cunning plan. #chamberlain 
Good summary of current Brexit state of play here. @BBCkatyaadler consistently the best of the BBC journalists on Brexit IMHO.  
How can we afford £55 billion for HS2, £53 billion for Brexit and £17 billion for Trident but can't afford to ensure UK children do not go hungry? #foodbanks #ChildrenInNeed2017 
DriveTime leading with Barry Walsh..... ahead of UK Foreign Minister in Ireland for critical Brexit talks and the critical EU summit in Gothenburg. Twilight zone stuff 
I do not understand how Twitter can be used to swing entire general elections and referendum results but not sell comedy gigs. RIDDLE ME THAT!! 
David Davis is Brexit’s Snowball, oinking out daft threats to Berlin business leaders. The New European editor @mk1969's column for @BritishGQ. 
Patently obvious that @BorisJohnson & @michaelgove campaigned for #Brexit without understanding the Single Market or the rule of law and have persisted with ignorance and/or indifference ever since.  Hence failure to understand the border issue in Ireland. 
EU chief Donald Tusk warns Britain has to make "much more progress" on its Brexit bill and the Irish border  
UK now only non-eurozone nation to have outstanding bailout loan with Ireland - £3.2bn - repayments of loan start fortnight after Brexit day 
Corbyn's popular appeal to voters in GE2017 was in spite of his looney acceptance of Brexit, not because of it. If the LP had been sensible, it would have won the election and we would have been rid of Brexit by now and well on the way to repairing the damage done since 2010. 
BBC missing a trick - they could fill their schedules with "what's really going to happen as a result of Brexit" programmes. Facts, facts, facts. I wish we had some. 
After Brexit, not “only will [the UK] have to keep complying with EU rules to sell into the [EU] market, but in some cases the UK will have to choose which of the mutually incompatible sets of EU and US regulations it wants to adhere to in order to trade.”  
The Brexit settlement, future of NI Border, UK-Irish relations, the Conservative-DUP Deal & Govt’s future visibly intertwined here:  
People who influence whether #Ireland gets a hard border after #Brexit Theresa MayDavid DavisBoris Johnson Donald TuskPeople who have no idea what a hard border would do to Ireland (north & south) Theresa MayDavid DavisBoris Johnson Donald Tusk 
As Austerity measures & Brexit uncertainty bite harder, wages are stagnating - this is putting huge pressure on household finances. Tory economic mismanagement and their reliance on discredited 'trickle down' theory have caused this. #ToryShambles #ToriesOut #StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/c4JUgPEha7 
If this is actually the Irish demand then we might as well give up on Brexit negotiations  
I can’t see how the Labour Party can be the Labour Party when it’s on the same side of the argument as Murdoch and Trump on Brexit. 
DUP MP @eastantrimmp: “People in NI used to Irish Govt interfering in our affairs..now into affairs of UK as whole” trying to thwart Brexit  
The breathtaking stupidity of the UK's so called political elite is beyond comprehension. They may as well chuck the towel in now, #Brexit it cannot be delivered. 
No Brexit deal will hurt the EU more than anyone else - @DCBMEP on @daily_politics 
Irish position about the border has been clear for months.#Brexit  
The Irish prime minister has stepped up pressure on Theresa May by demanding 'written commitments' to avoid a hard border with Northern Ireland after Brexit  
And here's the position of the President of the Council, Donald Tusk: “It is in fact up to London how this will end -- with a good deal, no deal or no Brexit". (). 
France & Germany are blocking deal, suggests David Davis as he lists countries that want Brexit deal - The Telegraph  
Does your faith and patriotism have the magical power to make technical legislation and multidisciplinary agencies just spring into being? Is it unpatriotic to raise the #Brexit alarm or quite the reverse? Am I a remoaner for thinking about this? Or are you a fool for not? END 
The question of Russian interference in the Brexit referendum cuts to the heart of our democracy, says @BenPBradshaw  
Then why are you supporting Brexit, Keir? Why do you want to leave the single market? Why won't you support a ref on the final deal?  
it's going to be a blue #Christmas with the #brexit grinch around!! Luckily we've got #EU #Santa on our team to give us our #EU Citizenship back! The only #xmas gift we truly need! #StopBrexit 
Which is the only party & party leader truly committed to ending a hard brexit being advocated by this current conservative government? @LibDems @UKLabour Please RETWEET the POLL after you vote for a larger sample. 
European Council President sets December deadline for UK to make progress on Brexit divorce bill and the future of the Irish border 
Varadkar tells me: "After 40 years of marriage- most of them good, now Britain wants a divorce but an open relationship the day after." #brexit #SocialSummit17 
"Serious issues" concerning the UK-Irish border after Brexit mean trade talks should be delayed and a five-year transition period implemented, Ireland's foreign minister has said  
Irish PM Leo Varadkar tells me in interview for @SkyNews that on #Brexit talks the UK hasn't done nearly enough to move to second phase in December: "I can't say in any honesty that it's close- on the Irish issue or on the financial settlement." #SocialSummit2017 
The smart thing to do today is the same as it was yesterday.Look at the evidence. What does Brexit means for the country? Is it in the national interest? /1 
Not all Brexit voters read tabloids. Best not to assume we are uneducated or uninformed just because we hold different views. 
I'm not saying it's the same demographic of people but it's defo a coincidence how the media missed the mood on Brexit and has also failed to support the music people actually like for a decade It's almost as tho the capital is out of touch with rest of the country isn't it ? 
I am on the Brexitcast podcast today  talking about Germany/Ireland and Brexit. Thanks to @jasimsoncaird for the suggestion. 
One more EU leader who has had enough of the ginbering incompetence of the Brexit mediocrity gang. They have risked EVERYTHING on a stunt engineered by tax dodgers. Everything is now at risk, peace in Ireland. The econony. Human rights. EVERYTHING. 
There's only one remedy for this intransigence is to leave with no trade deal without paying the #EU a penny and then we can immediately start negotiating trade deals around the world with our friends. #UK then would trade with EU under #WTO rules #Brexit  
We had a referendum sanctioned by parliament.The electorate voted leave. True patriots would accept it as we had to in 1975.Form a rejoin party & go to the country.  
Brexit profoundly complex but basics now v simple. EU wants € UK owes. UK either agrees or it doesn't. If it doesn't, no deal- and no planes 
RT if you're a football fan who didn't vote for Brexit  
BREAKING There are 27 Tory MPs prepared to rebel on Brexit, Dominic Grieve tells Chopper's Brexit Podcast Episode 28 today:  via @telegraphnews 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and your Country and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
It's truly outrageous.It's like #DavidDavis  got the gig because he won some telly reality  show.#Brexit  
Discussed with PM @theresa_may the calendar of #Brexit talks. Only if UK makes progress by early December, will I be ready to propose new guidelines on transition and future relations at December #EUCO. 
CEO of Goldman Sachs, Lloyd Blankfein wrong to call for a second referendum. Brits don’t want one!   
Brexit Britain - where did it all go wrong?Our thoughts on why Britain decided to leave the EU. 
Every single step of the Brexit negotiations so far has been not just utterly predictable, but actually predicted.It's genuinely boring. Like I've already seen this one. Spoiler alert: in the end, we Remain. 
Mr Speaker...oi you! I thought you said the Brexit impact papers had to be released by last Tuesday. Where are they? Why are you not carpeting Davis et al? C'mon, old cock, we need you to get these into the public domain - pronto! @Mr_speaker_UK @mrjamesob @JamesMelville 
.@eastantrimmp Wilson - “Irish government attempting to thwart EU referendum result”  
Every time ghouls like Tony Blair and Lloyd Blankfein argue for a second referendum, it makes a second referendum less likely 
Whip out your opera glasses to view the parallel universes of #Brexit My thoughts:  
The issue obviously needs lots more research but some on social media & events actively buying into "bots caused Brexit/strongly influence Leave vote". Evidence for that claim looks incredibly weak. 
Arron Banks' heart (if he has any such thing) is with the £7.5m he invested trying to buy #Brexit. Let's make that a wasted investment.We Remainers continue a proud British tradition. We don't surrender to fascists! #StopBrexit 
Having had my integrity questioned, let me clarify. My business would actually benefit from an economic downturn such as would inevitably follow Brexit.  My opposition to it is based on the national interest not a personal one. 
Bank of England research finds that "uncertainty" has much less effect on the economy than usually believed. Normally, it's problems in financial markets that bring about economic impacts. Fits Brexit experience so far.  
May's Brexit date falls apart  Hmmm. Anyone would think the editor of the Standard had some kind of grudge against the Prime Minister. 
The fight against Brexit is also the fight against Russia and that is why we have to win  
Tory rebels torpedo May's plan to fix Brexit date in law  
I’m stepping up efforts to ensure London remains the best city in the world to do business post-Brexit, by opening new overseas offices in six key cities @Londonpartners #LondonisOpen 
Frankfurt prepares for Brexit: 'It has put extra wind into our sails'  
Will people complaining about Jeremy's failure to comment on Brexit PLEASE just let him get on with his job?  
Varadkar really laying it out here. Gives Theresa May an excuse to stand down hard Brexiteers but they’d defenestrate here. No deal odds just got a lot shorter #brexit  
Many Brexiters seem to adhere to a "We won, you lost!" mentality. Germany must really annoy them by being both richer, and repeatedly beating England at penalties. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Kids getting firebombed in their beds in the UK. Is what Fascist Farage, Hate-Filled Hopkins, and Robbing Banks hope for Brexit Britain?  
My speech in Parliament last night on the importance of investigating Russian interference in Britain, including in the #Brexit Referendum  
#Brexit Britain (or perhaps one should say England) like Russia a former great power that still cannot come to to terms with the loss of empire.#StopBrexit 
‘It’s 18 months since the referendum, it's 10 years since people have wanted a referendum started agitating for one. Sometime it doesn't seem like they've thought all of this through’ Irish PM 
You Brexiters just don't get how we who try to #StopBrexit are doing so as British patriots seeking to save our country from either a Bad Pay & Obey + No Say #Brexit or a Worse than Bad ruinous WTO one..UK is our country..EU is not a country but 27+1? working for mutual benefit. 
Does David Davis have a great sense of humour or amnesia saying to the EU 'don't put politics before prosperity'? Wasn't that exactly what #Brexit was, putting Tory politics before the UK's prosperity? 
Nick Clegg: "the suggestion from the Government that if MPs have the temerity to reject the Brexit deal they will be responsible for the chaos of no deal is as thuggish as it is misleading..."#standupfordemocracy #bremain #StopBrexit 
The Irish Prime Minister has set Theresa May a one-month deadline to explain how she will avoid a damaging hard border with Northern Ireland, or the EU will block Brexit trade talks. 
Anyone else get the feeling that the UK is still playing at Brexit, while the EU is well on the way to preparing for it with concrete plans and actions? 
SCUMBAG #TORY #Remoaner #MPs who are Lying to the #British people, are now ganging up on the #WEAK & #SPINELESS #REMAINER #PM @theresa_may to drop the #BrexitDate! ALL #TRAITORS!”  @Conservatives #Conservatives #ConservativeParty #BBC #BREXIT #SKY #UK 
Great editorial in @standardnews on Brexit realities & the evaporation of the 'they need us more than we need them' mantra  
#BrexitReality #BrexitCrisis #brexitshambles A useful teaching aid for anyone who needs to explain #Brexit & the #Leave Campaign.... cc. @BorisJohnson ..... 
An American chemical firm may shift production from Britain if Brexit uncertainty persists  
Our editorial @EveningStandard on the PM’s retreat and another week of Brexit realities   
Best Wishes to EU Supergirl @albawhitewolf on @BBCAnyQuestions tonight in her ongoing fight to halt the #Brexit traincrash and #StopBrexit from doing yet more harm 
Boris Johnson says he 'wasn't aware' of Irish government's desire for a longer Brexit transition period. They announced it ten days ago. In a national newspaper. Our Foreign Secretary, ladies and gentlemen.  
‘Canada hasn't paid anything!’ Andrew Neil makes BRILLIANT point over Brexit bill demands - @Daily_Express  
The Irish PM says he'll block the Brexit deal if it creates a hard border with Northern Ireland.Good Luck Theresa May...  
Important we start to clamp down on government's misleading talk. We can decide not to Brexit any time we like prior to March 2019  
Here's Leave EU with Cambridge Analytica saying they were working together on #Brexit . Now both sides deny that. I wonder why  
Nice straw dog. No-one's blaming Brexit on 'Russians'. But Putin paying for propaganda to incite racial tension in ANY foreign country is wrong, and should be stopped.  
BLAME: If politicians want to point finger at someone over housing crisis, should be themselves. They’ve allowed mass #migration and population surge to run out of control.  #UK #EU #NEWS #BBC #SKY #TORY #LABOUR #UKIP #Conservatives #Brexit #Libdems 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Ireland just gave Theresa May a serious warning over Brexit  
Ireland threatens to block progress of Brexit talks over border issue  
Nothing changing at all wasn't exactly in the spirit of the Brexit vote, was it?  
Here’s what Russians think: Brexit is your creature – don’t blame it on us | Alexey Kovalev  
Aye that's me! My leave vote had sod all to do with immigration. I'm no fan of regional trading blocs and a political union. I wanted increased international trade, but the right-wing have hijacked #Brexit & I'd change my vote in a flash! 
Let's see how well their self-proclaimed sense of humour is after this is investigated..... 
Brexit puts politics before prosperity. Why shouldn't the EU do the same?  
Brexit proportions 
Brexit Heartlands want someone else to pay for Brexit  
Another reason Remainers are desperate to stop Brexit: if it happens and succeeds, many distinguished reputations will be shredded. 
Extraordinary statement from the man in charge of delivering #Brexit. When is he going to make the "smart choice" and admit that #Brexit will destroy the UK. It is the duty of him and all the other MP's to act in the national interest and #StopBrexit 
Dear MPs.I am just about sick and tired of this.If you oppose the idea of #Brexit, regardless of what your leadership thinks, just bloody well do something to turn things around.I'm tired of not being represented 
#Brexit Non stop doom & gloom Brexit talk. FFS 17 million people voted leave. Stop pussyfooting around get on with it. Were leaving.!!!   pic.twitter.com/Xiqtwe63Gu 
Brexit isn't like shooting yourself in the foot. It's more like shooting yourself in the face. With a missile. That you had to pay triple for. To a German company. 
And so here we are.UK will be out of EU on 29 March 2019 by automatic operation of law (unless something exceptional happens).No strategy or planning.Confusion re Irish border.No agreed post-Brexit position.A Canadian style FTA one day, if we are lucky.Well./ends 
Telling Brexiters they were fooled doesn't work - Nobody wants to admit thatPredicting how Brexit will hurt the UK doesn't work - Those who said there'd be a recession on June 24th royally screwed us thereSo my next video explains what we need from a "good" Brexit Deal 
I would like to warn all my former friends in Parliament; UKIC has had enough. If you collude with Russia to influence UK politics expect to be jailed. #Brexit #IndyRef 
And the most culpable - the real saboteurs of a successful Brexit (if one was ever possible) - were those who cheered and clapped May with each of her clumsy crowd-pleasing moves.From conference speech red-lines to premature Article 50 notification./8 
"A bit crackpot to say it was some Russian trolls and some Russian bots that swung either US election or Brexit vote" @JamieJBartlett #bbcdp 
The EU still thinks it can settle the Irish border issue w/o deciding the basis of future trading. They hope that by delaying trade talks they will get more money from us. The Brexit Sec was right to offer no money & to remind them that a Free Trade deal is in their self-interest 
Theresa May and the Tories are still yet to do anything to address money lost to the exchequer through tax-havens. New EU laws start in 2019 & coincide with Brexit. Coincidence? #PayYourTax #StopBrexit #ParadisePapers 
Meanwhile, Spain demoted the Chief of Police who handled the terrorist attack with such efficiency to a desk job for his role in the democratic referendum. 
This was not because I am against Brexit in principle - I am not, as it happens - it is just that it was bleedingly obvious that Article 50 was not fit for purpose.UK would just get shafted./5 
Irish PM: Brexit talks cannot progress unless hard border is taken off the table  
MUST-READ: Brexit select committee urges Theresa May to ditch plans to write Brexit date into #EUWithdrawalBill (£) 
We said a long time ago that Brexit would kill British farming.Here's a farmer who seems to agree.  
Lots of good things about Brexit Gary, but you're not likely to find them in the Guardian. The kind of people who write for that rag are fascinated by their own faeces. 
Fixing Brexit date in law was designed to send message to EU capitals - still doubtful UK will go through with it - that it is fixed. Parliamentary maths make date unworkable and it will be withdrawn. Meaning precisely opposite message from that intended goes to the 27. Brilliant 
James Dyson, the manufacturer who Brexiters keep using to justify Brexit, actually took his production of Dyson hoovers out of the UK to Malaysia because Britain didn't join the Euro.In 2000, Dyson said: 'It's suicidal for the UK not to join the Euro." 
I see the UK as a great destination for inward investors & for domestic investors wishing to set up businesses, create jobs, build factories & new properties. Brexit is full of opportunity for businesses in the UK. 
My boys make me laugh. Here's the eldest's suggestions for a a Brexit musical future: "We need to rethink our national music, to reflect our (diminished) world status.What about:Land of Hopeless ToriesRule TwitaniaJerusalem (to be written and performed by Priti Patel)" 
This is good: @georgeeaton on The plot to stop Brexit  
“We are the same country we have always been. With the same values and same principles ” - David Davis just said this in GermanyMany abroad & in UK certainly don't see it that way. Brexit is a cynical break from the European values of common interest & collaboration. 
Irish PM: I will block progress on EU talks with the UK unless a hard border in Ireland is taken off the table. "It’s 18 months since the referendum. Sometimes it doesn’t seem like they have thought all this through." 
- 2014: Farage praises Putin- 2015: Arron Banks of Leave.EU has 6-hr meeting at Russian Embassy at invitation of Russian intelligence- 2016: Thousands of Russian bots & sock puppets push Brexit- 2017: Farage dismisses claims of Russian meddling as "hysterical nonsense"  
Why would the Irish insist on a soft border with Northern Ireland? Every major nation does majority of its trade with near neighbours. The nearer they are the more important. Only Brexit UK seems blind to this obvious fact. #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Ouch of the day;Leo Varadkar: "It's 18 months since the referendum, it's 10 years since people who wanted a referendum started agitating for one."Sometimes it doesn't seem like they have thought all this through." 
I know ministers want to do new stuff, but re: Mr Gove’s plan for an independent body to champion the environment post #Brexit, we already have Natural England - “an independent body...responsible for conserving, enhancing and managing England’s natural environment...” 
‘Canada hasn't paid anything!’ Andrew Neil makes BRILLIANT point over Brexit bill demands  
Irish PM: I will block Brexit talks unless hard border is off the table  
Not only are we facing the dire consequences of Brexit itself, but this week alone we have lost a raft of rights & protections as they use the #EUWithdrawalBill as a Trojan Horse to hijack our laws. More than ever, we need to ACT to #StopBrexit  PLEASE SIGN 
Davis' speech to the Suddeutsche Zeitung Economic Summit. This description of post-#brexit relationship with EU is so similar to UK's current membership that a German journalist ask him why we were leaving. Beats me. Maybe we aren't?  
ULTIMATUM: David Davis says it's the EU's turn to compromise in Brexit talks and names and shames countries that are holding up Britain's EU exit. 
Why setting a Brexit date in stone will give the UK the upper hand in negotiations with the EU  
Brexit ironies are racking up fast. These are open goals for an opposition- but Corbyn is AWOL.  
Banks is mocking a British terror attack victim.That's life under brexit.  
Varadkar: "It's 18 months since the [#brexit] referendum. It's 10 years since people who wanted a referendum started agitating for one. Sometimes it doesn't seem like they've thought all this through."  
Let’s spend £53bn on the NHS instead and cancel Brexit!  
DENIED: Downing Street is refuting claims that Theresa May will crumble to Remoaner pressure and scrap Brexit date.  
Wtf does my “privilege” (there it is again, folks) have to do with the fact that Brexit is going to hit those who are already struggling hardest? Or is this the old “if you fail to blindly support Labour in all things it can ONLY be because you HATE POOR PEOPLE” argument?  
"UK and Ireland can strengthen ties via Brexit."@BorisJohnson is in Dublin today for talks for Irish FM @simoncoveney  
So the UK Parliament have voted against retaining EU environmental protection principles post Brexit. Retrogressive, short sighted and frankly unforgivable.  
The Brexit nightmare inside the Sun’s sleeping BBC journalists ‘scandal’ | Anne Perkins  
Irish PM: Brexit-backing politicians did not think things through  
I have the feeling that as the 2016 referendum slips further into the past, it will become legally necessary to have any final deal approved by the electorate in a referendum. And that will provide the opportunity for UK voters to #StopBrexit 
NEW REMAINIACS: This week we lose our shit about Brexit amendments, Lexit & a dreadful reality TV show they made me watch  
Pay €60bn to get UK out of the EU !‘Canada hasn't paid anything!’Canada has just “massively” improved its access to the single market and it has not had to pay anything, nor has it been subject to the ECJ.#Brexit #EU 
Given brexit directly threatens my job and my partners and if she loses hers she gets deported, leaving our baby with me, why shouldn't I hate politicians and pundits who support Brexit? 
HMG seems to just have utterly no clue what its doing in these negotiations. Which tbf isn't entirely surprising. For 44 years the UK has had no intl trade negotiators, and the first thing the UK did post-referendum is sabotage its own ability to hire experienced negotiators. 
David Davis has called for co-operation in the interests of mutual prosperity between the Britain and the EU.This begs the obvious question: If that's what he wants, why does he want Britain to leave the EU?#Brexit 
So John McDonnell is setting out his demands for next week’s budget in a sad attempt to deflect attention away from #Brexit and steal some credit. But let’s look at what McDonnell as chancellor would mean...#LabourFail #TheCorbynCon 
.@DavidLammy You suspect that the Leave campaign had help from the Russians? Meanwhile, we all know and remember the Remain campaign receiving help from almost all of the establishment including the then US President #Obama! #EU #Brexit 
Brexit impact papers are being delayed till after the amendment debates are done in the lower House  Told you so. Shameful 
If you regret voting Leave in the Brexit referendum, please know Remainers want to work with you.Britain is our shared, proud home. Let's protect it together from the liars who want to use us and it. Brexit and the ruin it is bringing are not inevitable.  
Ireland not ready to let Brexit talks move to stage 2: minister  
Peter Mandelson tells me: "In the end, Brexit will defeat Brexit."  
The UK's handling of Brexit has been such an omni-shambles of self-defeating measures that hobble their own position.  
Yasmin Alibhai-Brown tells Sky she would rather be Robert Mugabe than Theresa May at the moment because of "that whole Brexit thing". Searing analysis. 
'Hang your head in shame': Nicola Sturgeon blasts Ruth Davidson for Brexit hypocrisy  
Friends! Wise words!Literally no-one wants Brexit any more, apart from a tiny handful of 17,410,742 bigoted racists, who believed the LIES that were emblazoned on the side of a Far-Right omnibus!And we Remainers now represent an overwhelming minority of people, e.g. Our Gina.  
If you doubt my analysis of it, @pmdfoster & @justinhuggler have more here:If Britain is to get itself out of the #Brexit hole it has dug for itself, Davis and his DExEU team need to get serious on the details. Urgently.11/11 
SHAMELESS: Europhile CEO of Goldman Sachs calls for second referendum. In your dreams, Lloyd Blankfein.  
“And as we leave, we will be leaving the single market and the customs union.”“This is not an ideologically driven decision but a practicality based on what our people voted for and the respect we have for the four freedoms of the EU.”The referendum did not say that.8/11 
Russian bots did not win the #Brexit vote. But Russia's involvement shows that Brexit is serving Putin in his efforts to weaken & destroy Western democracy & replace it with a Putinist kleptocracy that doubtless appeals to the likes of Murdoch, Dacre & Farage. #StopBrexit 
Tory Brexit rebel Antoinette Sandbach's family were thrown out of their home by the Nazis, she explains in hard-hitting piece for Times today. That "collaborator" rhetoric by Brexit hardliners doesn't sound so clever now, does it?  
Brexit may be just what British trade needs  
Ruth Davidson pressing ahead with Brexit whilst admitting that it could come at a massive economic cost to Scotland.  
The way Brexit has transformed the power balance between Dublin and London is completely misunderstood by May and very well understood by Varadkar 
Remainers of all parties are planning to keep the UK in the EU, and they believe they will win. @georgeeaton on the plot to stop Brexit: 
Goldman Sachs boss calls for second Brexit referendum  
Brexit, border controls, the Irish border...what could go wrong? Nothing according to Boris Johnson. Not that he cares for the years of peace making that went into the current situation. #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Remember the first referendum?The UK committed to Europe. We are now interwoven and are destroying our future by breaking all those threads that connect us to our continent. #Thinkagain#FBPE@NewEuropeans@BritishInEurope pic.twitter.com/RLwMxiTZPf 
Looks like Varadkar will use the Irish veto over Brexit talks. UK-Irish relations taken apart by a mishandled Brexit process in less than 18 months  
It's quite long. But Brexit is only proceeding because of left-wing support. And yet there is very little out there looking at the Lexit arguments. 
Remember the pundits telling us how post referendum visitors were abandoning Britain?  
Another feckless attempt at fulfilling the people's will, another Brexit betrayal. David Davis's speech in Berlin last night “went down like a Led Zeppelin", said one German business leader in attendance.We give concessions and win no favour in return. This has got to stop.  
BETRAYAL: Theresa May could give in to Remoaner MPs and scrap Brexit date. These Europhiles don't care about the will of the people. 
So, Theresa May is to offer even MORE of our cash to Brussels and she caves on enshrining the Brexit date in legislation. Weak. Weak. Weak. 
A Catalan teacher detained for being critic in social network with Spanish police violence the day of the Referendum  
The greatest danger to Britain is not Brexit. Not even a "hard" one. It's Labour.  
Lots of posts this am explaining the  lack of progress in brexit negotiations by UK failure to understand the EU. Maybe how it comes over but underlying problem is inability to make definitive choices because of Cabinet/party divisions. 
Paradoxically I imagine many people voted for #brexit because they were tired of being fooled. 
How Brits are trying to haggle down Brexit bill. Some arguments reasonable, others a stretch. Many won't fly with EU. Best case -- if it *all* works -- €32bn. EU side confident it will end €50bn plus. Graphic by @digitalcampbell 
'The widely-covered police brutality which took place during the referendum of the 1st of October has, at last, brought home the long-sought international attention to the repression that we experience...'  
.@MichelBarnier: passionate about Europe, factual on #brexit, & a personal touch = speech of the week  
From today's Times on Leave.EU reluctance to hand over funding info to Electoral Commission. Maybe Brexit process should be paused until data forthcoming  
Davis asks EU to put "prosperity above politics" ... at the same time, Theresa May postures over writing a Brexit date & time into law for pure political show... restricting flexibility to forge a better deal. FFS 
Blog: Brexit will deliver a liquidity crisis that will make 2008 look like a half-hearted warm-up act  
150,000 Russian Twitter accounts! What prime minister worth their salt could continue with Brexit. Brexit is flawed, it is illigitimate #StopBrexit 
Theresa May is in meltdown. Tory policies are failing across the board; Brexit is a disaster; 120k people dying from austerity; tax-havens exposed; We need to get rid of the toxic Tories #ToriesOut #ToryShambles 
"Putting politics before prosperity is never a smart choice", says govt whose hard Brexit strategy will put politics before prosperity.  
Heading to Brussels to run a training session for EU Commission officials on Brexit; the usual "Brexplaining" fun. Probably makes me a "traitor" in some people's minds, tho! 
 “The Road to Brexit” 
Do not blame Grimsby. This is the referendum's smoking gun. The PROOF that Leave voters did not really understand what they were voting for.Stop Brexit.  
Most Brits now think Brexit was a mistake  
The #Brexit referendum was ADVISORY. It was to ADVISE the Government on what to do. They triggered #Article50 to leave the EU. A second referendum to ADVISE them to carry on or not, given what we now know, is not anti-democracy. They have a duty to ask again. 
'In a speech in Berlin, he warned against "putting politics above prosperity"'Could he be any more hypocritical? Everything the Tories have done with Brexit has been about Conservative party politics, including holding the referendum itself. 
Theresa May’s Britain is heading for a Brexit train wreck  
There could have been a sensibly negotiated, non-catastrophic Brexit. But the Brexiters could never achieve it because they've never thought it through, and only really want to attack the EU constantly. 
Simon Coveney calls for more clarity on the border before Brexit talks move to phase two | Read more:  
As a definition of Brexit putting politics before prosperity is a pretty accurate one. 
Irish PM Varadkar says UK Govt 'went further' than the referendum result by 'unilaterally' deciding Britain will leave Single Market & Customs Union. What will Theresa 'Will of the People' May make of that? 
BREXIT DIVISION: Boris Johnson tells reporters in Dublin that Irish border issue can only be solved in 2nd phase of Brexit talks. Irish foreign minister says "we are not in a place right now that allows us" to move to Phase 2 and Irish border needs to be resolved in phase 1 
UK government replies to @CommonsIntTrade report on trade policy after Brexit: "There is no evidence that there are workable plans" - @AngusMacNeilSNP, committee chair 
Coveney has said this in front of Johnson after publicly disagreeing w/Johnson saying Uk should now move to stage 2 of #brexit talks. UK-Irish gov relations are deteriorating  
The Government’s spending watchdog says more than 300 projects and hundreds of new laws are needed to prepare for Brexit  
If you missed this yesterday the man who's had a feud with his brother for 20 years wants you to "get over it" with regards to the Brexit vote:  
'Don't put politics above prosperity', Davis warns EU | German business leaders demand EU keeps Britain in bloc | Boris in Ireland - Read all the Brexit news here  
Thread: The EU in their own words. Sometime you don't need to say anything at all.  These people are openly telling us what they are doing. Here are tweets and videos from the EU. #Brexit  
Still a mystery how Vote Leave won the EU referendum, innit?  
VERY clear this morning that Ireland and U.K. are miles apart on #Brexit. "We can't jump into the dark," says Coveney. #Boris 
Oof. Irish PM @campaignforleo goes in studs up on May and the Brexiteers: "It's 18 months since the referendum, it's 10 years since people who wanted a referendum started agitating for one."Sometimes it doesn't seem like they have thought all this through." 
During press conf with Boris Johnson, Irish Foreign Minister says he believes Brexit transition period should be more like 4-5 years - Johnson responds by saying he thinks it should be significantly shorter 
Leo and Theresa meet in flags cupboard to do vodka shots. Unclear yet how this will impact on #Brexit  
Odd, isn't it, that none of the leading Brexiteers are calling for a full independent investigation into Russian involvement in the EU Referendum? You'd think they'd want to put all this behind them. 
Little sense or sensibility in David Davis’s Berlin speech. If he set out to antagonise Germany over Brexit, then full marks 
Succinct authoritative (and persuasive) analysis of where UK is at with exit and trade deals, by former Director General of the EU Council’s Legal Service @piris_jc. A must-read for anyone interested in Brexit.  
An excellent new paper for @These_Islands on the UK's place in the world - & what the effect on it of Brexit may be  
Brexit:Grimsby wants to have its Hake and eat it.#revokeA50forthwith#StopBrexit 
Here is the agreement I have signed for HMG with Cariforum to continue UK preferential trade arrangements for the Caribbean post-Brexit. Will be welcomed by the diaspora in the U.K. also.  
*Suddenly becomes massive enthusiast for Brexit*  
URGENT TRAVEL WARNING! Emily Thornberry has confirmed that "THE PLANES WILL NOT FLY" if we leave the EU without a Brexit deal. She made her announcement to the nation on BBC QT 16/11/17. Alan Sugar said that politicians who lie to the country should be jailed. I agree with him.  
.Let me help you out here.....NON-'Foreign' workers KNOW Brexit gave Britons a 'licence for racism'Not ALL Britons, but definitely the ones infested by your hate .  
'Sometimes it doesn't seem like they've thought all this through,' says Irish PM Leo Varadkar, in a nice bit of understatement on UJK's Brexit stance 
Yet another Brexit betrayal. We give concessions, extracting nothing in return David Davis's speech “went down like a Led Zeppelin", said one German business leader in attendance. We need to start speaking their language   
Was having a good week, so thought I'd wreck it by howling about the futility and stupidity of Brexit in @TimesBusiness 
The Government invokes the 'Dunkirk Spirit' & asks wheelbarrow owners to help transfer Brexit cash payments.£20bn? £40bn? £80bn?...  
Wanted:Investigative journalistClairvoyant AdventurerOr similarPurpose:To recover the fabled Lost Impact Statements of Brexit Reasonable expenses paid for the supply of Crystal Ball, Ouija board, Whips, Second homes, Moats etc etc 
Bilateral meeting with Theresa May before EU Social Summit, discussing Northern Ireland and Brexit  
Petition asked for investigation into Kremlin meddling in #Brexit. Govt response ignores this entirely. Please sign the petition to keep pressure on: 
This is the UK's very reasonable approach to the Brexit negotiations. On the EU side it is all about insult, threat, extortion & silly political gamesmanship.  
#Brexit benefitsMake our own lawsNot pay EU £10bn net a yrGet our fishing grounds backClose open door to EU immigrantsNot pay EU tariffs on imported non EU goodsSet all our own tax levelsDo trade deals with the rest of the worldWithdraw from ECHRStop live animal exports  
Theresa May knows Brexit will cause damage, says top Merkel ally  
Farm animals are #sentient #beings, Brexit or not. Help us keep the pressure up and save this much-needed legal status.  
Petition: Leave the EU immediately . 54,704 Signatures for the#Brexit we voted for RETWEET NOW! 
"CAN WE PLEASE STOP THE LIES?" - #Brexit Facts4EU Team destroy yet another Remoaner claim:  EU migrants growing, not falling. 
In 2017 white people are still tweeting that they did us a favour with their referendum to end apartheid. The sheer arrogance!  Can any white person who hold this view, vomits it openly and following my account PLEASE unfollow me. If you don't I'm blocking you. Nxa.  
EU MIGRANTS - Definitive analysis of latest figures, by the #Brexit Facts4EU Team :  Simple charts show it all. 
Latest message from #Brexit La-La-Land runs counter to statements on bonfires of regulations from Brexiteers and demands for lower standards from future trade partners  
Gave my two cents on current thoughts on brexit. Amused at Grimsby they get what they wanted but now they want what they had. UK perhaps neither the happiest or best educated country on the planet. 
"Away (with the fairies) Day"THAT DAVID DAVIS #BREXIT CONVERSATION IN FULL#StopBrexit 
Brexit: a terrifyingly successful move by Russia to weaken NATO. Let’s wake up. 
Let’s not forget that the ONLY reason that Cameron called the EU referendum was to settle the divisive civil war in the Tory Party over Europe. 17 months later, the divisions are far greater than ever. And the country languishes under a totally disfunctional Government! 
Remember what Davis said in 2012? ""If a democracy cannot change its mind then it ceases to be a democracy.""It's time for the UK to stop #Brexit in its tracks. It's still not too late! 
Brexit means a clean break. That's what we voted for. Strange how Remain keep trying to add bits and pieces, which is a shoddy attempt to keep us in  
"Sir Keir Starmer’s obsessive love affair" - A not-to-be-missed article by Martin Howe QC, laying it bare about Labour's anti-#Brexit man:  
Many risible moments in brexit saga but Davis lecturing EU on "not putting politics before prosperity" tops it all ! #Brexit @campbellclaret @DExEUgov. 
Seriously, at what point do we decide that this process is ruining the country & that the current Brexit team are completly incompetant   
Watch my lipsIf we stay in EU Single Market & the Customs Union we've not left the EUEvery country in the world has access to EU Single MarketUK will have access to EU Single Market after #BrexitIt's not difficult.Media try to mislead us cos they have their own pro EU agenda  
BBC News - UK 'trashing' its interests with Brexit  
Patronising or what?Rich banker doesn't like his cosy little world being disrupted so he's telling us plebs to vote againCos we clearly did not know what we were doing the first timeHe'd be better employed preparing for huge opportunities that will open up for us after #Brexit  
See why Brextremists hate experts when telling the truth would’ve lost them the referendum. Discussing the danger to security in a mo on @GMB 
If Brexit was the right thing to do, it wouldn’t have taken an avalanche of lies to make it happen. 
U.K. appeals to German business for Brexit help   
Britain prepares case to cut Brexit divorce bill  
Carney says the Bank of England will support economy no matter what Brexit deal  
Not too many @TheNationNZ shows left this year. Tune in tomorrow morning: @jacindaardern, Brexit, Gaza. #nationnz 
A bruising Brexit could shipwreck the British economy  via @FT; well this pretty much sums it up. What a mess Brexit is going to be #brexitshambles 
The irony is that after Brexit, millennials will need a mortgage to buy avocados.  Looking forward to making guacamole from great British peas, just like we did in the Blitz. 
David Davis - "Putting politics above prosperity is never a smart choice" Indeed it isn't, but that's exactly what the Tories have done with Brexit. You couldn't make this stuff up but clearly Davis can!! 
Brexit Britain deserves to lose its permanent place on the UN Se unity Council. It has no respect for the UN, it treats it with similar disdain as it’s attitude to the EU, because the Tories don’t like being told their policies are damaging the vulnerable. 
Gov claims rights they want to deny aren’t important - but jeopardizes whole Brexit deal by not guaranteeing them. >  
New York Times reporting Signs of Russian Meddling in Brexit Referendum -   
All non-Hindi people should support BSP leader Mayawati's demand that Uttar Pradesh be divided into 4 states.  Article 3 can be used to divide. Consent/referendum not required.  UP is the fountainhead of Brahmanism. Slice it up 
Brexit: 'Don't put politics above prosperity', Davis urges EU  
The only reason we even had a postal survey (not even a binding referendum) was because of weak leadership and having to appease his party’s numpty wing. Yet  fawning journos are in ecstasy over  his masterful leadership 
What a special evening #YRDSBQuest Wonderful to meet @MargaretTrudeau She asked if Scotland might join Canada instead of Brexit @NicolaSturgeon @JohnSwinney @JustinTrudeau @DuncanC64804105 @wilmacampbel1 @YRDSB 
Ken Clarke is quite simply a giant amongst peers, every measured word spoken makes complete sense.Parliament was too easily misled by the idea of having a referendum, itself so badly planned that the impact would be disastrous whatever the outcome. The rest is history, sadly.  
The #EUarmy is taking shape, despite #Remain claims that it was a “fantasy” They are building the United Federal States of #Europe!  #UK #EU #NEWS #BBC #SKY #TORY #LABOUR #UKIP #Conservatives #Brexit #Libdems 
#BBCQT Sad to see this young lady falling for project fear about Brexit and jobs.Completely EU indoctrinated.  
News alert! All 313 UK MPs who voted to ban the Precautionary Principle as part of #Brexit negotiations were later run over after failing to look both ways when crossing the road outside Parliament.  
In 500 days the #UK will have left the #EU. Thank you, the 52% - so proud of you all and privileged to be one of the 17,410,742. That Voted for #Freedom & #Brexit for #BRITAIN! #UK #EU #NEWS #BBC #SKY #TORY #LABOUR #UKIP #Conservatives 
So @Anna_Soubry says #Tory #Brexit rebel #MPs are being bullied. Meanwhile 17,410,742 #Leavers have been called old, stupid, gullible, misinformed, uneducated, xenophobic & racists! So, Anna, spare us your pitiful victimhood! @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #BBC #SKY #UK #EU 
Mind boggling hypocrisy from David Davis as he warns EU not to put 'politics above prosperity' in Brexit talksHe should be saying this to his own party#stopbrexit 
Brexit has caused Europeans to doubt what sort of country Britain is, David Davis admits  
There's lots that can be done to stop the foolishness of Brexit, and millions of us who will not just sit back and watch the UK be destroyed by it. Sitting back is what got us into this mess. 
The Tories embrace #Brexit As do @UKLabourTime to support @LibDems and their call for a second referendum 
Quite remarkable that the Government response to a petition to investigate foreign interference in the EU referendum mentions Crimea, but manages to avoid any allusion whatsoever to the EU referendum.   
Leaked EU paper dents May's hopes for bespoke Brexit trade deal | Politics | The Guardian  
Hahaha yeah, we feel wonderfully welcome since Brexit vote...   
It's a source of genuine confusion to me why so many people haven't clicked that Brexit  has to happen.Not because of a diktat of a royal proclamation but because the alternative is to obliterate faith in democracy at a time when it's needed more than ever. 
Brexit could push UK off security 'cliff-edge'  
Party politics are not important when the future of your nation is at stake. Britain has much to offer the world. It must not be sidelined economically, politically, and morally by Brexit. Fighting for Britain together - whatever our party politics.  
"Is Brexit driving us mad?" @afneil "I think it is slightly driving us mad on both sides of the the divide" @greenmiranda 
AngusMacNeilSNP: RT jjr205: Andrew Neil on this week criticising Russia Today about interference and fake news during referendums and election, what about the bbc spreading lies during the Scottish independence referendum.  
Another cut-out-and-keep headline! Of course Brexit isn’t putting politics above prosperity, not at all.  
David Davis warns EU not to put 'politics above prosperity' in Brexit talks  
Jesus wept. So Brexit is ‘rational’?! Triggerng A50 without a plan was ‘rational’? Holding a pointless snap election while clock was ticking is ‘rational’? Thick as mince, to coin a phrase  
God this obsessive anti-Russian theme is tiresome on #bbctw - especially as spuriously overplays idea it's Kremlin wot done it / won it re #Brexit - ironically #RT guy sounds less conspiratorial than rest. 
Sadly Louise. Though we credit you with some overall narrative, you backed #Brexit. And until late last year it was Milo/MercerMensch/MurdochNever to late to repent though...  
The Kremlin is interfering in The West.... you mean like Pres Obama did in UK's #EURef vote, telling use we're all stupid to vote for #Brexit, we should vote remain... that's "not" interference from USA? #bbctw 
In search of a world leader at #COP23:#EmmanuelMacron beautiful speech but no teeth#AngelaMerkel crippled by dirty coal#DonaldTrump's "clean" coal delegation farcical #JerryBrown bury the earth protectors#TheresaMay fire fighting Brexit at Con H.Q.#Uniting4Climate 
Keir, you’re a smart man. Work out how Labour can stop colluding with these bloody Tories and start being an *opposition*, especially on Brexit: ill-conceived, corrupt Disaster Capitalism and not in anyone’s interest except billionaire capitalist vultures. Go figure. 
You could Keir. And that includes the ridiculous lack of opposition from the Labour Party that means the Govt has carte blanche & today abolished Parliamentary sovereignty over many key citizens' rights. Stop backing Brexit. #FBPE 
I completely disagree. In a democracy, we trust people to vote on many issues simultaneously at General Elections; in a referendum, people vote on only one. Every argument in this article applies as much to elections as to referendums. Elitist, dangerous.  
nah what has happened is the Russian Trump collusion narrative has collapsed in the states, so got some unemployed leftists in the states looking for work.. hence the Russian Brexit collusion #bbctw 
And Muslims. They built their entire campaign around "vote Brexit to have fewer Muslims". 
I like to think of it as a community of #GlobalPreppers  all supporting one another 
We are told ppl from EU countries that work in UK are in a Brexit panic and leaving so why do new figs show there's 112,000 more now than last year. Its rising every quarter. 
“We voted for a hard Brexit” Really? Oh that’sll be why May secured that landslide in the general election. #ignorethefacts 
U.K Prime Minister May Deploys Anti-Russian Propaganda to Distract from Brexit Crisis  By Julie Hyland (@CRG_CRM @WSWS_Updates) #Brexit  
Hilton: Disappointed that current govt did not recognize the results of the vote. Says a PC government would commit to honoring the results of the 2019 referendum. #D11onTap 
openskies is dependent on being part of the EU. This is the regulatory system all our airtravel uses. So yes if we dropped out of the EU tomorrow planes would have legal/safety/regulatory issues. #brexit #brexitreality #bbcqt 
Goldman Sachs boss calls for second Brexit referendum - The Independent#FinalSay  
We need to repeal the 1972 EC Act NOW, not wait until the day we #Brexit !! #EUWithdrawalBill 
EFTA court boss quits, reducing UK’s post-Brexit chances  
45,000 messages out of hundreds of millions. 45,000 messages on bot accounts that only other bots follow. It's noise. Obama did far more to influence the #BRexit outcome. #BBCTW 
U.K. Opens Door to Tech Talent, But Brexit Concerns Remain 
It’s a shame about McDonell’s budget, he wouldn’t need to borrow a penny if the Labour Party actually opposed #brexit #bbcqt 
Roaming is free in Europe.... So use your normal data... Oh no... Brexit...  
Sadly, I feel hard Brexit is the real goal of these negotiations. They’re not meant to succeed, only make it look like we tried, but the EU weren’t being reasonable. It’s a con.  
Without a leader who can negotiate an inferior brexit, we will be left with a small brexit! 
Exactly. We currently have a parliament that believes brexit will make us poorer, yet marching us out of the EU because it is the will of 37% of an electorate that understands nothing about the situation. What happened to parliament LEADING the country? 

